
DEMONOLOGY 

   era 

REVIVAL 









   Moscow 

  ROSSPEN 

    1996 

a 

      General editorial, compilation and preface 

                     ML Timofeeva 



       Translations by VL Gafner, SL Koyransky, 

     N.W. Simonovoy, ML. Timofeeva, EL Sherwood 



     N.V. Simonova, Yu.O. Suvorova, 

                     ML Timofeeva 









   Demonology of the Renaissance (XVI-XVII centuries). 

P er. from English, Latin, German, French / General edition and 

compilation by M.A. Timofeev. - M .: And the publishing house "Ros- 

sian political encyclopedia", 1995. - 464 p., 

ill. 

    For the first time, the Russian reader gets the opportunity to get acquainted with 

deal with demonological treatises and pamphlets that appeared 

mission in Western Europe in the 16th-17th centuries. The deeds of the devil and his 

henchmen, demonic hierarchy, acts of witchcraft and connections with the mi- 

rum of Darkness, perceived as reality - that's what attracts 

the attention of the authors of these works, including D. Gifford, 

F. von Schpee, S. Cyrano de Bergerac and other famous figures 

this time. The second part of the book presents various points 

view of this phenomenon of our contemporaries, who are trying to make out 

Xia in the reasons for the emergence of faith in the devil and unfolding in 

renaissance "witch hunt". The book is provided with notes - 

mi and rare illustrations, and its materials will be of interest to 

to a limited circle of readers, since most of the works are re- 

introduced into Russian for the first time. 









                               © Compilation, preface, notes 

                                 chaniya, artistic design 

                                 publishing house     "Rossiyskaya 

                                 political     encyclopedia", 

ISBN 5- 86004- 021- 0             1995. 



                    DEMON OLOGI I 

                IN EP OHHU REVIVED AND I 









   And the historians who touched upon the issues in their work 

ses associated with demonology and witchcraft processes 

mi, explained the flourishing of these phenomena at the end of the 15th—on- 

the beginning of the 17th century by the following factors. Long time 

I interpreted this as the result of ordinary mental 

noe underdevelopment and insufficient intellectual 

progress in the specified period*. Others saw the reason 

ny in the economic, socio-political and du- 

govnoy crisis of society that engulfed Western Eu- 

ropu, without going into details, however. H most 

often there is a statement that the inflation of the demo- 

nomania (and, consequently, the development of its base, scientific 

demonology) was the answer of the beleaguered 

personal church on the advanced ideas of the thinkers of the era 

Renaissance and humanism, whose "criticism 

does not leave a stone ... from any religious mysticism 

and mythology"**. However, researchers still 

have not been able to substantiate why 

it was in the bright era of the Renaissance with its bright expression 

interest in man and the sciences, in an era 

more advanced, in their opinion, than the Middle Ages, 

the system of witch processes took shape and appeared 

the bulk of anti-Vedic and demonological 

treatises. 

   Demonic representations (whether folk, scientists) - 

phenomenon is very complex, incorporating all the many 

difference in the cultural tradition of the society. reflected in 

pamphlets, materials of some trials, people 

naya demonology is a fusion of stable 

      This point of view dominated especially in the popular literature. 

literature of the 19th-early 20th centuries, see for example: K antorovich Ya.A. Medium- 

ageless 

Ш< 

             witch trials. M., 1990; Orlov M.A. And the story of the dream 

   ** and th man with the devil. M., 1991, etc. 

      Boguslavsky V.M. Skepticism of the Renaissance and the Reformation. // 

Culture of the Renaissance and the Reformation. L., 1981, p. 22-23 



the howling of the pre-Christian, pagan tradition, the main 

Thus, in the field of ideas about good and evil, partly 

sti znakharstva etc., and some representations, 

rooted due to the influence of the book, christian 

Anan tradition. The latter mainly affect 

moments that determine the functioning of the demonic 

structure (the role of Divine will, 

the power of demons, the devil, witches, etc. - all these positions 

tions are taken from the field of scientific Christian demono- 

logic). The sixteenth century really became the 

century, which saw a surge of popular 

interest in the demonic, when "summoned to life" 

nor social and political crisis, disintegration 

traditional social relations and moral 

foundations, the rapid growth of irrationalism found its 

razzhenie in the demonomania of the masses "*. Breaking time 

always encourages people to turn to irrational 

mu, because they see no way out in the possibility 

use of the official means available to them 

noah secular or clerical ideology. And here, 

As a rule, the question always arises about the ratio 

medieval and new, humanistic element in 

the formation of demonology and the development of demonoma- 

n ii. And researchers studying the Renaissance and 

originally convinced of its progressiveness compared to 

in common with the Middle Ages, it is usually argued that 

The revival is innocent of witch-hunts and that demo- 

nology is not a product of Renaissance freedom 

thoughts"", but is one of the results 

crisis of the Middle Ages, whose existence is chronologically 

coincided with the beginning of a new stage in the development 

culture, Renaissance culture***. However, take 

May this thesis, one can hardly be content with it 

as a universal explanation. 

    Indeed, it is possible and necessary to talk about the crisis 

church to an organization (to a lesser extent, to a crisis 

all of its theoretical ideology), about the contradiction of its 

practical activities of Christian moral 

values, but in itself to the crisis, religious 



     Gorfunkel A.Kh. "Hammer of the Witches" - the Middle Ages. or Renaissance 

denie? / / Culture of the Renaissance and society. M., 1986. p. 169. 

  ** Ibid., Fr. 162, 170. 

 *** Ibid., p. 165. 



wars, etc. * can hardly be tied only 

to   the Middle Ages. Crisis in Church Organization 

observed permanently, starting from the 10th century, and all 

the efforts of the Lunians, Gregory VII, Innocent III, 

whether short-term by results and not overcome 

negative (in terms of Christian doctrine) 

trends in this area. However, for all that 

witchcraft, magicians, shabash were known to the whole public 

to a property, I am attracted and th, similar to demonomania of the 16th-17th centuries 

kov, as well as such an extensive anti-Vedic literature 

ry, it wasn't. And this is when faith in various 

representatives of evil spirits was, if not deeper, 

it is more organic than in the Renaissance. Missing 

the psychological atmosphere that allowed 

lila church and state, as well as part of society 

formalize a clear ideological (demonology) and 

practical (Vedian processes) system of combating 

these I own and I am mi. The conditions that pushed the determined 

fief (by the way, not so much) part of the people 

into the arms of the devil, were created through the efforts 

and the Catholic Church itself, and the influence of the ideological 

gy of the Renaissance, and the participation in this of some activities 

lei Reformation, whose religious intolerance is good 

sho is known. The role of socio-economic and political 

The physical factors here are also enormous. People, zan and- 

those who learned witchcraft practice were probably not 

satisfied with what the official 

the local church in the field of spiritual inquiries; equals 

they were not content with the Renaissance ideology and 

culture, which for the most part was alien to them not 

only because she wore, mainly, the city 

its character and, most likely, was simply not 

known**, but also because the Renaissance anthropo- 

centrism radically destroyed the habitual for people 

medieval system of the world order, refuting 

with their main provisions, all their worldviews- 

nie. Despite the fact that these people instead of God put 

Satan and all the rituals of the Black Mass and the Sabbath are 



    ,* Ibid., p. 169. 

       It is hardly possible, however, to fully agree with the following 

S.M. Stam’s statement: “Renaissance humanism .. was an ideology 

Early-bourgeois, that is, anti-feudal, which means - people's", 

/ ^tam S M . Humanism and Church Reformation Ideology / 1zyxwvutsrqp 

Culture of the Renaissance and the Reformation. L., 1981. p. 35. 



was a kind of mirror reflection, a parody, 

denial, however, of the reversal of the system 

did not happen upside down - the person remained 

in a subordinate position within the system, headed by 

lyaemy only not by God, but by Satan. People, the sign of oh 

with the ideology of humanism (we are talking here should go, which 

of course, about the townspeople) and consciously analyzing 

their possible consequences, feeling them on yourself 

all its influence, especially if, by their turn of mind, they are 

flocked by people of the Middle Ages, could not satisfy 

transfer of the center of the entire system of vision of the world from God to 

person. Such a cardinal reformation of the fundamental 

ropon imania inevitably knocked a person out of his 

ral-psychological rut, since as a result 

those became unclear to him, including many 

moral imperatives that he guided- 

earlier and who, in his usual medieval 

systems were all linked to God. "In your fight 

for secular human culture"* (as if earlier 

it was not human), during which the 

there has been a historically positive shift in 

field of human sciences, especially natural, ideal 

the ologists of human and zma made this, at first glance, 

It's expensive to carry a job, it's a long way off. 

shchie consequences. If before that, over the course of the table- 

ty human existence was determined by a harmonious, theological 

logically designed system, the core of which 

served as the Divine beginning, now this ster- 

the zhen was removed, and the central place was occupied by a man. 

It is characteristic, however, that the ideology of the Renaissance is so 

and could not offer society a single, answering 

to the interests and demands of all, a moral system 

values; very quickly this ideology came up already 

to his human crisis, which found expression 

ing, in particular, in the work of W.Sh expir, M. Servan- 

tesa, B .P ask ala . Principle of anthropocentrism, destruction 

shing the entire traditional system of worldview, ob- 

actively contributed to the release of all human 

potentialities, regardless of their nature, although, without 

conditionally, in their treatises, theorists of humanism 

appealed to the best in man, at the same time 

trying to create a well-known system of moral 



    Ibid, p. thirty. 



lyators. However, since the presence of this system and 

her work was made entirely dependent on human 

Well, it couldn't work. Stopping the last 

the head of the corner pushed into the background what is determined 

lyalo (albeit in theory) spiritual and moral being 

medieval society - Divine. now 

this divine spiritual was made dependent on 

biological organism, man, which is directly opposite 

opposed to Christian doctrine. Here you can even 

talk about the well-known formalism of the Renaissance, i.e. 

about its conversion due to the action of this factor to 

external side of the phenomenon in its analysis and disclosure 

tii, more precisely, to manifestation as such, even if 

it is the result of an inner, spiritual 

process. And this, in our opinion, explains 

partly the interest of Renaissance figures in all external 

him, physical manifestations of life and activity 

human and analysis and work with ethical concepts 

applied to an abstract person, not concrete 

nomu. That is why it seems possible for us to speak of 

that such a worldview, which did not leave any 

one hundred standing outside and above the human moral regulative 

lyator, moral and psychological support, and, rather, yes- 

same, its consequences, psychological conditions, that 

Teyan atmosphere, which was created as a result of 

development of society and the impact on it of the ideology of 

birth, in their own way contributed to rejection, dressing up 

do with the official church, and these views, for- 

setting to turn to the world of dark forces. Although, end- 

however, the effect of this factor should not be exaggerated 

wat. 

     Speaking about the place of the Catholic Church in the creation of 

research and study of the demonic pantheon, as well as 

struggle with him, it should be noted that it was her idea 

logs play a leading role in creating the 

demonic systems. If you look at that 

how the folk demonology endows them with traits 

tellers of the other world, then this one will be arty, with 

on the one hand, not new and traditional, but on the other - 

surprisingly poor in visual imagery and meager 

developed (especially in England). It can be said that 

The Church herself is partly the creator of that system. 

we, against which we fought. Overwhelming pain 

most demonological treatises belong to 

whether 

   R U church authors, which is quite justified also 



because from the 11th to the 2nd century, witchcraft gradually began 

can be treated as a religious crime, and 

therefore, the church considers it its duty to 

to roam with him. But only in the 16th century in the writings of the church 

nyh writers appears in detail painted 

hierarchy of demonic legions and their leaders 

(see, for example, the work of Johann Weyer “On pseudo- 

demon monarchies"), only then do the details 

vivid and colorful descriptions of the Sabbath (M. Delrio, P. de 

Lan to r). The question is why the church is so zealously 

clearly turned to the fight against witchcraft and magic named after 

but at this time, very difficult. Entering the pages 

of his writings bright and e pictures of the activity of evil 

harmful demons, explaining by their intrigues everything that starts 

nay from the radical snail and to him by natural disasters, 

Catholic and Protestant writers least of all 

th, in our opinion, thought about the need to directly 

to fight in this area and precisely in this way and mi 

means against the humanistic worldview. 

The authors of many treatises, creating them, often have 

whether in view of more public peace and order in 

state, rather than a direct polemic with the 

advocates of a new ideology. Paradoxically, but true - 

speaking at the same time against traditional peoples 

other beliefs and customs, these writers preserved in 

their works yah numerous folklore 

motives associated with dark forces, playing the same 

we play a positive role in the preservation of cultural 

nogo inheritance. However, the abundance of such writings 

says, of course, that the church itself is in the 

tse some of their representatives tried so to them 

answer the questions put before her 

crisis situation in society. Sde- 

to lay it the way she wanted, it did not work out; explain- 

thread all the failures and failures, based only on the 

conventional concept of good and evil, no longer succeeded, 

therefore, the demonic theme by the middle of the 17th century 

child in the political and cultural life of the majority 

European states in the background. 

    And the attitude of the figures of the Renaissance themselves is also interesting. 

niya to the problem of witchcraft. It was very different - 

from acceptance (with certain reservations) to proclaiming 

niya of this I am attracted and I am an invention of the ignorant and pre- 

foot churchmen. However, some well-known 

nye figures of humanistic culture gave a solid 

8 



a new tribute to the issue of combating witchcraft. Here you can 

to name the names of Jean Baudin, who published in 1580 

"Demonomania of witches", the English King James I with 

his "Demonology" (though almost during his lifetime and on- 

called "the most enlightened fool"). Right- 

seriously doubting the various moments 

witchcraft practice (flights to Shabash), they are still 

believed in intrigues and the devil and his deeds and I. 









   The book offered by us is aimed primarily at 

to acquaint the reader with those treatises which 

most fully and original aln about reveal the main 

plots and plots of demonology of the 16th-17th centuries, 

and not in its “scientific” version, but, rather, in 

native, or rather, how the ideas of witchcraft were perceived 

in various social strata of the then European 

Pei society. And that is why it is not included here 

we are translations of texts and classical demonology 

treatises, such as, for example, "Muravinik" 

Iogan Nidera or the mentioned work of Iogann 

Weyer. Presented treatises, dialogues, pamphlets 

you, the letters make it possible to recreate k artin y 

n immania of the image of a witch, devil, God, demons, an- 

gelov precisely (with rare exceptions) on average, 

folk level. It also contributes to the social 

the composition of the authors of these works - from the monk and 

puppy to a professional writer. H and taya these 

compositions, one can easily trace the dynamics of the change 

of the specified concepts - from the recognition of guilt 

witches, their equality with demons (And oann Trittemius) to 

denial of their active role (J. Gifford) and complete 

innocence (F. von Schpee, S. Cyrano de Bergerac), from 

categorical condemnation of all, without exception, de- 

monic forces to a sympathetically positive attitude 

relations with incubi and succubi (L.-M. Sinistrari). Ha- 

It is characteristic that the change in the positions of contemporaries 

emanates mainly in the same environment, 

church, which once again speaks of the complexity of the task and 

the impossibility of making categorical judgments 

on this issue. It is indicative that already from the beginning 

XVII century in a number of countries there is a kind of 

keeping the concepts of "witch" and "devil" when the world is dark 



                                                         9 



nyh forces is investigated in isolation from practice to comfort and 

friendship As a result, the ration alistic XVII century 

theoretically closes this problem, and interest in witchcraft 

wu and demonology in European scientific circles 

sat. This continued until 1830, when 

"Letters on Witchcraft" by Walter Scott, which put 

the beginning of a new era in the study of this cultural and historical 

cheskogo I'm bound and I . 



                                        M L. Timofeev 



      PART ONE 



      "The whole earth 

full of demons... 



K *pr. t 1,14 

KYUVICH 

, 

! fiVI Ch 

>r I Gorevich 

Sh aDSVI Ch 

>s!si 1jeyich 

rornch 

' )rswich 

and ip )ВП Ч 

ii,i Ь I Ч 





M I N O V 1 

ORI Ch 

O T ^R R I H 





LU H DrhVI H 

 IM LEE YOU VICH 

ovich 

"UVI Ch 

ikgorovich 

FI SOVI CH 

 And 1erevich 

switch 

Cheevnc 

\..1skseevych 

Orovich 



John Trithemius 

    TRAK TAT 

ABOUT EVIL PEOPLE 

  I O K OLDUN AH 



       John Trittemia, 

 Heads of the Abbey of Saint James 

          in Hvrbypol, 

once the oke of the abbot of Spangeim 

    treatise on bad people 

          and about sorcerers 

   (III question to Maximilian I, 

         Roman Emperor) 



    Question one1:zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJ 

                      why evil people, bad and stupid 

in relation to faith, what are those women who 

we colloquially call witches, they can believe 

levitate with evil spirits when people are good and re- 

the most prominent adherents of the Christian faith cannot 

Gut neither good spirits to control, nor eternally evil? 

    Before answering this question, I will say this: 

in all deeds, divine majesty is observed 

the unchanging proportion of the genus and order of beauty, and 

this steadfastness is achieved in accordance with the location 

niem all steps and gradations. And more without correspond- 

nothing exists in this world in general order. At 

                               2 

such an order of free will, which the Creator of all- 

icic gave to people, does not experience harassment from the same 

the drain of power, of which 3 let less remain in 

in the order that he received from the master of his 

creations of the first man. That's why none of the good 

decent mortals, guided by their own 

desire, as well as none of the evil people who left 

left to the mercy of fate solely because of their desire 

shadow, thanks to the merciful Lord is not 

a sinner. In the same way we get excited 

righteous desire and good spirits, if confirmed 

we wait by our labors for our pious faith in 

Christ that we carry in our hearts. Like that- 

mu how good will makes good people 

equal in spirit to angels, so the corruption of evil 

makes people look like demons. That's why 

poor and spoiled people, the more they become spoiled due to their own 

I, the more evil, are desired, the more they become 

mood like evil demons. In its turn, 

close friendship arises as a result of the similarity of sympathy 

ty, and from it gradually flows mutual agreement 

rie. And from the trust of the lower to the higher, power is born, 

either real or feigned fake. And so, at 

vicious people whose power seems like 

the power of demons, it is the result of their unusual 

tea vice. When their aspirations begin to 

likewise and say 4, they either reject or 

more they overcome the cunning of the demons they meet, 

or they become so and mi, to like them. For themselves de- 

mons among themselves are by no means equal in cunning or 

Mind, but different in comparison with the other is much superior 

feeds him with cunning, quickness of thought and unrighteousness 



                                                  15 



the intensity of their passions. So, for example, those of them who 

which shake the foundations of the earth, are more connected with her 

upper regions and they inhabit caves and grottoes; 

others are much weaker in comparison with them, and 

it comes to the fact that they are afraid of swords, rods and 

threats scaring them of their people. With regard to them, one can 

mother, that these are just those demons that we call 

energymen. The demons, who are in a greater 

away from the ground and more subtle in nature, less often 

encounter people. In turn, bad people 

because of their inclination, they do things that are most 

nye debauchery, becoming at the same time unusually similar - 

mi on the demons who grant them their friendship5. IN 

due to this, they become unusually daring and 

take over the demons, whose semblance of power 

they enjoy, however not real, violent, 

but false. And more demons constantly support times 

subordinate people in a state of depravity, 

pretending at the same time that their dominion was shaken, and 

they themselves willingly obey them, as if by good 

                                6 

bowing to the will to obey ov. And for, truly, no one 

will not be exalted in power above the demons, besides the human 

century, whose faith in the Lordship of Jesus Christ God 

ours becomes properly pleasing to God, 

for thus he speaks of those who truly believe in the Lord and Jesus 

rit Scripture: “And he gave them power over all the demon- 

     7 

m and » . Therefore, demons like them control 

bad people that friendship and connections with them make 

slaves and subordinates. So, if anyone from the 

bes born in the mud rises for a long time (which 

happens often) and, being bound by friendship, attracted 

repents to management, without objection receiving everything that 

required to further assert their dominance, though 

and equal to the royal, then people around him are bad 

and the rejected ones, who are in friendship with the demons, 

more daring impudence is espoused and imitated; 

I'm not talking about the manifestations of power that they 

demonstrate due to the similarity of their bad ha- 

raktera. Therefore, they receive from the demons everything that 

nor will they demand, in all the tangled 

or, conversely, clear cases, except that 

forbidden by divine decree - this they 

cannot be discovered. However, not everywhere rejected and 

bad people gather together; do it those with whom 

rym demons conclude some kind of contract, and 



namely the witches, over whom he also establishes 

the patronage of the Devil, and those who communicate with 

demons and were popularly called necromancers. 

    There are two kinds of people who are allowed to rule 

demons. 

    Sd 

    Again, there are two kinds of people, desiring their command 

be demons that discover this, concluding 

prohibited and harmful contracts with them. 

    The first most pernicious kind of these people consists of 

witches who enter into an agreement with demons, 

solemnly announcing that they voluntarily 

are given to them as their property and go on a permanent basis 

service. To what extent is this most pernicious kind of 

dey can do atrocities, i can not describe any 

one man, living, oh the wisest Caesar, in 

your empire. And for denying God as the source of everything, 

and the faith of Christ, and holy baptism, they offer 

your mind and body to demons, leading to an upset state 

casting people and cattle with their witchcraft, causing them 

harm and even killing them. There is no such disease, which (with 

God's permission) they cannot send on people, 

since he and, observing the articles of the aforementioned agreement 

thief, pose as servants of demons and do everything 

anything, just wanting to compare with them. That's why 

they are not tolerated anywhere, but rather, everywhere they are persecuted 

God, the creator of all things, who prescribes 

                                            9 

the following: "Don't let witches live." One of 

them with witchcraft spells n an and I m and summon demons, 

Others attract them with supplications and sacrifices. 

yami, while others call them to the aid of their inhuman 

through terrible deeds and ceremonies. Next- 

consequently, it is not surprising that witches seem to be in 

over the demons they became like 



                                                    17 



live a wicked will and a spirited one 

to the bad in the human race. 

    The second kind of vicious people, desiring to command 

demons, these are the ones we colloquially call 

n ek rom an tam and 1 0 . They say that with the help of different 

a kind of spell they can call demons into a circle, 

detect them in a crystal or a stoppered vessel 

and make them visible. These most evil people, half- 

false deceit and superstition, commit the same bad deeds 

la, how and x a good person cannot even imagine 

smash. 

    In order to attract demons to their service, they use 

mainly used by the ugliest victims 

rinsing and quite openly conclude with them 

contract. They distribute many different 

vile books and zhechek, full of wickedness and lies, with inscribed 

by the names of the ancient philo- 

sofas and scholars, distributing which they introduce into 

wandering of many careless and curious people 

dey, dragging them into his trap. They promise them unbelievable 

I t nye tales, having heard which, people are deceitful 

way and get dependent on them. 

    With the help of rings, pendants, images, conspiracies 

ditches and spells, they, according to them, can reduce 

evil demons and squeeze them into a circle, into a crystal or 

another receptacle, and they will answer all questions 

them separate answers. They all promise it, but in 

In our time, there are few people who are indicated by 

bad and evil spirits obey in this way, for the Lord 

go with your just decision does not allow that- 

inquisitive and prone to new people would disdain 

Regali by the faith of Christ and, if necessary, striving 

lis to get an answer from the demons. Yet, to whom I will obey 

there are evil spirits, called spells of anan and yam and necromancers 

comrades, without hesitation, go to them as accomplices 

on the basis of the concluded agreement. The rest, who 

ryh clear majority, evil spirits refuse to 

to be guilty, although they were not afraid all this time 

swear by the godless art of necromancer Comrade. And therefore 

in our days, various 

hardships, and for many, love grows cold, and too much 

these proud and extraordinarily deceitful people are strengthened; 

and no matter how much they are despised by demons for their 

hasty views, they manage to mislead 

many staunch people in the faith. Believe me, caesar, 



18 



that these false people, living in your sacred 

empires are the most vicious; it is they who are 

the deep source from which the but- 

you witches and sorcerers. They promise a lot and all of you 

think. For all that they are promised by them by their Igers, 

are false inventions, and they show nothing believing 

who, besides crimes, cunning and extraordinary 

stupid deceptions. When does it seem that they are the most 

are connected in a certain way with demons, then everyone becomes 

it is clear that from participating in their affairs it is necessary to 

as soon as possible to run away, as if from the most terrible 

torments of hell. And for the deeds of these necromancers are many 

demons come running in a gesture and, in order to support them in 

in a treacherous act, they, if they can, give them vows. 

When they are called with the help of incantations, they 

reject any comparison with people, but despite 

on it steals the minds calling them them. 

    There is also a nek and th kind of people, how stupid, so 

prejudiced - I mean those 

who, not wishing to have intercourse with demons, use 

are, nevertheless, in their affairs various false 

sewing techniques peculiar to demons, and 

completely unlawful. Because they think that 

inside the objects they use is enclosed a 

kay and secret power, and for this they commit 

personal terrible deeds against the faith of Christ. By- 

truth, there is not enough time to count all their 

the madness with which they persecute us. 

    It is also necessary to briefly say why 

good and just people do not seek power over 

demons. In what way is the similarity of inclinations 

there are bad and wicked people equal to demons, such 

how does the dissimilarity of inclinations completely 

pushes away from them good and just. Between 

people dissimilar and opposite in their aspirations 

niyam cannot be any kind of friendship, but constantly 

there is a sharp confrontation and hatred. There, 

where there is no similarity of desires, there is no close connection 

zi; there can be no trust in relation to a friend 

To 

   friend, no mutual attraction in the production of human 

anything wonderful. Likewise, you, glorious Caesar, will 

chi a great ruler, you bring something closer to yourself 

Friendly, but resisting quite the opposite 

I am also desired by your rights and different from yours. 

 Obviously people are kind and righteous, constantly resisting 



those who succumb to the vicious desire of demons cannot 

enter into an alliance with them, because they do not want and do not 

are invited to be bound, but with all their might 

run and refuse such meetings. Here's how- 

to whom the opinion is false, according to which they say that the demons 

simply submit to their authority. For it cannot be 

a connection is strong if it is not preceded by the similarity of desire 

n and y; there can be no agreement between opposites 

stymi; there can be no friendship between unlike. One- 

but demons do not obey all the bad and damned 

people, but at least those with whom they 

by means of treaties and agreements are combined into an alliance and co- 

whom they can regard only as their own 

faithful. Hearing that they are called, they voluntarily 

rush to a meeting; but at the atom they say 

that they are forced to do so. And so, there is nothing surprising 

of the body, the most excellent Caesar, that bad, 

evil and corrupt spirits sometimes, as they say, appear 

are needed by people who, as we said, are brought closer to 

them disfavor and ordinary human malice. But 

it is not common for every Christian to wish to govern 

demons, relying on a similarity in bad deeds and x. 

Therefore, if anyone in this life wished to have as 

comrades of evil spirits, then in the future he will 

children will burn with them in the flames of hell. But 

how honest and just people cannot govern 

holy angels of God, then they, according to their good will, 

are likened. And so, I think that, relying on the saying azan - 

above, it will be easy to answer questions if we 

Let us recall the difference in the ideas of these people. 

For no matter how much there is in the Church of God, 

people of faith, whose piety is dear to many 

can gain salvation, however, even today 

there are those who seek to receive rewards from the angels 

du, citing as a basis either holiness or 

that they are afraid of demons, or their close unity. 

What is happening is that today's people do not manage - 

because of holiness - by evil spirits and do not deserve 

the friendship of holy angels lives on. If anyone strives 

Xia to the yuth degree of holiness, which makes it possible to commit 

perform miracles in the Church, as the saints once did, 

they can become more powerful and rule 

demons, as well as to have friendly participation blessed 

spirits. And more it is determined that the holy and dear God 

people in the original Church of Christ were strong 



20 



her, contributing to the establishment of goodness among mortals, 

using the benefits of good spirits rather than wickedness 

bad deeds. Many miracles can be performed by resort- 

casting to spells n an and i m, but similar with the help of angels 

saints can be created by any zealous admirer 

Lord God. 

    Question two: how do witches possess with 

what power that allows them to do so much 

different and surprising, moreover, at the same time, what 

or how much no good man could commit 

sew for your whole life? 

    If we wish to briefly answer this question, 

then we will definitely say that all power is from the Lord 

God, without whom no creature can do anything 

will be able. And more says in the sacred Gospel Christ: 

                                           11 

• you can't do anything without me”, whence 

it can be seen that the power to do something is bestowed on any person 

love from the Lord God, and not from somewhere, is it bad 

people will commit or good. And here's what he says 

great Augustine: “God's will is the first and highest 

the cause of all physical species and mental movements 

no, nothing else. And may every creature in this world 

it will become clear to the most personal and huge republic, 

that is not from secrets oh, invisible, as well as intelligible 

the supreme authority of the emperor is established or 

permitted, but inexplicably fair 

distribution of rewards and punishments”. That's why, oh 

dawn, should not doubt that this power 

witches, with the help of which (and with the assistance of demo- 

new) they produce terrible and unprecedented deeds, 

is given to them from the Lord God, whose will no one can 

can resist even without the influence of which a person 

                                   12 

even a hand move can not be able to. They draw conclusions 

holy doctors that neither demons nor witches can 

at least do something at all - whether to harm a person, 

animal, if Almighty God does not wish, 

will not agree and give them the power to do what 

that with their bad desire they have already decreed 

lat. But if God is not willing and agrees, then neither 

° The bottom of the creature will not be able to do anything; otherwise 

tea, if it were possible what he did not want and with 

whatever one disagrees with, then from this it is necessary 

Sl 

   goes that God is powerless and cannot forbid what 

It is done against His will. But so to how to every person 

the age, being created, depends on God, then it does not 



can do without His desire and I, thanks to which he 

and * does something, and can achieve what he wants. 

And so, everything that witches do, happens with permission 

niya of God, without whose will they can do nothing; 

for if God will not agree to do what they want, 

then neither m nor the demons will be allowed to do this, for the whole 

power comes from the Lord God, under whom all things exist 

exists and lives, for He is the first cause of all things, and 

from H of it we accept free will, from H of it also 

we can get what we want; but many people 

believe that they do not by human art 

they are those atrocities that they commit, but with the assistance of 

vii demons whom He made tone to them according to their nature 1 3 

and after long experiments for the production of fleeting 

miracles. But surprising effects are not caused, due to 

harassed by witches, what they use in 

witchcraft? These are the heads of the dead, toads, snakes, 

personal metals, figurines and the like. N about origin 

this comes from the Devil who created these signs, who, 

filled with pride, strives at least apparently 

ability to be equal to God. And indeed, to a to All- 

mighty God established in his Church some mysteries 

va, which are properly supported by servants 

living and x point to salvation and lead to benefit and 

for the good of people, so is the Devil, who does not want to 

more, how to be considered equal to God, also sort of like 

established certain sacraments in which you help him 

called or contracted employee, 

and if God allows, then he does evil, about which 

forces; if he does not allow, then he, in general, does nothing 

can do. For the creator of all the deeds of witches and necro- 

manti - the Devil, who, through the inclinations of his 

mediators chosen by him earlier, conducts in subject- 

the matter given to him a desired deed, sometimes real, 

sometimes only to azhusch esya. The witches themselves 

spoiled by their desire and the fact of complicity, 

are cured through an agreement into an agreement with demons, and 

receive from themselves certain signs and symbolic 

          14 

about tm etc. And x protection and tn and to s and demons soon presented 

ut. There is nothing in these destructive actions of demons 

stronger than the thoughtless gullibility of witches, which 

multiplied by pact and solemn promise, 

for how much more are the demons, or their signs, and they will be 

be corrupted by their faith, the greater the impact those 

achieve this cooperation. Too malicious 



22 



the depravity of the mood of the witches plunges them into some 

                      15 

in an angry way, so that the demons, gathering, fight 

zu take possession of their mind and bring them closer to themselves, and, on- 

falling on them, mark, if God permits, them 

signs and conclude agreements with them. similar 

way and Plato in the book "On poetic madness" 

said: "That's exactly how the woman will be, not healthy." 

wise, they drink honey and milk from the rivers; healthy 

can't drink it." Deprived of ivsh showers and 1 6, kidnapped 

bred by a demon, and with the participation of the latter, they are able to 

us to a bad deed. We know for sure that witches 

                                                    17 

sometimes they drink animal oil in fast streams, which 

which cannot otherwise appear there, as soon as 

with the help of demons. In the same way, if someone 

or incur hatred, whether a man, a horse, 

then they just long for their death, not thinking about anything, 

but only about revenge, then they take the usual and well-known 

things given to them for witchcraft, summon demons, de- 

monstrating the sign and iso- 

fermentation, and if they are something due to lack of own 

can’t do some bravery, then they follow 

yut for and x 1 8 orders. Others who are not 

obeyed the demons and did not conclude an agreement with them, 

Even if they know the appropriate means for 

Dovstva, as well as the method of action, no matter how 

presented these signs and rarely still succeed 

                                                       23 



Ha. Because among their signs there are no demons- 

sya. And the extraordinarily arrogant Devil with the Church 

Christ's strives to be equal, but, in spite of n, not 

can he destroy the Body of Christ, how- ever 

powerful words of magic spells n an and y he does not pronounce 

forces; so the demon will rarely meet such a person who 

which could be subjugated with the help of 

dialect, although various strong 

spells and different signs and images are shown 

brazhen ia. And if he meets people, he is located 

nyh to him, but not concluding an agreement with him, then he 

does not possess my sorcerers on the rights of ownership 

to a 1 9 . He is he who, by means of impious arts, 

convenes, using terrible conspiracies, demons in 

round dish, in a mirror or in some other 

receptacle, but no effect follows, because 

that either he opposes the power of God, or the Devil 

despises this inquisitive man who did not bring him 

to la you. And for three things are necessary for sorcery, without 

what cannot take place and its realization: the evil 

and witchy desire and I'm a spoiled soul a, near- 

some cooperation with the Devil, but above all - 

natural permission. And if one of these conditions 

does not coincide with others, then witchcraft will not take place 

Maybe. And if God does not allow, then neither the Devil himself, 

no witch can do it. And if the Devil doesn't go 

to meet the desire and I of the bad woman and ny, then she is nick- 

                                20 

whom witchcraft is not known to the swarms. And vice versa, if 

if the witch is absent, then the devil will not commit any 

whom witchcraft. The devil uses the inclination 

raging witch, like a skillful tool 

for an action without which he cannot do evil. 

And how do demons differ in strength and sophistication 

tricks, so witches are not endowed with the same power, 

but to each in his own way; so the demons meet 

greater or lesser difference in their nature. 

For their generations are many, and they differ among 

                                   21 

themselves according to certain degrees of m, the nature of their places 

identity, that is, those places where the Lord would 

fallen angels are cast out. 

                                                       22 

    The first kind of demons is called "fiery". 

They rush around the upper layers of the air and up to the ship 

of the day I will never go lower, but constantly exceed 

will be in the sublunar space. They don't have any 

whom intercourse with people living on earth. Oh de- 

24 



monk, living near the moon, St. Augustine witnessed 

testifies in his work "On the Christian Controversy" 

in the following way: “demons do not dwell in heaven, where 

essence of the sun and stars, but they all revolve in sub- 

lunar regions. This is about them, as I believe, Apuleius 

said that this demonic movement is movement 

fiery beings, because Aristotle also affirmed 

gave that in hot furnaces they often see restless 

small living creatures that spend their entire life 

children in fire, because they are born in fire and in fire 

die, and to their place, whence they come, 

chezay, come back. They don't have any message 

with sorcerers, because if they linger in 

fire, then, due to their subtlety, they cannot 

make your body tangible or create it from condensed 

puppy air. 

      The second kind of demons is called "air". 

They, wandering through the sky, live closer. If 

some can go down lower, then, having created for themselves those 

lo from more condensed air, they are sometimes 

visible people. Often, with the permission of God, they 

stir up the air, stir up thunders, and 

          23 

the weather, and all together unite for destruction 

the human race, moving by the property of oblique 

stey of human passions. They are endowed with great 

pride and envy, create unceasing unrest; 

their bodies are covered with something hard, and they are not 

in one place, and not one they all have a form, but many 

some of them often change, in accordance with the diversity 

state difference. They are called spells n an and I m and 

witches and are excited to confusion and evil. And generally speaking, 

they have a cruel and rude disposition, full of confusion, 

that is why they are plotting many unexpected 

intrigues, and when they make their attacks, then one 

neither seek to do it in secret, but for other reasons 

violence is open. Through collaboration with these 

demons, witches are so strong for sorcery, 

as far as they can follow the main participant 

someone from their community. In the life of St. Anton and God 

                      24 

the native Afanasii said that the air is full of demo- 

us, which was previously broadcasted by Mercury three times the greatest 

shy: “It is obvious that no part of the world is without 

presence of demons. Saint Ambrose 25 says: 

* the world is full of the virtues of the saints, for it is full of corrupted 

values". That is why the demons of Platon, who are restless 



                                                     25 



in the air, in the form of dense luminous snow, are visible 

wanting to tell them about them, if they 

long time will ceaselessly look inseparable 

looking up at the sky at the sparkling sun, but I don't know 

whether the object in the air is called from a real entity, 

or the veiled gaze represents false statements 

times, and not without damage to the senses. Nevertheless, 

evidence for this is easy to obtain from these particulars. 

ny experiments. 

    The third kind of demons we call "terrestrial". They, 

of which we have little doubt, were cast down about 

heaven to earth for their sins. O n their holiest 

the father and martyr of Christ, and the God-bearer, wrote 

when in one message to the inhabitants of Ephesus: “No 

nothing is better than to have a world in which 

everything is a weapon 2 6 of both heavenly and earthly spirits” 2 7 . 

And of these demons alone dwell in the forests, and also in 

groves, laying traps for hunters. Others 

live in open fields, and at night they make 

wander travelers; some of them hide 

Xia in inaccessible places, as well as in caves. The rest 

but the less formidable and restless ones enjoy 

that keep people in the dark. And they are aware 

not by one passion, but by different ones, since they all teach 

tormented by various passions, but all of them are 

filled with evil. Some of them love them all the time 

to sew people with visions, others prefer 

to listen to them with predictions about the future, 

barking to surprise. Some of them work 

with such zeal that people, inexplicably 

driven into a frenzy, or tormented by melancholy 

ley, get frightened, upset by health or die 

yut, about the commission of which we more often learn from experience. 

So, Saint John Chrysostom in the third book of the book “On Pro- 

vision, to the monk S tagi ri yu "2 8 says:" Excessive 

despondency is more harmful than any demonic action, because 

like a demon, if he rules in anyone, then he rules through 

despondency, and if despondency was destroyed, then from the demon 

you will not suffer any harm.” This kind of demons is not- 

doubtfully familiar to the sorcerers because of the variability of 

structure and frivolity, since they love more 

make many tremble rather than obey the 

sti any woman. And sometimes they delay 

and promise crazy women and us, being called 

we cast spells in a mirror, glass or crystal. 



26 



give them answers and if anyone is going to hurt them 

some evil on their way, they warn about it 

give. And this kind of witches is quite different 

about the rest, because what they send with 

the power of sorcery, these promise to heal. That's why 

the church forbids Christians access to them, because 

to them by sorcery they deny many things. 

    The fourth kind of demons is called "water", then 

mu that they, immersed in moisture, live near 

rivers and lakes, full of malice, anxiety, restlessness and 

barbarism. They stir up storms on the seas and, plunging into 

the abyss of water ships, thereby taking away life 

many people. And these demons arrogate to themselves vi- 

visible body, and more often they appear in the form of female individuals 

of the male sex, in male guise they are less common, 

because they live in damp places and, leading from 

women's way of life, as a rule, is very difficult to 

take on the images of others. That is why in ancient times 

they called naiads and nereids, water ni^f persons were not 

male but female. We have a common name 

The word “Wasserfrauen” serves as a food for water women. 

Some live in places more waterless and arid, 

and each time, being bodily visible to people, they 

turn into men. Others use personal 

us animals, depending on what passions 

they are covered. Holy angels never 

do not change, but are always the same in men 

com guise. And nowhere can we read that 

the good spirit abides in the visible form of a woman, whether 

like some kind of beast, but always in the guise of a man. AND 

Indeed, demons are more often seen near streams and springs. 

nicknames in the form of women who sometimes lead a round dance, 

sometimes they will let their hair down according to women's custom, sometimes 

they talk to people, teasing their differences 

in a different way. And this kind of demons has no habit 

communicate with witches. 

    The fifth genus is called "underground". These demos 

we live in caves and grottoes, as well as in remote 

Cracks. And here they are, by their nature, the essence of 

we are the worst. Most of all, these demons attack those who 

who digs mines, extracts metals and looks for 

treasures hidden in the ground. Wishing death to the family 

human, they arrange cracks in the earth, 

smoke 

We 

          fire-breathing winds and shake the foundation 

   i buildings. Sometimes at night they, as if in detachments, 

                                                   27 



from the mountains, they lead amazing and unprecedented 

round dances, after which, as if frightened at the order of the aza 

some leader, in a hurry they disappear as if on a signal 

and return to their shelters. At times among 

and the roar of millstones ovs sounds; sometimes, considering myself 

spirits, they take on the form of people, ush edsh and x from 

life and . They want nothing more than the fear of people 

sky and p och tan i . We do know for sure that 

some simpletons they sometimes brought into their secret 

nye, located in the mountains of refuge, and there, I influence 

surprised by an extraordinary spectacle, in luxurious living 

li sch ah appeared before us in a fraudulent way as 

would be in the form of their living and now friends. And from these demons 

some are reclining on treasures 2 9 , which 

rye hid human greed in the ground, but the usual 

but people fail to take them back - they hide them 

they are guarded, guarded and sometimes carried from place to place. 

And this kind of demons does not have any intercourse with women - 

Witches usually don't. 

    The sixth kind of demons is called "photophobia- 

ny ”, because they are unusually afraid of the light and hatred 

see him, for in the daytime they somehow form 

they cannot create bodies for themselves, but there is a way to do this 

us only at night. That is why demons of this kind 

walk in the twilight, impenetrable and absolutely 

gloomy, torn apart by cold passions, insidious 

nye, restless and formidable. At night they are on- 

strongly hold bystanders and very often 

then (with the permission of God) either with your breath, or with 

by touching someone they destroy. Oh with the witches this 

the genus of demons is not found, and the spell is n an and I m and you expel them 

it is impossible to call, because they run the light and the voices of man 

lovable, but at the same time they are disposed to all 

to the shocks of the air and to various atrocities, 

because of all the others they are the most subtle and most 

we are reckless. Some of the earthly demons, pre- 

being on the lower steps, as it was said, 

serve witches, but still they can hardly 

commit significant atrocities. And so it becomes 

obvious that all the power of witches, thanks to which they 

do such amazing things and is given to demons 

limited by the Lord God, and when He does not allow 

wow, nothing can happen. 

   Question three: Why is God Almighty, being 

fair and I am an avenger for bad deeds 

28 



to me, admits that so and e atrocities could be committed 

stagger to the detriment of the human race, in which 

to 0,   not only sinners suffer, but also many innocent 

new people. 

     To this question, recently asked by me in the presence of 

Your Majesty's grace, he did not answer either. Whatever 

allows Almighty God, the merciful and righteous, 

good and just, he permits justly, for 

He is just and N does not have his severity, but everything that 

what is done, what is done and what is allowed, He judges 

fair. Therefore, when we are asked why 

The Lord allows bad things to happen, we answer, 

because he allows it because he is just. Not at all 

it will seem to your majesty, O Caesar, that we have brought 

Is it a ridiculous answer, since no one gives a preliminary 

a meaningful assessment of divine justice before, 

than he will be allowed by the fairest decision 

niu to commit evil; such an assessment can be DRT, 

if He doesn't let it happen in the world today zyxwvutsrqponml 

                                                      yaur 

nomu. And more if you do not allow bad things to happen, then 

a person will no longer be able to sin and will definitely appear without 

sinful, which is not characteristic of his nature, which with 

From the very beginning, the creator of everything gave free will. Here 

why man, I am a creature, and not a creator, 

gently turned to both good and evil. 

     He depends on the Supreme Creator of all creatures for sure 

just as everything depends on its cause. to create 

left to God alone, who is incorruptible and eternal; He 

but can change, if necessary, any corruptible, 

which is preserved by the kindness of the Creator until 

He will not allow the free flow of affairs. He can't 

it is possible, and not to the face, to do so that a person 

the character of his nature was created sinless; own- 

Indeed, this is what pleases the Creator of all kinds, invariably 

th and eternal. Every time a man is told 

that he cannot sin, then free will is denied, 

explicitly taken away is the ability to act, 

but the desire for good is confirmed. And every time 

when this gift is given to a creature, it is not a beneficence 

by the grace of nature. For Scripture says that God 

from the very beginning he created man and left him in his hand 

your decision. And for he cannot, as he speaks, 

so that mortal man from the very beginning be something 

dissatisfied, but let him have free will and not 

lives on sin. And more holy primate August 



Steen says: “The first freedom of choice was possible 

sinfulness to sin, the latter will be more glorious - impossible 

opportunity to sin." And so, if a person cannot 

let him have no power over his will. P oe- 

no matter how almighty God may wish that 

sin, but He justly allows that any 

have sinned or have done evil, for when it remains 

freedom of choice, then a person receives what he deserves and for 

good deeds, and for their voluntarily committed harm 

raziya and bad deeds. After all, no one does good 

and does not sin against his will. And so, almighty 

God rightly permits that the people whom He is with 

from the very beginning gave free will, sinned and badly 

stepped. There are many reasons given 

recently by the holy doctors regarding how 

reason, the Almighty allows such evil 

deeds were performed with the assistance of a demon. And x we're on 

we will give the order in the ratze. 

    The first argument is that it appears 

the supremacy of divine power, which alone 

one is unchanging and, moreover, tired for a long time 

updated. All the same changeable creature is incomparable with 

the unchanging Creator. Therefore, in the book of Numbers it says: 

“God does not deceive like a person and does not change like 

son of man." In the book of the prophet I sai it is said 

like this: “God is sincere without excessive severity, just 

lively and truly righteous”; in the book of Tobit it is written about: 

“You are just, O Lord, and all your judgment is right, 

and all thy ways are mercy, truth and righteousness 

di e» 3 0 . And in the book of St. Job we read: “No from 

                                                  31 

God of wickedness and from the Almighty ne injustice. i bo 

the deed of each person he returns to him and repays 

to each according to his way. And more to every day, who is right 

correctly understands his ignorance and weakness, I clearly understand 

recognizes at once that nothing can compare with his 

creator, for the Lord does justice, let 

for me to sin a man, so that his freedom of choice should be 

must exist, and the excellence of the great God 

became known to people. 

    The second argument is that the inexpressible wisdom 

the growth of the Lord is made known to mortals; she 

contributes to the emergence of good from our bad deeds 

for the sake of multiplication in the world of perfection, when sin 

one in relation to another becomes a crime 

niem. And for if He does not allow bad things to happen, 

30 



jjo , then 0 and zn and with will understand what good is? For he creates 

and   the Lord does good, but He does not do evil, but 

He knows that the deeds of the wicked are 

n 

  it's disorderly. And human deceit has no effect 

to the will of God, neither man himself can 

do something that God does not allow. 

    The third argument that Almighty God 

allows bad deeds to be done, is His 

desire to extend your gracious kindness to those 

who sinned and did repentance, which no one could 

can find out if He does not allow the creature to sin. 

For if there is no sinner, the Lord cannot 

become regretful. However, we are all wrong in many ways. 

Xia, and, considering it necessary to descend, the good Creator exposed 

expresses his compassion when he meets the guilty. 

That is why the holy primate Augustine says: 

 “If a sinless person is not affected by diseases, 

not looking for a doctor; if the healer is not found, then the disease 

does not end, for where there is much sin, there is much 

grace, which alone separates the saved from 

lost, united by him from the very beginning of creation 

into one mass. Therefore, the mercy of the Lord is above all 

His deeds. 

     The fourth argument about divine permission 

lies in the fact that the justice of the Creator is forgiven 

repents against those who have sinned and have not repented, for 

if everyone does good and no one sins, 

then divine justice will not have those who follow 

blowing nakazat. Therefore, let there be fair 

and let the creature, with the divine permission of the Greek 

shield For the Lord is just, who gives to each according 

deeds, and I desire him. 

     The fifth argument is the conditions for the existence of human 

human dignity, because if God does not allow 

lit to sin a person, it will be even worse if 

 put violent pressure on his temper. And if 

 people and are devoid of reason, then they, however, have before 

 is the free movement of nature, to which 

 yut; at the same time, the person, in all likelihood, is the leader 

 is changed by changing aspirations, if he has, ultimately 

 but, there will be no free choice of will. God allows 

 love to freely dispose of his desire, over 

 to whom neither kings nor princes have power. 

     Sixth argument - this is an opportunity deservedly praised 

 pour the virtue of human constancy, that is 

                                                          31 



when we give praise to some person on the right 

politeness, because, having the opportunity to commit 

something, he did not do it, but, encouraged by the grace 

God, he constantly keeps the goodness of his desire 

niya. 

    The seventh reason for the question of why the almighty 

God permits demons to do such terrible 

affairs, is that those who are deceived by contempt 

noah and false truth, is introduced into the deception of the inventor 

                     32 

Lem lies like an ox and plunge deep down and out. For 

it is inevitable that sorcerers, as well as witches, reject 

the need to follow saving doctrine 

Christ, are deceived by demons and carried away by them into 

hell to eternal punishment. They seek 

approval of demons, enemies of the whole human race, and 

Savior of the world, to whom alone they must bow 

come on, they don't respect. That is why it is fair that 

yes, the one who, by spontaneous volition, throwing 

the truth, becomes a follower of lies, gets carried away 

the devil to perdition. The eighth argument is the manifestation 

divine power, whose power and strength is forgiven 

spreads over the whole created world. And when the Almighty 

God once allowed the devil more, and he did not wish 

lal small, he did not become the most powerful enemy of the kind 

lovable and submitted in all things to the divine Majesty 

chiyu. And for the Devil can do nothing on his own 

himself, but everything he does happens with the permission 

Lord God. And so, the root cause of everything, for which 

Almighty God allows evil deeds to be done - 

justice, which initially preserves in unruly 

shim order freedom granted to each of your 

ri. Because, verily, the power of every creature depends 

coming from its creator, bound and limited; and sde- 

lano all this so that the devil could not commit 

everything he wants, and that the person is not subjected to 

seduced by great desire. And if the will is really de 

le free, then the force is limited by certain and not 

avoidable obstacles. Just as if the demons 

could do whatever they want, so a person 

whenever I was safe, and they would bring 

everything is in decline. The chained power of demons is good for 

gives an example of the story of St. Job, on which 

Satan no longer dared to attack, although he i; 

divine permission was given. And for no one in our 

time, however fair and bold he may be, cannot 



32 



zket to resist the wrath of the demons if they can temporarily 

give the choice of people, using their power. Before that, 

how the passions of the Lord were accomplished, they are much more painful 

to a greater extent than later, enjoyed the 

delivered to them by freedom, but redemptive 

the death of Christ crucified for us on the cross, her strong 

priumil il. How the Savior says in the gospel: 

"Now the prince of the world is being driven out." And more humility 

Christ and the firmness of the saints greatly limited the audacity 

demons; wherefore, the instigators of evil deeds should be punished 

call openly, the same applies to others like them. 

The devil will not be strong against us in any way, unless 

will not draw strength from our sins. Written by 

warns us, calling: "Resist the devil and he 

run away from you." And again: "Give no place to the devil." 

Therefore, concluding the speech spoken for clarification 

proposed question - why does God allow the 

to do evil deeds - I declare with all confidence, 

that the reasons given were satisfactory. 

For if the will of the demons is always hostile, then the power is not 

may be unfair, because if anyone wishes 

do evil, then he has the right to choose, and this 

he can do evil only with the permission of 

Oh god. About the same way He treats those who do 

bad deeds, has already been said. Oh why almighty 

Whole God allows demons to attack people, 

using witches, on people baptized in the name of the Holy 

Trinity and believing them in the only begotten son of the Lord, 

And Jesus Christ? After all, attacking bodies and bad deeds, 

bad and unfaithful people, they are kept from 

access and harm to good and believing people 

dyam; verily, the verdict that allows such a thing is just 

Liv. However, now, more often, good and blameless people are 

indulge in the evil deeds of demons, sometimes 

living life; this is done so that we silently 

suffered the loss of transient things, which is often 

suffer and bewitched; at the same time, many 

know to fear why the Lord Almighty allows 

to do all this, He who allows nothing to be done 

cheat unfairly. 

    The proposed question is no different from those 

which I have learned from the ancient orthodox scholars, 

so that, as far as I can, I will briefly and in order from- 

I lay down the necessary arguments. And the first argument will be 

the next is the test of the faith of Christians and the experience of 

2 

- 34OO                                                 33 



depravity, when those whom the demons scourge with their evil 

deeds and ya mi, know through the suffering of the flesh, what faith 

and love for God is kept in the depths of their souls and. Not difficult 

be patient, live calmly and happily, however 

when in time of adversity they expect help from the Savior 

believers with ordinary patience, then it is much more weighty 

and speaks of the real Christian faith. holy- 

sh and y Iov, narrating about his torments, tells, 

how constantly he believes in God; but even before that, zyxwvuts 

                                                          v 

calm environment, he did not hesitate to keep the numbers 

that of faith. At the same time, it should be noted that those 

of the evil deeds of demons and whether people are in any way 

made unhealthy, and he, wanting to regain his health 

blood, went to all and m spellcasters and sorcerers and 

consulted with them themselves, or through other people, 

such people oppose God's instructions to 

churches. Preferring the health of mortal flesh to the Lord, 

they seek salvation not from Christ, but from the devil and 

servants. They prefer to refer to the name of the devil 

and be healthy, but barren, rather than a little 

endure in the name of the love of Christ and then eternally 

deal with H&M. The same does not apply to sorcerers i 

the power is forbidden and I of God, preferring to live, observe 

giving the covenants of the Lord, in poverty and sorrow, unwilling 

oppose him by being rich and healthy 

rovy, he truly loves God and the most accurate about 

at once acquires the purity of the Christian faith. Among the hri 

Stian, O holy Caesar, do not tolerate bad minds i, 

uk lon and lice and hsia from faith, which heal about 

bathrooms with the help of witchcraft and through mediation1 

demons are revealed to rages and facts of adultery 

who predict the future by stones and mirrors 

lam. I beg you, do not listen to those who ignore 

divine laws he s, these servants of demons speaking 

that in your state they are useful because they know 

learn how to eliminate the results of atrocities with the help of 

the villain himself. And for such a pernicious concern for the bodies 

leads to the death of souls and forcing ya people to retreat 

from God, the creator of all things, and to be tied; 

to the wicked, apostate demons, with whom 

rymi after death they are condemned to eternal torment and. 

    The second reason why God Almighty allows 

so that witchcraft harms innocent people v 

people, consists in multiplying the virtues, so that; 

through a painful test and patience, they deserve 



34 



l 

 and in heaven worthy of their crown of glory. For says 

Saint Augustine: “Man does not know that he can 

carry and what cannot; and sometimes he gets scared 

that he cannot do what he, after all, could do 

lat; when someone comes to him asking 

ing, a person seeks from himself what was 

originally hidden in him, but he did not know about it. 

Archapostle Peter of blessed memory, when unexpectedly 

I've come to the test, discovered hitherto hidden 

a disease that neither he nor the others knew about. So , 

the highest test for a person is unexpected 

something that is attested in the Holy Scriptures: 

“The oven tests the potter’s vessels, but the righteous people 

ordeal of torment. It is easy to endure prospering, 

since the soul is not affected by any of the worries and 

although many righteous people experience torment, the Lord 

come on our Jesus Christ will free them from all these un- 

happiness. 

   The third reason for divine permission is 

Xia in defense and those humble ren and I, because a person is faithful and 

the righteous always fear God and never act 

by their courage or reason. That's what it says 

Scripture about bad people: “They do not work like people, 

wherefore, they shall not be scourged along with the people.” Here 

why are they seized with pride, and do they hide evil 

their own and their wickedness, and they think that their hardships are 

stem from what has been achieved. God is sorry 

that at times he allows to bring down on good and 

righteous people various hardships; in favorable 

At the same time, these people could not be unmarried. One- 

many, becoming humiliated in misfortune, 

rise. Cautious portrayal of the bad 

deeds makes a good man God-fearing, and he 

zealously calls for help, so that, having strengthened against 

demon attacks, he was able to secure himself 

ness. And for no one else, possessed by pride and relying 

only on their own, does not feel safe 

from the atrocities of the demons, since their swollen 

°t the arrogance of people leaves the protection and that of God and he, outside of 

opinions, becomes accessible to the atrocities of demons. 

   The fourth argument is the need to separate 

of good and evil people. And more says Scripture in De- 

the apostles' opinions about kind and dear to God people - <<che- 

Through many hardships, we must enter the Kingdom of Bo 

    3 

G and 4 . l Saint Paul, friend of Christ, in one epistle 

                                                           L1 



nii says: “All who wish to live devoutly in Christ 

look, let them endure persecution.” Also the wisest 

King Solomon in Proverbs tells: “Whom I love 

scolds the Lord, with that he acts like a father with a son 

       35 

n o m ". There is nothing more glorious for Christians than for the sake of 

Lord patiently endure adversity, whether bad people 

di their reasons yat, or demons. And for the devil and his servant 

power is given to attack the good and the righteous 

people, however, they are not confused, words- 

but a herd of old rams, but souls and they acquire on- 

the greatest and definite consolation. In fact, when- 

Yes, a righteous person lives well without harming anyone 

and without causing harm to anyone, without causing any harm to anyone 

justice, and loves his God with all his heart, 

hides and reveres before N and m, with all the zeal of defending and- 

following His precepts and yet suffers from 

dostva, whether harming the body, its deeds, and often that 

and to another, this person is truly blessed, for, bu- 

duchi tested, he will perceive the crown of life and what a 

the Lord God poured out to him whom he loves. Everyone, righteous 

but living in unity with the faith of catholic christian 

Church of England and enduring patiently in this world 

evil out of love for the Lord, carries a certain 

a sign indicating that he is with God in 

standing mercy. About bad and bad people on- 

it is written like this: “The wicked live, their riches support 

live and create comfort for them. Their homes are safe and peaceful 

koyna, and there is no scourge of God over them; their lives 

perform well and then at some point descend 

to the underworld." But here the recognition of the curse is obvious: 

if so oh man is lucky and healthy, but lives badly, 

in sins and vice, he is not pleasing to God. 

   Your argument is that the Almighty Lord 

allows good and righteous people to suffer from 

bad and evil people for the sake of purification by all means 

shower i. And as the Scripture says: “There is no right on earth 

a leading man who does only good and 

don't sin." But since the Lord does not forgive a single sin, 

inflicts without retribution, He, out of compassion, established 

gives good people temporary punishments for their guilt azan and I; 

the wicked and evil are punished by eternal judgment. And from co- 

suffering He replaces the penitent with the eternal naka- 

a temporary indication, to which they inevitably confirm 

either in this world, or after death, in purgatory 

e. Since, verily, torture in purgatory is terrible and 



with 



she 

   I sat, the compassionate Lord usually cleanses those 

repentant ones whom He loves in this life and by 

the imposition of various bodily hardships and hardships in their de- 

lah. And the bad deeds and I of the atheists are useful for 

good and righteous people as medicine, and 

those who do these deeds - as a condemnation. 

     The sixth argument proves that a person bewitched 

owing to the onslaught of the demons, again comes to 

repentance and promises in his heart that he will surely seek 

rules his life. Because the almighty God 

suddenly punishes us when we sin with them, but beforehand 

The appointed time is waiting for us to correct ourselves. 

If we refuse to repent, we will 

dit, when we do not expect it, an avenger for evil, 

which we, sinners and to and, in a calm time proudly do not 

we admit, in adversity, however, he belatedly accepted 

eat. The holy prophet in the face of God speaks, exclaiming, 

the following: "If they despise my law and 

my son, and do not do according to my judgments, and do not 

protect my teachings, I have tamed their disgrace 

with a climb and their sins with whips, and my compassion does not dissipate 

spread over them, but I will not hurt my truth.” 

     The seventh reason why God Almighty 

allows the evil deeds of the demons to suppress the do- 

good and innocent, is that they destroy 

too much opportunity to sin. And for there are many 

of the poor and weak, pleasing to God, kind and submissive 

nyh, and degraded and zhennyh, whose scarcity and bodily 

keeps sickness in love with God; and there are those who 

being rich and exalted with honors, quickly 

plunged from the proposed holiness into the abyss of 

ka. Do not lead to the salvation of all those who have health, 

honors and riches, as well as a longer 

life does not always make a person better. Besides, 

Almighty Lord, desiring to extend to the elect 

compassion for them, allows them to subject them to various 

personal troubles of good, righteous and innocent people. 

And then through demons, then through bad people, then through 

through various other measures and deeds, He deprives such 

some people of wealth and honors, which, according to Him, 

nyu, poorly used, while in poverty and despondency 

nii, keeping humility, they will not understand how, living in 

wealth and honor, they are actually less 

Art 

   epen and protected themselves. It also allows you to send 

n 

  e. there are many branches of them to and e ailments and reasons for them, 



giving them flowering carnal health, the highest 

mental suffering and I . In addition, he allows 

to kill a person with the help of witchcraft to death so that 

in order to make it possible for those who are wrong to sin 

knowingly used earthly goods in this life. Here 

What does Scripture say about a righteous man: “He has been kidnapped, 

but his mind will not change deceit, and will not deceive when 

the creation of souls is with him.” 

    The eighth reason for divine permission is 

that people who honor the sacraments of the Church have 

great is their courage in the struggle against all evil 

deeds of malevolent spirits. And for the one who should 

honors the sacraments and rites of the Catholic Church 

to you, demons less often annoy with their attacks. AND 

very often we heard from our own confessions 

the sorcerers themselves, that he and, listening to the Mass and using 

things blessed by the church are greatly weakened 

whether the power of demons. And it was not in vain that they praised ong 

in the church of God, and among them there are such and such who 

to strengthen ia divine protection and you show de 

Monam is a sign and is frightening. H and without a doubt, m' 

we can say about the boys and children who were christened 

Christ and died them ever because of the intrigues of demons! 

or people that all this made it possible to make a divine 

divine providence for the sake of salvation, for it renews all 

is for the better and puts the earthly things in order. Odinash 

it often happens that children die as a result of 

dovstva, as well as because of the crimes of parents. 



Interrogation and confession of famous witches 

  in Chelmsford, Essex 

           before the judges 

    her royal majesty 

      on the 26th day and July 1566 



              Introduction 

     Recently in this glorious city, 

     I'm talking about Chelmsford 

     They sent the chief three judges, 

     To protect him. 

     And the famous royal court 

     Justice began to be done, 

     And three criminals are led, 

     To eradicate their deeds. 

     Three local ladies by Satan 

                                  1 

     Infected with respect, 

     About the spirit of a sinful deed 

     With their death, they drank the lawsuit. 

     H and tai te n and the same you about 

     What did they say to the court? 

     And they signed the papers 

     Confessing in his witchcraft. 

     Take a closer look at the evil deeds, 

     You, dear friend, and pray 

     So that God takes it as soon as possible 

     From us these witches with their retinue. 

     Here I finish my tea and hope 

     Why will you read my words, 

     And the truth, as he is, you know, 

     When you understand what you are reading. 









40 



  THEIR INTERROGATION AND THE CONFESSION   MADE 

  BEFORE DR. HOLE AND THE MASTER 

  FORTESCUE IN THE SAME COURT AND VERTICALLY 

  REPRODUCED   TO THE EXTENT 

  HOW POSSIBLE THAT COULD BE; AND 

  FIRST THE RECOGNITION OF ELIZABETH FRANCIS, 

  WHO SAID THE FOLLOWING. 

    For the first time she was acquainted with the art of witchcraft 

at the age of twelve thanks to his grandmother, 

whose name was matushka a I v from Hatf ild Peverill, now 

not deceased. When she taught her, she advised the girls 

ke to give up God and the Word of God and give up your 

blood to Satan (so she called him), whom she revealed 

                                        2 

la her in the form of a white spotted cat, teaching her short 

to wash him with bread and milk, which this girl did, 

in addition, she taught her to call him, calling when 

this name is Satan, and keep it in your basket. 

    When this mother gave her her cat Sa- 

Tanu, then Elizabeth at first wanted this cat (and 

she called him Satan) made her rich and prosperous 

accurate, and he promised her that he would fulfill this desire, 

asking her at the same time what she wants to have, and she 

                3 

vechala - sheep (for, according to her confession, this cat 

brewed with her in a strange, muffled voice, but in such a way that 

she understood), and he immediately brought sheep to her meadow in 

the number of eighteen heads, black and white, which 

which remained with her for some time, but then all 

they disappeared, and she herself does not know how. 

   Also, when she received these sheep, she decided 

get yourself a certain Andrew Byles as a husband. Che- 

this man was not poor, so the cat promised that 

everything will be so, but, he said, first she must 

say that this Andrew will insult her, 

which she did. 

   And after Ak this Andrew insulted her, he did not 

attacked her, that's why she asked Satan to destroy 

to waste all his goodness, which he immediately did; one- 

but she, being dissatisfied with this, asked him 

touch Andrew's body, which was immediately 

neno, after which this man died. 

   Also, every time he did something for her, 

Oud, she said, he demanded from her an orange of blood, 

which she gave him, piercing her skin 

                                                     41 



sometimes in one place, sometimes in another. Where she is 

made similar injections, and you can still see red 

nye p i tn a. 

    Also, when this Andrew was already dead, she began 

wonder if she has a child. Therefore, she 

asked Satan to destroy him, and he advised her 

take some herb and drink cooked on it 

infusion, which she did, and her child at the same moment 

died. 

    Also, when she decided to marry in the second 

time, he promised to help her with this, meaning Fran- 

sisa, who is her husband at the present time, 

but at the same time he said that he was not as rich as others, 

wishing thereby to obtain her consent to extramarital 

connection with this Francis, which she did, as a result 

tate what conceived a daughter born in three months 

after their marriage. 

    After they got married, their life passed 

she was not at all as calm as she would have liked; they- 

constantly (according to her) swore and quarreled, that's why 

Why did she want her cat Satan to kill this child? 

to a, who was then about six months old, that he 

and did. But even then she did not find the desired calm 

and asked him to lame Francis, 

her husband, and he did what was required. One morning he 

snuck into Francis's boot, lay down there like a greedy 

bah, and when he tried to put on his shoe, then the cat 

touched his leg. Francis was greatly surprised and asked, 

what it was, however, she forbade her husband to kill him, 

and then Francis was overcome by such a lameness, from which he 

have never been able to heal. 

    After all this, when this cat lived with her for years 

spots eleven or sixteen, and, as some say 

rye (albeit incorrectly), she was tired of him, she came 

to mother e Waterhouse, her neighbor 4 (poor wife 

not) at the moment when she was fussing at the stove, and 

asked me to give her a pie, in return for which she promised 

bring her something that will work properly 

live her all her life. And onaya m atush k a Waterhouse 

gave her a pie, after which Elizabeth brought her 

this cat in an apron and taught everything that she heard 

at one time from her grandmother and in, saying that she 

should call him Satan, give him your blood, 

bread and milk. More on this inquiry and she is nothing 

no sk azala. 

42 



  MOTHER WATERHOUSE OF HATFIELD 

  Peverill, aged sixty-four, 

  BEING INTERROGATED THE SAME DAY, 

  CONFESSED THE FOLLOWING 

     First, she got this cat from the wife of the 

the mentioned Francis in the order in which it was indicated 

above, and she said that he should be called Satan 

and 

    that if she appreciates him highly, then he 

will do for her whatever she wants. 

     Then, having got him, she (deciding to test his 

opportunity) asked him to kill his own 

a little dew, which he did; and for his labors she gave him 

chicken, which he demanded from her, as well as some 

a drop of his blood. And so she kept doing 

whenever he did something for her, she 

pricked his hand or cheek and applied this blood to him in 

mouth; he, drunk, again lay down in his basket, 

where she kept him; places where she stabbed herself, before 

are still visible on her skin. 

     She also said that when she was insulted by a certain 

father Kersey, she took her cat Satan, put it in 

apron and took it to a tree that grew in front of her 

mom, and ordered him to destroy the three pigs of this father 

Kersey; having done this, he turned back and told her 

about it, and she again rewarded him, as before, 

giving him a chicken and a drop of his blood. This chick 

he ate clean, so that she could not find any 

a single bone or pimple to a. 

     She also admitted that, having quarreled with a certain 

widow Goodday, she asked Satan to drown her short 

woo, which he did; she rewarded him, and 

earlier. 

     Also, having quarreled with her neighbors, she 

in the same way she killed three geese from them. 

     She also admitted that since she never 

could rest, which she really needed, she 

asked Satan to destroy the brewery. 

     Also, when she didn't like someone's oil, she 

She did so that these people's cottage cheese went bad in two 

and 

  whether even three days ahead. 

     Also, having quarreled with one of his neighbors 

and 

   his wife, she asked Satan to destroy them through 

from tv 

     °m bloody diarrhea wasp 5, why that man a and right- 

Doo died, and she rewarded him, like before. 

                                                       4 zyxwvutsrq 

                                                          i 



   She similarly confessed that since 

husband, if they did not live quite peacefully, then she asked 

Satan to kill him, which he did nine years ago, and 

since then she has been a widow. 

   She also said that if she wanted him 

did something for her, she must have read 

"Otche n ash" dish. 

   Also, this mother to a Waterhouse admitted that she 

turned this cat into a toad, making it next 

way. She kept him in a basket full of 

wool, but over time, due to poverty, she was 

need to put her to work. Then she begged for 

the name of the Father, and the Son, and the Holy Spirit 6, asking to turn 

cat into a toad, and immediately the cat turned into a toad, so 

that now he could live in an empty basket. Also 

she said that one time when she was going to Broxted, 

and it was shortly before her arrest that Satan told her that- 

she would hurry home, for she will have big problems 

pleasantness, and that soon she will be hanged or 

burnt a; this time she said nothing more. 





     JOAN WATERHOUSE, MOTHER'S DAUGHTER 

     WATERHOUSE, AGED 18, DURING 

     INTERROGATION SHOWED THE FOLLOWING 

    First, that her mother taught her this winter 

art, but she learned nothing; also she is not 

I also remembered the name of "this thing". She said she saw 

her in the arms of her mother ah only once, and that she was 

like a toad, and that, entering quite suddenly, 

she heard her mother urging her to do something 

Lat, while pronouncing the name "Satan". For she is not 

always and not everything told her daughter and never 

to the basics of her shaft before this incident. 

    She also admitted that when her mother went to 

Brexted, she wanted bread, but not finding it, sent 

curled up to a neighbor girl and asked her to give her a doll 

bread juice with cheese. When she refused her and nothing 

did not give, or gave too little, she returned home 

and did as her mother did, invoking Satan. He 

appeared to her (as she says), in her opinion, from bash 

her mother's mak, which stood under the bed; he was 

looks like a big dog, and I asked him what 

she want. 

44 



   At first she was frightened, but then she said that she 

Even so that he frightened this girl (at the same time she frightened 

called me too); then he asked what she would give him, and she 

answered: “Red rooster”, and he objected: “No, you 

give me your body and soul”7; she was so 

frightened, and wanted so much to get rid of him that 

promised to do so. And then he went to this girl 

ke, having taken the form of a terrible dog with horns on his head 8, 

and greatly frightened her, and even pursued her. now 

these witches cannot (as they say) call again 

him here because they don't want him to show up- 

sya. More, she said, I did nothing, alone- 

but this act of hers revealed everything else. 



  SECOND INTERROGATION AND MOTHER'S CONFESSION 

  AGNES WATERHOUSE AND HER DAUGHTERS JOAN, 

  MADE AFTER THE ACCUSATION, WITH 

  QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS AGNES BROWN, 

  THE GIRL HUNTERED BY THE EVIL 

  THE SPIRIT SPECIALLY SENT   BEFORE 

  JUDGE SOUTHCOTT AND MASTER 

  GERARD, ROYAL PROSECUTOR, 

  JULY 27, 1566, NO LESS WONDERFUL, 

  HOW TRUE 



  Confession of Agnes Waterhouse on Day 27 

July of the year 1566 at Chelmsford before Judge Sa- 

Uscot and Crown Prosecutor M. Gerard. 



     First, being asked whether she was guilty or not of 

accused of murdering a man, she 

confessed that she was guilty of a sheep, and then, after witness testimony 

punishment given by us against her daughter Joan Waterhouse, 

she said that she had a white cat, whom she 

the power to destroy the cattle of the neighbors, as well as that he 

killed one person, which he did. When does she have 

had to move away from home 

Two or three miles, she began to think about what to do 

with a cat. Then the cat and she decided or that he, that is, the cat, became 

no toad, after which she will have to lock him up and 

Give him milk and he will eat it until 

° will not return home. Meanwhile, her daughter was in one 

neighbor's house nearby. There she is 

p 

  R sent Agnes Brown, a girl of about twelve years old, to give her 

                                                       45 



a piece of bread and cheese, and what Agnes mentioned was answered by 

la, that she has nothing, and besides, there are no keys, that- 

to get it all from to the ladovk and . P after what is mentioned utaya 

Joan came home angry with that Agnes girl. 

B round, and then he remembered how her mother walked 

up and down the room and you called ala “Satan, Satan!”. 

She told herself that she would try to do the same, and 

then I began to walk around the house and call Satan. 

Then a black dog curled up to her and asked what she needed. 

But. She, according to her, was frightened and said: “I want 

so that you frighten Agnes Brown." Then he asked what she 

give him, and she replied that she would give a red rooster, but what 

he said it wasn't enough. Then she asked 

what does he need in such a case, and he replied that he 

you need her soul and body. In the end, being afraid of him 

herself and having heard such a proposal, she gave him 

your body and soul at 9 . Then the Crown Prosecutor asked her: 

"How did you do it before the face of the Lord?" "Oh, Mr. 

bottom, - she answered, - I believe that the Lord of Mercy- 

hovering over me”, and then he said “correctly speaking 

rish b”, and then he left her, after which she heard 

la, that he really frightened this Agnes Brown. 

    Then they ordered to call the aforementioned Agnes Brown, 

and she came in, and they asked her how old she was, and she answered 



la, which is probably twelve, after which the royal 

the prosecutor asked her what she could say: and she answered 

tila that on such and such a day (while naming a certain 

day) she was churning butter and then something came up to her, 

similar to a dog, but with the physiognomy of a monkey. Him 

had a short tail, and around the neck was a chain of silver 

whistle (so she thinks); a couple crowned his head 

horns, and in his mouth he held the key to the pantry with milk, and 

here, my lord (she said), I was afraid, for he 

jumped and jumped in different directions, and then sat down in the edge 

beer. Then I asked him what he wanted, and he replied that 

he wants butter, and I said that I have nothing for him 

no, but he replied that he would go anyway and get it, and for- 

so he rushed to the pantry door to insert the key into 

castle, but I said that he would not find anything there, and he 

replied that he could find something. After which he opened 

door and climbed onto the shelf and there he put the key on a fresh 

cheese, and after staying there a little, he went outside, closed 

door and said that he was churning butter for me. Then he 

gone. Then the girl told her aunt about it and 

sent for the priest. He, having come, ordered her to 

pour to God and cry out to the name of Jesus. N o n and follow- 

day, my lord, he came to me again, holding 

in the mouth is the key to our storeroom, and then I asked him: 

“In me and Jesus, what do you need?” He put the key 

and said that, invoking this name and, I uttered a fool 

words, after which he immediately disappeared. Here my aunt 

took the keys, because he had them for two 

days and nights, after which we entered the pantry, where we saw 

Is there a trace of butter on the cheese? A few days later he came 

again, but he had bean husks in his mouth. Here co- 

the role prosecutor asked what it was, and others 

the judges asked the same question, to which she replied: “My 

sir, I asked him in the name of Jesus, what is it for you, and 

he put everything on the ground and said that I uttered a fool 

words, and left. Later he came here again, de- 

rust in the mouth pieces of bread, and I asked him what he wants, 

and he answered - butter, and went away again, and since then, my lord 

dun, I didn't see him until last Wednesday, that is 

Until 28 and july » 1 0 . And why, asked the royal prosecutor- 

ror, was he with you last wednesday? He was with me 

she answered. What did he do to you, the prosecutor asked. 

My lord, she answered, he came with a knife in his teeth 

and 

  asked if I was still dead, and I replied that, glory 

God, no, and then he said that if I did not die, then he 



                                                           47 



pierce me with this knife right in the heart and do so, 

for me to die. And then I said: “In the name of Jesus, please 

take the knife," but he replied that he would not throw the knife of his beloved 

bima lady, and I asked him who this lady was. And he nodded 

head towards your house, m atush k a Waterhouse. Behind- 

the Crown Prosecutor then asked the said Agnes 

Waterhouse, what will she say to this and she asked the girl 

describe the shape of the knife, and Agnes Brown said that it was 

knife type k and n sting. Then you're lying, said Agnes 

Waterhouse. Why, asked the prosecutor. My respect- 

my lord (she said), she says that it was to and n sting, 

and I don't have anything like that at home, I only have 

big n. That's why she lies, my lord, honestly 

new word. Joan Waterhouse said she also lied 

and when he says that he has a face like a monkey, 

for what came to her was like a dog. Well 

well, said the crown prosecutor, can you 

summon him now to appear before us. If 

If you can, we'll get you out of jail soon. Without ve- 

ry, said Agnes Waterhouse, I cannot, for it is possible 

to do only with faith, as my daughter and I did; Then 

I could quickly call him, but now I have no over 

n them power. And so, said the royal prosecutor, 

tivsh to Agnes Waterhouse when it was your cat sucking at 

you blood? Never, she answered. Well, okay, said pro- 

curator, let's see, and then the jailer took off her 

handkerchief and various spots were found on her face, 

one of which was even on the nose. Here is royal 

the prosecutor said: well, respectable Agnes, when 

last time he sucked your blood? I affirm, 

she said that in the last two weeks there had been nothing. By- 

whereupon the court retired for deliberation. 



     FINAL AND LAST 

     MOTHER WATERHOUSE'S CONFESSION BEFORE 

     DEATH MADE ON THE 29TH DAY OF THE MONTH 

     JULY 1566 

   First (already prepared to accept death), 

she confessed frankly that she was a witch and 

used her disgusting sorcery on 

spanning five and thirteen years, and did many 

disgusting deeds, in which she sincerely and purely 

heartily repents and asks for forgiveness of the Almighty 

God for ruining his holy name with her 

48 



sinful deeds. She believes she will be saved 

thanks to His inexpressible mercy. And being 

asked by those present, she confessed that she 

sent her Satan to a certain Wardol, her neighbor 

du, the tailor (who offended her), in order to harm 

hit him personally and damage his property. And this one 

her Satan went there in order to fulfill 

her wishes, but then he returned, because he could not 

commit this crime. She asked him what 

lo, and he replied that Wardol turned out to be so 

while in faith 1 1 that he could not harm him; later 

she repeatedly sent him again (but all in vain) 

in order to cause him any harm. AND , 

being asked if she was accustomed to go to church 

to a common prayer or service, she answered in 

positively, but when asked what she was doing there, she answered 

she believed that she did the same as other women, and from 

soul prayed, but on the question of what she said, 

praying, she answered that she was reading Our Father, Goddess 

Devo, I believe, after which they asked, in Latin 

or in English, and she answered in Latin, and 

they asked why she read them in Latin and and not 

in English, knowing that the government 1 2 and 

according to the Word of God, I have established that all people should 

you should pray in English and in your native language 

speech, which they understand better, and she answered, 

that Satan never let her say that 

English, but all the time only in lats; according to what 

cause, as well as because of the many 

other crimes to which she confessed, she 

grieves, repents and asks for the mercy of God and all 

common forgiveness, giving in this way and in this way his soul and 

hoping to find happiness with Christ, her Savior, who 

who at the highest price of the priceless blood of his artifice 

drank her sins. Amen. 





About the most evil deed of some unfit 

  witches, about the likes of which no one else 

     heard in England for many years. 

    It tells about one person, 

Richard Berte, servant of Master Edling, from 

    Woodhall, Pinner Parish, County 

     Middlesack, a mile beyond Harrow. 

 Done in March 1592 and again 

recognized as true by J. B . , 

             master of arts usstv. 



                Hexasticon 

About evil witches in this book will be discussed, 

About how they affect ordinary people, 

How, muttering something, they commit atrocities. 

Praise the Lord who will beat them! 

God casts them out, but then Satan 

Brings new witches - and there is no number for them 1 . 



   Leviticus 20.6: “And if any soul turns to challenge 

waking the dead and to wizards, so that whoring ho- 

follow them, then I will set my face on that soul, and 

I will cut her off from her people." 





  THE MOST EVIL ACT OF SOME 

  WRONG WITCH IN RELATIONSHIP 

  THE PERSONS OF A CERTAIN RICHARD BURT 

   Oh, courteous and supportive reader! So long 

how we live in this vale of sadness and miserable condition 

in our opinion, all of us, even the best of us, do not get tired 

repeat that we are in a state of continuous 

war, waging a deadly and most dangerous fight with the enemy 

hom. Our enemies, with whom we must fight, 

the essence is: the world, the flesh and the Devil; two of them (ta- 

what is our blind stubbornness) most of the people 

considers his friends, while in fact they are 

are the henchmen of our archenemy; while they 

with many different friendliness deceive these 

people, and in reality their bodily and spiritual 

noah death. 

   Satan is our greatest enemy, 

creator of all evil; in Scripture we see many names, 

explaining his evil nature. For your cruelty 

he is called Abvadon, the destroyer, for, unlike 

from some ordinary enemy he is not satisfied 

is conceived by the death and perdition of the body, but he plans and windows 

the destruction of souls and, unbearably tormenting them, 

their. For his skill, he is called a thief, for he is 

shaves in many ways, using which, he can 

maybe having contrived and, as if by chance, fall on 

pious people. For his anger, he received pro- 

the name "Devil", the accuser, for all the time, day and 

night, he is busy accusing the conscience of the righteous. 

   For his cunning, he received the nickname "dragon", 

for since the time of Adam, over many thousands 

years, there was not one wise enough or was 

a stubborn man who could resist 

his tricks; he wounded and poisoned them until the very death 

ty. For his power, he is nicknamed the lion 3, for like 

to how the huge body of a lion is full of strength, so 

and 

  in his tail lies extraordinary strength and power. 

                                                    53 



    We have no doubt that this enemy, 

our Apollyon, more powerful and strong enough, 

to fight against both cowardly cowards and 

honest but indecisive people, which we are 

We. But in order to make your victory even more 

strong and not experience defeat in achieving their 

targets, he is accustomed to using the power of his tail - 

that is, his bewitched slaves, whom he defines 

lil fulfill all my desires and I, in relation to the harmless- 

nyh people, which has already been done many times 

in many different ways. But usually he never 

shows his dexterity, strength and his power 

directly through his servants, but does so with 

by the power of the insidious seed merchants of the false account 

n and I 4 and zan and mayusch and hsya sorcery of witches; alone co- 

tempt the mind and soul, others attack the mortal 

flesh, deceive and trap in their nets 

people's minds. 

    I don't say anything about these false traders, but 

I want, the Lord is a witness, to tell about the damned witches- 

max, about their malice and incantations on an and i x, hated eyes 

of God, not seen by good people and bringing 

and their harm to themselves, showing what power and 

superiority is obtained by the permission of God- 

mu the father of sin Satan over sinners and to us, devotees 

worldly life. 

                         5 

    One Richard Burt, a servant of a gentleman 

name of Master Edling, who lives in Woodhall in the 

Pinner's course in Middlesex, a mile away 

Harrow-on-the-hill, was heading to his master's threshing floor 

ina, located near the outskirts of this city 

Yes. He was accompanied by a huge mastiff. suddenly he 

I saw a hare in front of me, rushing away from 

him. Having decided to set the dog on him, Richard completely 

I forgot about the purpose of my journey. However, the dog is not 

                                      6 

only refused to run after the hare, but began to jump 

around the host; at the same time, she sometimes fell to the ground, 

emitting pitiful cries, so that everyone could say 

to say that this game was clearly not for her. Richard, 

on fire, followed the hare and saw how he 

ran into the house of matush k and Atkin s, who was already out of 

known as a witch. Then, after reading the prayer and 

calling on the name of the Lord, he confidently said: 

"Shit, witch!" 



    This was the first (that is, what he called her after all- 

mine), which later led to the tragedy of Richard Burt. 

It so happened that a month later Richard Burt met 

her near the barn of his master and on and said "good afternoon." 

However, she is like a stubborn woman, a dangerous wasp, 

the witch spreading the infection, went into a rage, 

devoured it, and, bowing her head, did not utter a word. 

    And the next day, that is, on Wednesday, March 8, he 

again came to the master's threshing floor to work 

there and at the same time take care of some animals, 

and since he did not want to return, so as not to 

tearing up work, he took lunch with him - bread, butter, 

cheese, apple pie and a bottle of good beer. When coming 

in place, he put the bundle with food and proceeded to de- 

lu. Having worked until twelve o'clock, he, according to 

agenda, and also felt an attack of hunger 

yes, I decided to have lunch; however, his dinner did not last 

for a long time, because he saw him sitting in the straw 

against him a terrible black cat, which suddenly began 

to stir up this straw with a terrible noise. 

    This man, horrified, got up from his seat. De- 

rustle a piece of cake in your hand (because this hungry 

the poor thresher did not at all want to interrupt 

such a good meal), he suddenly heard a voice saying 

shouting to him: “Go away!” "Where can I go from here? 

to give?" he asked. In response, the spirit said the following: 

"And di, but leave all your stuff here and nig." 

    H hapless simpleton, continuing as before de- 

laugh in his hand a piece of apple pie, went up to you- 

walking out of the barn, when he suddenly felt that his 

lifted off the ground and carried through the air. flying over 

lying below the fields, he saw the workers of his 

his master a, however, he could not call them, although with a 

he seemed to be all right. So he 

bodies to Harrow, where on the slope of one hill was 

significant size reservoir; richard dragged through 

across this pond where he left his hat, 

which later became evidence of his torment, but 

he could not stop; he was dragged higher and higher. 

He flew over the top of this hill, over high 

Trees near the city's cathedral. He remembers all this 

well, and as he carried on, he 

eg 

   about words, got into a certain place full of fire, where I 

I heard such mournful pleadings and I and sobs that. 



it seemed as if all the damned demons of hell were subjecting- 

Xia torture in this Limbo 7 . 

    And so, you found out what a strange place the transfer was 

carried this Richard Burt; is it left to tell about the 

distinctive features of this place. 

    First, he says, it was very hot and very 

dark, darker than in the country k i mmerii y tsev 8 , in the air 

disgusting aromas hovered and emanated from everywhere 

stench; it was noisy, from somewhere they heard ri k i , 

and so strong that, it seemed, at the same time 

but millions of different voices speak, but there is no 

nothing could be seen except the flames and which 

caused such an unbearable thirst in his mouth that, 

remembering the penny left in his purse, he 

began to look around in search of a beer oh. 

    However, listening to these voices and thinking that 

some of them turn to him, he said: “N o 

there is no work for me here.” In response, he is here 

I heard: “Don't think about it. Oh you'll be free 

den only on the condition that everything is kept secret and 

don't tell anyone about it when you get back to- 

my". To which he replied: “But my master asked 

Sith, where have I been?" 

    Then suddenly he felt that I was folded in my mouth 

doubled, legs caught fire, hands smoked, 

rushed from the back and fell into the fire, and he, rapidly inflamed 

a ditch over the banks and hedges, then collapsed into a swamp 

and dirt, scratched at the same time about some kind of spikes and 

hatch and, so that he looked so oh that to look at and not- 

It was both scary and at the same time pitiful. 

    Returning back to Pinner 9, where his ho- 

zya i n, on sun achala n apilsya vody iz blood, and then c 

in this form he went to one of his acquaintances, 

who also occasionally worked for Master Edling. I, 

however, I cannot say whether he decided to go there 

the fact that his friend's house was closest, or else 

because he had been absent for four consecutive days. 

    And so, on Sunday morning, as was customary, his 

the host decided to take the same road to the church. Not 

knowing that poor Richard Burt had lost his sheep, 

he asked his servant if he had brought some 

any person. “For some reason, - answered 

he is your man, sir, Richard!” "My man- 

century? - he asked. “That can't be.” And here, 

Surprised beyond words, he silently looked at him. 

56 



Finally, he asked him to tell what, in the name of 

Gentlemen, something happened to him, and although he could not speak, 

however, remembering, probably, about something, he constantly indicated 

called, making some kind of sign, to the house where matush- 

ka Atk in s, and his whole being exuded so much 

fear and anger, that everything that came into his hands, 

immediately torn to shreds. 

    In the meantime, the assembled resh or what follows 

to send for the parish priest, whose name was ma- 

master Smith, and the gentleman Master Burbridge of 

P inner Park. Approaching this wordless creature 

Intuitively, they expressed their regret at his grief 

position and, having surrounded him with care, began 

whether to work on n and m. They cut his teeth, opening 

mouth, disconnected the finger from the tongue and with great difficulty 

the house was bent over. The first words he uttered 

It was like this: "Let's pray for Atkin, let's go 

cursed mother Atkins, she bewitched me." P o- 

after which he did not calm down, but said that he might even 

talk to her. 

    Master Burbridge and Master Smith sent for her. 

When she arrived, this Richard pounced on 

her and did not stop until he bled her all 

tso, while saying that he is doing what is pleasing to God 

a matter by which he can be cured. All 

and so it happened, as evidenced by life itself, 

for since then he has definitely recovered and now he 

child to church. 

    Such, in short, is the description of all those anxieties and evils. 

the adventures that had to be endured, as he says, 

Xia, in full measure, to this poor Richard Burt. All 

this happened on March 8, 9, 10 and 11 of this year, and precisely 

these days he was absent, having seen them off, as already known 

                                       10 

Obviously, in the manner mentioned above. 

    Now let's talk about it inside R 

a lot about matush k e Atkin s. And from reliable messages 

from Pinner it follows that the mentioned mother Atkins 

once came to the house of master Burbridge for youth 

com and it happened at the very time when the maids ki 

I was busy at the oil mill, so she wished 

could not receive. And as soon as she walked out the door, 

etc 

 Here the cream began to rise and boil in the vats 

so that in the end they broke out, 

flowed down the kitchen and got into the drain hole; So 

h 

  then their whole household suffered a loss that day, for 



                                                         57 



everything spilled on the floor and it was impossible to do anything 

Can. 

   O rebels against the Lord! Enemies of the human race 

sky! Extortionists! But you don’t even want to waste fire 

even! At the expense of this woman, we attributed many differences 

cruel and ferocious deeds, however, we 

let's sum up and finish it all in the same way. 

   Shortly after the described events, the mentioned witch 

mother came to the site of a certain Gregory Kulson to 

ask him to help her (for she lives by alms and 

mercy of good people), but she saw that he 

very busy with his own affairs - I think he marked the sheep; 

uttering his request and seeing that he does not leave 

her job and wants to bring it to the end, she 

belched out a cloud of smoke. After a while 

after she left and he finished his work, 

he released two sheep into the yard. Suddenly they started 

very fast to run back and forth, and rushed like this until 

as long as they didn’t die. 



George Gifford 

Witch Dialogue 

  and witchcraft 



  Dialogue about witches and sorcery, 

   which openly shows 

as the Devil deceitfully injects 

  mislead not only witches, 

but also many other people, plunging them 

     in a bad way in many 

     great sinful deeds. 

    Written by George Gifford, 

    servant of the word of God in Maldon. 



   To the most respected Mr. Robert Clarke, alone 

from barons to the treasury of Her Majesty. 

   Your a favor! Several years have passed since 

since I have published one small treatise, which 

witches 1 , in order to show the tricks of Satan 

and all his insidious deeds, so that ignorant people 

did not succumb to his deceit and did not deceive 

you are true. However, misconceptions of this kind 

were much larger, and the sins - to which he 

with the help of witches, he inclines many - more difficult and m and, 

than is usually thought of. Such things are 

hung in many places and, as I think, all this would be 

                                       2 

It was very unexpected for people. Undoubtedly, one 

however, the fact that thanks to nothing but the heavy condemnation of God 

living devil gathered in his hands oh so strong 

power, about which I had never even heard of 

happened 3 . And when people are enlightened, hearing a voice 

God speaking to them, they justly refuse 

called from devilish teachings and do not follow it 

example. However, today Satan is spoken of in every 

corner, it is heard about everywhere, they believe in it. About him 

                                     4 

say sorcerers, sorceresses, witches. By his word, 

obey. He already planned to do something, and in 

our day and it is being put into practice, it is being followed. 

About the highest providence of the Lord Almighty and all 

the ruler of the land is spoken of us in the Scriptures x as follows- 

in a general way: without H, even an arrow cannot fall 

to the ground. All the hairs on our head have been counted. De- 

the monks injure and kill people, destroy the living 

natural and other creatures, the reasons for them are physical 

daniya, however, all the demons of hell are shackled and restrained 

are given by this supreme Providence, so that they are not subject to 

the strength of even a feather and tear out of the wing of the poor fellow red- 

brewery without special permission given to them 

Ruler of all the firmament of the earth. However, we are 

made to believe that it was at the request of the witches 

and for the satisfaction of their angry desires, their spirits 

mutilate and kill both people and animals. And for- 

in order to disseminate such an opinion in the general 

nature, these insidious spirits betray them, forcing them to 

to openly admit that it was they who committed 

Are all these deeds that I could never have done 

Lat - at the request of man - not a single demon. i bo 



                                                     61 



if they could do something like that, then w 

it would be necessary to persuade them. And sometimes God gives 

monu power so that he can disturb people and living 

votnyh, cause them bodily suffering. If he 

maybe he will do it at the request and on calls 

witches, but it is absolutely impossible to imagine 

to believe that it is their appeals that give him a well-known 

force or that he will not do what is permitted by the Lord 

to make a house for him until they call 

and we don’t send it to anyone. In the body 

lovek and animal lies a lot of diseases, 

seeded and m 5, and it is with their help that he brings any 

dey to lameness and even to death. At the same time, he de- 

neighing witches in the kulak e; he can be said to create them. 

Wishing to consolidate the fruits of his labors, he acts 

em with the help of sorceresses of a different kind, which in 

kind of name is knowing and mi people and wise women shch and a- 

m and 6. Through n and x, he reveals his many different applications. 

ema, desiring to be aspired to and revered 

like God. These things take root in the hearts 

people, making them, in this and that way, afraid of witches; 

they arouse suspicion and stir up rumors among 

sets of n ev n n s; some fall into the category of wine 

cottony, others are sentenced to death - in general, 

much innocent blood is shed. That's why me and 

I want to show in this treatise (to the best of my modest 

possibilities), how skillfully the devil does everything 

This. I did it in the form of a dialogue in order to 

our conversation was accessible to simple people and not 

very learned. I dare to suggest this book and- 

the life of your Grace, but not because I consider you 

those in need of such instruction, for you are 

devotedly devoted to the gospel and so firm in faith in you 

the best Providence, which I was glad to see and 

to hear how prudent and right to act 

la your mercy in judgment when such things arose 

situations. That is why I offer you this book in 

as evidence of their gratitude for the 

position and kindness that you have shown me, and 

I offer your Grace to her to receive her. If she 

serves to correct the minds of weak-willed people. 

                       7 

then I will be very happy. If I'm wrong about anything, 

below, I'm ready to fix it. 

    Your Grace obedient servant 

                                              8 

                             George Gifford 

62 



                    Members: 

   Samuel. Dan iel. Wife of Samuel. M.B. - school 

ny teacher. Good Wife R. 

   Sam: Here we are, my old friend. I'm glad, 

that you look as good as all your 

friends living in your village. 

   Dan: I hope they are all in good health. 

wee... At least they were when I 

arrived here. However, something else upsets me - you 

you look unusually pale. Have you been sick recently? 

   Sam: To be honest, no. Thank God, with health 

I'm fine with me, although it seems to me that in 

Meat has been making me sick a little lately. 

   Dan: So what, buddy? You chose to take care of 

around the world? “And for God’s sake, sorrow produces invariable 

new repentance to salvation, but worldly sorrow produces 

death”, 2 K op.7.10. This is a great sin, flowing 

most of unbelief and doubt in Divine Providence 

nii, if a person wants to rise above worldly sorrow. 

   Sam: I'm really worried, but not because, oh 

than you said. And for me, thank God, I have such a desire 

life and will not occur. 

   Dan: But maybe this anxiety stems from 

out of a sense of sin? If so, then everything can ne- 

change for the better. 

   Sam: No, no. The reason is unknown to me. 

   Dan: Then let me ask you a question, what 

anyway, is that what it is? Please answer me. I 

your friend, right? 

   Sam: Yes, yes, of course, I always considered you my ho- 

our friend and I am sure that you will give me the best 

our advice, because it suddenly became clear that we 

we live in a very bad village 9 . I even think 

which is one of the worst in England. 

   Dan: Why not? And I thought to myself that you were inhabited 

eat in a beautiful village, in the fresh air and blessings 

good earth. 

   Sam: In the air... The air has nothing to do with it, here 

people are stupid. 

   Dan: Bad people? Wherever a person lives, he carries 

Den stumbles upon them. Blasphemers, liars, scoffers, 

vagabonds, drunkards, adulterers, revelers, and kos-players 

ty, high-minded proud - they are everywhere, and they are very 

a lot. 



     Sam: No, I don't mean them, it's not about them at all 

Witches, those old devil-supported ones^ 

witches - that's what worries me 1 0 . 

     Dan: What did you do that you think 

have you been surrounded? 

     Sam: No, no. I think that no evil spirit can 

can do me no harm even though I have enough 

hear about the harm they cause to people, 

they lame them and kill their cattle 

Yes, yes, they persecute adults and children. They say that in 

there are very few cities and villages in this district, but in 

each of them is sure to find one or two witches 

During my walks I see them here and there - 

I'll tell you this as a friend! - some hare. Consciousness 

tells me that this is a witch, or some kind of demon 

sky spirit. Moreover, he always looks intently at me 

n i . And sometimes in my yard I meet an ugly lady 

ku, snooping back and forth, but in the barn - a huge 

creepy cat. I don't like him either. 

     Dan: But about you, no witch has eaten anything yet. 

lol, isn't it? 

     Sam: You know what, I can't say it, but I'm afraid 

what can be done, because in our city 

a couple also live, and so and x, but I don’t like them. Especially 

one of them, an old woman. Oh how I tried to please her 

like his mother, gave her everything she wanted, and 

However, I think she keeps looking at n- 

me from under my brows. I have a pig, which is usually 

ate with everyone else and, in my opinion, she was with 

perfectly healthy yesterday. So this morning 

whether we have her around. My wife had five chickens 

and they all died. So some neighbors offered to burn: 

someone, a rooster or this pig; others advised 

                                                       11 

I should ask for help from some sorcerer ds 

                  12 

moreover, as about n and the reasons yat to me still something. Here I am zyxwvutsr 

                                                          v 

I want to do what's best. 

     Dan: Do you have some magician here who 

does it really help? 

     Sam: There is, they say, there is one. He lives at twenty; 

miles from here in town B. and has already helped many. In two 

A friend of mine lives miles from here. So big for him 

bad luck: he lost two cows out of three, yes four 

pigs. So they didn't even give him 15 shillings for 

pig. Well, he went to that same person and 

said he suspected an old woman in the area 

64 



He told me what the man had shown him in the piece 

glasses, saying at the same time that that woman’s 

henchmen three or four imps, which some 

calls spirits. So, break their thunder, one is like 

on a gray cat, the second on a weasel, and the third - on a mouse! 

It is a pity that the village will never get rid of them! To rum then- 

oh, that person told him and what she intended 

do. All this happened six months ago and since then 

everything is in order in the house. In addition, twenty-five minutes 

lyakh from here, in R.Kh., lives a very famous woman 

on the. Everyone comes to her when almost all hope 

already lost a. My neighbor's daughter - and the girl has only 

for ten years - lameness overcame, and she was so sick 

her back that she couldn't even sit up. He went to this 

woman and she told him that somewhere near them there were 

answer some unkind neighbor for whom she was supposed to, 

by prior arrangement, to marry. Point- 

she promised to tell her in the event that the father 

goes home and fetches some of her clothes, in which 

she, that is, a girl, must first oversleep 

all night long. My neighbor returned home and tied his do- 

cherry around the neck a small towel, lying usually 

but on the field. In the morning he returned to this woman and ne, 

grabbing, of course, a towel with her, and she said 

him that the girl was really bewitched, and told 

la, what should be done in this case 

health, he cured his daughter during the same day and she 

la, becoming an ordinary nimble girl. L at my other 

neighbor's wife was constantly worried about something; so he- 

went to the same woman and she told him that his 

his wife is pursued by some kind of spirit. I don't know what she 

vetoed him to do it, but his wives suddenly cheered up 

la. I heard the same, no, no, it's true or not that 

she always carries with her the Gospel of John or 

some part of it. 

    Dan: B o (aphids you have such skillful signs ahari, 

then what are you afraid of? 

    Sam: You know, I even dared to poi in. but alone 

advise me to go to that man in town B., and 

others to that woman in A.D. I'm losing out 

Miyah time, but meanwhile they can ruin me before 

how will I get the remedy. Who the hell 

advises me to beat this witch to blood and threaten 

her gallows. Oh, if I knew what was better, so 

but would have done. 

3- 3400                                                   , , 



    Dan: I think the main danger is 

now that you are sitting on two chairs. 

    Sam: It's true. If I knew at least 

about one of these people, I would go to him. But I 

I'm glad I met you today. Please advise what 

me to do. I hope you don't refuse. 

    Dan: God knows, I will give you the best advice, mi 

who is capable and who I think will suit you 

and benefit, if, of course, you follow it. To me 

It's unfortunate that everything turned out this way, but most likely you 

really bewitched. 

    Sam: Bewitched? Do you think I'm bewitched? N o me 

I don't have any pain!!! You say scary things 

sh and... 

    Dan: No, I don't think that this old woman was bewitched. 

you or your body. Probably your mind is bewitched 

bewitched by blindness and unbelief in order to lead 

from God and make you worship him (the devil. - 

P trans.), while turning to the demons for help. 

                                   13 

It makes me sad to see how the devil bewitches thousands 

chi people and they run after him and even bring him zher 

your 

    Sam: I will never submit to the devil! To worship 

to him?! Fuck him!!! I hate him with all my heart! Du- 

Do you think I'll seek help from him? No, we will find 

remedy for it. I think he will never 

He wanted to do good to people and never helped anyone. 

    Dan: However, this is not the case here, as we 

imagine, but as the Word of God teaches 1 4 - 

For although a man thinks he does not worship 

devil and does not seek help from demons, moreover, neither 

when he doesn’t think about it, what is he constantly trying to 

give, we nevertheless, with the help of the Word of God about 

we discover that he worships them and resorts to 

n them, and will help and. 

    Sam: So you think there are no witches? N o n<' 

did the Lord suffer, seeing what was done to weak people 

harm? And do you think that such artificers help 

people with the help of the devil? I would very much like to 

to beat you, but I am too weak in Scripture. However, we have 

there is a teacher here; they say he knows the priest well 

nye texts, and besides, well-versed in Latin and. By the way, 

now he is - and his name is M.B. - must come to msh 

home. So, I ask you to join your efforts and 

bb 



in this direction and discuss the essence of the matter. You are the people 

scientists. 

   Dan: That would be nice, but everything takes time. 

me, and I was going to go to one place on an important 

part. 

   Sam: I beg you, agree! Four, five o'clock - 

because it is so small! 

   Dan: Oh well, I'll go with you. 







    Sam: Wife, I brought my friend, so please 

you, meet him properly. 

    Woman: I am very glad to see you. You know, hubby, in- 

sometimes I'm very angry with you and can hardly restrain myself 

because you did not go to ask for help against that 

old bitch. This night we have another dead Ku- 

rice. Others don't find the means to do so! To us 

now come M.B. and said that the good wife 

R . All last week, I couldn't beat the butter. 

She worked without rest until she sent her 

husband to that wife in R.Kh.; when he returned 

they threw a handful of heat into the cream and, uttering 

this certain words, as was punished by that woman 

oh, and they made a good, soft butter, 

what they did before. And this old bastard I 

met this morning. God, with what expression - 

like a hunter for a victim - she looked at me, 

and, walking away, she muttered something! I even heard 

la something. “Ah,” she said, “your husband is an honest 

man, but I heard that he despises me.” You 

You know, everything turned upside down inside me. Oh here I am 

took courage and scratched it. True, then I used 

she was afraid that she could not cope with her - she 

such a healthy aunt. I want to come to me 

there was a good woman R. And I ask you, my dear, 

go, please, to that very woman. 

you go there for half a day. 

    Sam: Wife, please calm down. I asked for my 

his old friend to talk to M.B. about this, because 

that he told me that we had fallen into a deep delusion- 

we. 

    M .B .: As far as my knowledge and ability allow me to 

property, I think that a little reasoning on this 

theme can serve us well. Word 

3 

    *                                                 b7 



God clearly shows us that witches exist 

howl. In addition, it commands us to sentence 

them to death. And from our experience we are too good 

we know about the many evils that they can do to us 

for a reason. And if someone suddenly has a way - 

the ability to provide assistance in the fight against them, then how do we 

can we refuse in such a situation? Are we not 

do we drink when we are thirsty? Aren't we wearing warm clothes? 

clothes when we are cold? It is to be regretted if 

someone stands up for witches, these creatures are not pious. 

    Dan: As for me, I'm not going to defend 

for witches, and I do not at all reject what they say 

the power of the devil does his deeds. And x really 

should be sentenced to death. And we really 

must look for a means to get rid of them. Oh, how am I 

already told my friend, the devil is bewitching everyone with 

with the help of witches and leads them from God to the fact that they 

followed him, offered him sacrifices, worshiped 

him, obeyed his will, committing many terrible 

ny sins and getting involved in various sinful 

dey n i . 

    M.B.: If you mean that witches and sorceresses 

fascinated by the devil that they renounce God and 

follow him and m, worship and obey him, 

bring sacrifices to him and commit a lot of grave and grave sins 

hov, then I agree with you, for I believe that they themselves 

bow their necks to him, otherwise he 

it would be very difficult to work with them. But if you do 

you think that the search for saving means in an effort 

to destroy them lead to the fact that people seduce- 

Xia and go astray by the devil, then I will say that your 

speeches are hasty and stupid, for these people speak passionately 

they fight both against witches and against the devil. They drop 

challenge him, resist him, wanting to destroy him 

tools. So if you were a scientist, 

you would see that opposites cannot exist 

to be in the same subject, in the same 

time, in the same part and in the same 

relation: how then is it possible that a person is not 

sees the devil, fights with him and his deeds, and yet 

less, should it? 

    Dan: I know that witches and wizards usually sleep- 

the chalices are perverted from the true path, after which they become 

they are the servants of Satan: they are his servants and, 

not vice versa, as you can see. Oh I really 

68 



I mean that many are deceived and turn away- 

from God, starting to follow the devil, it is the blessing 

giving influence to witches and sorcerers. Yes and I say it 

not of those who are overcome by piety, but of those whom 

turn with the help of blind anger and wild rage. 

If I say this hastily and thoughtlessly, how can you 

deigned to declare, and if you, in your opinion, know everything, zyxwvutsrqp 

                                                         Mr 

I am nothing, then I can be refuted with 

even more ease. But I say it so 

tilted and so I can justify what I said by the Word 

God that HRV your knowledge and skill will not be able to 

refute my words. First, the vag will let you down 

vein logic. “Opposites cannot exist 

voicing in the same subject, at the same time 

me, in the same part, in the same respect 

n ii. I must say that you are blind and deluded. 

about these opposites, saying that the first of 

them - hatred for the devil, rejection of his personality and 

his deeds is in them (people. - Trans.), when on 

in fact, it exists only in their imagination. 

Because if people say and think that they 

cast down the devil and his deeds and I, at the same time being 

bewitched through unbelief and deceit and following the devil 

crowbar and fulfilling his commands, is it possible that their speech and 

blind imagination will make things exist in reality 

But? What if the poor tramp beggar thinks 

that she is a queen, and talks about it. What, she really 

is no longer a beggar and does not ask for bread for himself 

food? And there are no more lice on it? 

    M.B.: You know... If people come out in all sincerity- 

sing against the devil, do not accept him and his 

works, will you really judge their consciousness and say 

to think that they do not accept it only in the imagination, 

worshiping and following him in reality? Do not eat 

Is God the only Judge of human hearts? AND 

then: maybe you are comparing people who are in 

sane, with crazy and not quite normal- 

m and ?15 

    Dan: I know that it is only given to the Lord to penetrate into 

depths of the human heart, reaching what 

hidden in its secret corners. But since these phenomena 

appear before everyone, then, as they say, the tree of knowledge 

ed according to the fruits 1 6 . If a person thoroughly confesses 

He has the faith of Jesus Christ, following the word of God in everything, 

after which he begins to build his life in a new way, 

                                                      6Q 



doing good, it is hardly possible to condemn anyone 

give it up and say he's a hypocrite doing it all 

for vain glory. It is possible that the Lord 

who knows the secret intentions of souls and sees what he 

                             17 

raetsya do tsem er . On the other hand, if he 

proclaims in words that he does not accept the devil and 

his deeds, but at the same time, when he is involved in 

tried and tested by the word of God, it suddenly turns out that 

he is corrupted, entangled by the devil in a web of delusion, 

unbelief and sinful deeds, in which he performs 

the will of Satan and glorifies him instead of the Lord God, then 

can we say that this is a good person 

because he pronounces the same words and has sub- 

good ideas, and that he does not accept the devil and 

his deeds? “Woe to those who call evil good, 

and good - evil", And p. 5 1 8 . It should be noted that all 

they are in a very bad position, except for those 

who will repent and turn away from Satan. That's why I 

I say that a believer can make mistakes in some 

some of these questions for reasons of weakness in faith and 

out of ignorance. And that is why there should not be special 

sh and t with estimates to ami. Since you find my 

well, in that I compare crazy people and normal people 

small ones, then I must say that it is precisely because of your 

ignorance, you think that there are no two types 

of the madmen: the first, these are those who are not in their own 

mind regarding earthly affairs, and the second - regarding affairs 

spiritual and heavenly. There are so and e, which are directed 

their minds on the objects of this world, and so on, which 

ry, thinking about spiritual things, are so 

same wrong, like a vagrant tramp, imagining herself 

righteous queen. Did not the holy Apostle say, 

that “if they have not received the love of the truth, God will send them 

a strong delusion, so that they will believe a lie", 

2 F es.2 1 9 . What is this, if not seduction, damage and about 

Satan's manipulation of the minds of the people whom he leads to 

manu and deluded iyam, making them believe that they 

worship God when in fact they worship 

demons? 

   M.B.: Do you think St. Paul meant this? 

That is, that Satan a bewitches the minds of men, 

misleading people and leading them to unrighteousness, 

while making them believe that they worship God, 

while they worship the devil? 

70 



    Dan: St. Paul really talks about coming 

the great Antichrist in the power of the Devil. So those who 

corrupted by the Antichrist and worship him, they think 

that render honor to God. However, listen to what 

says St. John: “And the whole world was surprised, and followed 

after the beast, and bowed to the dragon who gave 

                                                       20 

power to the beast; and they worshiped the beast”, O tk r DZ . 

Yes, then look at the 12th chapter of Revelation and there you 

find that this Dragon worshiped by pa- 

pists, instead of honoring God, are the Devil himself 

ox 2 1 

    M.B.: Truly, I really liked your words 

and I was convinced that the devil seduces and bewitches 

human minds. As for the fact that 

seek help against witches, sorcerers and sorceresses, then 

I don't think they should be treated that harshly. 

Maybe I'm wrong, but one thing I know for sure: 

if the word of God points out to me my mistakes, then persevere 

I, of course, will not act. Let's be friendly 

we judge this question and do not be offended by me, so 

I, for my part, will speak of everything I know 

or what I'm thinking. 

    Dan: In turn, I want to ask you to listen to 

shat all my vys zyvan and I . And let's get into it all 

actually follow from one point to the other, stop 

only where we disagree 

I. And let the word of God be the only Judge 

among us. 

    Sam: I like it. There is nothing to add here, so 

I sit and listen to you. 

    Dan: So, what question are we going to discuss per- 

what? 

     M.B.: I heard what you said, if, of course, I 

I am not mistaken that there are witches who 

work with the help of the devil. Please tell me 

do you think that's the way it is? I know that some 

think otherwise. 

    Dan: It's so blatantly confirmed by St.P.Isani- 

we eat and it is clear from experience, that is, that there are after all 

we who work with the help of the devil, or rather 

zat, the devil himself acts with their help, that desire 

to prove the contrary will testify 

only about the captiousness of people who want to do it. 

    M.B.: I am glad that in this paragraph we adhere to 

common opinion. I hope that in the future everything will be 

                                                      71 



children behave in the same way. What do you say 

about the following statement: that witches have 

their spirits, some one, some more - 

two, three, four or even five; one of them 

appear in one guise, others in another: in vi- 

de cat, caress and, la goush to and, we sh and. The witches feed them 

milk or chickens, sometimes let them drain 

                            22 

call to apelk and blood. Witches call them when 

someone offends them, while they incite du- 

how to inflict harm on offenders - to injure them or kill them, 

or destroy their livestock. 

   Dan: This is an extraordinary delusion. 

and great deceit. Here the devil leads the ignorant 

people to gross mistakes, thanks to which he 

turns them into many lamentable sins. 

   M.B.: Then I must declare that you are mistaken- 

you, if you deny all these things, saying that all this 

just illusions. This has been repeatedly proven 

elk, at least even by numerous recognition and I am sa- 

my witches. I, on the other hand, feel anxious 

on this occasion, and I can, citing many facts 

comrade, tell about such cases. During these 

five years I lived in the same village and was there alone 

wealthy person. And suddenly within ten days 

he is killed by three cows, his bull is worth 10 pounds 

went limp, he himself was shot in the back, and his child 

At the age of seven, he went to another world. He went 

to that woman in R.H. and she told him that on him 

sent damage to a certain witch. At the same time, she added, 

that three witches and one sorcerer live in his town. 

She asked him which of them he was more suspicious of. On 

that our men answered that he was suspicious of one 

old woman. Whereupon he made this old woman 

appear before a worldly court and answer all questions 

dew. Finally, after much denial, she 

dabble in everything. And what did it reveal? She had 

three spirits: the first in the form of a cat, which she called 

Leggy, the second - in the form of a toad. His name was Lan h. Tre- 

the one looked like a weasel and wore the nickname of the Cunning- 

n th. She told the court that this Lightfoot was being sold to her. 

la sixteen years ago a certain mother a Barley from V., 

asking for him a baked pie. Wherein 

she said that the cat would serve her well and 

that if she wants, she can send him to her 

instructions. Moreover, she did not use this for long, one 



72 



nako weasel and toad regularly performed their duties: 

the cat killed the cow, the weasel killed the horses, and the toad sent 

la damage to people. She sent them all (by her own 

to a certain confession) against that person. Her sentence is 

to imprisonment, and there she almost immediately 

and passed away. I can tell you a lot of things... 

anyone, but I'm not going to live in this place anymore. 

     Dan: Well, you're wrong about me. I do not speak, 

that these things do not exist; I just think that 

the devil, with the help of such phenomena, deceives and 

turns ignorant people around and leads them to delusion 

denias and regrettable sins. That's why let's 

we will check every position that you have expressed, and you 

you will see that there is nothing else there. 

     M.B.: And that's what I would like to hear about. You, 

so you acknowledge that they have spirits in their service, 

someone one, someone more, and that they exist in 

indicated n th guise. What kind of delusion 

then such people are introduced? 

     Dan: First, consider that there is a huge, 

many, and in other words, the army of demons that we 

we see already in the gospel. Many demons have settled in 

man, that is why Christ says: “How is your 

Name?" and hears the answer: "Legion, for we are many," 

M a r k . 5. 2 3 So demons exist extraordinarily 

many, and all of them are led by such a great hatred 

longing for God and such a great desire to achieve what 

to be reviled and reproached, burning at the same time from 

furious malice and hatred for people that they are all their own 

efforts unite, helping and promoting each 

friend in all his deeds. About this even in Scripture 

it is said, that is, that they look like one 

single Demon. Here are the words of St. Peter: “Your adversary, 

the devil, walks like a roaring lion, and u 

                                   24 

he was able to swallow,” 1 Pet. 5. In the 12th chapter of Revelation 

all the demons make up that huge red dragon 

on . 2 5 And our Savior shows how they turn into 

into one when he says, "If Satan be separated from 

Satan, or if Satan demands Satan, how can he resist 

                           26 

his kingdom", Mf. 12. So now everything is one way or another- 

what has one result, is it a witch, how is she 

considers, with one spirit or with many: each of 

they act not alone, but with the help of others. 

That's why, if such men or women are driven 

acquaintance with one demon, then this is equal to 



                                                        7.4 



like if they had a hundred demos as their friends 

new Moreover, these demons are spirits, they have no human 

something like a body, although they may appear in some 

images, which were once done by sorcerers in front of the eyes 

pharaoh, when their wands were turned into snakes, 

And with x. 7. 2 7 That is why one demon can act as 

de four or five i ti, and four or five demons 

may seem to be the only one. All this is so far 

united in many ways and vice versa - the tricks of Satan. 

    M.B.: Then don't you think that the more de- 

monks, the more powerful is Satan? 

    Dan: That's right, but there's almost nothing to distinguish, 

for if a witch does something, so she and one de- 

mon can appear in ten forms and vice versa. 

    M.B.: Well, yes, we can agree with that. I ask you to, 

go on. 









   Dan: Now we should note how Holy Scripture 

depicts demons to us. These are mighty terrible 

spirits, domineering, angry and cruel, comparable to that 

                                                   28 

a huge scary red dragon, Otkr.12, 

or with a gluttonous and hungry lion, which 



74 



roar after prayer, 1 Petr. 5 2 9 , and named 

my st. Paul to princes and lords and rulers 

                    30 

the darkness of this world. And so since they accept 

the shape of so and x pitiful and x creatures like as to osh to a, mouse, toad 

and caress, then we see how insidiously they hide 

their tyranny and the power they exercise over the 

children of the weak. Most of all, we need to know 

how strong an enemy, opposing everything and everything, we 

we have. So we should soar to the Lord God, 

so that he endowed us with his strength in the struggle against them. 

   M.B.: Okay, but what do you mean by 

this? I do not at all deny that Scripture is real. 

describes these demons to us as powerful and 

evil spirits. They probably really are, though 

and appear in front of us in the form of a cat or weasels. 

   Dan: As for me, I do not say that they are not 

powerful and not terrible because they appear in 

so and x here are images, but I admit that a similar form of them 

appearance is necessary in order to hide and hide them 

strength and effective actions they produce 

in dark human hearts. And please note ho- 

Roshen bko that the power of demons lies precisely in the hearts 

of people. They harden hearts, blind the spiritual vision. 

n ie; thanks to bodily lust and desire and yu they are thrown into 

rage them in anger, malice, envy and incite them to cruel 

murders; they arouse in them their pride, arrogance 

glory and vain glory, lead to rampage, debauchery and pro- 

                                 31 

chim disgusting things. Hell with all this they work 

constantly and with such efficiency that without force 

glorious suffering and resurrection of our Lord 

And Jesus Christ, which we find in faith, they cannot 

can be resisted, that's why they act in ro- 

whether some kind of servant, engaged in all sorts of damage to drugs and fabrics, 

make them greasy, keep the cheese from cooking and the butter 

stray, sea to ur and pigs, and people are let dry 

fabric, etc. 

   M.B.: But maybe they don't do all those things. 

Shchee immediately? 

   Dan: Possibly, but I think they are busy im- 

are engaged in large cases, as, for example, they initiate 

tyrants or evil people to persecute, vilify and 

                      32 

mourn E van gels e, casting them down and c; divide 

kings and kingdoms and kindle wars between them 

and hatred, but disagreement and quarrels between husband and wife 

noah, bringing in this and that way everywhere confusion and trouble 

                                                           75 



in a row, they must be busy and empty, but 

by this they so tune the minds of people that they do not 

can see and just don't pay attention and mans and I'm on 

their role in all of this. 

    M .B .: I understand that you under all this im- 

you zoom, but I don’t even know what you are leading to? 

Those who see everything done by witches are not recognized, 

that everything you mentioned is the work of the devil? 

    Dan: Ignorant people, greatly intimidated by 

mami, in words they really recognize everything how you 

and they said, but when it comes to the real case, then here 

they reject everything. And for the devil constantly besieges the souls of 

man, striving to throw all their terrible strivings at her 

ly , E f es.b, 3 3 wishing to death and guard it with the help 

sinful villain n y. "The devil walks around like a roar- 

a devouring lion, and a shcha whom he could devour”, 1 Peter 5. WITH 

using deceit, using witches, demons 

make blind people pretend they've never 

will not come close to them, unless, in fact, 

we get angry and send them on someone. So them 

can be easily repelled if you burn any living su- 

creature, for example, a piglet or a chicken, or by beating up to 

the blood of the witch herself. Thinking that you can get rid of them 

twisted or similar, or poured in a handful 

heat into milk, in fact, far from the knowledge of spirits 

a battle in which we must act under the banner of 

                               34 

it is Christ against the devil. Even less do they know how 

to use the weapon of God (as St. Paul said) to 

                                                     35 

go to resist and defeat him, E f es.b. He mo- 

can influence their souls, and even when he is just serving 

w aet. They accept it not in its existing form, 

but through his messages, when pain appears in their bodies, and 

their goods and property bear any loss. 

    M .B .: I do not at all deny that demons tend to 

sya, mainly to destroy souls and human. 

But (as I understand it) you acknowledge that they, being sent 

We are witches and commit all these crimes. AND 

Still, I don't see any reason why people can't 

find means to get rid of such misfortunes and expel 

with the help of something suitable these demons? Is it 

Does the Word of God forbid us to use them? If I 

sick, shall I not resort to medicine? And es- 

If I suffer from thirst, shall I not drink water? Yes I 

I agree with you, although up to now I have never 

noted so clearly that the devil is at work here 



76 



extraordinarily sophisticated about - contacting every space 

with these things, he hides his participation in more 

serious, as if he was not even there at all. 

But the whole point is that I oppose him precisely in 

these serious things ah; so can't I use 

to know what is needed, and what will save me from him in the ve- 

less significant? I'm going, unless of course 

I can get rid of it all. 

   Dan: But we haven't gotten around to how witches 

they send devils and how they inflict all these bodily 

damage. This is where the main trick lies. 

the devil, with the help of which he introduces many loves 

dey mislead. However, we somehow accidentally mentioned 

zeros about the means to get rid of it, since (as I 

already said) thinking to get rid of it above described 

in a sleigh way they do not know the spiritual struggle. More me- 

they do not know how to raise all the weapons of God, 

to fight the Devil. The order of our conversation is pre- 

believes that at first we are talking about who 

sends, then about all bodily injuries that 

rye the devil inflicts, and only then about those means that 

rye are used in order to defeat him. So 

let's go back a little, if you agree with 

what I just talked about. 

   M .B .: I will do it with great pleasure, because so and m about- 

Together we won't miss anything. However, it seems to me that 

we are completely unanimous in the fact that witches 

send their spirits and do a lot of evil to ak in 

in relation to people as well as in relation to animals. About 

this is what our daily experience tells us. And if you 

you will not deny what witches show in their 

activities, then, I have no doubt, for all these questions 

dew we will come to an agreement. 

   Dan: I'm saying witches send their spirits. 

   M.B.: So what do we need then to let us down 

the result on this point, on which we must agree 

sit? 

   Dan: Well, even though we agreed that we were the only ones 

send others, nevertheless, we can disperse in 

views on who sends whom. To start, say- 

those to me: who is the servant, the witch or the devil? Who 

of them commands, and who obeys? 

   M.B.: How can I answer this question? Counts, 

that he is her servant even when the witch 

dissatisfied and wants revenge, she hires him, which 

                                                         77 



He would do what she needs. Witches themselves repeatedly 

but they confessed it, and as for me, I think 

May no one be able to refute this. 

     Dan: Those who do the will of God are children and servants. 

God. Fulfilling the wishes of the Devil and sub- 

those who serve him are his children and servants, And John 8.44; De- 

             36 

i n .13.10. Is not it? 

     M.B.: Yes! 

     Dan: These demons are the rulers of the darkness of this world, 

               37 

Eph es.6.12. 

     M.B.: The text is too clear. 

     Dan: The darkness of this world does not mean the darkness of the night, 

I am only a shadow of the earth, but this is spiritual darkness, 

                                                 38 

consisting in the punishment of God, unbelief and sin. 

     M.B.: I agree with you about this. 

     Dan: So don't you think then what the devil has 

your seat, your possession, and your kingdom in the hearts of 

ignorant and blind infidels? 

     M.B.: I must necessarily remark that this 

this is true. The word of God also leads me to this; He 

really to n I z of darkness. 

     Dan: And is there any greater disbelief and 

darkness than in witches, sorcerers and others, I have 

What is their acquaintance with the devil? 

     M.B.: I think disbelief and darkness overwhelm them 

more than anyone else. 

     Dan: Now put everything you said together. 

and see if that doesn't match what a witch 

is a servant of the devil, but he is not her servant. 

He is Lord and to oman di r; she obeys him, you- 

doing all the dirty work. 

     M.B.: Yes, it is. However, although he is the Lord, 

however, she uses it on certain occasions. 

Witches themselves admit that they call them and send 

bark where necessary; or they hire them in order to 

harm someone personally or spoil the livestock of someone 

who they were unhappy with. 

     Dan: I'm sorry, but you are deeply mistaken. 

It's sad when someone does something like this. 

mistakes, especially if this person is a scientist and is called - 

ny to teach others. 

     M.B.: I will not accept your words and x, for if you 

If you deny this too, then it is foolish to talk about anything 

Further. I stand firmly on my point of view, on the fact that 

what I know, and you can't push me off of it. Listen now 

78 



 enya. In one big city there lived a mother atush k a V. A u 

me* 

  There was a spirit that outwardly looked like a caress. Somehow her 

someone G.M. was very offended. When she comes home, she 

 called her evil spirit, which lay in a basket of 

                                            39 

 wool that stood under her bed. Wishing on- 

to send pestilence on this man, she told the spirit that she 

gives him the opportunity to kill this G.M. And further 

she said that she would give him a rooster, which subsequently 

 and .did; and the spirit of the ears ate. Almost immediately that man 

fell into bed, his stomach hurt terribly, 

how many days he sharply weakened and soon died. This one is- 

Ma was taken to court, convicted, and hanged. 

By the way, she confessed everything. 

    Dan: I told you before that I can't deny 

I give these things to her; and yet you are still deceptions- 

wonder about their essence. Come on, don't you tell the truth 

ril St. Peter - “the devil walks around, roaring 

lion, and shcha, whom could he devour”, 1 Peter 5? 

     M.B.: So what? 

    Dan: How what? Are you really that simple 

imagine that the devil lies in a basket of yarn, 

in comfort and warmth and does not move at all, is it really 

yes, when asked or for something n aim? Such 

demons agree on their actions, they are energetic 

they are greedy and never rest, day or night. 

They never get tired, they never get cold 

they don't need a soft bed. There are co- 

of course, such stupid jokes with which he 

deceives witches and bewitches the minds of many ignorant 

important people. And what you say is like it's someone 

then it doesn’t, it’s also a hoax. Therefore, let me for- 

give you two or three questions, or, if necessary, 

a little more. 

    M.B.: And what are those questions? 

    Dan: You say the witch comes home ras- 

angry. To something other than the devil, can soften and uti- 

sew anger into her heart? That fills her brain with malice, 

the desire to be avenged, the desire to commit 

various dirty tricks, why not the devil? Doesn't he rule her 

heart? With to live, what do you think about this? 

    M.B.: I must admit that it is the devil who excites 

gives her anger and malice. 

    Dan: So he's not at home in a basket. 

with 

   yarn, and no one hires him. Hence, 

it is the witch who walks around in his day laborer, obeying 

                                                       74 



him and his instructions azan and i m, and not vice versa. So say 

me, doesn't the devil look like a huge red dragon 

on, Rev. 12., burning with malice against the Lord, 

full of bloody, cruelest hatred 

against people? And isn't he more ready for any evil- 

deed than which man or woman? 

   M .B .: The devil is more cruel than any of the people. 

It is impossible to deny this. 

   Dan: So if no one denies it, and it's him 

produces evil and anger in the heart of a witch, why should he 

do I need to go somewhere else? He turns her on and 

if necessary, czyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV 

                                     l will be able to turn her away 

from desired and I use it myself. So why would he 

to be in service? Does he go after someone, for a chicken 

mi or for chickens? Is he hungry, does he have something 

do you want to? 

   M.B.: No, no, but it is believed that the devil pre- 

accepts all this in order to prove that 

the witch belongs to him. 

   Dan: So be it. In what you said there is 

something like that ... In fact, it penetrates much 

deeper, for the truth is that he convinces 

blinded people, as if he hardly intervenes in 

their affairs. But even if he is entrusted with something or somewhere 

sometimes they send it, and then in all this it is manifested 

intervention. That's why everyone jumps on 

old women who can somehow be suspected of 

that they are witches, as if they were the chief 

new danger to the world. You might think that all 

children will be fine and everyone will be safe if you 

driven. That is why they start from them so thoughtlessly because 

             40 

add up. And it is known that many believe that, after all, 

a mother who has her own spirits is something like a human 

century, keeping bad dogs. He can set them on 

on other people's cattle and dogs will obey him, because to this 

there is an inclination in their nature, although they themselves 

will never start doing anything like that, unless they 

only p ri to azhut. So this is where all the harm happens 

from a person who has such dogs. People think- 

yut that the village will be able to get rid of all these spirits, 

if there is no one to incite them or send 

barking them to work. They think that in this case 

and they themselves and their cattle will be safe. 

Alas, unfortunate creatures! How deluded they are! 



80 



C kol 

      m a l 0 

              they understand in the highest Providence of God 

almighty who reigns over us all. 

   M.B.: So, then you think that witches should not be 

banish? And do you think that the inhabitants of this village 

wouldn't it be better if they could get rid of them? 

   Dan: As far as witch exorcism is concerned, this 

Scripture is quite clear: "You must not 

let the witches live,” however, before that, we 

haven't you got there yet? The main thing here is this: can it be 

a person is calm if the witches are expelled, how on and on- 

strayed and blinded people flock? 

   M.B.: A person feels that pain and those wounds that 

they inflict on him, even if people are trying their best 

rush to expel them. There is nothing surprising. But 

it would be nice if you could clear them 

the whole earth 

   Sam: Truly, M.B., I completely agree with you. 

I would like them all to be hung opposite each other 

friend. And then (I hope) we won't be so much more 

yatsya their spirits. But sorry, I interrupted you. 

   Wife: And I would like those who will not be hanged and 

if they didn't burn it, they'd go straight to hell. If in 

all over the world turned out to be only one knitted to a sickness 

a hundred, I would have carried it on me for a whole mile, if only 

If only this witch were burned! Here! 

   Dan: Okay, good woman, hold on 

while your brushwood and do not bother your shoulders. Allow me 

we'd better discuss this problem a little more. Ask 

you allow me to ask you this question: 

whether a witch or a devil harms a person and their household 

here? 

   M.B.: Well, the devil makes it his own 

hands, although I must admit that all this can 

look and feel like you said, that is what the devil 

does all this in the witch's head, making her 

send it wherever you want. 

   Dan: The devil has his own kingdom and is in 

darkness and the unrighteousness of sin. He has no rights or power 

hover over God's creatures, he is not strong enough to 

Kill a fly or steal a grain from some 

barn until he is given the strength to do so. You 

You know that when Christ drove the demons out of the possessed, 

                                                         41 

they asked to be allowed to enter the herd of pigs. 

So tell me who gives the devil this power then, 

when a witch sends him, who gives him the power to kill and 

                                                        81 



send damage to people and animals? Is this a witch? 

em? And do you think that he himself has the power to create 

all these evil deeds ia, but only when she sends 

his? Or maybe, in your opinion, what gives it strength is the fact 

that the witch sends him somewhere? 

     M .B .: Indeed, this question is worth considering 

swear. There is no doubt that the devil does not have the necessary 

mine by force until it is given to him. He can't 

can neither touch, nor hurt, nor harm anyone 

to whom creation; he can only seek to hear and enter 

into temptation. In addition, I am convinced that only the Lord 

can endow him with such power from above, but no way 

witch. 

     Dan: Let's combine the following two statements then. 

wife and me: the devil can only harm, but no one can 

can endow him with such power, neither men nor women 

shch and na, but only God. Oh now tell me weren't 

whether people are strangely enough introduced into one 

cruel delusion? And bo if they assume 

that the devil is something like the executioner of the Lord and exposes 

they say that he has some kind of power given to him 

annoy, harm and agitate people bodily, or 

in some other way, then, knowing for sure that this 

comes from the Lord, they understand (as it is in 

reality) that God is displeased with them for their 

mortars. And they long for him and shyly plead 

forgive and free from this enemy, wishing the thief 

to live as a powerful weapon of faith in order to 

repel him on the attack and and resist him, as well as 

                                42 

the Lord himself gave, 1 Pet. 5. There is nothing worse 

for a man than to fall into sinful error, 

thinking that the witches themselves did all this, the guide- 

feeling his anger, and not realizing what this is happening from 

human sins and unbelief. There is nothing in this so far 

I n and I, they will not beg for any forgiveness for themselves, but still 

will help the devil more by using those 

means which he prescribed through various arts 

nyh wizards, scraping with claws and scratching, test 

thirsting for the blood of the victims, inflamed with rage about 

against those whom they presented as witches, what 

often wrong because people think that 

if the usual sorcery of witches is absent, then do not 

there must be so many disasters and evils. As if but 

remained on the land of sins and unbelief, or the right disappeared 



82 



fair retribution and punishment of God, or as if he had 

there are no more demons, the executors of his wrath. 

    M.B.: Truly, your words have overwhelmed me with fear 

hu, because it turns out that I am guilty of all these regrets - 

good things ah. At least you outlined it 

exactly . However, by the will of God, I will be more attentive 

think carefully about this matter. I myself have spoken to 

many who aspired to these sophisticated people, 

wishing them to use their help, according to 

lazy prescriptions, which, according to you, is equal to 

seeking help from the devil. This question we must 

we now allow and th, since I firmly determine 

poured and about one place from your speech, so 

I want to ask you: do you justify witches because 

that it is God, and not they, who give strength to the devil? Do you think 

do you that the demons will destroy people and their livestock, if 

isn't the witch sending them? Will all these villains follow 

niya, if there are no witches? 

    Dan: I told you that only God, not witches, gives 

demons the power to torment and torment people. It's just as 

obviously, as well as the fact that there is hardly a person who 

lading so oh strength. And it needs to be acknowledged. 

However, this statement does not whitewash witches at all, 

for their sin is in connection with the devil, and in 

they imagine that it is their spirits that do 

all these atrocities at their request and instigated. 4 3 For on 

in fact, the devil, having the power to cause harm or 

knowing that death or serious illnesses will overtake and 

loveka, and the animal, introduces the witch into an angry state 

and incites her to give him some commission. What 

concerns your other question, then, I tell you, we 

we see even in Scripture that if there were no witches 

everyone, then even then the person would still be pursued 

devil, harming his health and well-being. IN 

regarding pious people, the Lord uses 

eats Satan, causing pain to them, or harming ma- 

materially, in order to test their faith and patience, 

somehow the example of the saint clearly shows us 

And ova. It would be stupidity and narrow-mindedness to say 

that the witches set demons on him, wanting to destroy 

live for himself and his children. 4 4 Moreover, I believe 

extraordinary stupidity, if a person thinks 

that now the Lord does not punish his children for their misdeeds 

with the help of the Devil. Moreover, there is no doubt that the 

mon, having the power given him to harm, uses 



                                                         83 



all his dying and will strive to do so to 

he was sent by a witch, and he will try to make it known 

stn ym, so that it will seem to come from not 

God, but from an unfortunate angry woman. Form- 

I’m paying attention to both evil people, provoking 

who worshiped God with their immoral deeds 

and unbelief, shall we not see in Scripture that the evil 

                                           45 

the spirit was sent by God to the king Saul,         who before- 

imprisoned and pursued him? Was this spirit sent 

a witch? And maybe the witch sent those spirits into 

E van geli and 4 6 who entered the herd of pigs and drove 

their? Did God give them power and send them? Are we 

we will be so stupid as to think that He does not send 

lal the devil against unpious people in order to 

to annoy and harm them? R en her I already said 

that in the fact that Satan appears to be sent by the witch- 

mami, lies his great skill. But in fact, de- 

le God sent him and n and to that, except God, could not do this 

do. In addition, we must assume that 

in the bodies of people and animals there are natural 

the reasons causing unfortunate torments and illnesses 

and which can even lead to death. And x n it is impossible 

hide in secret, so the devil knows about them, especially 

if they lead to some kind of consequences. Then he on- 

starts to communicate with the witch, he angers her, she nasma 

him, and after that this person or animal 

suddenly and strangely begins to feel 

inconvenience, fall ill and die. P after which this after all- 

they begin to suspect, she is interrogated and she 

it is known that} she beat such and such a person or killed 

togo- something ogya n y, or caused damage. Here people usually 

become zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC 

               in tunik and wonder why it's a witch 

was able to harm a person by sending her spirits, 

since they themselves admit that their spirits lie and 

ly n and to which they do not have, but that the harm came as a result of 

the effect of the action of natural causes. For the same. What- 

to confuse people even more and make them believe 

to say that strange and unexpected diseases occur 

go from witches, the devil activates a different kind 

sorcerers, men and women sch and n, who say his words 

you, and they, as you know, must be believed. They talk 

they say that the victims were bewitched, that they were persecuted 

dovali fairies and what's around, in general - 1 oh, lives a lot 

witches, almost in every city. 



    M.B.: What you said is, no doubt, very right. 

vilno. I don't know how to refute this further. Os- 

lurks only to be surprised at the skill of demons in these 

things, as well as the fact that, possessing the power granted to them 

able to cause harm, they are sent by witches, word- 

but at the request of the latter, as well as the fact that when harm 

he advances, as you said, for natural reasons 

to us, they present everything in such a way that it seems to be 

he did and Oh do you really think that's all 

or, at least, most of all the evils committed 

now, the work of demons, if we speak 

rim that it's not witches? Although I must admit 

that witches cannot give demons any power, 

as well as they cannot influence anyone, because 

sending witches, but can't it be that God gives 

strength and power to the devil much more often precisely because of 

the existence of witches associated with him, which could 

not to be, if the latter did not exist at all? 

   Dan: The skill of the demons is such that without the light of the Word 

of God, even the wisest person on earth will not 

inevitably deceived. We know that there are such 

cunning and dexterous people that others cannot immediately 

recognize them. So how much more difficult is it to do this 

wearing to demons, which are much more skillful and 

more insidious than the most dexterous of their people! As for that 

the question that you asked, then he, in my mind- 

nyu, quite complicated. There is no doubt, however, that 

The Lord God, giving demons the power of time often enough 

dit, does it because of the witches, because the demons are bound 

us with this kind of "tools". And these actions 

the result of His attitude towards the unfaithfulness of people who 

do not look to the true heavenly light of His word. How 

says St. Paul, prophesying about the coming of Anti- 

Christ, God gave the devil power through the Antichrist to 

go to seduce people with the help of false banners 

ny and miracles due to the fact that people did not accept love 

and sti n s . 4 7 And indeed, I cannot say that the dia- 

the ox received this power exclusively for witches, but 

precisely for the sake of the weakness of people who, with their lives, 

deserved that he continue to receive power and with 

by the power of witches he seduced them. Here we must turn 

attention to one common misconception, which is refuted 

the majority follow closely. It consists in the following 

future: there is no way people can see that 

God moves to these actions by their own pre- 



                                                          8 > 



sins, giving, respectively, to the devil 

similar "weapons", but turned against witches, 

like they can do whatever they want. 

    M .B .: Indeed, I will be good if I start from 

to deny that God will grant demons the power to harm and 

rotate precisely because of the presence of human sins. 

But all the same, I would like to know if it can not be so 

it may turn out that any pious and devout man 

na or wives will not be bewitched? We have seen 

that the devil is powerful enough to 

віться с И вовом. 

    Dan: The Job example is not suitable for 

prove that a pious person can be 

bewitched, for here the devil was not associated with the witch in 

fight against him. However, this example proves 

no, that not only the pious, but also very pious 

good people (like Saint Iov, the like of which is not 

was on the ground) 4 8 can be transferred for testing 

into the hands of Satan to be tested by temptation. 

And, as I said, where Satan has power, 

given to him by God, to harm bodily even pious 

to the people for and tested and I of their faith and patience, he will 

children to solicit (especially if it is feasible), 

to be sent by some witch, as well as post- 

wants to make this event public. 

The faithful must turn away from this witch and turn 

keep your eyes on God, for everything comes from him. When 

but they will be tested, then the Lord in a good hour will 

invigorates those who depend on him for their joy and glory, 

like brave soldiers. That's why I don't matter either, 

Does a witch send Satan against a pious man? 

loveka, or he has no ties with her. 

Overcome the devil and you will overcome everyone. In the very 

Indeed, the devil rules among the most ignorant 

ny people who, when he comes into conflict with them 

so t, they perceive all bright and bright words as something, 

said by the witch. And many are now beginning to confuse 

Xia and hesitate; likewise their faith wavers. If he 

has power (they think) over knowing and mi P and san and I, then 

than then the latter are better professionally 

shen yi? N ad n and mi, as well as above the others, there is a witch. 

Thus, it may seem to them (what is with them, their own 

actually, and happens) that the means to salvation and 

power must be sought elsewhere than in Scripture. 



86 



n and i x. That is why they go to seek help where 

it should not be sought. 

    M.B.: Although I have become convinced that it is useless to apply 

to these sly ones for help against the witches, but please 

you, let's discuss one more thing. There is plenty 

exactly many different manifestations that miraculously 

in a way convinced me to think well of these people, 

moreover, I began to believe that God gave them knowledge and 

skill to do good deeds. 

After all, we see a lot of people, we eat them with them 

power and freed from adversity, who fell on 

them thanks to the demon am. That's why me in the first place 

I would like to know how they can be configured 

against witches if they themselves are associated with demons and, 

thus, are also sorcerers? As then 

they can think of some kindness and mercy, of 

pity for nothing? And whether to ak Satan 

                      49 

haunts Satan? For they no doubt cast out 

demons from some people. 

    Dan: I would like to answer your questions regarding- 

I also desire to find help from skillful men and 

women, but first tell me this: you are exactly op- 

clarified with regard to the problem of sending spirits and 

the harm they do? And then it seems to me 

that you have already moved on to other questions. 

    M.B.: I can’t say that I understood the meaning of all that 

what you were talking about, but now I'm sure that before 

I was very much mistaken, and I now admit this 

I'm sorry. But if you wish, we will stop there. 

a little more question. 

    Sam: To tell you the truth, I myself wish that- 

Would you like to talk about all these issues in more detail? 

but, because although I listened carefully to all 

what you said, but the last one that sounded in your 

many speeches, I could not understand. With your permission 

niya, M.B., I will ask my friend a couple of questions. 

And so, about seven miles from here, in W.H., lived 

one healthy man a, someone M. All the neighbors knew 

its superb. However, it dried up within six months. 

from some illness, after which he died. Due to this 

some suspicions visited his wife; she went to 

one sorcerer, I don’t know, though, where, deciding to find out, 

why her husband died. He told her that he was dead 

because he was bewitched. He then asked her if 

Does she suspect anyone living next door? 



                                                      87 



woo. To which she replied that there is one woman who 

she didn’t like the other one, a certain mother V. 

she quarreled with her husband and two days later he fell ill, 

never to get better again. That charm 

the day showed her the image of this woman in a glass, 

and as clear as we can see each other now 

friend. She was wearing the same clothes that she 

was at that hour, for she wore an old red hat 

with corners, the way women usually wear. In her 

she appeared in this glass. The sorcerer taught his wife 

the deceased, how and in what way should this number be brought 

dunyu to prizn an and yu. Well, she followed his advice 

that one, came home and made it so that that sorceress was 

held and put before the worldly court. Her race 

asked so skillfully that in the end she admitted 

was involved in the murder of this man. She was then sent to 

prison, tried, sentenced to death and to azn or li. 

Standing near the gallows, she expressed repentance and forgiveness. 

the strength of all to forgive her. She said she had one 

spirit in the form of a yellow-gray cat. She appeared to her 

according to her, when this woman was sitting near the fire; V 

At that moment she quarreled with one neighbor. She wants 

body, so that the vengeance of God may come upon him and all 

his family. This lady asked her not to be afraid, saying, 

that it does not cause her any harm; she has already served 

some lady in Kent for six years, but those 

now her owner is dead, and if this woman doesn't mind, 

then she will serve her. And so to ak, this one said 

to osh to a, that men a pissed you off, then I, if you want 

Chesh, we will spoil his cattle. The woman sent 

cat and she killed three pigs and one cow. Zapodoz- 

riv something, this man burned alive another pig, 

and this cat, according to the woman, is never there again 

did not go. Soon she quarreled with this same M., 

sent a message to him, who told her that she 

endowed him with such a disease, from which certainly not 

get rid of. Indeed, this man is dead. And so, no 

do you think that this woman was talking real 

the truth? Will she really put forward in her address 

deadly accusations? Wasn't this cat her 

servant? And didn't she send it? Didn't she kill 

these animals and this person? What should generally 

think about it? 

   Dae: You are offering us a particular example, so 

let's really carefully examine it 

88 



everything about this witch, up to the point where 

how the wife of the victim went to this skillfully 

my sorcerer. So you say that this lady came 

to her when she was in a terrible quarrel with one 

from their neighbors and cursed, calling for revenge on God 

living on the heads of him and his loved ones? 

    Sam: She really said so. I heard it 

with your own ears, because the presence 

shaft at k azn and . 

    Dan .: Then tell me who inflamed her such a fi- 

volan fury that she began to swear and send 

curses, calling for the vengeance of God to fall upon 

the heads of this man and his relatives? Isn't it cat- 

where? 

    Sam: To be honest, I think I did it all. 

she has the devil in her. 

    Dan .: Great, so you see that all this 

the performance began with ko sh k and . 

    Sam: You call it a performance? For whom- 

it wasn't a game at all. 

    Dan .: Yes, yes, in the end the witch did not work at all 

just as it was intended in her play. However, I affirm 

I grant that Satan is the deceiver here. Is it 

didn't he offer his services? Didn't he knock her out 

send him to harm this person? And say- 

wait for me, is she really so strong that he 

send, and he is just waiting for this? And don't you accept 

you bear in mind that it is he who reigns in her mind 

hey, am I directing her to such actions? 

    Sam: I am absolutely convinced that it is he who rules. 

in her heart. 

    Dan: Then if she is his slave and not he is a servant 

her, then there is no need to incite him or beg 

vat, for if she sends him somewhere to do what 

he is unable to commit, or he does not see how 

how can I show everyone my wickedness, then he 

can easily talk her out of it. Look: this cat 

ka goes and kills a person, or, for example, a cow 

or a pig. So how can she prove that all this 

did this one to osh to ah? 

    Sam: How will she prove it? Well, that's what happened to 

this man oh who lost all his livestock. A 

she saw and heard it all. 

    Dan: This one is lying, isn't it? For they say that 

such cats are known liars. 



    Sam: I really don't believe the words of this osh k, 

however, that is exactly what happened. 

    Dan: But since that pig and cow are dead, I 

Are you sure that it was this bug that killed them? Not 

could they have died by any natural cause? 

rank? After all, you know that this man is a, and 

ting and its were absolutely healthy and suddenly all of a sudden 

died. 

    Sam: It's strange, though, that they could die from es- 

natural causes - after all, all this happened precisely 

after they sent this cat. 

    Dan: It's not strange at all if you take into account- 

what I have told you, and you will easily understand it. 

In the bodies of that men and animals, there were 

known natural causes of pain, suffering, pain 

you and even death, however they were so deep 

are hidden that even the most experienced doctors could not 

discover them. The devil sees all this, and therefore 

can easily calculate the time when they bring 

lead to the expected result. After which he enters 

joins the game, creating the appearance that all this happened 

lo, allegedly solely because of his interference. EU- 

does he have some kind of witch whom 

can be used, it excites to action a certain 

divided reasons that bring her into an angry state 

message, and then he can already act as a message 

nika, while he tells her that he will do this and that - 

That. If he does not have such a witch, he still 

ignite disputes between one person and other people 

mi, sowing among them the seeds of suspicion, because 

his greatest desire is to shed innocent blood. 

    Sam: However, the question is this: how can 

do it all? 

    Dan: I already told you that demons inhabit all 

together and can sell unusually quickly and skillfully 

to do something that is far beyond human 

of the logical mind. And sometimes in the hands of the devil renders 

all power given to him to injure and injure 

let's say that he has this power given to him and 

kills the cattle we have already spoken about; one- 

but now we are faced with the question - who, in your opinion, 

endowed him with the power to beat and kill? The witch gave him 

such power or the Lord God? 

   Sam: Of course the witch can't give him a takop. 

strength. 

H) 



    Dan .: Or maybe he got this power after 

how did she send it? 

    Sam: I can't say that. 

    Dan: Then notice this to yourself: the devil had 

the power to inconvenience that person, using 

digging the property of the latter. And he did it but he did 

fraudulently. The Lord gave the devil the power to dominate 

to act over the good of St. Job. He also acted 

with the help of certain means, using saveyan, 

who took away his bulls and donkeys. devil used 

also the Chaldeans, who took away his camels, 

I ov I 5 0 . But even in such cases, having the power 

strike, he will be sent by some witch- 

mine, although he can do all this without her; dei- 

by acting in this way and in that way, he gains a great deal, 

which, however, we will see when we talk about those 

the means of deliverance that all men crave. 

    Sam: It's strange, but somehow, what this person has, 

after he burned the pig, nothing else happened. 

walked. 

    Dan: You know, the Devil can't stand fried food. 

meat, no fire. He is very afraid that by burning these animals 

here, they can burn him too. If he gets hit 

sizzling red coals, they can damage 

him that his mistress could do without 

go, if she wishes that he never again 

was returning. However, we will talk about all this 

volume, in due time 5 1 . 

    Sam.: Judging by your words, the devil is generally unusual. 

tea seasoned 

    Dan: He is so skillful, dexterous and resourceful that 

no earthly being can escape what- 

would not be seduced by him, if, however, this man 

there will be no heavenly Divine word. One- 

but let's talk all the same about the man who 

the horny witch, by her own admission, killed with 

the power of his kota. 

    Sam: Well, yes, I think of it like this; that sorcerer said 

the hall of the wives and not that her husband was ruined with the help of 

sorcery. The witch confessed everything before her death, 

and this cat informed her that a murder had been committed. 

    Dan: So this whole com pany and I are individuals who 

can you believe?! This sorcerer vouches that that man 

he was bewitched to death. And who told him this? 



    Sam: His spirit that made the witch appear 

in that glass. 

    Don: And who, in your opinion, was this very spirit - an- 

gel or demon? 

    Sam: Some sorcerers say they have the spirit of Mo- 

Isei, Or and or some other saint. 

    Dan: The devil himself can take the form of an angel of light 

   52 

t a . Those who think that sorcerers deal with 

some other spirit, and not with Satan, hardly anything 

take. Satan testifies that this man was 

driven to death by witchcraft. 

    Sam .: Satan testifies, but you can’t believe him 

zya. But the witch herself confessed to everything. 

    Dan: And who told that witch about it? 

    Sam: Her osh to a that she sent. 

    Dan: And who is this k osh k a, after all, a demon, isn't it? Then 

remember the proverb - "ask about the stolen from the thief" 

This whole thing is based on showing demons, but they 

did not bring at all n and to ak and x to la tv. If we do not 

we show people to people until they don’t 

swear, then how can we believe the word of the demons? 

    Sam: So you think that this person was 

not killed by a witch? 

    Dan: It is possible that the Lord empowered Satan 

harm the body of that person, after which he under a 

some pretext and was sent by a witch. H about CKopet 

his entire body withered and withered, for some natural reason. 

                                            a 

there are other reasons that the devil did not know about, that's why 

it seems that, having been sent, he did all this, although not <! 

in fact he didn't even have the strength to touch him 

And in spite of that. that the Lord gave the devil power 

inflict bodily harm on some people 

for their heinous sins, most people, about death 

which the witches think she happened to them 

desire and with the help of their spirits, actually 

rests from natural causes. 

    Sam: Then it turns out that the witches themselves are deceived. 

yut, they are mocked at them if the devil makes ich 

to believe that it is he who commits these murders, although on 

in fact, he does nothing of the kind 5 4 . So having 

the power given to him by God to harm people and animals, 

he can do it and does it without the help of a witch, 

using it, in one way or another, as a cover for 

their most vile of their deeds. 



    Dan .: I'm glad that you understood everything that was said correctly. 

me. Think carefully about all these cases. 

and you will see that this is indeed the case. 

    Sam: However, I interrupted M.B. Please continue 

eat. 

    Dan: The matter to which we are now 

dosh, consists in help and means, finding 

in the hands of sorcerers, and it is for them that they fight 

people speaking out against witches. So why don't you 

off to suggest your and question? l, I will try m n and \ 

answer. 

    M.B.: To tell the truth, I see what to object 

useless here, but I would like to speak in 

water of those things that led me astray. I 

I see that a person is looking for means to get rid of 

demons and I think it's just a gift from God when 

He gives it to those whom we call sorcerers, for that 

May they do many good deeds. If th- 

Loveka disappears to some kind of thing or, let's say, something 

steal, many people go to them and find 

help is there. I know one case when I was stolen 

dena bowl for communion. Church guards went 

to a certain wise man and he gave them instructions and I, at what time 

name and where they should be, because the company 

equalizing this cup, she should have come there. He poo- 

ran na vernya to a, and, indeed, everything went on like that 

gone. And is there anything else. One man had a daughter, a girl 

to a five years; so bad luck happened to her. And her father 

being in inescapable grief, did not know what to do. Then 

someone advised him to go to a woman who lived in 

ten miles from him, and bring her something from 

clothes in which this girl was lying in bed. So 

he did, and this woman said that his daughter 

bewitched and that if he does not turn to saving 

funds on time, he will lose his daughter. She in- 

asked him to take some old clothes, put on 

into her girl and put to sleep, zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV 

                                       and in the morning remove and 

burn. At the same time, he must look: if the clothes are 

Dut burn with a black flame, it means the girl was 

bewitched. And she also said that the witch is undoubtedly 

will return to their home. He followed her advice and 

but, some old woman came there, whom he owns 

venously, and suspected, moreover, this happened when 

Yes, these things were still on fire. Then a man without special 

Trudov threw his cloak over her and began to scratch her 



                                                    03 



until the blood started streaming down her face. 

Two days later, the girl stood up on her feet. I could 

to tell you about many strange things, but I know about them 

only from stories, although these reports can be supplemented 

trustworthiness. There was one me here, and he has a son, 

a boy named John. And suddenly this boy 

opened many painful wounds. Parents on- 

they put healing ointments on them, but none of them 

could neither cleanse them nor relieve the pain. Somehow 

once the father complained about this to one of his friends, and he 

suggested that he go to a very skillful man 

Lovek. He did so, and on the question of who he 

suspects, immediately received an answer - he was shown in 

glass of some old woman who lives alone in a small 

houses not far from them. John's father told 

this sorcerer that this woman had left their district and 

what is now hard to say how to get to 

her. But he told him how and in what way it can be 

n astich. Pull out, he said, a hair from your head 

son, put him in a garment and burn it all. And I hand- 

I hope she will hurry home as soon as 

will be able. But burn this, not in the fireplace, but somewhere in your sleep 

shoot, because if you do the opposite, you have 

can be a lot of hassle. M clearer came home and 

did everything as he was told. And this old woman appeared 

very quickly - she entered the house, approached the boy 

and said, "John, scratch me." He started scratching 

her until blood came out, and if before that nothing could 

cure him of the sores, now they themselves have disappeared. 

The common man should think the same about everything 

this? 

   Dan: Indeed, you told us about people 

having received their help from the hands of sorcerers, and there is no doubt 

that so and x examples can be given a great many 

in. Something was missing from someone, something was stolen from someone, 

someone is concerned about their health. And so they come to them, 

drawn by their illnesses and losses, and there they go 

they say that you need to do certain actions and that 

in this way they are freed from their sorrows and 

suffering. However, we must remember that we receive 

they are this help, if, of course, you can call it that, 

exclusively from the hands of the devil. So do you think 

you know that a person can really resort to 

the power exerted by the devil? 



94 



   M .B .: Heading towards these people, some imagine 

not yet convinced that they are seeking help from demons. They 

believe that this power is a gift from God, given to them by God 

in order to help others. 

   Dan: I really tend to think that a lot of people 

really think like that. But why 

then all this happens? God with the help of His Spirit 

it opens where the lost or stolen 

w hen thing? Is it an angel from heaven or a shower of some 

the deceased person appears in a crystal or glass, 

showing the appearance of the company and and, who stole her thing, or all- 

is that a witch? 

   M.B.: I rather hear your thoughts and thoughts on this question 

dew than a clear answer to my words. 

   Dan .: Such demons make you believe the language 

in that they are gods, so providing them way to themselves 

                                                          55 

human worship and the rendering of divine honors. 

Thanks to their cunning, they have great 

a reserve of funds with which they can 

achieve this: they take on various guises and, 

being in them, give different answers, if they are about 

they ask something. At the same time, they act very 

skillfully: when they cannot say exactly what should 

happen, they give this prediction in a foggy 

form, so that everything can be perceived in two ways. Here 

why should you look to what answer you will hear, for 

he reveals the essence of these gods. If they 

know what's really going to happen, how do they know 

everything pertaining to the kingdoms and monarchies of everything 

world according to the writings of the prophets, or different information, 

arising from the predictions of fortunetellers, how, on- 

example when a demon told Saul that he would be killed, 

because he saw that God left him, and weakened 

then the hearts and eyes of the lien, and the Philistines did not 

courage 5 6 , then they will tell about all this 

call frankly. In addition, taking the form 

men or women, they reveal things, must 

for a long time considered mysterious, as, for example, 

                                                        0 

measures (and I am convinced of this), the prophecies of S and vi lla ' y 

linguist ov. The same was the girl to a in F or p p ah, 

which is mentioned in the Acts of the Apostles 5 8, bringing 

which brought great benefits to its owners with the help of 

                                                          09 

witchcraft, - from it the apostle Paul cast out the devil. 

     the girl was broadcasting about the missing and stolen VR- 



shakh, and everyone who decided to 

hang out with such a strange person. 

    M.B.: Let me interrupt you a little. The devil can't 

/Ket to be in many places at the same time. How well> 

he could, remaining in the girl, talk about what was going on 

moose in remote places? How could the devil say 

where stolen or lost items are located 

lying not only somewhere far away, but also i 

secluded corner? How and in what way could he show whether 

the rank of a thief or a witch? Can he at the same time 

to put on the spot and see things hidden in the distance? 

    Dan.: Yeah, we can't talk about that demo 

can be in several places at once, or, fuck 

living in one place, to see something happening somewhere 

far away. But in these actions they unite^ 

in order to create your own kingdom, to lead people from 

themselves, forcing them to seek their help and worship 

them. Some of them are here, others are there, 

from everywhere they incite unbelievers to resort to 

the relics of such people, and then they themselves enter into business 

because they also go there and they know, for example, TOI 

the thief whom they instigated to steal, so they 

it is not difficult for everyone to achieve a similarity in face and clothing; sun 

why can they tell where things are, 

which he hid, even if they were unusual 

small by them. Here's to the way the spirit, to the way to me, g 

at least it seems to be talking about the words spoken 

nyh and about deeds done somewhere far away. To oroche p 

saying there are a lot of people doing it and he 

there are practically everywhere where such things happen 

    M .B .: Everything that concerns this issue, I am satisfied 

ren. You have shown how the demons act with the tongue, 

mi, speaking from idols, women and men. 

    Dan: And that's right. They strike again and again and,!' 

deep wounds in the hearts of Christians. And using witches 

as their guns, they make them believe! 

that it is they who commit many atrocities, 

slan and mi. which is not really there, but since 

they have God-given power to inflict other 

gpm harm, it will seem that all they do is 

for the wrath and pleasure of the witch, his promise!' 

cabbage soup, and the case itself is either somehow discovered 

Xia, or it will be said that he subjugated him by force 

conjuring to himself, or else he admits that ei 

sent such and such a man or such and such a woman 



for the witch herself admits to all this. That's why 

people think about how to escape from witches and run 

to magicians in order to find out what they should 

do to protect yourself from the witch's wrath, which 

she fell or rope fell on them; when they get out 

curl from her perfume and make sure she doesn't send 

again, etc. Here's how to kaya k arti n and open in front of the dia- 

an ox, and then he will show what he is capable of. Through these 

he teaches sorcerers various terrible abominations and 

chanting the name of God; people are made to believe 

that they possess a saving remedy against demons, 

sent by witches and that they can heal 

of witchcraft charms. 

   M.B.: I don't know how a person can explain or 

to assert that the spirits that appear to them in crystals are more 

feces or in water, as well as in some way speaking to them and 

those who show them all these things are holy angels or 

souls of wonderful people, and x, for example, as Mo- 

Isaiah, Samuel, David and others, although I heard that 

my sorcerers take them for such and think that they 

act with their help against demons. 

   Dan: It doesn't matter what Satan makes you believe in your 

their servants, resorting to the help of various charms. All this 

harmful for Christians in a, harmful even to allow the 

to think in your head that all this is happening 

power and wisdom of the Holy Spirit, or with the help of an- 

gels and good spirits, or that sorcerers do all this 

in defiance demon am. They act with skill, 

received from evil spirits. They themselves strive to 

monks, and they willingly run towards these talkers. 

   M .B .: I really made sure that they are looking for de- 

Monov, but I want to see evidence of this, 

gleaned from the Word of God. 

   Dan .: Regarding all spiritual issues, for example, 

measures, the possession of power in the fight against demons and knowledge 

how to avoid all the dangers they pose, 

I want to say that we will not find out about this anywhere, how 

only with the most blessed Lord our God. But 

and we can’t learn anything from N directly. 

we eat, but only from His Holy Word, for in it 

He reveals to us the fullness of His will. That's why 

when the Lord led the people through Moses 

il, Deut. 18, He said that they should not come 

V 

  this land, learn to act according to the abominations 

of these languages, listing the different types of former 

                                                       1)7 

4- 3400 



tools of Satan, which he used to lie 

many people through divination, study 

n and times, predicting azan and y, deceptions perpetrated with 

the power of demons, the use of the sign of washed spirits, 

sayings and appeals to the dead 6 0 . He also said 

and about the means, showing, firstly, that he owes 

cast out from the people, for they listened to these talkers 

and soothsayers, and said that everyone who does 

good, does an abomination to the Lord, behold 

why does he want his people not to listen- 

to them, but listened only to Him. Then Moses said: 

“A prophet the Lord your God is raising up for you from 

our brothers like me, you will listen to him”6 1 . 

    M.B.: It turns out that with these words you prove that 

that we should strive only for the Lord, but 

not to those who act outside of His words. 

    Dan: If you read this passage, Deut. 18, and well 

Mark all the necessary places 6 2 very carefully, you will see that 

its text not only shows that they are striving for 

to the demons, hasten to them in turn to the sorcerers 

and the sorcerer am, for the prophets whom God raised up in order to 

declare our will, command us not to commit 

good things, but he also says that they all abide 

become an abomination to the Lord because of the use 

them, or the desire for n and m. 

    M.B.: I see that this is not just a sin, but a terrible sin- 

ny - to strive for both people. Alas, many 

do not think that they are actually looking for demons, 

going to people like that about stolen 

things, or wishing to find some help and salvation 

in the fight against witches. 

    Dan .: Of course, many people refuse to serve 

lean towards the voice of God and His instructions. They pre 

they look upon His word, and in this way and in this way they begin to serve 

hang out with demons. Anyone striving for action 

acting with the help of demons, equally and for the first time seeing 

attacking them, must repent for this, and not 

to ak for some slight sin. This is a big bastard 

ness - to go to the devil for help; it means 

put him in the place of God and honor him as God. 

Such things spring from unbelief and mistrust. 

help received from the Lord, as we see on 

the example of King Saul, who, having received no answer, 

no consolation from God, to whom he is so regrettable zyxwvuts 

                                                         Not 

obeyed, went to the witch. This I am loud and b 



98 



He said: "If I cannot read the Superos, I will warn Acheron." 

If I can't beg the gods, I'll go down to the demo 

n am 63. 

   M.B.: It is doubtful, however, that there were no 

protection for those who seek help from people connected 

nyh with the familiar spirits. Oh I have besides this 

there are a number of other questions. For example: how are these sorcerers, es- 

whether they are dealing with demons, use the correct 

good and good words, wishing everyone who comes to them, 

that they do so-and-so in the name of Christ, 

teaching them to use words and sayings 

from Scripture. 

   Dan: This is also the great cunning of Sa- 

Tans. How could he then seduce people if 

he didn't use all his art to cover me 

their deeds, wanting to show that the demons here are words- 

but also to do with it, and all the evil that they cause or, 

can be cured if only by mentioning the name of the omnipotent State 

hearth. In this also lies the most that neither is 

abomination, including insult and the most terrible os- 

the return of the blessed estate of God and the Holy 

of the Scriptures by witches, sorcerers, exorcists 

and various diabolical arts. Likewise, 

Lovek is accompanied by elves and spirits; he must instill 

to people whether n an and I, made up of some phrases, 

interspersed with the name of the Lord, or worn with 

fight some part of the Gospel of John or something 

then in this spirit. Such things are used against 

thieves and against the demons sent by the witch. What 

more can Satan desire than that the saints 

things would be reproached? Very hard to call 

it in a glass, a crystal, or in some kind of container with 

doy, it will be difficult for you to tie him if you 

those ask him about this or that thing in name and power 

the vision of Christ. The caster binds him with the name of God 

them and by the power of the suffering and resurrection of Christ 6 4, for- 

making him so and so serve himself. And all this - 

his own deeds, for no one forces him, 

does not oppress, but he himself strives for blasphemy. ABOUT 

(the simpletons say) what a good wife she is! She talk- 

speaks of the Lord and of Christ, and does everything for their sake; how 

she taught me good words and what harm can 

result from the use of these words? Alas, unfortunate 

nye! What position did you find yourself in if you began to study 

the right words of the devil? No pronunciation needed 



words and not carrying with you part of the Scriptures of the defense 

protects from demons; the cunning of Satan to just the conclusion 

lies in the fact that all these holy things are used by him 

quite wrong, even if this person were to 

believe the words spoken and expressed and I m. the Devil 

can be resisted only armed with the power of faith, 

when the Scriptures are engraved in your heart, 

but your soul is filled with the power given to them. Exactly 

Satan leads people away from this with his words, accustoming 

them to another kind of help, since naming only 

just the name of God or the utterance of a statement 

Scripture will not bind Satan, because he is TAJR 

can do it with us. 

    M.B.: How can this demon be compassionate? 

people and help those in need? i bo 

after all, many receive help from these wizards. 

The devil is cruel and he strains all his strength to 

spit evil. And this is what many are pursuing, and 

good things can be done even with 

ly of the Lord. 

   Dan: These demons are as compassionate as they are 

a hungry gluttonous lion who roars when he asks 

something, like a terrible dragon, destroying 

everything around with its malice and bloodthirstiness 65 . They, who 

of course, they can show that they are doing good to people, 

following, however, the most cruel and murderous goals - 

they want to lure people into the very depths of hell. For 

if they can help their bodies even a little, it is 

means the betrayal of both souls and bodies to eternal damnation. 

One must be very careful when Satan offers 

help. It's worse than when he confronts the- 

covertly and openly seeks to harm. 

   M.B.: But then it turns out a strange thing: they don’t 

are connected with Divine power, but resort to the 

the din of the devil, wanting to keep the demons from evil deeds. 

How can one demon cast out others? Our Spa 

the witness says that one Satan does not cast out another 

Satan, for then his kingdom would be divided and not 

could exist 66 . 

   Dan: Yes, yes, of course, Satan does not drive away Satan. 

well, for our Savior has shown the cause of all this. 

One devil is always ready to continue the work of another, 

but in no way drive him out or interfere with him. 

   M.B.: And that's what makes me think. 

We see the devil go and not return; And 

100 



if this is not done by the power of demons, how are you talking about 

they said, then this should happen with the help of 

B divine power. 

    Dan.: The devil is cast out where the sorcerer heals and 

not demonic power, and not divine. 

    M.B.: And from all that you said, these words are 

they seem to me the least. And for if Satan is not cast out 

neither diabolical nor divine power, then what is this 

the power that can drive him out? If you show 

me this third force, then surprise me greatly, for about 

I have never heard of this. 

    Dan .: In order to drive him out, it is not at all necessary 

third power, for he is not cast out at all. 

    M.B.: I already said that it makes no sense for us to discuss 

this question, if you deny everything that is confirmed 

waiting for a lot of evidence. Similar 

cases were in many places and everyday we see 

we see that the devil is expelled from the possessed 6 7 , and that the 

whether he annoys people and torments them, or their cattle, 

they find a remedy for it. 

    Dan .: I do not at all deny that some oder- 

pressed by Satan and tormented by him, were delivered from 

him. And yet, you can't get rid of the devil like that. 

Kim way. Does he suspend his activities? 

ability to mislead people, keeps 

the most sinners from profaning the name of God and 

self-worship, while even deeper pron and kaya in n and x. 

    M .B .: Please, tell me how it happens 

that he voluntarily renounces his actions. 

Is that what you said? Is he willingly and do- 

voluntarily lets his influence disappear, which 

swarm he had on people? Did he not want to inflict 

harm to people? 

    Dan: He doesn't let his influence fade at all- 

ion, on the contrary, in fact, both it and the harm caused by it are 

my, increase when everyone thinks that from him 

Finally got rid of it. В P isan ii on n azvan «starim 

serpent" - after all, he taught witchcraft, that's why to expel 

it with the help of witchcraft is impossible. Nevertheless, 

outwardly, it seems to everyone that the sorcerer binds him; He 

can even use the name of God and the power of the passions 

Christ. It seems that the sorcerer banishes with this power 

devil from a bewitched man, whose body he torments 

and 

   worries. And he voluntarily ceases to torment him, 

In order for the spell to come true, taking away so and m 



image of man from God, forcing him to follow and 

worship him and seek help from him. Yes- 

if a person experiences bodily pain and, or 

the devil brings sickness to his cattle and he seeks 

relics from sorcerers and sorceresses, following the prescribed 

by them, as a result of which, it seems, it turns out to be 

safety and he and his cattle, but, nevertheless, Satan 

does not retreat under this onslaught, but stops producing 

drive all those torments and which he himself can easily 

reasons for both the body and the soul. And if you don't 

dimity is spared ia, then how to make a person look for 

help from people who act like this? 

How else would all these sorcerers and sorcerers get 

the possibility of cursing and god- 

to blaspheme against the glorious name of God? 

    M .B .: It turns out that they are expensive to buy this 

power from the hands of such sorcerers. 

   Dan: Yes, what can be bought at a higher price? 

other than when a person loses his soul forever, 

and body, while forsaking the Lord and following the devil. 

    M.B.: What then should a person think about 

of everything that is not connected with the devil and has 

sure ways to discover witches, and all they have created 

foot? 

   Dan: Although all these people are not controlled by the devil 

not directly, I mean that they do not have a sign of washed spirits 

                                          68 

hov who would talk to them, however, 

they are driven by devilish tricks, which are also 

an abomination before the Lord. After all, all those varieties 

to the old ones, which the Lord enumerates, Deut. 18, not 

connected directly with demons. And more than one of them on- 

watch the time, knowing about happy and unhappy 

weekends and hours. If oi and go to buy or sell 

say something, they choosezyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUT 

                                 this is the right time. 

Others conjure on the trail of animals, on the flight of birds, on 

meeting with a hare or a fox, by the hand and a thousand 

good things. Some people use a chair and a pair of straight 

my boards, while pronouncing certain words. 

Some people resort to spells against dental 

pain, others with fever, or wanting to stop 

nosebleed, or when talking about thieves, or 

when they don't get butter and cheese, when they don't get 

ale is stagnant. It seems that of all the witches, these are you 

evoke the strongest disgust; at the same time, they 



102 



act with the help of the devil, so that's why we 

we call them witches and witches. 

    M.B.: We consider as witches those who have their own 

spirits, and we do not consider so new those who use what 

these people were taught by sorcerers. And because it does not mean at all, 

that they are doing something with the help of the devil. That's why 

we think that they can hardly be called witches 

and to oldun ami. 

    Dan .: However, the name of witchcraft applies to all 

mu that is connected with the power of the devil, with his fish soup ren and i mi. 

Without a doubt, some types of witches are more terrible than others, 

however, even the most "innocent" of them are an abomination 

before the Lord, to a to us Deuteronomy teaches. 18 6 9 , and unknown 

ing cannot serve as a justification here. For what 

then, according to this witch, the spirit of Moses was needed, 

appearing in a magic crystal, and isn’t it 

dun this person? Yours is a neighbor who has no oil 

not suitable for ak and which throws a handful into milk 

heat, while uttering certain words and spirits 

May, what does she do with the help of God, removing those 

most of the devil? Isn't she a witch resorting to 

what she was taught not by God, but by the devil? Isn't she 

witch, if he seeks help from demons? burning 

clothes in which their children lay, in order to 

find out if they are bewitched, or wanting to bring 

here this witch, equally act with 

by the power and prompting of the devil; same thing about 

ts arap an and i, for God did not teach such things. So, 

Are they also a sorcerer? By whose order and thanks 

what power did the witch have at home when they started burning 

hair son a me sn and k a that you talked about? Not 

Was all this done by the power of Satan and at his instigation? 

nyu? And not me, are the people involved in the sub- 

bny things, taught and to the witches and, in this way, 

also a sorcerer ami? Those who resort to sorcery 

and spells on an and I m, who they can be, if not a sorcerer- 

mi? I believe that a woman who resorts to ha- 

Denmark, cutting his hair and doing other nonsense 

Doi, in which the name of the Lord is inevitably offended, 

does all this thanks to the effective help of Sata- 

us. God provides natural help, and this 

help received from His hands, we can use 

call against natural adversity, but he does not 

gives us nothing supernatural. Here's the 



                                                        103 



why are all these people trying to get rid of 

demons and disease. 

    M.B.: You are talking about natural things, and we see 

We see that nature contains many mysteries: 

For example, diamonds are harder than iron. Why then- 

yes, in all these natural things there can be no 

some strength? 

    Dan: No doubt there are many mysteries in nature. 

stvennyh phenomena. This is what natural philosophers do. 

f s, yes, the smartest of doctors. You can hang something 

then on the neck and get rid of bouts of malaria and for sure 

you can also wear something that will make it easier 

whether you have a fever etc. . And thanks to this, Satan 

gets the opportunity to carry out his villains 

and arrange various cunning tricks. So 

since nature shows us many secrets, these people 

they make a special ring, tie it to it, according to 

the position of the heavenly bodies, thread and lower it into 

a bowl or bowl with water, as a result of which there 

you can really see a lot. In the same way 

so they say that you should red-hot under- 

kovu, put her in a manger and hold them over the fire, 

to drive the spirit of the witch out of there. And the one who has stabbed 

dovan cattle, burns alive a hen or a pig, 

to drive out the devil. But can these natural 

things and exile him? What do these witches do when they burn something 

then wanting, as if, to drive away the demons? Is the Lord 

taught to do something similar? Do they burn for 

Lord, or rather, it is a real sacrifice 

to the Devil? In the time of Zak he, burnt victims 

were meant for God; the devil does the same 

for my own sake, but in the environment of the language chn and k ov. However, now he 

through his intrigues, does the same 

through and by the hands of these men, who, speaking, 

that they are Christians, worship him this way and that way. 

He, in turn, stops harming them, their livestock, 

thereby acquiring additional benefits. 

   M.B.: If so (although I can't say it), 

it turns out that in all places where we see witches 

sorcery and sorcery, a great many of them. For I see 

that many people in such matters resort to the help of 

cabbage soup and the power of the devil, to which they somehow 

strive. In addition, I am surprised at the diversity 

I am obsessed with and I m, which arise when people 

waiting for the help of the devil. Let's now a little 



104 



we're talking about that too. The devil knows about things past 

and real ones, but only God knows what will be done 

in the future. And if these signs Ahari use help 

the devil and only him, then how can they so accurately 

talk about things that will happen in the future? 

   Dan: Only God knows what will happen 

in future. But O Lord God, through his prophets and 

apostles, I saw many things that are inevitable 

will happen in the future. Can Satan guess 

predict when an event will occur. He - 

very attentive observer in regard to 

some things, and can guess a lot, especially 

especially when he has the power given to him by your 

roar and do something. Here he can and will 

say it. In short, the Lord with his righteous 

by a bold decision gives him the power to seduce the unstable. 

   M .B .: I ask you to elaborate on what you are talking about. 

said. 

   Dan.: Good. What do you doubt? 

   M.B.: I understand that the Devil guesses things 

foretold and vigilantly oversees the ways of their 

existence. But you said that he says that 

will be, when he himself is working on what he 

says. Please give a few examples 

trench. 

   Dan: But what better example is needed than the one 

when you talked about the church watchmen who went 

those who want to know about the thief who stole their tea 

Shu. You can say this: if that sign achar asked them 

go to such and such a place, on some day and on such and such 

hour, saying that he who stole this cup will come there, then 

how could the devil tell if it was a day or two 

later that this person will really come into it 

place at the specified hour? First of all, you must 

to mark what power the devil has, guiding the mind 

mi this thief. He incited him to steal this cup from. He is 

he also persuaded the church watchmen to go to that bastard. 

He also named the place and time for which he determined 

the lazy hour will move this thief to come. And in n a- 

for a certain time he leads him there, for he, having forced 

steal it, I could also with the help of secret suggestion 

encourage him to come to this place. The devil said 

that that witch will return home very quickly - I have 

in view of the one that bewitched the son and me snik a. He, having 

power over her heart and making her a witch, also 

                                                      105 



knew that he could make her hastily return to 

my. He does what some sick person 

considers the unconditional act of this sign acharya. Possible 

but, he can tell by the smell of clothes whether he was in 

her the devil (if she smells his scent) 7 0 , and then he 

says that this person was bewitched. "Take- 

those garments in which the sick man lay, and burn them; 

if black smoke comes out, then it means that it is, and then 

yes, this witch will appear here, but only while they go- 

ryat". And so, if the Lord gave the devil the power to torment and 

cause physical suffering to sick people, and 

if he certainly incited the witch to 

sent him, wouldn't it be easy for him to do this 

the flames and smoke are black and make the witch herself come 

to this place? If he has the power to torment, but no 

witch who would send him, then his greatest im 

the desire will be to make a person guilty of proli- 

of innocent blood. So is it hard for him? 

with the permission of God, who, by his fair pre- 

speech gives him the power to seduce people, listen 

going to the demons, and in this way, make the flame black- 

n th, or at least make sure that it 

it seemed to them as such, and to force the suspected wife 

shchi in u to come and enter the house, although she may not 

be a witch? He does thousands of such things and, as 

a skilled magician, can represent them here and there. 

    M.B.: Indeed, at such a moment the house may 

to enter an innocent person. I heard though 

and I can’t say how much this corresponds to the reality 

evidence that in both cases there are different 

things. For example, at the request of the zn ahar, people drink 

fingers in the bread and the moment they do this, 

a witch comes, and after a few days it turns out 

that her whole face was scratched with nails. Still I heard 

about one old woman who came in like that, and through 

for several days they saw her all scratched up, as if 

she fought her way through the bushes or was overpowered by Li Shai. 

    Dan.: The depth of satanic delusion compels 

blinded people become sorcerers and bind 

deal with him. In this case, for example, he knew about 

health disorder, which manifested itself in a slight 

w and x pockmarks or something like that, and if he 

can persuade someone to enter there, especially since this 

a person is ready to do it, then why is it strange, 

if he makes it look like it's all because of the nails? 

106 



   M.B.: Yes, this shows the great skill of Satan. 

   Dan.: However, we cannot represent the entire iso- 

pranks of his tricks, it is equally not given to us to see that 

the secret power by which he controls minds 

ignorant people, doing everything 

their enterprises. This is the greatest cunning of Sa- 

your. 

   M .B .: Indeed, it seems incredible and unusual 

tea ym that the devil can control the minds of people, 

lead them to this and that. In the meantime, they 

they do not suspect this at all, thinking that they are pro- 

tiv the devil. However, I doubt this. I'm at- 

I know it's easy for the devil to tell where the sweat is. 

ryannaya or stolen thing, but where does he get 

power to heal the sick and those suffering from ulcers? 

Undoubtedly, the number of people going to this kind of sign 

lol, great. You say it helps the body, but 

can destroy the soul. He makes people 

rush to him, putting him in this way and in this way in the place of the Lord 

Yes. For usually a person thinks that helping him is not 

in the power of demons. 

   Dan: Yes, yes, everything really happens and 

in all this we see the extraordinary dexterity of the devil. 

You said that a lot of people get help, 

coming to the sign of the acharist. However, I am sure that they are by no means 

not as much as you say. 

   M.B.: Oh, a lot. There are others who are about this 

never say, because such things are not to some 

like. 

   Dan: Yes, and many come home fooled- 

empty talk, because these answers are 

simple scam. 

   M.B.: It is possible that they come too late- 

but when there is nothing else to do. If they 

If they come right away, they can help. 

   Dan: Well, yes, the devil says what he can satisfy. 

steal these ignorant people who are ready 

believe in everything he says and dance to his 

tune. For example, when someone comes to know 

mug because of his child and asks, not death- 

but is he sick? If he knows that it is fatal, then 

says that the child was bewitched, but that time has passed 

and help is no longer possible; the child is unlikely to live 

day or two. The father returns home and sees that the child 

ALREADY dead, or it dies within two or three 

                                                     107 



days. And believe the devil. The other is sick and very frightened 

gives. In response, he hears: “Satan (for he sent them) 

sees that the disease has subsided and the reasons a, you- 

calling her, gradually disappears. In a few 

days this person will come to his senses. Here he is told 

all nonsense, he observes all these instructions azan and I and 

everything passes. It is clear that everything would have gone well without 

devilish medicine, but Satan is beginning to 

dig even more. Someone is sick and languishing. Neighbor talking 

rit him that perhaps he was bewitched and what happened 

It would be nice to send to find out what it is. He sends but 

the devil doesn't know if the sick person can get well or 

No. He says he seems to be really around 

dovali, and teaches what to do, although at the same time 

doubts whether there will be any benefit or not, 

but regardless of whether this person dies or all 

reads well, trust in Satan will remain and not 

will be shaken. And he gives so much advice 

a lot of. In addition, we must remember that human 

The human imagination is an extraordinarily powerful thing, 

whether it is the continuation of the disease or its weakening. 

And it is Satan who deceives people, for it seems that 

his medicines do something, even though they really do 

just a figment of the imagination of these unfortunates. 

   M.B.: Of course, there are various tricks, but I 

I think you're exaggerating too much. I `m not vi- 

I wonder how human fantasy can help him. 

   Dan: Imagination can take a serious toll, 

everyone knows it. So why can't it help 

human consciousness, especially this person 

encourage, making him believe that he is receiving 

power? 

   M.B.: And yet, it is hardly possible to prove that 

so th help has ever been effective. 

   Dan: It's not difficult to prove it, because it has been proven that 

the devil can do what a man can do. I heard 

about one such case. A certain husband lived in London 

rank a (how it is reported), who was familiar with others 

a man named Fite. And now, this Fitz 

there was a black dog named Bomelius. Soon the 

the guy imagined that Bomelius was the devil and that he 

feels its action within itself. Very upset- 

shis, he complained to one of his acquaintances and he 

said he had a friend who could drive 

B omelius. Then this man prepared breakfast and 

108 



they both came to him. The treatment was this: 

 the "doctor" forced him to undress and ordered him to stand near 

strong fire and, despite the fact that it was sufficient 

but a fat man, he smeared the sick man with oil all over his body 

crowbar and tied a smooth stone to his stomach. This husband- 

China felt relieved and subsequently strongly 

thanked my healer. 

    M.B.: I know that a person can invent a bunch of 

all sorts of nonsense, and although one fantasy can 

to drive another without curing, in this way, in fact 

no illness, however, does not follow from this, 

that the human imagination can help heal 

real illness. 

   Dan: No, fantasy I do a lot, even where 

there is a real disease. The person is afraid that he 

dovan; because of this, his consciousness remains in constant 

agitation that upsets the whole body, 

making great changes in it, and entails 

various misfortunes. And so if his mind is spared 

of all these images, then his physical disturbances, 

arising from them disappear. Most sat- 

Ninskih drugs has just such an origin. 

   M.B.: But there are still diseases that are real 

are present in the body and which occur inappropriately 

some sort of fears and fantasies. And x is being treated! 

But to ak, tell me, can they be cured with 

imagination? Of course, if all this appeared due to 

rank of excitement that arose in the soul of a person, then from this 

You can get rid of him by calming him down. 

   Dan .: Yes, but sometimes it happens with bodily 

ailments that are not caused by imagination, 

but other passions. I can give you one example, oh 

which was told by a certain very respected and learned 

doctor. This thing was done by some rogue servant. Case 

was in Germany. One woman's shch and n we constantly tear- 

Her eyes were drooping and she couldn't see well. As for the sa- 

my servant, he rented a room from her. One day he- 

promised to heal her and did so: he hung on her neck 

some note and sternly warned her not to 

under the same guise did not take off and did not read it, because then 

nothing will help for sure. The woman believed it 

and became so oh cheerful and self-confident that she stopped 

cry (for frequent weeping and tears poisoned her eyes), and 

gradually the moisture in her eyes returned to normal, and they themselves 

eyes are healed. They say that when she lost this 



                                                     10Q 



little note, then, upset, she began to cry again and 

got sick again. Someone ate this note, opened it 

and read. It was written in German, so her 

If you translate into English, then it will turn out like this: “The devil 

pinches your eyes, I fill them with my feces. So 

what, wasn't that the cure for her eyes? If 

such a drug has its effect, then the eyes 

no need to read anymore. However, one should not think that Satan 

has less resources at its disposal than all 

people on earth put together, because they still don’t 

students . And where a man fails he can 

do what needs to be done, using the disease of consciousness of these 

of people. And you will hear how they say using k a 

some kind of charm that you have to believe that this will help 

Well, otherwise it won't be of any use at all. So, es- 

Is it good to take a closer look, then most of all these 

your many stories are just a hoax. 

    M.B.: Okay, let everything you said be 

true. However, there are still many things that 

demons help. What can you say about the boys 

ke, who was cured in a few days after 

how he scratched the witch, and before that his illness was 

terrible and not treated at all? What will you say about 

the case when the butter did not turn out, but the milk failed 

moose skim cream? What do you say about burning the living 

creatures, such as a pig or a chicken, and 

puppies after this illness? And, well, he's a man, what do you say 

those about helping those people whom I probably bake 

devil, why am I torturing their bodies? 

    Dan: All this can be answered in several ways. 

wah: in cases where it can harm a person 

century or cattle, milk or butter, he can 

be able to simply step aside; when does it stop 

if the course of the disease is, then this, as I said earlier, he de 

barks especially willingly, for, eliminating her, he does so, 

that people rush to him and sometimes become yes 

but real sorcerers. If any demon 

pesters or torments a person, and he wants to fast and 

prayers to get rid of him, starting immediately 

pour God about it, then he leaves without much trouble 

him, although not wanting it, for he yields to the power of the Lord 

flies and is driven away And m. But when he hurts, 

how it was in the case you told with the son of meat 

to a, and they seek his help and follow his instructions 

I m, letting the witch, for example, bleed, then he leaves, using 



1 10 



trying to please - I mean that he is beautiful - 

it hurts to torment the body, while, of course, it doesn’t hurt 

scratching, but rather penetrating even deeper and even stronger 

taking root in the soul. This is how everything happens in the rest 

cases. How willingly will he stop pestering 

ritsu, for in order to bring him joy, this 

the chicken will be burned alive. His help is nothing 

other than ceasing to cause harm, if, 

Of course, he has the power to harm. 

   Sam: It's strange, but if that's the case. It turns out, 

that in these places there are thousands of deceived. They say that to 

that wife and n e in R .Kh. in one week something came 

rock man, and many of them were not at all so and mi, 

as you said. But I interfered, so I beg you, 

continue. 

   Dan.: The devil can mislead milli- 

they are people and even the wisest in this world, if they 

not taught by the Lord and do not take heed 

His teaching, in the most legitimate way, can become 

by the devil. 

    M .B .: If all this is a hoax, then, then, witches are not 

kill, do not cause damage, but, apparently, 

the devil masterfully destroys people and causes pain in case of 

tea when the disease is of natural origin, 

making the witch believe that he did all this for her 

request. And when the Lord gives him strength, he 

wants her to be the one who sent him, as if he himself 

unable to do or intervene in any 

business until then, ok and someone sends him. Considering, 

that all responsibility lies with Satan, apparently not 

no reason to sentence witches to death; one- 

but Scripture commands to do so 7 1 . 

   Dan.: Scripture says that witches should 

sentence to death. Here you are absolutely right. But 

if you think that the word of God prescribes not to 

put them alive in any way, for they destroyed 

people and animals, sending their spirits, because of which 

people became possessed, and their bodies suffered 

if it is torment, then you are very much mistaken, for, 

of course, you will never know from those who have experienced 

m 

  Uk and who were tormented by evil spirits that the Holy Spirit 

dwells on witches. The reasons for which they follow 

It is necessary to sentence to death, so ovs: they lead the sign 

communion with demons, which are the damned enemies 

Lord; they seduce people into following 



                                                      11 1 



the devil and deal with Satan insk them dey n and I mi; they have 

at the disposal are those who are not firmly in the faith personally 

with ti 7 2 . And although they never intend to kill anyone 

action or reason to hurt them, but they only want to do 

good, as they themselves think, however, if they 

messing with demons, that's what you must die for. 

    M.B.: So you think that all these 

ray, to which so many people rush for 

power, because they are considered to do good and 

do not harm at all, should be destroyed. Oh let's 

Let's see what Scripture says about this. 

    Dan .: Yes, they must die, because they bring 

the greatest misfortunes are coming. It is believed that others 

we who have spirits do evil, because 

the devil, according to the order of God, does this atrocity, 

showing that he is doing this at the suggestion of the witch. 

And what, as it seems, brings good, in fact 

brings evil, and all this is done by many 

ways, so that anyone can easily see 

lovek. As for the text of Scripture, showing 

if she must die, then read about it first 

22 chapter of the book And the descent, verse 17, which says: “Do not 

let the sorceress live and be. 7 3 

    M .B .: This place speaks of sorcerers who send 

they bark at the evil deed of their spirits in 7 4 ; others cannot be 

call to oldun ami. 

    Dan .: But it is about the sorcerer ah that is when 

call to sentence them to death and at the same time use 

use the word Mecasshephah; that's what they're talking about 

and it was to them that Moi- 

this, when with their own eyes they turned the wands into snakes 7 5 . AND 

in one generation the Lord includes all those who act 

with the help of the devil. And because there are a huge number of them 

I saw the heat and all those called ' 6 in Deut. 18, and n azi- 

they are "an abomination before the Lord"77, and no 

abomination must not be allowed to remain among the people of the State 

hearth. The same is true in the place where he says: “Yes, do not find 

                                                            78 

you pout such and such and such and such”, listing everyone and x. 

So one should not only wish that no one 

nimalsya similar things, but must destroy 

those who do it. 

    M.B.: I have to agree with what they endure 

judgment of the word of God. However, there is another 

the most difficult thing is how to prove their guilt. 

1 12 



   Dan: Why do you think it's the hardest thing to prove? 

blame the witch or the sorcerer? H eat, as it is not proven 

by the authorities determines the guilt of the murderer? If there is 

there is real suspicion, and this person, in the course of 

following recognizes a perfect deed, then this is 

is proof enough. If this 

the subject denies everything, a. two or three declare on os- 

novation known to them, while bringing solemn 

oath that he is guilty of his deed, then this is also 

sufficient proof. With regard to this State 

go ahead and command Moses not to kill anyone 

whether until then, until a lesser 

at least two witnesses, Deut. 19, v. 15. 

   M.B.: I think that if this person denies everything, 

especially when it comes to life, then, of course, 

must be done in accordance with the law of God and m, so that 

There were at least two witnesses. This can be done with 

murderers, thieves, but as for witches, I don't see 

you move 7 9 . They are so secret about communicating with their spirits 

hami that it is almost impossible to convict them of the action 

exclusively due to categorical evidence 

lei, speaking directly about what they heard or saw 

share how they sent their spirits. In addition, re- 

when does a witch confess at all. Because it is common knowledge 

that the devil has such power over them that they cannot 

allows them to make recognition. 

   Dan: Then I see why you think that before- 

to fight from a witch is recognized and I am the hardest, if and 

testimonies are shown and I, and her own are not always 

manages to get. What then to do next? 

   M .B .: I believe that if there is a way, then it is probable 

suspicion, well-known rumors, which is evidence 

enough satisfactory evidence, and even better 

she, if there is an act for which one should hang, then 

so it will be possible to rid the area of them. 

   Dan: So you think their spirits will be hung together 

with them and in such a way this land shall be redeemed and 

from witches, and from spirits, and people and cattle will live in peace 

Life. 

   M .B .: I'm still smart enough not to think so 

mother, although, to tell the truth, he almost did. i bo 

I believe that if all the witches are hung, then 

Yes, their spirits will no longer be able to find people 8 0 who will 

Do not hire them or send them to harm 

man or cattle. But I am aware of my own hl>- 

                                                         1 zyxwvutsrqp 

                                                            \L 



post, for the Lord alone provides a demo 

us the opportunity to harm and feel good 

steve people, as well as to disturb, torment and annoy 

give sinners to us, and they will do it even if 

weigh all the witches on earth. I know they don't need 

to be taken care of or given some kind of work. 

    Dan: But aren't you afraid that if they hang 

all suspects, then among them may suddenly be 

Are there a few really guilty people? You 

you see that many who were executed on charges of 

dovstve, after death were declared innocent. 

    M.B.: I'll tell you everything I think about this question. 

dew. Witches raise storms, they harm the popu- 

you and fruit trees, bring plague to people, and cattle 

not me ur. They send their spirits on people, making 

their lame, children and livestock are killed; their du- 

hov cannot be seen, they cannot be fenced off 

door and walls, as from thieves and murderers, but they come 

go if they are sent, and cause much evil. Here 

why do I think it would be very useful to sentence 

kill all suspects to death, even if someone 

of them and is innocent, because in this case already 

I'm sure no one will escape punishment. 

    Dan: Have you ever thought how terrible it is to spill 

innocent blood? 

    M.B.: Yes, it is, but I think it will be much better 

better if someone is sentenced by mistake than to be left alone 

Well, a witch who will kill people and harm them. 

    Dan: So that's why you insist 

that all suspects should be sentenced to death 

(although it could also happen that among them were invisible 

new) in order to avoid great anxieties, 

how many otherwise a few surviving witches 

could torture and kill people. Better by mistake 

sentence several people to death than if demo 

we will torture, kill, or send lameness to many 

goofy people. And what, do you really think so? 

    M.B.: Not at all. You claim that evil spirits are on- 

share the power to bake people and animals, 

exclusively from God. They crave it, they look 

they know when and where He will let them get started, and 

where he will test faith and patience with the help of his 

his justice, as he did to Job. It is He 

              81 

sends it when the witch wants to send a demon; This 

just an excuse, she cannot give the demon power and 



he will do what he wants, even if she does not think about it 

maet. When the Lord wants to overtake and punish 

sinner, He gives permission to the demon, so all this 

happens not at all by the will of an angry witch, but 

the reason for this is the people's own weakness, 

to which it evokes a feeling of discontent in the Lord. 

Thus, they put weapons into the hands of their enemy. 

    Dan: Therefore, since there are these two 

position, that is, that God, through Satan, harms some 

in a certain way and tests their children (as, allegedly, 

those you He did to Job) and that He uses him as 

executioner, to torment and torment sinners, as if 

lo, when He sent an evil spirit to torment King Saul 8 2 , 

so many atrocities committed by evil spirits, 

cease, even though all the witches and 

spell casters in the world. P look better at the reasons s, es- 

whether we refuse such conclusions. If you are more 

if you seek God, and Satan strikes you, then be firm in faith 

and patience and wait for your deliverance from the Lord. If you are 

overcome temptation, you will be blessed and receive 

crown, And ak .1.12. If your sins provoked the Lord 

and the enemy has touched your body or property, fall on your face 

and be in humility, whine and pray, and beseech the Lord 

moderate his dislike; don't look at the witches, don't 

look for reasons where there are none, do not look for help from demons, 

do not be a student of sorcerers, do not commit vile 

things by defiling the name of the Lord and exalting 

Satan, do not thirst for the blood of the innocent, as 

this is often the case. 

    M.B.: I agree with all of this; of course spill 

the blood of innocent rams is a great evil. 

    Dan: And from the text of Scripture we see that 

the shedding of the blood of the innocent is the worst thing 

the eyes of the Lord Almighty; and it is very unfortunate that 

yes, the earth is watered with the blood of the n ev n s. Is there one 

a special reason when Satan associates with witches: 

he seeks to infiltrate the guilty, who are 

under suspicion, and he thinks that thanks to his help 

cabbage soup to witches in all cities there will be a lot of malicious 

sorcerers, so that he will be able to lead many into 

angry state, so that everyone thinks about his arrival 

presence or direct participation in even the most insignificant 

affairs. This is where all the judges will be guilty - 

us in shedding the blood of innocent people, convicted 

swearing them as guilty on the basis of their oaths 



                                                       1 15 



beliefs. All these suspicions are based on empty 

conjectures and ideas, illusions that arise 

out of blindness, unbelief and fear of Satan, who 

lives in ignorant people. 

   M.B.: If you admit that all this is happening 

thanks to the skill of Satan, who makes many people 

dey guilty of shedding the blood of innocents even far 

the use of them for you, which is most terrible, 

what you think all judges and courts should do, 

when anyone can be charged on suspicion 

nyu in witchcraft? 

   Dan: What advice would I give them? I wish they were 

very careful and prudent, so as not to become 

guilty of shedding the blood of the innocent 

of people. And if you blame, so only based on 

solid evidence and unshakable grounds, 

for the presumption will not justify or excuse them in the eyes of 

Lord, if the blood of the invisible is shed 

new. 

   M .B .: And sometimes it turns out like this - especially if 

the thief, the murderer is blamed - that direct evidence from 

not present, but certain specific circumstances 

even reinforce the court's confidence that this person 

age is guilty. It seems that this practice is adhered to 

mainly in relation to witches, since 

their connections are very close and hidden; besides, he thinks 

that the devil has so much power over him 

mi that he won't let them confess. 

   Dan: You gave two considerations in order to 

that in determining the guilt of witches, the assumption 

and probability seems to have more power than 

whether in the case of thieves and murderers. First, this is what 

their connections are carefully hidden; the second is that the dia- 

the ox will not allow them to confess. Indeed, human 

century, suggesting that witches cause unusual 

tea suffering ia, just burns with the desire to hang 

them, hoping that after that he would be free, and. 

having convinced himself in this way, as you have already mentioned, 

he thinks it's best to put everyone to death 

suspects. As for thieves and murderers, 

let people pay attention to how they think 

are subject to assumptions until they become 

seem real, for we see that sometimes judgment 

takes the innocent, which is not good at all, especially if 

this is done on the basis of their oath statements. 

11 h 



 In matters pertaining to faith, evidence must 

 we should be especially clear about them, because here is the trick 

 Satan, who wants to destroy the innocent, is present 

 to a much greater extent than in other cases. Here 

 you need to use special wisdom, and so on. 

 is given to those who confess, then here Satan acquires 

 benefits itself more precisely because of their recognition 

 nii than if they are locked. He is rather 

puts them to open up and admit what will be the setting 

 denial them. 

    M.B.: These things are not given to me to understand, but I am in them 

 and I don't understand. Am I asking you to explain them to me 

 so that I can understand what you put into it, 

 and see the reasonable grounds for your statements. 

    Dan .: Then it is necessary to dwell on this question- 

se in more detail. Let's start with the last one. 

    M.B.: Well, if you start with the last one, then 

tell about the reasons for which Satan dis- 

covers witches, leads them to confession and discovery 

 hides them, but does not conceal or hide their deeds. Must, 

 True, to notice that most people think differently, 

probably based primarily on facts, on the one hand 

side, and on reasonable grounds on the other. 

    Dan: I know people think the way you do. 

said, but I am very surprised to see how practical 

human experience and reason prove the opposite 

things that I will try to show. When it comes to 

reasonable grounds, do you think that the demons 

acting at the same time cunning and deceit, make 

what their deepest desires are directed to 

and aspirations. 

    M.B.: And that is why the devil by no means 

will expose his witches because he needs 

hiding in order to commit various evil 

deeds. 

    Dan: Indeed, it could be good. 

basis for proving that Satan received 

et his power from the witch, or that he can't do anything 

do until she sends him, or whatever he needs 

ma her defenses and that, or that he does not interfere anywhere, but 

invited solely to quench her 

malice. However, it is clear that all this is nonsense, and 

it is he who uses witches and exorcists to 

to commit even greater crimes. From here 

with 

   it must be inevitability that the disclosure of - 

                                                                   1 17 



witches is more profitable for him than the ability to keep 

all their deeds are secret, for if no one knows about it, 

children know, then how can he make people 

to think that he commits all these atrocities at will 

witches? How and in what way will he be able to captivate 

such a large number of people behind the demons, so that 

did they seek their help? In what way can he 

then incite them to resort to the forbidden and the damned 

conjured n an and I m, to witchcraft, insulting so and m terrible 

the blessed name of God and His holy word? 

And whether to how then he will lead people to numerous 

delusions, forcing them even to thirst for the blood of un- 

wines? All this and much more he manages to achieve. 

on foot to do thanks to the exposure of witches. 

    M .B .: But how can you confirm this position of re- 

real facts? For example, I have no doubt that 

he doesn't want his lady (as some say) 

discovered. 

   Dan: You said it right, outwardly he does not want to, 

for his witch to be discovered. But actually 

it only seems so, for he forces both her and everyone 

others to believe - even revealing it to those or 

in a different way - in that it is done by him reluctantly 

and I am also desirable against him. 

   M.B.: Please explain this with an example. 

   Dan: When a person feels that he is infected with a 

mine and writes it down at the expense of Satan, then he enters 

like this: he goes to the sign ahar and he shows him in a glass 

or crystal form of this witch. So, who 

opened it this time? 

   M.B.: It was the spirit of the given sign of the achar, and not the spirit 

the witch she's dealing with. 

   Dan: But you're not sure yourself, because 

it could be the same demon she's bonding with. 

zan a; and it is he who shows her reflection. Nobody 

no other can do it better. 

   M.B.: I don't think he will move away from her like that 

far. 

   Dan: Yes, but you must remember that a witch is a saint. 

occupied with some kind of spirit, has a relationship with more than one 

demon, but with many, for most of them unite 

eats together. When one of them leaves, carrying data 

a new image with a n ahar yu 8 3 , the rest remain in place 

ste. But what happens when it turns out like this, to how- 

are you telling? That is, when some other spirits are open 

11 8 



reveal their essence. Do you think they do it against 

the will of the spirit of the witch? But is Satan separate from Satan? 8 4 

Will Satan open the disguises of Satan in order to create for himself 

let? Remember what our Savior taught 

about this subject. 

    M.B.: Therefore, if this is the case, then you are not 

considered sufficient evidence in the case against 

witches, even for trial if she is found guilty 

on the basis of my own application, and I, when any 

for zn ahar, with the help of his spirit, discovers it. 

    Dan: This is one of the most unsatisfactory pieces of evidence. 

legacies that exist at all, for even if he 

and tells the truth, revealing the true nature of some 

ry people, which is confirmed by their own 

to the azan and I m and , then nevertheless he does it, guided by the wrong 

leading purpose. That's why his words lie to you, for father 

lies only wants to accuse the innocent sheep, so that 

be able to make that person responsible 

in shedding their blood and make people believe 

that there are many witches around them, knock them out 

to the study of spells and witchcraft, but, most importantly, 

at once, in order to have the opportunity to strike at him 

all the bad people. And so, if he skillfully unmasks 

chil someone in order to win himself more confidence 

riya, then can a human decision based on 

an oath, to rely on this kind of evidence? EU- 

does the devil come to court and say man, case 

whom he is investigating, the sorcerer, should the members of the su- 

to believe him? And should they be told to 

brought to the lament and testified already on its basis? 

If this is not the case, then why should they believe that 

mu, what did he say to this medicine man? 

    M.B.: Yes, yes, I have no doubts regarding 

that all this he masterfully does, 

having in front of him only disgusting and terrible goals 

whether, and that his testimony, if it is done well, 

freely, should not show any trust. But 

what do you say about his testimony, 

when he is ordered and forced in the name of God 

to tell the truth? After all, if he wants to hide 

something, it can't. 

    Dan.: A sorcerer who assumes that ego 8 5 og- 

wounds in actions the name and power of the Lord, obliges 

Those who tell him the truth are greatly mistaken. His 

V 

  no one limits it and he is glad that the most glorious 



                                                        1 19 



and the me of the Lord is subjected to such a terrible insult 

and that he can bring a man into this gathering of all 

abominations. 

    M.B.: No, I don't mean wizards, but when 

a pious person tries to influence the prayer- 

howl. 

    Dan: You probably mean the following: if 

men or women are possessed by the devil, for example, 

that this is so (we will do this in order to distinguish them from 

numerous pretenders, as often happened), 

then all these obsessed people gather in one place and cry out 

yut to the Lord, forcing Satan to tell them in the name of Christ 

a hundred, how he came here and who sent him. 

    M.B.: That's it, that's exactly what I meant. N some- 

ry obsessed really demand an answer from the devil 

the one who sent him, and he confesses that such and such 

lovek read the spell n an and i and sent it here, or what 

he was sent to ak aya by a witch. Isn't that convincing? 

    Dan .: When someone is possessed by the devil, then the person 

eternal passions, love, grief are manifested very brightly 

ko, showing what people can do when they get into 

this trouble. They must, as soon as possible, 

to beg the Lord you to show your mercy and 

persecute the devil. The teaching of Holy Scripture confirms this, 

but for the people who will discuss his words and 

argue with him, I don’t see any support in the word B o- 

we live, especially if at the same time they want to force Sa- 

Tanu leave. After all, he is the executioner of the Lord, God sent 

him and can we ask the Lord to take him away, but 

do we have the power to tell him to leave if 

did the Lord himself send him? 

    M .B .: I agree, a person has no power, but 

people beg and even demand from him in the name of the State 

get out of here. 

    Dan.: What I'm talking about doesn't necessarily happen, 

however, let us consider the following comparison 

eat. The prince is dissatisfied with his subordinates for the manifestation 

no disrespect. He sends an officer to arrest him and 

to imprison. Will he or anyone else 

ask this officer in the name of the prince to leave him on 

freedom and not interfere in this matter? Will there be 

their actions are directed to appeasing the prince, so that 

he gave the command to this officer to refrain from performing 

n ia pri k aza? So when God sends Satan, his- 

th executioner, the only thing that can be done is to pro- 

120 



ask the Lord to have mercy, for then this tormentor 

won't work for that long. 

    M.B.: How does what you say relate to 

by what we read in the Acts of the Apostles, when the saint 

Paul orders the devil to leave a certain maid, 

living in F and l and p p a x? 8 6 

    Dan .: Holy Apostles and other members of the original 

church had an extraordinary power given 

them to exorcise devils, cure diseases, and 

they exercised that same power under the guidance 

and the guidance of the Holy Spirit. That's why we can't 

we accept all this as a single rule. 

    M.B.: However, we see that demons are sometimes made 

nurse 

    Dan .: Does it work when you turn 

to the Lord with prayer; otherwise it will only seem to us, 

that they are bound by our requests and driven out. 

But how can one prove that the father of lies can be connected 

zan and compelled with the help of prayer in and me of the Lord and 

his strength to speak the truth? What are the guarantees we have, 

that from his mouth we hear them the truth? We tell him: "We 

we call on you, in the name of the Lord, to tell us who 

sent you. Who sent you? A?" "M atush k a joan, it's 

she,” he will answer. “But again we call on you to say 

us, in the name of the Lord, who sent you. 

sent the sorcerer L. B . (he will say). Should we think 

that he did it by submitting to force? And whether the members of the court 

must be sure that he is telling the truth? 

    M.B.: The devil in a possessed person, 

He said that such and such a person sent him here. For that 

said sorcerer was sentenced to death. By the way, 

he confessed to everything. And there was also a case when the devil, 

living in a man, said that he was sent by some 

woman, which the latter, in general, admitted. 

    Dan .: Does all this indicate that I am already 

I do not deny. The Lord gives the devil a chance to take over 

man. The same that he is sent by a sorcerer or witch- 

mine, serves here as a preposition. And man 

thinks that the demon takes up residence in him at their request. H eco- 

who at the same time believe that such a state is even 

limits the actions of the demon somewhat, since it 

Controls only their minds. But then the devil 

willingly exposes these people, pursuing many 

Purposes, tending chiefly to produce sorcery, 

sorcery and conjuration n an and I, making it so that after him 

                                                        121 



sh whether people and so that he could force them among all these 

disasters, start taking care of witches and sorcerers, in words 

but they can cause some kind of torment, and do not reverse 

vn and man and I on the Lord, so that, exposing certain 

witches and swindlers, he will be able to gain trust 

people and they will believe him even when he is 

raise false and false accusations so that he can or- 

to sow the earth with the blood of innocent victims. That's why everyone loves 

di must pay attention to how, regardless of 

their vows, they pass sentences, especially in cases 

i x, concerning life and death, no matter how they 

urged: all this is the result of extraordinary cunning 

and the arts of the devil. 

    Sam: Let me and you both say something. You have said, 

that the devil willingly exposes witches and wizards, and 

does it for the sake of their own goals. But I hear a lot 

shal about recently occurred edsh their cases, which, according to 

mine, they talk about the exact opposite, that is, when 

Yes, he regretfully perceives the news that they 

confessed and revealed their secrets. 

    Dan .: No, he only externally perceives all this 

what a bad event. Let's take a better look at these 

cases and you will see exactly that he is deceiving and 

does he cover what is not in line with his actions. 

    Sam: Well, I've heard from people, totally deserve it. 

trustworthy, just as not so long ago one woman became 

to suspect the other of being a witch and that 

somehow already managed to harm her. She prepares 

stole one jen tlmen and send for the suspect, 

and then, blaming her in his presence, she left her 

this gentleman, who, walking beside her, began 

exhort her and urged her to renounce the devil, 

viv this sinful way. OK, so he persuaded her like that, but 

she stubbornly argued that she was an ordinary woman, 

suddenly, at some distance from them, 

either a caress, or a cancer, gazing intently into 

their side. Look around (said this gentleman), there 

your spirit is there. Oh, mister (she answered), it's ka- 

some kind of predatory animal, and there are apparently none of them everywhere 

apparently. And so, while they were approaching this place, 

the creature disappeared from view, however, it sometimes appeared 

and again looked at a n and x. Of course (said the gentleman 

men) is your spirit. Oh she still clean everything 

denied, and then suddenly her mouth sharply twisted a hundred 

ronu. Then this gentleman pressed her a little and 



122 



she confessed to everything. She stated that by sending 

her spirit, harmed people and killed them. Gentleman 

But, not being a member of the court, he let her go home, deciding 

open this case to some of the judges. When she approaches 

went to the house, she met another witch, who turned 

going to her with the same words: “Oh, you cholera! What 

you did! You betrayed us all. "" How can we now 

                                                   123 



fix it all (she asked)? What will the rest say 

nye?” “And you sent your spirit and let it touch 

this person (recommended by her friend). Then she 

really sent her spirit and that gentleman 

suddenly saw a fiery flash near him. But he 

immediately turned his heart to the Lord and nothing with him 

did not happen. Returning, the spirit said that he was nothing 

could not do because of the strong faith of the latter 

go. “What,” another witch asked, “he doesn’t have 

nothing to touch?" "He has 

have a child,” answered another. "So send your du- 

ha, - advised the previous one, - and let him touch- 

this child.” Then the witch sent her spirit 

he touched the child, causing him to fall ill and die. After all- 

we confessed to our deed and were hanged 8 7 . 

    Dan: Why did you even mention this case? 

    Sam: To show how reluctant the devil is 

for witches to confess and talk about 

its activities. There is no doubt that when 

that gentleman coaxed her, the devil kind of distracted 

her, afraid that she would confess. And when she doesn't 

obeyed, he twisted her mouth. When did she come 

knew the devil complained to another witch and so 

way n set her on the child. 

    Dan .: The point here is very clear - he is very willing 

exposes them. True, you may be thinking about 

why he appeared in the form of a certain animal 

go and even pushed her to recognition, bringing in the replacement 

scheming and thereby giving this gentleman a clear 

proof, especially when he twisted her mouth. But 

why then did he make another witch beat her (in 

what did she confess) to send that spirit? And he did everything 

this is because I wanted to highlight this case even more and 

put them both on public display. 

    Sam: But what motivated him when he exposed 

witches? What could he get out of it? 

    Dan: You'd better ask him what he couldn't have. 

And that is why now in all countries people beat the 

vogue. The witches seemed to give a command to their spirits to increase 

to cheat and kill, but in reality they do it 

not they, but the devil who sends spirits. He knows about that 

authority which the Lord has given him, that he may cause 

took suffering and torment and; he works through witches, he 

makes others afraid of them, that's why he gets- 

Xia that witches can be accused of committing 

124 



all these crimes. And he also finds the most 

personal means to disclose all this. And it is he 

moved those witches to send him 

tiv this gentleman. He is well aware of his 

opportunity, so he comes back. And does Mrs. 

why doesn't he give him the power to sometimes harm his faithful? 

But how can he affect everyone who does not have faith? 

If I could, then for a long time most of the world was 

would they destroy a. However, so are x people - compared to 

relationship with those who profess the true faith - fortunately, 

too few. In that case, it should 

send to the money, who still do not have faith, but do 

not the faith of parents nourishes God's guardianship, protecting and sch ayu- 

schyuyu and children, and themselves? The skill of Satan for- 

is as follows: he knows by some 

signs that are present in the body of the child, which during 

After a certain time, he will fall ill and die. But for 

the killer of this child will take him, and will be considered 

that it is he who has such power, doing everything that 

wants. And because he has the power given to him by God, 

which one is used in this case. If he k ak and m- 

sometimes strikes a child, then do you really think 

that he does all this for the sole purpose of 

to please a witch? And do you think 

that he had never thought of anything like that, and only 

she pushed him to this? Aren't they walking around here 

and there are legions of demons, and shcha, who would be swallowed up? 8 8 

Aren't they waiting for the Lord to give them the opportunity 

strike? Are we still that stupid 

to think that this woman should ask or 

begging them for reasons to hurt someone? Look at Mrs. 

yes, for these evil spirits play in our game all the time 

li, misleading both witches and everyone else. 

   Sam.: I will tell you one more case, also about- 

out recently. One woman was suspected of counting 

and in the fact that she caused harm to someone's livestock 

Not. She was interrogated and she confessed that she had a spirit 

who lived in an old tree, sitting in the hollow of which he 

often had conversations with her. And every time when someone 

offended, she came to this tree and sent it, 

asking to destroy the cattle of the offender. And so she was persuaded 

openly confess everything and promise forever 

to engage in such unseemly activities. But after 

how she made such a confession to her when 

she was all alone, this spirit came. "Ah," said 

                                                     1 2zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfe 

                                                         •> 



he, - you confessed and revealed everything. Look, I'm 

gu tear you to pieces. She was scared, but he 

soaring up, Li w took her with him. H a few not- 

del later she was very angry with one man 

Well. She goes to this tree and her spirit asks: “Why 

is that you come? Who angered you?" "To some man- 

na,” said this witch. “And what do you want 

did?" the spirit asked. "He has two horses, 

she said. “They went over there. Fuck them both 

or at least one of n and x. In general, one horse fell 

on the same night, and the other almost died, but at the end 

in the end, they still came out, though since then she has barely 

dit. I think everything is clear here: he was angry that she 

opened everything. However, when she came to the tree, he 

was about his dissatisfaction and readily went to work. 

    Dan: You think everything is clear here. Here the action 

everything is remarkably clear, if we take into account the connection that demo- 

we usually use. But do you really think that 

Does Satan live in a hollow tree? Him that, pain- 

is there nothing else to do? Has he ceased to be 

                                          89 

lion, and shushch and m, who would be swallowed up? Is he 

changed his bloody and cruel essence of that 

                      90 

terrible dragon     and refused to hurt people 

harm, doing this is only when someone is angry- 

the lady's wife asks him to go and kill a cow or lo- 

shad? Is he really so old that a man 

it became possible to discover his skill or even 

become more skillful than him? And maybe in everything 

this is not n and what tricks? 

    Sam: Do you think these things are insidious- 

what? 

    Dan: Do I think so? Better tell me what you on 

think this account. What could it be, if not 

barbarity. 

    Sam: But his goal was (in my opinion, this demo- 

we want most) to cause harm to people. 

    Dan: I don't deny it, because all his skill is 

directed to just that. What do you mean th- 

saying the word * harm "? 

     Sam.: You can see that in this case he 

beat this man's cattle. 

     Dan: Maybe he really did. But 

 how do you know? 

     Sam: You heard that at her request he went and 

 killed one horse and nearly killed another. 

126 



    Dan. I wouldn't dare to say so. Who said those 

be that he killed one and almost killed the second horse? 

    Sam. The witch herself confessed to everything she had done. 

    Dan. Who told her that? 

    Sam. Her spirit told her that he did so, how did she pro- 

strength. 

    Dan. Yes, a person worthy of trust ... And, judging by 

all over, very obedient. 

    Sam. Well, why, we see that everything happened 

according to her p azan i m. 

    Dan. What do you mean? 

    Sam. Well, she admitted her guilt, this spirit is angry 

attacked her, then she had an argument with that man and 

because of this, his horse died. She admitted that she 

sent a spirit. Is this a mere coincidence? 

    Dan: When she came to the tree, the spirit asked her: 

why did you come? Who pissed you off? So? 

    Sam: Yes. 

    Dan: Are you imagining the devil lay there and 

knew nothing until she came and 

told him? 

    Sam: Why did he have to ask her if 

did he already know everything? 

    Dan: Because he's cunning. He looked into her 

shu and ignited anger there, thus providing them with 

everything that happened between her and that man. Except 

moreover, he knew that already at that time the horses were suffering 

something that was supposed to cause their deaths 

ty. Or it was the Lord who gave him the strength to strike them. 

Then he wrote on her heart so that she would come again 

went to the tree. He seemed to be angry because 

she confessed, but in fact he wanted these 

things became known to everyone. If he didn't know that 

the horse will die of natural causes e, action 

which began to intensify, or due to this 

his strength, then he would not have done so that she would 

walked towards the tree at that moment. Even if her anger, without it 

participation, brought her so far, he could quickly give 

him the right direction. And for the power of Satan is great, ma- 

nipulating the hearts of x people. 

    Sam: But I noticed what you missed. Could after all 

happen that God sometimes gives power to the devil, even 

sending a witch. 

    Dan: I said that the Lord is in His justice 

Gives Satan the power to mislead people, for 

                                                     127 



they refuse to love His truth. But this is not the case ^ 

blows that the devil gets the opportunity to harm because 

that a witch is sent to work. It happens because of wine 

man, for the power of the devil is increased by the sins of the people 

sk them. The Lord is offended and sends (how do you say zyxwvu 

                                                            > 

app. Pavel) strong deception. Do you have any other 

ry, with which you can prove that the devil t 

wants witches to be discovered? 

    Sam: I have heard of many such cases, but 

you say that all this is a trick, and that the devil forces 

people to think that all the evil done is the work of his hands. 

    Dan.: The devil will make people believe he's doing 

no all this, only when he can do it 

twist. That's why he benefits when he causes 

evil, do not keep it secret, but proclaim it in 

public hearing. 

    M.B.: And what do you say to this. One witch was 

arrested on the basis of strong suspicion and 

stood before the court. He handled the matter in such a way that 

she confessed, I heard. Recognition it was 

of the following kind: she had two spirits, one in the form of la- 

ski, the other - mice. According to her, they did for 

her many things. Once, she even accused 

a certain woman who lived ten or twelve miles 

from there, which (quite possibly) she did not know, it 

nevertheless, called by name and, in witchcraft, and 

at the same time she said that she had such a place in her mouth, 

from where her spirit sucks blood 9 1 . 

   Dan: It's easiest for the devil to tell the witch that it's so 

then a woman or such and such a man is engaged in a number of 

and wear on the body a certain secret mark 

tin u. After all, over the past few years 

he accused people with the help of witches and sorcerers, 

tean about religious and pious. People must 

remember that they are not based on his testimony 

wah. He should not interfere in this matter, but any of his 

interference must be discarded, since all this 

he does it with extraordinary cunning. 

   M.B.: Of course, the testimony of the devil must not 

in itself be valid in court as long as it does not 

det confirmed to some indisputable evidence 

properties. But what do you say about the next 

tea? A certain witch was condemned and, already standing by the 

tsy, she talks not only about what she did, 

but also about who she received her spirit from. De 

128 



she gave it with regret, for she was preparing to leave the earth 

new life. It is believed that in such a case, in her words 

did not contain any lies or unfounded accusations 

ny. She said that this spirit was brought to her by a woman 

sch in and from another city. By the way, it has long been 

some neighbors were ripening. Then she was arrested and 

brought to court, but she stubbornly denied that she was 

being a witch and that once delivered the spirit of another witch 

me, now accusing her. The question is this: they are not 

whether the evidence of a woman made by her before her death 

tew, sufficient reason for the court to recognize 

that, the second, guilty? Here they are at their disposal 

no longer evidence of the devil, but women, reported 

nye by her, albeit not under oath, but in the face of death, 

which, in my opinion, is no less significant. 

    Dan: That kind of evidence might seem like 

sufficient grounds for judgment and she will be called guilty, 

though it is a matter of life and death. Oh if it's good to 

take a closer look, we will see that it is not so. 

    M.B.: Maybe you want to say that it does not 

undeniable to all, since it is the only evidence 

authority? 

    Dan.: No, not only for that, but also because it is 

testimonial of the same person. 

    M .B .: I gave this example because women 

broke down. And even if she was bad before, but those 

then you can trust her. 

    Dan: I didn't mean that if she's a witch, then she 

and can't be trusted. But if she never repented, 

then her testimony is too weak, because she is strong 

but is mistaken, thinking that he is telling the truth, although on a sa- 

In my case, this is not at all true, but sheer self-deception. 

    M.B.: You mean that the devil could make 

this woman should not think that another brought her a spirit, but 

was it really not? 

    Dan.: Yes, that's exactly what I'm talking about. 

    M.B.: No, I will never understand how this can 

happen. 

    Dan: You should remember that the devil is deceiving 

Women in many ways, making them believe in 

u and which in reality do not exist. In Ger- 

mania and in other countries ah demons so introduce witches into 

delusion that makes them believe that it is 

they raise storms with thunderstorms and lightning and I mi. Demons 

V 

  Who knows when such things will happen - storms, 

                                                        f 

5- 3400                                               12 ) 



thunders, and spread rumors, making me blind the world 

to believe that all these great works of the Lord are not 

Him, but the devil. And for this reason, he craves 

appear in n and x. So the demons make the witches 

to say that it was at their request that they destroy people and animals 

so many, causing harm in various ways, while 

a lot happens naturally, but it seems to be 

then he did it. The same is true for the rest, with respect to the 

they are endowed with the power to act - they incite 

witches, while pretending that it was they who sent them. IN 

in some places, such demons make witches 

to say that they acquire masks from wolves, torn apart 

shchi and tearing sheep to pieces that they get together 

and festivities, that sometimes they are transported through the air, 

which things do not really exist, but de- 

monks in the most strict way keep witches in a similar 

                92 

deluded and and . The devil can even deceive wives 

so, having appeared in the form of another woman, bringing 

shchi her we sh or a cat. In minds suffering from melancholy 

holium, he can create a very strong fictional 

them to arti n u, when it seems that such and such a thing is about 

gone, but in reality it never happened. IN 

In such cases, a person should be especially reasonable 

diligent, otherwise he will very quickly be deceived by insidious 

the voice of Satan and was cast into sin. 

    M.B.: If this is so, then how will the court rule on 

witch denunciation? It turns out that neither she 

killed, nor did the devil do it at her request. 

    Dan: According to the word of God, a witch must 

roar, but not because she killed a man, for this she 

cannot do (unless these are the witches who kill 

yut with the help of I yes, or received by them from the devil, 

or prepared according to his recipes), but because 

they are associated with the devil. So if the court finds evidence 

evidence that she is associated with demons, then she may 

and must be found guilty of witchcraft. 

    M.B.: If witches are found to be guilty 

in that they had a connection with the devil, but it will not be possible 

to say that they killed a person, then the court will not sentence 

them to death. 

    Dan: One should wish that he was more- 

more perfect in this regard, to the extent that- 

May this abomination be eradicated. These sorcerers and 

dun yi, which, being connected with spirits and resorting 

to the order of n an and i m, outwardly they do good, in fact 

130 



lead people to many sins. What 

concerns the rest, leading them into acquaintance with demons and 

using magic, then all of them should be destroyed 

live so that others can see and fear. 

   M.B.: You will never get such a certificate. 

the devil that the judgment will accept. And what do you say then 

people? That was someone who is now dead, and before death 

Tew said they were all bewitched. And you definitely said 

zheet that it was done by so-and-so and so-and-so. Question to just 

lies in this similarity. 

   Dan .: They are actually bewitched, for their consciousness 

nie is clouded by the devil. And you won't hear from them 

nothing, except that for them man is nothing, and 

they don't doubt it. 

   M.B.: What you said, in part, may be true, 

but I personally knew a woman whom very many consider 

thali witch. Indeed, when she was 

angry, a lot of strange things happened. It is you 

don't you think it's real evidence? She, of course, 

denies everything, but all this is happening and what happened 

speaks for itself. 

   Dan: You have to tell them to us and then we 

we'll see. 

   M.B.: It so happened that she got angry at one 

man, and he had a pig, which suddenly died 

la. The other thought she didn't like it and got sick 

horse. The third could not sit on a chair while working. 

In general, there have been many such cases in nine or ten years. 

Some saw the devil a little larger than osh k and, with og- 

roman eyes. Somebody was brewing beer, but it didn't thicken. 

The third saw in her house something the size of a lamb, playing 

about approx. Another was often visited by some 

spirit. A certain old woman, who was in a disconsolate 

building, I saw this woman standing next to her all 

night; according to her, it was she who bewitched her. So x 

there were a great many cases, so it is impossible 

even list. And if she wasn't a witch, wouldn't 

could all this happen? 

   Dan: I have already said that where Satan has 

wearing with a witch, he makes sure that in all cases, 

when he has the authority received from the Lord, 

it feels like he's not doing anything, but he's heading to fix 

especially at the request of the witches. In cases where 

we meet sickness, lameness or death, on- 

stepped due to natural causes, he deeds 

5*                                                     13 1 



no way that makes the witch believe it's hers 

hand business. And all this is only for the sake of 

turned up. In the same place where he does not have the opportunity to 

calling witches, he tries to gradually sow 

some people have a strong suspicion of 

one or another man or woman. So if 

once he started, he will not back down from his own, and will do 

it with all the power and ingenuity. If a man 

suffers from a painful illness and is ignorant at 

so much so that he refuses to believe in Divine pro- 

vision, imagining that everything is done by the devil, sent 

ny witch, then he, in turn, introduces him into another 

more delusion, making me believe that behind him 

this witch is worth it. People suspected of 

dovstve, cannot appear here. Who then does 

Is this not Satan? Someone is afraid that he will be poisoned 

Wit the devil the man he suspects of za- 

sorcery - in this way, he gives the devil 

even more power over yourself, no matter what 

he will do - harm someone or just 

I swear to him. And for Satan constantly appears to everyone 

dyam, using any occasion, and he does not need at all, 

to be sent to some woman or some 

be men a. Those who think that an evil spirit is coming 

child and appears before them because they are dis- 

angered some woman, who as a result sent 

him, unusually blind. Is Satan, if he possesses 

the ability to cause evil or to know what will happen 

children, unable with the help of his cunning to force 

think of the injured person that it is precisely to blame 

the one he suspects, so that in the end he will become aza- 

Xia, as if all the evil happened through the fault of the latter? Or 

here is a man, with fear and a breath, and th along a dark street, 

n yal to otenka or a dog for an ugly devil. N apri- 

measures, not so long ago, one spaniel, having swum somewhere in 

de, with a chain around his neck, he went to the door of the house of a certain 

loveka. Someone noticed him in the dark and said that it was 

there was something, the size of a foal and eyes, majestic 

Noah with a saucer. Then this man decided to approach 

come closer and ask, in the name of the Father, and the Son, and the Holy Spirit 

ha, what a phenomenon. And then the dog spoke 

she answered in their language - and said: "Suk". So become 

lo know who it was. If the devil knows 

deterioration in health should occur due to natural 

reasons, he does so, "that these people are someone 



132 



then offends and everyone starts to think about the person who 

many victims suspect. Or is he deceitful 

engenders in them a feeling of dissatisfaction and the thought 

that the disease could come from this or that person. 

If he really torments a person, having mastered him 

body, then it makes no sense for him to continue to lie and talk 

to say that he was sent to some woman. 

    M.B.: Doesn't it sometimes happen that he believes 

as if he had been sent to some woman, what was the last 

and confessed during the investigation? 

    Dan: Yes, but I'm talking about when he has 

there is no connection with the witches, and he tries to keep everything under- 

ripened the innocent, thereby making people guilty 

nym in the shedding of the blood of innocents. And when he says 

truth, but you can trust him only when he 

lying. So let people in their simplicity not think 

that he is telling the truth, albeit for bad purposes. 

    M.B.: This is something from everything else that seems to me 

the strangest thing, that is, how much can 

happen, even though it was a solid appearance, 

because of the displeasure of the suspect. Some things 

and, I think, this is what Satan does - for example, when not 

it turns out beer, butter, cream, etc. Still, you suspect 

my man is not a sorcerer. 

    Dan.: Oh sir! The cunning of Satan in all these matters 

incredible. And I know that usually (as they say) 

it is firmly proven that this person is 

sorcerer, if all the results of his actions are found 

brew at the same time. But for an experienced demon 

it is quite easy to do this. 

    M.B.: So you don't think the public 

opinion is sufficient for the court to be certain 

delivered a verdict? 

    Dan .: Experience shows how recklessly acting 

there are people who condemn this or that person for 

dovstvo on the basis of mere suspicion. Strength, cash 

which is attributed to witches, gives birth in many 

fear, causing them to be so and mi gullible. Many- 

some go so far in doing so that if they 

can make children blame their own ro- 

divers, they think they have done an unusual 

good deed. 

    M.B.: You say that the testimony of the devil does not follow 

Duet accepts his mother, even if it is known that he is not 

once spoke the truth, for when he speaks the truth, 

                                                       1 33 



duh, he does it with bad intentions in mind. And you think 

those diabolical evidence is not only what he says- 

rit when it is demanded of him, but also when they speak 

sorcerers who can't say anything but the inside 

shennogo them. Moreover, if I am not misinterpreting, you said 

whether that the testimony of a witch concerning many things, 

what she did before her death is not something from 

personal from the testimony of the devil, for he deceived her, for- 

by believing in things that don't exist. besides this- 

go, you say that neither suspicion nor public 

opinion and judgment cannot have weight to influence 

on the court, because Satan is too cunning and interferes in 

all this. Then how to find a witch? As and e evidence 

should they have pledges in hand? 

    Dan: People should take a vow of having- 

ties, and if their involvement in 

witchcraft, then we can talk about life and death 

ty. This is the most important; it follows from this that 

we also be and the corresponding is shown and I am reliable- 

other witnesses, or the confession of the witch herself. i bo 

if the evidence turns out to be false and false, which is quite 

perhaps, since everything that comes from demons should 

suspect it, or it will be based on rumors, 

random similarity, which may be the result of 

tatom of Satan's cunning tricks, as it was with pain 

majority of people, then what will the members of the court of the State 

go, not being sure, but only relying on an oath? 

By doing so and in this way, they may well condemn and 

innocent, as often happened with us. 

    M.B.: You are wrong about one thing - the confession of a witch 

guilty court is not necessarily associated with spilling 

blood. 

    Dan .: I'm not at all mistaken, but if the court is only 

who, on suspicion, determined a person guilty of 

killing an animal, he immediately sentences him to tyu- 

belt imprisonment, puts him in the pillory and does not 

only dishonors him forever, but if behind this 

new suspicion and arrest will follow again, then it will be 

signify inevitable death 9 3 . So you see 

how thin the line separates them from the shedding of blood. But 

even if a man is not killed and he is saved, stay 

wailing in captivity or standing at the pillory, and in the distance 

most never falls under suspicion again, then 

Isn't it sad and shameful that he was condemned 

prosecuted for witchcraft? I'm talking about cases where 



134 



which are based on suspicion, or on witnesses 

powers that come from Satan. In these cases, the person 

may be completely innocent. 

   M.B.: And sometimes it turns out that, relying on 

suspicion and public opinion, the judges fall on 

the right path and a person who does not confess to witchcraft 

in the course of the investigation and arraignment, 

know when the verdict has already been read. 

   Dan: Let's say that the court, relying on the evidence 

Satan, suspicion and rumor, sometimes attacks on the trail, 

which, in my opinion, is very rare; however, for people 

those who take oaths before the face of the Lord, this is not the basis 

veneration, for they swear that they testify to 

based on rumors, or still a full 

confidence about the confession that was made and I discovered 

armed evidence. If a person is considered a witch 

nom only on the basis of suspicion, without any evidence of them 

statutes, the court will act more fairly if the 

child him, and not condemn him, for on what basis do they receive 

they, as a result of having thus acknowledged 

and how will they find what they do not know? 

   M.B.: I believe that these people are violating the law, 

convicting an innocent on the basis of insufficient evidence 

ceremonies, especially if a solemn 

oath. But if they're on the right track, let it be 

done and on the basis of rumors, then I don't see why 

they must cause harm to someone: condemning the guilty 

Nogo, judges don't do anything wrong. 

   Dan.: I'm not saying the members of the court should be blamed 

in the death of all the innocent victims, or in the wrong 

relation to a specific person. I 

I ask what they will say before the face of the Lord 

regarding convicts solely on the basis of 

rumors. Imagine that someone was accused of 

catching crime; suspicions about his 

news is unusually strong, but it may be 

absolutely innocent. What should I do in such 

case court? Should he stake his life 

person, based solely on suspicion? Let 

he will indeed be guilty, but his guilt is known 

Lord, and no man can find it- 

go, that's why they'll justify him. And do they put forward 

any accusations? Can they discover 

what they don't know? Indeed, in this case they 

can condemn an innocent person? 



                                                     135 



    Sam: Hold on, let me think a bit. I'm not yet 

very well understood in all these matters, regarding 

seeking to uncover and discover witches. What you go- 

you're talking, it seems to me somewhat strange. I myself 

many times I was in court when the cases of witches were heard there, and we 

found them guilty on the basis of public 

opinion, suspicion, and such evidence as 

you reject. Indeed, it happened that 

before death, suddenly we heard that they were innocent, 

However, this did not shake my belief that 

they are witches. For they say that the devil has over 

them such power that it does not allow them to confess. 

    Dan: What made you think the devil didn't 

wants them to be recognized? Do you see that 

some confess during interrogation and at the moment 

to azn and . Maybe the devil has the same power over 

the most inveterate thieves and murderers? 

    Sam.: Yes, it is, but he is not very worried when 

thieves and murderers make their confessions, because this is not 

affects him as much as the confession of witches. 

    Dan: Wh, do you think he doesn't want to be dishonored- 

lazy or does not want to be treated badly 

foxes? So all the same, what should be done if the witches 

confessed? When a thief or murderer confesses his 

sins, then this, whatever you say, is the first step towards repentance. 

However, if the devil can hinder them or keep them 

them from recognition, then he will do it. Absolutely clear, 

that he's just aiming for witches in everything 

confessed; it's so important to him. He will make a person 

centuries to think that there are a hundred times more witches than them 

actually exist. He will expose them through his 

dunov and zn ahari. Most of all, he wants people 

they thought that he does everything - both storms and unusual faces 

fever, and all the diseases that fall on anyone 

dey and animals. And it is for this reason that he made 

makes people believe and even admit what they 

really wasn't; that he did what 

actually never committed, and could not commit 

sew. And so it will be, if, of course, we do not deny 

to give the power and providence of God over the whole world. 

    Sam: If Satan gets such a huge benefit, 

exposing them, then what then lies the reasons and convinced 

people, as if he wants to hide all his deeds and does not 

allows witches to confess what they have done? 

136 



    Dan.: It all stems from a mistaken belief 

and fear that witches commit many atrocities and that 

at their request and guidance, the spirits do all this. If 

Since Satan is so kind and helpful, why doesn’t he 

                                            94 

brings her any money? He knows where 

they and in whose armor they lie. He tells the witch 

can make a person go limp. He says, 

what can kill a horse. And sometimes he says that he 

zhet and certainly (if she wants it) will kill a person. 

As if it is in his power to do all these deeds and I, 

only asking him is not enough. And I wonder if everyone can 

these demons bring even one penny from that man's house 

century, whose cows or horses they say they will kill 

bi li 9 5 . The caster, this demon says, can infuse 

him into a person and call from there. Let him try to make 

to lay so that this demon climbed at least into the chest, if, 

of course he can, and brought something from there. If 

demons will not be able to do this, then be sure that they 

will not be able to show anything in the case of murder or injury 

niyu, as they do in most cases, or what 

they are still doing it. All this happens only with 

the will of God, and not at all for the pleasure of some 

then witches. And for what purpose must then all serve 

these tricks and tricks, if the witches keep silent 

chanting and not talking about anything. 

   Sam: And yet, for my own satisfaction, 

I just want to share some of my thoughts about 

cases that I have encountered. Not 

so long ago in the court of which I was a member, 

There was a case on the accusation of an old woman of witchcraft. 

Eight or ten people came to the meeting, who 

rye and gave against her a show of azan and I. All the details I, co- 

of course, I don’t remember, however, their main evidence 

are not of great value. One woman, 

taking an oath, stating that her husband was on his deathbed 

said that he was bewitched, for his long, long time 

pricked with a needle. And then he said that he was probably not 

bewitched this wife. In fact, he doesn’t even care about her 

put and considered that she was angry with him, because somehow 

that time she asked him for a loan of five shillings, and 

he didn't give it to her. This woman, also under oath, declared 

la, that she is absolutely sure that that old woman is a witch, 

and that she killed her husband. Then entered men a and 

told such a story. I used to have strong 

and 

  healthy legs, he said. This old woman 



                                                          137 



rushed with me because of the child. She said that she calculated 

eats with me. Three days later, my knee hurt so much, 

that I just couldn't stand. And since then, as soon as I 

I think about it, every time I visit the same 

pain. Then another man came in, not very tall, 

looks very honest. So he immediately declared wil, accepting 

I swear she is a witch. Once I made her angry, I said 

he, but soon repented, because he expected something to happen 

reads. And then the next night I saw such a mature 

one that I had never seen before. 

Suddenly waking up, I saw next to me a huge 

a face so huge, as is usually drawn among the Saracens 

new It looked straight into my eyes. After that I don't 

I could probably come to my senses in two days. Then another entered 

one woman who, as a result of a serious illness, 

the child died. I took an oath, she said that exactly 

this old woman killed her child. Then a man appeared, who 

who said that although he did not know 

it seems that once she was angry with him, because 

that she had come to him to ask for flower pots, and 

he didn't give it to her. And immediately after that, he heard in his 

a whistling voice in his ear, telling him that he was bewitched. 

But the next day his back hurt so much that he 

couldn't even sit up straight. He said he sent to find out 

to the sign of ahark, and she said that he was bewitched by that wife 

Noah, who came for flower pots. One- 

but, according to her, he had to be cured of it, 

which happened within ten days. So he said. 

Then two or three respectable townspeople entered 

on, who assured the audience that, by all accounts, 

nope, she was a witch. Do we find her guilty, for what 

more could be done; she was convicted and to the Azn or whether. N aho- 

sitting on the platform, she began to pray, and after her death 

it turned out that she was innocent, so all these 

accusations were made against her. Do you think we will 

whether bad? 

    Dan: What do you think? Are you sure that she 

was a witch? Couldn't she be innocent 

and you shed innocent blood? 

    Sam: If she was innocent, then what do we care? 

did you dare to do? We acted according to the order 

witnesses who took their oath, who swore 

that they unconditionally consider her a witch and that she 

did everything indicated. 

138 



    Dan: And if someone swears what they think 

so then it will be enough to based on my 

Why would you say that this is not so? 

    Sam: No, you see what they were talking about. 

and what made them think that and that way. 

    Dan: Couldn't you all be mistaken in your 

assessment to ah, regarding all these cases, as a result of which 

you thought exactly as you thought, and thought you knew 

those, what's the matter, since these people swore to you? 

    Sam: If a witness takes a false oath, then 

the court all the same acts according to its p azan and I m; and he 

free from punishment, since these certificates are given 

a person who swore an oath to them. 

    Dan .: If the witness clearly shows that, according to him 

opinion, things were so-and-so, pronouncing at 

damn it, the court will act according to his testimony 

until he realizes that his oath is a lie 

on the. But how to make this evidence sufficient if 

a person only thinks and cannot express the necessary 

my basis for your explanations? In all this remains 

is it possible to see only the desire of a person to prove that this 

naya woman must inevitably turn out to be a witch. Ta 

the woman said that her husband confessed to her before his death 

tew that the old woman killed him because he did not overcome 

lived in five sh and lly ngs. But does that prove that 

did she bewitch him? Can the devil kill for pleasure? 

volition, just to bring joy 

this witch? Here one should rather think that he 

died from some kind of illness, born from race 

the structure of his body, about which the devil knew and so led 

with this or that old woman, that this could well 

entail suspicion of witchcraft. 

    Sam: You see what happened here, what 

could not do anything but the devil. 

    Dan.: In fact, that huge face that 

a swarm, as it seemed to him, saw that men, but was it 

om devil ghost. However, is that enough? 

to prove that the demon appeared before him after 

how he caused discontent in that woman, and 

so it was she who sent him? Oh isn't Satan 

constantly I appear to people and if he got it 

the Lord's permission, terrifies them with the help like this and x 

ghosts? Especially if a person is afraid of something and 

has a strong imagination. And what are the grounds for you- 

said that woman, absolutely sure that 



this old woman killed her child, proving that this is so 

and was? If she only thinks so, and thousands of people 

do the same, only relying on her imagination 

nie, is that enough for you to swear with might and main? 

bet it was like that? What is up to the evidence of that 

the sign of ahark i, who told her that men were bewitched from 

this made his back hurt, because he was someone there 

refused flower pots to ah, then this is evidence 

the devil, which I already spoke about earlier. So what does it mean 

rumors based on so and x considerations? 

    Sam: So you think we should all 

reject it, right? 

    Dan: Well, I just wouldn't say so op- 

romantic to la tv. 

    Sam.: But oh, it could be that she was after- 

mine, although after her death they said that she was not 

I got in. 

    Dan.: Yes, most likely she really wasn't 

witch. For what could make her reject it in vi- 

do death? She was accused by the devil of being a witch, 

for it was he who gave direct evidence against her. 

    Sam: Are you saying that it was the devil who spoke to 

tami of that sign ahark and , as if this woman were a witch. 

    Dan: Do you think it was someone else, not 

Satan? 

    Sam: I didn't think it was the devil at the time; 

but now I see that it was none other than him. 

    Dan .: Well, from now on, be smarter and think about what 

you didn't do it already. 

    Sam: Indeed, I will suffer greatly if it has- 

that she really wasn't a witch. 

    Dan: If she was a witch, then you have a reason 

think so very little. But she wasn't her, and you took away 

she has a life and put her name in disgrace. 

    Sam: After that time, I got to be a member again. 

court and we again came across one woman, on whom 

showed that she was a witch, although she did not kill anyone 

foot man. It was opposed by five or six 

Human. The first was a certain old woman, who said that, 

how does she think she made this woman angry and that two 

or three days later, one evening, she was sitting at home with 

hearth and then something appeared, either a toad, or cancer, which 

the swarm began to creep up on her heart. She grabbed 

stick and threw it off her, but suddenly it was like something 

squeezed. The next witness said that she 

140 



quarreled with her, after which her chickens began to die alone 

after another, and so it went on until she 

burned one to uri ts u live. The third witness entered 

men, and said that she was once very angry 

lunged at him, and he had such a dark cow, which 

at that moment stood on a leash in their house, because 

it was winter and he was afraid that something might happen to her 

bad. And in his life he would not have gone where she was, 

but, apparently, because of her spells, he entered this room 

and kissed the cow under the tail. Then two more 

or three witnesses said that, according to the general opinion- 

nope, she was a witch. We found her guilty and she would- 

la is sentenced to imprisonment and shameful 

pillar, although she herself insisted on the fact that she was a witch 

never been 9 6 . 

    Dan: Are you sure you were? 

    Sam: I really thought there was, although many of 

her neighbors thought she wasn't. But how could pro- 

get out of all these things right after she gets angry 

valas? It seemed that all this was the work of the devil. 

    Dan: Indeed, he is so cunning that he could 

depict it all. Let the devil really come 

that old woman in the form of a toad or cancer, and it was he who chained her 

body. But does it necessarily follow from this that his 

sent another wives shch and na? He cannot accept another 

disguises until the Lord gives him a co- 

volition, in order to mislead so ignorant 

ny people. And one witch cannot give him the opportunity 

ability to appear before people in a visible way. To him 

it is granted by God, and Satan gradually becomes angry with all 

stronger and stronger, after which it appears, so that 

it seems that the reason lies precisely in this. 

    Sam: We see that he appears to the witches and conjures 

n ateliers. 

    Dan .: Yes, it is, but we must not think that he 

according to her desire, the mother can accept some kind of 

times to appear here. What he is after all- 

mothers and conjurers m, is done only for reasons of anger 

the Lord’s, since He wants to strictly order for- 

errant people, not heeding them and not obeying 

the words of the Lord God. And more demons are bound by mighty 

the supreme power of the Lord and His providence, and in all 

when He loosens the fetters, they move towards 

as much as He allows them, not an inch of pain 

she. If a person loves darkness and not light, then the demon 

                                                        141 



Permission is given to make here the most diverse " 

things. He scares some people with ugly images 

mi, others, he clouds the brains of different pictures 

mi, the third in general, I is in the form of a weasel, a mouse 

or some other small animal. 

     Sam: I thought that Satan might appear in that vi 

de, in which he wants, or which he likes 

if the witch sends him somewhere. 

     Dan: You are very wrong. For what its over 

the witch sends, does not give him any power. If \ 

he has power, then he will no doubt be everything 

and everywhere in the same way and in such a way as oh will eat \ 

necessary. So if he is anyone, ts 

let this person think that the Lord allowed it 

the devil get to him, and let him trust in faith 

to resist him, and to fate in order to get rid of 

from deceit and delusion. 

     Sam: But doesn't he sometimes show up when 

sent by the witches? 

     Dan.: When he discovers that he is allowed 

appear, he - if he has a witch - does so. 

like she's sending it. If there is none, he 

equally appears and acts as far as 

he was given power and authority. 

     Sam.: What do you say about the chicken woman / 

     Dan: What can I say if they are dead? 

     Sam: I mean, don't you think they would- 

whether bewitched? 

     Dan: God! And one arrow won't fall to the ground 

without the permission of your Heavenly Father. What about a chicken 

better arrows? 

     Sam: No, I was satisfied with what you said. 

about the fact that the devil cannot touch anything 

more, neither kill nor harm, unless there is a special 

God's permission of the Lord. Witches can't give him 

no power, although they think that they are sending 

him, when exactly he incites them to all such actions- 

to and . Let's not talk about this anymore. But 

after all, isn't it clear that it was the devil who destroyed those 

chickens? Because after this woman burned 

                                     97 

one chicken, the case was stopped. If Satan does not de- 

Lal this, then how could all this stop? You said 

hall that he, having the power to cause harm, wants and can 

can stop this, although such acts are carried out 

come. Therefore, if a demon did all this, 

142 



should one think that this woman really was 

witch, taking into account that everything happened according to 

after how angry she was? Let it be so that Sa- 

tana, having received the power to do what he did, will 

sent by a witch (using this as an excuse) and 

in order to make it obvious, he will sow discord 

between her and that woman, in order to make people think 

mother that he had nothing to do with it, 

but, on the contrary, is itself used by a witch because her 

someone got angry. So we have nothing left to de- 

how to call this woman a witch. 

   Dan .: But this is a very weak reason for such 

a serious announcement and I . To begin with, we do not know 

sure if the devil really killed those chickens. Maybe 

maybe they had some kind of infection, which - and he 

I knew this - I could destroy them; he masterfully completes 

sewed the case, forcing two wives and n to quarrel (and 

making it was easy). To cheers as a result 

died, and it might seem to people that they were 

bewitched. But you also asked: how could it happen, 

that after burning one chicken, the others no longer 

died? Isn't this the work of the devil? Well, and you mo- 

you want to say that if this chicken had not been burned for- 

alive, then all the rest would probably die? And what 

if it is he who has done so that no chicken is no more 

was dying, and he instigated this woman into witchcraft, which 

would she burn this very chicken, so that she could show- 

Xia, that this is precisely the means, with 

the power of which can get rid of demons? Or 

imagine that he had the power to destroy all 

these chickens, and it doesn't matter if he was so inept 

an assassin or just doing his job lazily. 

He could quickly destroy a huge herd of pigs, which 

Did Christ give him the right to do so 9 8 . Wouldn't he be able to 

if this woman had five thousand chickens, kill 

vat them in one moment? So he's so stupid and 

stupid that kills them one by one and, without having time to kill them 

everyone, already expelled? If he had the power to kill 

before they burned that chicken, why didn't he 

killed the others when those people decided to burn her? 

Perhaps he did not know what they were going to do, and 

I was lying in my basket with wool and tew, and, having come to kill 

Others, felt this smoke and got scared. 

   Sam: So you think he didn't kill those chickens. 

                                                           143 



    Dan .: And how do you have such confidence that this 

did he do it? You came to this conclusion based on 

the novation of the oath given to you; for the same reason you 

I'm sure it was sent by that wife, but I'll bet a hundred 

against one that he never had such strength, 

to at least touch them. 

    Sam: Well, what do you say about the rest- 

th? This man who was forced to kiss his ass 

cows? 

    Dan.: I think he just loved his 

cow. May this man learn to know the Lord 

yes, and drive all these fantasies out of his head so that the devil 

no longer had any power over him, for he is your 

writes his deeds in fantasies that are born in the minds 

people, and he succeeds especially if people are afraid 

him, as it was in this case. Satan creates in their 

many foolish notions, and in order to 

to make a person believe that he is bewitched, 

he quarrels him with someone who can be suspected of witchcraft 

stve. Thus, your court, in accepting these indications, 

n and i, condemns a lot of innocent people, because 

you believe the devil and what witches can do 

even though they can't really do it. 

     M .B .: I also heard about many cases when 

di were convicted of witchcraft, and before his death, go- 

they said they were innocent sheep. And against many of them 

far less serious accusations were made than 

the ones you mentioned today. 

     Dan..: Yes, I talked about it. The person is very rare 

thinks of the sovereignty and providence of the Lord 

over the whole world. People attach great importance 

the power of the devil and the wrath of the witches and are so much afraid 

sya them that the latter even manages to show them that 

can be done using the tricks of Satan, introducing 

mislead them. The only way for a man 

avoid all the traps set by the devil, all 

his tricks and atrocities, so it is to heed the voice 

God, learn from him His life-giving word, 

full of pure light that will expose 

it and will disperse the dark fog, launched by Satan, with 

with which he leads a person astray from the path of truth 

leg. He will arm man with faith to resist 

the devil, which the holy apostle Peter 100 wished, and come down 

from this path, which leads to terrible delusions 

pits and abominable sins, thus bringing people 

144 



century to complete destruction. Uh, and now I have to with you 

say goodbye. 

    M.B.: I am satisfied with what I heard from all 

these questions, and now I see how deeply mistaken 

gave. And although you were already about to leave, I still 

I hope we meet again sometime. 

God bless you! 

    Sam: I must thank you very much. You know, 

If you get a chance, come visit us. We will 

glad to see you in our house. 

    M.B.: And I thought that the devil is not capable of such 

insidious atrocities that can lead to such a sin, 

how it almost happened to me. 

    Sam: Of course, it's strange to see how thousands of people 

stray from the true path and are deceived, but 

vse-taki many understand, in what here business. 

    M.B.: Yes, and for the wisest the devil is too tough, 

unless they are enlightened by the light of the word of God. 

    Wife of Samuel: Hey, husband, there comes a good wife 

of Rs. 

    Sam: I wanted her to hurry up. 

    Good Wife R.: Well, and with whom are you sitting here? 

    Samuel's wife: I really wanted you to come 

a little early, because there was one person here, 

who said you were a witch. 

   Good Wife R.: There was someone who said that 

I am a witch? So check. 

    Samuel's Wife: No, it's true, he spoke completely 

really seriously. 

   Good Wife R.: Am I a witch? Yeah it's a lie though 

God himself would have said it. I would like to- 

in general, all the witches in the world were hanged, and their spirits 

in addition to n and m. 

   M .B .: That is, you will be glad to have clothes decorated with 

skin of hanged witches and their spirits to boot? 

   Good wife and n a R .: Well, they have fur 

clothes? 

   Sam .: Wife, why did you say that he called the do- 

bruyu wives shch and n u R . a witch? He didn't say anything 

similar. 

   Samuel's wife: Listen, husband, I'm very attentive 

listened carefully to what he said, and he said that she 

witch. 

   Sam: He doesn't even know her. So where could he 

say she's a witch? 

                                                        1 - I "> 



   Samuel's Wife: So what if he didn't know 

her? But didn't he say that she did exactly as 

witch, when she took a handful of heat and threw it into 

cream when butter didn't work? 

   Sam: Ha, right, you're telling the truth. He said, 

that the devil taught her this, just as when squeezing 

they eat a chicken or a lamb to a and the like. 

   Good Wife R.: Is this witchcraft? Probably this 

some learned cracker told you. So it teaches 

devil? No, that kind woman taught my husband this 

shch and n and from R .Kh. In a year we received so many good things from her 

how many such connoisseurs will not do in their entire 

life. 

   M.B.: And then, in your opinion, he taught that good 

women in R.H.? 

   Good Wife R.: Yes, this is a gift from God. I do- 

May, this was taught to her by the Holy Spirit of our Lord. 

   M.B.: So, you don’t think that this is her 

did the devil teach? 

   Good Wife R.: That is, I must think that 

Did the devil teach her this? Have you ever heard 

that the devil taught something good? 

   M.B.: Are you sure it was something good? 

   Good woman R .: But is it bad to expel 

evil spirits from my cream? 

   M.B.: Do you think the devil was afraid of your coal? 

   Good Wife R .: I know that he was driven away and with 

since then we have got rid of it forever. 

   M.B.: Could the coal have harmed him? 

   Good Wife R.: Yes, I could; he can even a witch 

cause harm. Of one thing I am certain: he will no longer 

will come. Equally, and she will not be able to force him to return- 

Xia, because the fire inflicted wounds on him. She can't 

can make him come back, because she 

damaged by coal. 

   M.B.: And it is known that spirits can only be struck 

spiritual weapons, so that your coal cannot 

how to harm the demon. And to ak and m, say- 

Zhi-to, how could he hurt the witch? After all, you are not 

you think she was in your cream, don't you? 

   Good Wife R.: Some people think that 

she just sits there, so when they throw 

these coals, they say: "Let this coal hit those 

be in the eye. 

146 



    M.B.: Well, if she has been in your cream, then 

your oil is not very clean. 

    Good wife and na R.: Yes, you just say that, 

M.B. I know that you think exactly the same as 

I though and ask me these questions. I am sure that neither 

who will not advise more ardently to apply for 

power to the zn achar m than you. 

    M.B.: I thought so, but now my opinion has changed 

elk, since I saw how stupid I was. To me 

it is a pity that I was so much mistaken in advising 

dyam go to these devils. 

    Good wife R.: Listen, M.B., who is this chi- 

gave you a lecture today? I am sure that yesterday you 

thought quite differently. 

    Wife of Samuel: There you are, dear R. I think that 

and my husband began to think differently. Here with them for three hours or 

four talked one smart and to . 

    Good Wife R.: So your husband also thinks otherwise 

what? I'm afraid that soon you will lose all your chickens, but 

then she sent her spirit against your ducks and geese, 

and you will soon be destroyed. What are you, protecting and sch Ali witches? 

    M.B.: Yes, we did not protect anyone. 

    Good wife and na R.: But still, very many for- 

are looking for them. I think they can conjure like this (not 

all, of course, only some) that a person will fail- 

going to hell in order to frighten others so that they 

protect them. And your nit-picking, M.B., I think soon 

stop; Let's see if you're happy with 

the same help. 

    M .B .: I will ask for help ... Yes, I will take them to 

blacksmith to see if they have any 

any puncture or stamp 1 0 1 . 

    Good Wife R.: You're joking. If you would- 

la fever ah, as happened to some, then you then 

let it not be judged that way. 

    M.B.: Do you think the devil can kill someone else's 

cattle, send lameness to people and animals, and all 

it's for your pleasure. Do you think that if 

the witch summons and sends him, he obediently 

accepts her order azan and I. And if she does not send him, then he will not 

will interfere. Do you also think that when 

comes, you can banish it with a handful 

heat, or by burning a chicken or a piglet alive. 

    Good Wife R.: Don't ever tell me. What 

That's what I think when you think so yourself. Let it go 

                                                         147 



they talk about what they can do and everything is connoisseur and 

The writings in the world will not convince me otherwise. 

   M.B.: I am surprised - not, of course, that you are so 

ignorant in this matter - but what I thought 

in the same way, not seeing their own delusions. 

   Good Wife R.: Misconceptions? How is it all of a sudden 

have you become so wise? I know that their spirits are somewhere 

hide, so how the witches bring them up; and when 

some person makes them angry, they call 

these spirits and send them. And look what they are 

they ask them to do it, but what they set up: when so 

the witch is angry, this spirit asks her: what do I need 

lament? Such and such a person gave me trouble, go- 

she steals. Go and kill his cow; he goes 

there and does what he was asked to do. And di and kill the chickens u 

such and such a woman, and he goes. Some of them are not 

satisfied with doing so little 

evil deeds, and then they say: go and do 

bark so that such and such a person limps, kill him 

or his child. So they are always ready to perform 

niyu any order kazan and I . And I think people will 

happy if they know how to get rid of them. 

   M.B.: If I start discussing this issue with you, 

proceeding from the word of God, then you will see that everything is said 

what you know is wrong. The devil cannot kill or 

to harm someone, even the most pathetic chicken. If he 

has power, then who can then run away from it? 

th? And, in your opinion, he makes sure that his mood- 

silt and poisoned like a woman? He is a guinea pig 

all evils and misfortunes. 

   Good Wife R.: Why are you talking to me about the word 

Will we? Does not the word of God say that there are 

yut witches? Or maybe you think that God will endure 

bad people? What are you, a renegade? Goodbye, I'm in pain 

there is nothing to talk about with you. 

   M.B.: She is really stubborn. Then I'll go too. 

   Sam: Thank you for your company. 

                        END 



An extraordinary message about the six most 

        notorious sorcerers, 

who by their diabolical deeds 

      killed over four hundred 

young children. In addition, they inflicted 

 harm to other people; what for these 

 and other similar crimes 

   were executed in the princely city 

     Munich in Upper Germany 

          26 and July 1600 





   I am sure that there is no such Christian who 

who softens in heart, or in delight turns his 

look to heaven, or not be surprised to learn about the villain- 

on the six most notorious sorcerers, about which 

ryh he ever heard at all. For they (betraying those 

la and souls and eternal damnation) have done so much 

inhuman murders, so many terrible thefts, 

robberies and violations of public order, spoiling 

whether livestock and crops caused hail and storms, and 

similar troubles among the inhabitants of Germany, which 

I think that this case must be remembered, 

so that the shameful end of these villains may serve us well 

our example to the sadness of the pious and to the fear 

niya bad and stagnant in sin people. And these men 

heinous criminals, as well as a listing 

their atrocities follows n and the same. 

   First, Paul Hamperle or Poppen Hamer. 

   The second, Anna Gamperle, the wife of the aforementioned Paul. 

   Third, Simon Gamperle               „,, npp, i 

            in                       IH   iblH In bbJi 

   Fourteenth, Jacob Hamperle 

   P i you th, Ulrich Seeltibaum, gunsmith ik. 

   Sixth, Georg Smaltes, tailor. 

   These six people, who have been suspected for many years 

Vali that they are engaged in witchcraft, although for 

this was not sufficient evidence, now 

were taken together near the city of Dettingen in 

some cave where they met many times 

in the same way until now. Thinking about 

they still know nothing about their surroundings, they 

began to go about their usual business and 

due to their sorcery, they raised such a storm from the wind 

rum that all towns and villages suffered from this great 

damage. 

   But oh God, not wanting these disgusting pre- 

the footsteps were still unnoticed, 

shed light on all their deeds and I. Thanks to the howling of the dog, 

maddened by this terrible storm, some of 

whether they lived in the area came to the mentioned cave or 

crevice, where they were all arrested and the next 

The day, i.e. 24 June i, presented before the ruler 

M yunchen, who, considering them on the basis of inquiries 

guilty, sentenced them to prison 

niyu. 

                                                       151 



   However, listen to what happened here: when a person 

century (or secretary) of the ruler took a paper in his hand, something 

to give an order to az, then suddenly both 

feet, and it all happened because the ankles and 

he came out of the bundles, so that after three days he died. 

   Then the ruler ordered the officers to search them, and 

those are our pouches hidden under the clothes on the body 

with pig manure, which, being extracted, published 

bring forth such a stench that no one could bear 

Human. And on the chest of Paul Gamperle (who was 

their main ringleader) did they find a diabolical 

the book was spelled out and made on a tin plate 

image of a man holding a scroll in his hand or 

a book on which were written the three words "Magall, 

To umat, Hellbeza. 

   Thus, their malicious activity was proved 

so clearly that they immediately confessed (without how and x- 

or embarrassment) in all murders and heinous 

deeds that they have ever done, about which 

and it says the same. 



      Acknowledgment Paula Gamperle 



   P aul Gamperle or P oppen hamer, fifty 

eight years old, confessed that he adhered to the Vedas- 

practice to and from childhood and that he was taught this 

an old grandmother who died many years ago. 

   He also admitted that during this time he, with the help of 

witchcraft and sorcery killed about a hundred small 

children. 

   He also confessed that he sent lameness and made 

lal humpbacked the most prosperous citizens of Munich, 

so how did they not forgive him the money that he gave them 

must. 

   He also confessed that with the help of witchcraft he 

got rid of two of his uncles in order to 

give them property. 

   He also confessed to committing ten robberies. 

churches, in fifteen murders on passable 

horns, in the nightly robberies of merchant houses, which 

of which he personally committed twenty-seven, and to no other 

a mok or a door couldn't stop him, but with help 

sorcery, he could open them without any difficulty. 

   In the end, he admitted that for all his 

In his life, he committed eight nightly arsons of neighbors 

152 



houses, thanks to which sixteen people, men 

we, women and children, burned in our beds. Except 

In addition, he committed many other crimes 

to the great misfortune of all this earth. 



  Anna Gamperle's confession 



   His wife, Anna Gamperle, sixty years old, 

knew that throughout her life she, with the help of 

dovstva also killed about a hundred small children 

tey. 

   She also admitted that she mutilated, made 

la humpbacked and besides, she just killed with the help 

sorcery nineteen elderly people. 

   She also admitted that with the help of witchcraft 

she forced the wife of the owner of the inn to climb in grief 

a burning stove, where it burned down; and likewise 

she brought the husband of this woman so much that he buried himself 

head into a trough full of feed for pigs, and so 

suffocated. 

   She also admitted that he was in large numbers 

spoiled cattle, scattering grain on the ground. And what 

she set fire to two haystacks, the fire from which spread 

rushed to the whole village. At the same time, she did not help 

dyam to fight the fire. And bless us, Lord, dear 

Your anger from this! 



  Acknowledgment Simona Gamperle 



   And x's own son, Simon Gamperle, twenty-two 

years old, confessed that he killed with the help of witchcraft 

thirty young children, and in addition to them - six hundred 

ricks, on whom he similarly sent 

lameness and hunchback, after which he killed. 

   In addition, he confessed that he had robbed nine churches. 

vey, four times robbed on the roads, twelve times - 

merchant warehouses; at night he violated the public 

order and robbed six times; often with the help of hail and 

storms caused damage to alien cattle and gardens. 

   In addition, he admitted that with the help of witchcraft 

                                  1 

wa he made himself invincible, thanks to which he 

one went against six people, robbed them, 

and then killed one by one. I'm not talking here anymore 

about many other cases of rage and murder, which he 

committed. 

                                                     1 53 



   Confession of Jakob Gamperle 



   Their other son, Jakob Gamperle, twenty-one 

yes, admitted that he killed sixty-five children, and 

except for them - five old men, whom he first 

made them humpbacked, sent them to their ache, and then killed 

shaft 

    In addition, he confessed to robbing five churches. 

way, in ten robberies of merchant houses, in four 

reh - on the carriageways. He set fire to five houses, 

He disturbed order and robbed the streets at night. By- 

the latter he did several dozen times. 

    In addition, he admitted that with the help of witchcraft 

wa he made it so that the storm swept a flock of sheep into the river and 

they all drowned; the storm was so strong that 

travelers could not even drive on the roads. He 

committed many other vile atrocities. 



   Confession of Ulrich Seeltibaum 



   Ulrich Seeltibaum and from Dettingen, sixty 

eight years old, admitted that in his entire life he had 

by the power of witchcraft killed seventy young children 

those, and also sent an ache and killed thirty people 

dey of advanced age. 

   In addition, he confessed to robbing churches and 

merchant houses, in robbery and nightly murders, in 

                                         2 

spoiling cattle and causing damage to orchards, and de- 

he did it so often and in such quantities that he did not 

could even list all these cases. 



   Confession of Georg Smaltes 



    Georg Smaltes, tailor and peonist, sixty years old, 

confessed that in his entire life he had killed thirty 

six young children and in addition sent an ache on a 

fifteen elderly people, killing them afterwards. 

I think that there is no need to list the murders on the road 

zhi x roads, robberies in villages, arsons of houses, 

enslavement of churches. But in conclusion, it should be said, 

that this man had a habit of digging 

Cham the graves of people who have just died and rob them. 

At the same time, he took away everything that was there, up to 

last three n to and . In my opinion, there are no people on earth now 

worse than this six. 



15 4 



   This is why all Christians should pray that 

God in his mercy has kept us and everyone else 

people from such cases and cleansed from both pre- 

footsteps the earth, as He already did, and let the reward 

they will be shamed and punished in various ways. I beg you for 

this, God! 

   These were the recognitions made before the government 

Lem and other burghers of the city of Munich. These people 

heard the accusation, they were found guilty and you 

sentenced them. And on July 26 they were executed 

in this way and in the following order: 

   First, they were brought in front of Munich's town hall, 

where the mentioned woman is placed between two 

her son ovyami, pulled out both breasts, to which the executioner 

He hit her three times in the face, after which he 

in the manner of each of her sons, who sat by her side, 

received three blows to the face with the chest of their mother. To her 

also na n if six strong blows twisted in 

They burned her with a whip, after which they broke both her hands on a ko- 

forest and placed on a certain seat, specially prepared 

                    3 

manufactured for this purpose; then her body was burned. 

                                                    15 5 



   The remaining five k oldun am men were distributed 

six blows with a whip, they broke it in the same way 

hands, four of them were tied at the same place 

stake and burnt. A P aul Gamperle, father and chief 

ny sorcerer, was impaled alive on a skewer, and so 

in this way he was gradually roasted to death, after which 

                               4 

his body was burned to the ground. 

   And so, supportive reader, you have heard 

to the life and death of these six most notorious 

sorcerers. And let no one doubt her truthfully 

sti, because not only many people told about this 

shadowy people, but the translation of this book itself was made 

from her first Dutch and zdan i . 

   And now let us fall on our knees and with contrite hearts 

children, let us pray to the Lord, by whose permission were 

all these atrocities were committed, so that he pacified pride 

and reduced the malice of Satan, who now reigns among 

people, and filled our hearts with such a strong faith, 

so that such attacks never cause us 

harm, but that we may serve Him with a perfect 

love and piety, to Him, most powerfully 

mu, King among kings, to whom power, praise and S1ava 

forever and ever. Amen. 



   Friedrich von Spee 

    Criminal warning 

           or 

About trials against witches 





                                  1 

                     QUESTION 4 7 



  Can a demon create the appearance of presence 

  innocent at witches' sabbaths?2 

   ЯzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

     I answer this question like this: “yes, maybe, although this 

only an appearance, observed, however, by all who 

takes part in this activity. What are the main 

vanity to assert such a thing? 

   Reason 1. That such a thing can happen is sub- 

examples say, therefore it is possible. I 

I know a monastery where a similar event took place, 

which was noted in the documentary acts. One of 

monks of this monastery was accused by a large number 

witches in that he took part in their sabbaths. 

They also called the person with whom he allegedly danced. 

shaft, and, full of repentance, in the face of death, confirmed 

were waiting for all this, while at the same time, according to the testimony of all 

stuck at this hour, the accused, along with other monks 

Hami sang in the choir, offering prayers to the Lord. Applicants 

could lie, which is quite common after applying 

denial of torture, and to slander an innocent out of malice. If 

on the contrary, they did not lie (but they themselves considered it 

judges), then they took the phantom for reality. I 

I can name others, pious even in the opinion of the 

days, before which many witches, people, 

living and still, which are just as many times 

they were accused of dancing on witches' sabbaths. 

Many other examples could be cited, but I 

I will do this because they are well known 

and come down to the fact that individuals were seen on 

shabash ah, while kak irrefutable evidence- 

properties testified that they were in this 

time is unrelenting elsewhere. 

   Reason 2. The devil can take on the form of an 

gela of light 3, this is spoken of in the Holy Scriptures 

and in numerous examples from the lives of the saints. Next- 

conclusively, and he can present the innocent to trial. 

the face of a ghost, which gives reason to think that the Lord 

God allows him many things. 

   Reason 3. Arguments of supporters of the opposite 

many opinions and I do not give enough reliable evidence 

to refute our original thesis, I conclude 

that in the name of justice it is necessary 

follow common sense in their views, and not 



be satisfied with the words of others. I draw attention to 

what I am, supporting the opinion that a demon can 

to create a ghost and innocent people, is not obliged to prove 

your rightness. It's more for those who object. 

me, in case they deny my point 

eyesight. For the point is that there is little for me 

will change on whether the demon can do the same or 

can not. I don't want to deduce anything from both statements. 

and I bother myself only because of the joy of knowing and I, let me 

to warn others. But if this is not for me 

luck accompanies and my knowledge does not threaten anyone, then 

it will not cause any harm to anyone and will not 

pose a danger to someone. Mine are against 

niki make their views as if the foundation, with you 

whose cells allow themselves to judge the human 

life and . Therefore, they should, unless they are easily 

mentally, as close as possible to the complex and heavy 

desired problems, the knowledge of which is by no means 

is the foundation of their knowledge, and to study them. 

    One who denies that a demon can create an image 

innocent, violates the rules of dialectics; debt is 

investigator and his duty is to prove the assertion 

nie. This, of course, applies not only to those who 

denies, but also to those who agree with this statement 

denium. Under the word "agree" (as I could already see 

reader) should be understood as “I agree on the condition ...”, and 

therefore, if everyone, whether he agrees or denies, re- 

accepts this position as a fundamental truth 

well, he wants to use it for further their brainwashing- 

lucence, then he is obliged to prove it. Opposite and Polo 

conclusion that the demon can create images of invisible 

new, must substantiate it, prove it, and then 

conduct processes on this basis, since otherwise 

Che, rejecting the evidence, in this case they will achieve 

the opposite result. However, on the other hand. 

even having created the foundation of their proofs, they do not 

greatly improve their position. 

   The reasons given are sufficient for us to 

to shed light on this dubious case and in order to further 

people who were not quite versed in the sciences were horrified by the deeds 

devil and did it with God's permission. For us 

it is enough that we hint this to the judges. If they 

want to come forward in the process frankly, without resorting to 

going to the most severe tortures, and relying only on other 

new foundation of arguments, they will act as a worthy 

160 



smart and prudent people; without doing this, it is impossible to 

fight a fair decision. P let's look at the same, to ak and e 

evidence is provided by the opposite side. 



                      QUESTION 48 

    What arguments are sought to prove 

    va provisions that the demon on the witch's shabba- 

    Shah can not create images of innocent people? 

   I answer: B insf eld gathered these arguments together 

                                      4 

But; Delry Fr. is also based on them. I represent- 



6- 3400                                             161 



the reliability of the entire study is very doubtful. 

witchcraft, since the arguments of B insfel- 

yes, we will subject them to criticism when they are re- 

position, and to call them thoughtful, I also do not 

Can. So in this way, I will state in order ar- 

arguments B insf elda and only the first argument will be 

take me from Delrio. 

     Argument I. It is probably not worth describing how 

for a long time, one not very smart fighter against witches boasted 

Delrio's words, referring to his book and citing the following 

following position, in which Delrio declared as follows: 

“Demons are good at taking on the forms of 5 innocent 

people and in this form to be present at the Sabbaths, es- 

Does the Lord God not intervene in this. However, I have not yet 

never read about it and never heard of it happening 

counted" (to n .2, question 12, no. 5). And a little further down there: 

“If the Lord allows it, then soon the deception will be revealed 

and the Lord allows or to repent for others 

sins or through suffering to earn glory 

And descending from the above azan, this spiritual father exclaimed 

says: “You see, Delrio himself didn’t say anything like that. 

tal and did not hear al. It can also believe that it 

It happened? » 

     Objection 1. This argument proves too 

a lot and, ultimately, nothing. He proves 

same as many other circumstances, 

which some are carefully illuminated, others are not, 

since Delrio had not read or heard about it. I, 

on the contrary, he spoke and heard a lot about it, just as 

and many with me. 

     Objection 2. At the present time the inquisitors 

to every day with new tortures snatched from 

witches confession about unheard of hitherto criminal 

len yah and uhi sch ren and i x and do it, regardless of 

to n I zey, nor to the people. 

     If I want to use this argument, only 

them alone, and dispute everything, since Delrio is nothing 

I haven’t read or heard about it, what would they say then? 

They would be indignant and would begin to assure that 

The Lord allowed everyone to commit sins 

day. Why don't they want to agree with me? 

many who have not read them and not heard them, in that de- 

mon can, with the permission of the Lord, represent on sha- 

Bashe images of truly existing and innocent- 

162 



other people? This disbelief is also another 

the sin of each of them. 

   Objection 3. When people are told that they are seen 

Delhi during the satanic Sabbath, then it is considered self 

taken for granted that they are guilty and indeed 

but physicists were present there as well. Then they are tortured 

as much as is necessary for their recognition, and if not 

who endure torture and do not confess, those 

strenko burned alive to ak zakoren ate and stubborn 

sinners, because they are guilty anyway. 

Isn't it surprising that Delrio has nothing to 

Haven't heard or read this? 

   Objection 4. You want to object to me that not all 

happens as I described above, that those unfortunate 

those who withstood torture and torment without admitting 

guilty, were, according to the law, released home, and 

not burned. Well, this will be useful to me too. If 

few of those who were released were found not guilty, and 

this happened more than once (according to your statement), then to ak 

could you not read or hear about it? If these 

people are justified, then who was at the Sabbath then? Follow- 

importantly, and this argument does not prove anything. 

   Argument II. The devil doesn't have any desire and I 

imitate the presence of an innocent at the Sabbath, 

therefore ... This position is especially unreliable, 

because from the Holy Scriptures it is known that the State 

God does not oppress or tempt his chosen ones, 

except perhaps only when he wants to test them before 

brothel, spiritual qualities and patience. This is a learning 

we B insf elda. 

   Objection 1. This argument proves a lot, but 

hence nothing. Since almost the same 

With our words we can prove that the demon did not hit everything 

being And ova, and he is responsible for death 

martyrs, not only because of their art and 

to the sources of torment they have chosen. Likewise, I 

to say: “The demon does not have any need for 

good deeds and I x. He knows from Sacred P and san and I, 

that the Lord does not oppress his chosen ones and does not tempt 

no, except perhaps only when he wants to test them 

Virtue, spiritual qualities and patience. 

   Objection 2. Perhaps not all those whose appearance is 

nimal demon, are God's and chosen by n and kami. Not- 

who are capable of doing evil, they can be a villain- 

mi, having eaten them in mortal sins, even if they 

б*                                                     1 бzyxwvuts 

                                                         ?, 



have nothing to do with witchcraft and, investigator * 

but, in this sense, they are innocent. But even in this case 

if the demon has no need to take on the appearance of God 

their chosen ones at the Sabbath, then further 

more evidence that the guise of innocent mo 

Can be used on Devil's Coven. Tai 

that this argument proves nothing. 

    Argument III. B insf eld believes that the doctrine of TON: 

that a demon cannot appear in the guise of an innocent 

draws special power from the mind of the innocent. N evi 

the new ones, exhausted by fear and worries, are not demo 

does it seem to us in the society of sorcerers and witches - 

On the other hand, if the demon can perform 

anything, then, consequently, we will all deserve to be honored 

to be in horror and fear, but the body and soul are in a real 

will be in constant danger. However, the number 

that conscience is absolutely not afraid of anything, therefore 

This is true . 

    Objection 1. This argument proves a lot, zyxwvut 

                                                         <, 

hence nothing. With similar words, you can 

to say that any innocent person is not bewitched 

witches or unaffected by others 

good spell, you can live your whole life unhappily 

and that it just doesn't happen. Proof: who and 

innocent people are afraid already in the morning that he is on that day> 

not bewitched by witches? On the other hand, if the witch 

can do this, then we will deserve to stay " 

in horror and fear, thinking that because of witchcraft 

we will remain unhappy for the rest of our lives. Only pure! 

conscience is not afraid of anything; this implies 

    Objection 2. The innocent are calm and fearless. 

we are not because we believe that the devil cannot play 

use their appearance for their own purposes or not deliver 

they are in trouble, but because they are sure that if yes 

but their appearance will be used, for them it will not be" 

have consequences. They are sure that they are not sitting in court 

corruptible wise judges, who, having initiated a process on 

them on the denunciations of people who obey the devil 

believe more in the moral purity of the accused, 

which, in their opinion, speaks for itself. 

    Objection 3. I must dispute the statement 

which is true that where and inquisitive processes are on 

witches are carried out with zeal and fervor, and where the courts 

adhere to the opinions and I that we are talking about, her; 

conducting the process with skillful excuses, accused 

164 



we (actually innocent) have nothing to fear. This 

does not correspond to the truth. I know many eminent ones, 

sane people who experienced this 

fear, and sometimes so strong that some 

some of them left for other places. I know and so and x, 

who themselves asked me and others for advice. I 

I also know people, I rush to you for advice and for confession in 

neighboring city and former them, the next day 

rotation ii, grasped, since it was considered oblique 

vein evidence - they allegedly tried to escape, but 

the attempt did not succeed, because the Lord, out of revenge, 

til their minds and they returned back. When 

they tried to prove that everything was wrong, no one 

didn't believe. I know how many references I had to give 

me on specific questions of my knowledge and about 

how to behave in order to avoid mortal sin, not to 

speaking to himself and to others during the torture, and about 

how many people actually live in a given 

place in a state of fear. Therefore, the argument 

B insf elda cannot be used by him; vice versa, 

he rather helps me against him. And, finally, I want 

to say: if B insfeld in these cases has acquired such 

little experience and knowledge if he has not read and heard 

about what everyone knows, what you can wish for 

such a scientist and others like him? They may continue 

him to sit in their offices, how did they do it and 

until now, rewarding us with their theological labors 

ladies. However, I ask one thing: that people who have 

having such great authority, ceased to consider pro- 

cesses a fun game and were not afraid to come closer 

prisoners and feel the dirt of the dungeons if 

they will certainly get there someday. And more from experience 

it is known that the spirit and power of the imagination are constantly 

excite, and thoughtful and I soften a person. 

   Argument IV. Something that never happened with 

the usual set of circumstances, we can assume 

never happened before; if it follows from 

unusual facts, it should be investigated. H ikog- 

yes, or it was extremely rare to hear confident 

and full-fledged recognition of an and I in that. what the demon took 

on the shabbats the appearance of innocents. On the contrary, from experience 

it is known that those seen on our shabashah really 

guilty of witchcraft. So, argues B insf eld. 

   I object: the last statement must be 

rut. How does B insfeld know what is really 

                                                    1 t S 



the innocent were never represented by the devil 

shabash ah, and therefore all who are accused are worthy of 

ri tsan and i and condemnation? And from reliable confessions? 

How does he know that all those accused of witchcraft and 

convicted because of this, are really guilty of 

n i ti i x witchcraft? Probably from the recognition of myself 

unfortunate, as, at least, he himself claims. 

But how does he know that all these recognitions are valid 

authentically reliable, and not obtained as a result of torment 

and under the influence of fear? It often happens that 

the main part of the evidence looks unreliable; 

so how does he know that those on whom he 

yang is not based, not i are the same, that is 

misleading them. Woe to those whose leg at least once 

entered the torture chamber; they will never return 

back, without confirming that it is only possible to come 

mother. Here we can again refer to the third objection. 

the first argument above. And therefore 

I consider it my duty to repeat often that we are not all 

we go to oldunami; the only reason for this 

statement i is only the fact that we are not forced 

whether to this p tk am and. This was also stated by some inquisi- 

tor one mighty ruler, sitting at the feast- 

table and being in the consciousness of the absolute 

his rightness, and since the Roman himself put 

in his hands and an instrument of torture, it is not surprising if 

and the pope himself will someday confess to witchcraft. That 

B insf eld will do the same, and I, and others, with the exception of 

I eat a few k rap k and x in spirit. That's why this argument 

also proves nothing. Here you can once again 

to turn, as already mentioned, to the third objection 

to the first argument. 

    Argument V. If the demon can 

shah to take on the images of innocent people, then he can 

may wish to present them as murderers, criminals 

kov, adulterers, since his main task is 

destruction of sinless people. That's why maybe 

be so that a person accused of murder, gra- 

fleeing, slander and adultery, defending himself and being able to defend 

I see that he is sinless, and the devil is to blame for everything, 

taking on his guise and committing this criminal 

deed, etc. 

    With this argument B insfeld wants to show 

to say that those who act with 

16 6 



constrained consciousness, or often and in a state 

blindness. 

   I object, since practically and from any basis 

Vaniya follows that Binsfeld and his adherents 

interpret our opinion very selectively and condemn 

they do it insofar as they themselves are blind and cannot 

distinguish intent from harmless fiction. That's why 

if someone could not untie such knots, 

having deceived his senses, then for us this is all 

proves nothing anyway, because we know how 

resolve such a situation. With all the obvious 

we declare that all Binsfeld's assertions cannot be 

can be compared with our particular case. AND 

this is the case practically and always. Be careful, 

reader, and you will be convinced of this. 

   Suppose there is a place about which exactly 

it is known that there at a certain time and hour appear- 

there are various ghosts in order to spend 

time and to do various things, as people do; 

suppose that Sempronius accuses Gracchus, i.e. 

that someone saw another person at a time when 

it was absolutely murder. However, any healthy 

thinking judge will have enough reason to doubt 

wonder if it was the real Gracchus, suspecting that 

in that place they saw his empty disguise. However, 

it would be foolish to let Grak ha go home without further- 

our investigation and analysis of evidence. Exactly 

the same is the case in our case. Our and opponents 

defend the position that the demon has a habit of 

the vow to appear at certain hours at certain 

places where satanic festivals take place, sha- 

bashi, round dances. They also claim that he 

yanno changes appearance, appearing in one or the other 

form, and appears in the guise of men, women and n, soldiers, 

boys, girls, goats, lions, etc. And if anyone 

because of n they are not among the dancers and x, then, as they say 

Our and opponents, the demon himself takes on their appearance. 

There is a lot going on, but even more 

there to already. Witches are in the habit of periodi- 

to eat, drink and sleep in ivory beds, 

even if they absorb carrion and carrion, write 

brewing her bile, and resting under the gallows. Yet 

the rest can be considered an illusion and a thing of unproven 

zanny, that is, what is needed at both festivities 

dimo there is a large number of all kinds of 



                                                    167 



chin, ghosts, shadows, ghosts and masks. Since 

why do all my opponents say it's possible 

(about what I think is possible in satanic 

bashah, I will say later), then everyone who turned out to be mi 

place of the judge, painful doubts begin to torment - 

he wonders if the power of demons is spreading and 

ghosts of all kinds so far away that it becomes 

possible use of ghostly guises by them 

people, especially those convicted of committing a death 

sin. If the judge is a shrewd and healthy person 

thinker, he will not hesitate to doubt (or to 

call it whatever you want), but was the suspect acting 

at the indicated hour in the given place, or it is 

the ghost of the suspect used by the demon. After all 

it by no means follows that I should 

to suspect and look for evidence that speaks of 

the presence of a ghost from myself, doing it only on that 

grounds that someone saw someone among thieves, murderers 

and adulterers, or even resort to tricks and 

methods of this kind. All these are different things. From here 

it is quite clear that the given argument of Binsfeld, 

which he considers irresistible is by no means 

so new; its groundlessness is especially visible - after all, 

its creator just blindly insists on it. Only 

this he confirms, for we do not at all see what 

what B insf eld wants to see with it. Can, 

of course, to talk about other aspects of this argument 

menta B insf elda, however, what I have proved here, 

is quite enough to completely whether w and t 

his any strength. 

    Argument VI. God did not allow the demon to accept ob- 

whether innocent, therefore, he cannot de- 

lat. 

    I object, because where did my opponents get so ah 

certainty that God did not allow any of this? 

As we said above, the Lord allows many 

other bad things - the death of martyrs, babies, 

trampling on the sacred hosts and other terrible things. 

In addition, God allows the demon to create a ghost and 

different people, as well as their reflections in the mirror, water, 

oil, which then exist independently, 

so that many informers, slanderers and all sorts of 

witnesses, wishing to know who in what particular 

stee is engaged in obscene deeds, sent 

where cattle are allegedly bewitched, where someone's daughter goes out 

1 68 



dit married where someone died. Unfortunately, this has become 

appears to be a very common and common occurrence. 

The demon feels especially good about this and, to 

we know, confuses the innocent with fake claims 

metami. I know one worthy and learned priest 

nik, a very good person, to whom one 

a hot woman, a witch, experienced an unbearable 

love fever, trying to inspire at the same time similar 

zke desire and the object of their desires. There was no such 

some tricks and tricks that she would not let into 

move, but, convinced of their futility, she 

repeatedly with the help of a demon created ethereal apparitions 

the ghosts of a staunch priest and just the way it is 

said in the bulls of the Pope. Why then 

the demon must take the form of innocent people only 

ko n our shabash e, what can he, of course, do? 

   You say: if he was allowed to take 

the appearance of the innocent on our shabbats, then the already mentioned 

the third objection cannot be met, and thus 

to our state may be caused irreparable 

damage. 

   Objection 1. If so, how do you know 

that God will not allow this harm and loss to the state? 

God allowed the devil to carry witches from place to place 

one hundred, create a witch's potion for their deeds, etc., che- 

none of my opponents denies it. N oh unless 

it's not a problem? How deplorable this is! That 

God does not know about any of the activities of the devil, including 

including that he assumes the form of innocents on 

witchcraft festivals, there can be no question, for with 

those who say such things must argue. 

   Objection 2. I contest the opinion above- 

the stated position is correct. For what harm, ask- 

I vayu, can an innocent person govern- 

stvu? Maybe it lies in the fact that the innocent- 

of necessity, they held him for the guilty, turning 

lis with him to ak with the guilty, etc.? And I will answer this: 

a smart and judicious judge is not to blame here. By- 

good things are done by narrow-minded and stupid people, and in this - 

harm to the state. And the rest of the position of my opponents 

netov is completely wrong. They claim that they 

new ones, whose images were used by the demon, 

fall into trouble because they are mistaken for the guilty 

and treat them accordingly. The sa- 

to which they assert that anyone whose image is used 



                                                     169 



shaft demon, must be considered guilty. Thus 

So here another question arises: is it possible to count 

to blame a person who has fallen into such a situation 

tion? And so, the circle closes, but the question remains: how 

what in the majority of these people should be considered 

guilty because they were seen on witchcraft 

shabash ah? Because God does not allow the devil to use 

to use images of the innocent in our shabashah. N about respect 

Does the Lord not allow this? Yes, because everything is not- 

happiness lies in the fact that everyone seen there 

must be considered guilty. Here it is especially evident 

how little my opponents observe the rule of dialectic 

ty to and: "Therefore B is, that B is A." But 

hasn't anyone broken this vicious circle? One- 

nako and still there are scientists of the spiritual rank and I, 

using this and introducing authorities and rulers into 

delusion; they never return to true 

way, using the patronage of their superiors, 

so little understanding of them in all this. And if B insfeld 

thinks it is the right of the sons of God to decide 

people, then he should place this thesis before 

the ten questions I am answering. In for- 

Finally, I must briefly tell something about the 

beings in one famous corner of Germany, turned 

Nome is now dust and ashes. N e k n i a z proposed to 

go to your table two priests, famous 

among other people by his learning and righteousness. 

Continuing the meal, knyaz asked one of them a question 

ros: “Father, do you think it is right that we 

we still torture everyone we point to 

a dozen witches, how about a participant in a witches' coven? 

I'm very afraid that the path the system is taking us 

denunciations, may turn out to be absolutely wrong, 

how the devil, master of all sorts of tricks, could 

take care of your adherents, not give them away 

dozens in hand and justice. What do you think about 

this?" To this the questioner answers with excessive 

the diligence of a man who studies philosophy at home 

on the oven. “How can you be saddened by the fact that, despite 

formidable character, brought so much to 

file zn an and I? Believe in what God could allow 

so that the images of the innocent are used on Shaba- 

shah means to doubt our Lord. I do not see 

no reason for doubt and hesitation, which 

may arise from the judge regarding the truth of the light 



170 



deniya reported in the submitted denunciations. K n I z- 

reeked, and a serious argument broke out between them. One- 

but since the priest constantly tried to prove 

to say that he was right, the king put an end to the dispute, saying: 

"I'm sorry, holy father, but you yourself have determined 

my mortal end, from which it is impossible to escape if I 

I will put you in the dark. About a spot of ten witches 

knew that they saw you at their shabbats. AND 

this is not a joke, you can read the compiled 

p azan and I, in which all this is written in detail 

But. According to your opinion, which you are so far behind 

If you have come, you must suffer the punishment you deserve.” 

Here the valiant husband became numb, speechless and did not 

knowing what argument to bring in his defense and that. He shut up 

chal and his gaze stopped. And this is not a fairy tale at all, 

I told this story the way it was, omitting 

only the name of the area and the name of this person. They 

nothing here. And here is what is surprising: why the demon 

should and can take on the appearance of only being innocent 

nyh people, because even in the Holy Scriptures stories 

it is believed that he is capable of not only destroying souls and, but also 

turn into an angel. Indeed, according to Apo- 

                                                7 

table (2 Corinthians 11), he does this all the time. Here's the 

which this argument also proves nothing. And those- 

Now consider the last of the remaining arguments. 

     Argument VII and last. In this regard, B ins- 

Feld believes that the true doctrine that the devil 

cannot appear at satanic sabbaths in the guise of 

whose innocent people are protected by all scientists and 

of all books, from The Hammer to the works of Spina, Jacquier 

               8 

and Loy eri i. 

     I object: our opinion and I, if it ever 

be made public through open discussion 

deniya, will adhere to a much larger number 

of people. And it will be connected about, first of all, with the fact 

that it is true, and not with the authority of its author. One- 

but since B insfeld comes first 

from weightiness n showed azan and i witches, then it's really 

funny. It's like saying: this teaching is right. 

marvelous because the disciples defend and protect the father of all 

lies. Excellent conclusion! With my own witness 

witches strengthen their authority through the presence of witches. In Evan- 

helium Christ says: “If I provide a witness 

testimony about myself, then my testimony is false. And x same 

a 

  Rgumen t says: if Satan testifies for himself, 



                                                     171 



then this evidence is true. I look with surprise 

I wonder where this might lead. That's why if 

I am allowed to express my own opinion, then I 

I declare with full confidence my belief in 

that testimonies torn out with the help of torture - 

lies, if they are talking about a particular person, 

seen at Shabash e. I believe that most 

so their people are innocent. It became clear to me, 

what if not- 

how many guilty rams, then they will certainly follow 

a series of absolutely innocent people. Under the threat of 

the current and torment of the innocent erects in vain on 

others, which they do not know about, and thereby captivates 

them behind you. We don’t want the truth, but we want 

so that they themselves would confess all their deeds. Cog- 

yes, sometime this is sure to stop him. And therefore I 

I sulk, because I never had any doubts that 

that there are not so many witches in the whole world. What ca- 

their covens and dances, then here you can express 

cast doubt on their reality. I do wish that 

all this is somebody ever really learning 

chi l. With my book, I just wanted to stir up, 

to provoke scientists, to involve them in the discussion of issues 

owls accompanying witch trials. 

    Every day I see how many of them allow 

captivate yourself with short-sighted and thoughtless statements- 

mi. I like those scientists who do nothing 

take on faith without a doubt, even if the whole nation 

believes in it. However, at the same time, the princes must show 

to be as attentive as possible, so that in both serious 

in our cases, imprudence has not led to harm, 

even in the name of satisfying the scientific curiosity 

value. 









172 



    Sira and o   de Bergerac 

        For     koldun ov 

      P roti in k aldun s 

States and Empires of the Sun 





                    FOR KOLDUN OV 

   Monsieur. Ever since I had the honor of seeing you, 

I had a strange incident. 

   Tired of reading to n and gi, which I once had with you 

I borrowed and which you once praised me, I 

went out for a walk in order to dispel the gloomy and absurd 

fantasies with which I was filled with terrible stupidity 

this science and . Struggling to correlate their thoughts with memories 

niya about these dark stories, I gradually deepened 

fought in your little forest. Later, as it seems to me, 

four hours on the road, I suddenly noticed a broom, strange 

in a way I find myself between my legs. So, having provided 

wittingly or involuntarily riding on it, I suddenly felt 

I thought I was flying through the air. Nak he is, not remembering either 

the way I climbed, nor the road itself, I turned out to be 

in the middle of the desert. There was not one around 

tropin to i. I looked at my broom without a word ... Wilderness 

                                         1 

this one seemed to me some kind of planet. 

   Determined to pierce and kick a little 

deep into, I, not noticing any obstacles, moved 

forward. Well, he was very tired, I knelt down and, 

But then I saw something that greatly surprised me. 

Against the background of the Sun, stars shone with blue light, further 

there was a full moon, and in size it means 

significantly superior to the real one. Three times they disappeared 

and three times the air became still, the 

streams, birds left their singing, fish like glass 

nelly, and all the animals trembled softly. Incredible ti- 

the tire, standing around, instilled some kind of fear. 

   By the light of the moon, I saw how, from the depths of some 

ate a deep old man dressed in white 

clothes. His face was weather-beaten, his gaze menacing. From- 

severe eyes peered under thick bushy brows. 

A thick beard fell over his chest. Crowning his head 

la hat, woven from vervain, but covered the waist 

belt made of May fern. N a chest 

a half-dead bat dangled around him, and around 

the collar was wrapped around the iron collar, unizan 

seven different gemstones, each 

which I was the sign of a separate planet. 

   Dressed in this way and in this way, in his left hand he held three 

coal-shaped vessel filled with dew, and in the right - 

a rod of elderberry, one end of which was bound with a 

                                                       175 



stin to oh, consisting of different metals, the second 

was made in the form of a small pen and. 

    Having kissed the threshold of his cave, he took off his shoes and, something 

muttering, and uttering some incomprehensible phrases, after 

which, walking backwards, went up to the old oak tree, four 

steps from which he drew one in one three f and- 

gurus. Here the earth, trembling, by itself p n I la te 

the most delineated and I which he depicted there. To rum then- 

go, he wrote there the names of prominent people, age, 

year, season, month, week, day and hour of their lives, 

even kings he appointed there, placing each on 

own place; At the same time, he is adil to all of them, but to each 

in a special way. 

    Having finished this, he placed his vessel in the center of these 

circles, opened it, took the pointed end in his teeth 

his rod, then lay down on the ground, turning 

facing east, and fell asleep. By when min ula approximately 

half the time during which he slept, then 

I noticed how five fern seeds fell into the vessel. 

Waking up, he took them out of there, while two seeds 

I put it in my ear and, one in my mouth, I immersed one in water, 

and threw the rest out of the circle. However, hardly 

he released it from his hands and, as I saw that he was around 

reaps more than a million animals and insects, no fore- 

nothing good by their appearance. This 

with his rod he touched the forest owl, the fox and the 

the one who, and making monstrous cries, immediately 

entered the circle. He ripped open their bru with a copper knife 

ho, pulled out x hearts and wrapped each in three leaves 

to a from a bay tree, immediately swallowed it. Behind- 

so he took out the liver from each, after which again about 

owed his incense. By mixing the dew (which was 

him in a triangular vessel) and the blood in the basin, he immersed 

there is a clean parchment, holding it in his right hand; behind- 

by issuing four or five times some terrible 

cry, he closed his eyes and began to pray. 

    The old man hardly spoke with his lips, but I heard 

how it seemed inside him that several 

votes. One day a palm branch appeared from the earth, he directed 

her up, while occasionally glancing at the nail! 

index finger of the left hand and.zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWV 

                                   He was scary once 

ardent and agitated, it was evident that he was being tormented by 

some convulsions - suddenly he, gasping, fell on a stake 

n i. However, he immediately uttered three words of some 

kli n an and i and the forces returned to him again. Now he 



17b 



stood straight, not staggering, despite the monstrous 

gusts of a terrible wind that blew right in his face and 

flying at him, then like a hurricane, then like a tornado. K a- 

it seemed that this wind wanted to get out of this ring. But 

then the three circles mentioned suddenly made a circle 

the first movement, a stream of fire escaped from them, which, 

rotating, divided into several balls, with a bang 

spewing out peals of thunder. 

    Suddenly a clear and transparent light scattered these gloomy 

meteors. In the midst of all this, a young man arose, one 

with one foot leaning on the eagle, the other on the lynx. He in- 

gave the sorcerer three bottles filled with unknown 

me liquid. The same in turn gave him three hairs. 

sa, pulling out one and the top of the ears, and the other two from the temples, 

after which he hit him on the shoulder with a stick, which 

whinnied in his hand, and everything disappeared. All this happened then 

when the stars began to fade slowly against the background 

the rising sun, gradually merging with the sky. 

   Then I was about to go, wanting to find my 

village, one like a sorcerer, gazing intently at 

me, approached the place where I at that moment found- 

sya. Although he walked slowly, he soon 

was equal with me. Approaching, the old man handed me his 

a hand that turned out to be so cold that it 

my own hands could not get warm for a long time. Behind- 

so he led me past dilapidated shacks in a hundred 

the dreadful ruins of an old abandoned castle, 

whose rooms for a million years have turned into a gloomy 

new dungeons. As soon as we entered, he. turning- 

come to me, he said: “Rejoice that you had to face 

to see the sorcerer and Agrippa, 2 souls and which through the resettlement 

souls once inspired the scientist Zarathustra, 

Duc B a k tr i i . 3 It has been about a hundred years since 

how I left the world of people and hide here, being in 

health thanks to drinking gold. That's why I don't 

a terrible disease. I drink this universal 

a remedy that rejuvenates me and restores my 

wasted energy in the body. Look at these three charts, 

given to me by the Fire Demon King. 4 First 

full of liquid, in the second - the powder of the eruption, in 

the third is talc oil. By the way, you should 

be very grateful to me, because of all mortals I am you- 

took you to participate in the mysteries that I 

I only do it once every twenty years. With the help of my 

magic I send scarcity or abundance; I loosen 



                                                         177 



guy of war, inciting Geniuses to it, controlling their short 

la m and ; I teach shepherds to love wolves; I am teaching 

dunov way to rotate the sieve; I incite the fairies to dance 

vat by the light of the moon s; I do so that the card players 

four of them go looking for clubs under the gallows. At midnight I 

I send from to the cemetery dressed in cloth robes 

ghosts, so that they demanded from their heirs 

for the fulfillment of the promises given to them. I order 

demons to live in quiet castles and kill passers-by 

residents who will stop there, and so it will be until 

until someone decisively forces them 

Show where the fret is. The poor I make rich 

mi . I help thieves burn a candle made of fat 

gallows to put the owners to sleep while they commit 

to the rage. I give people a flying pistol, which 

again returned to the owner's pocket after 

he spent it. Lak her I give rings, with the help of which 

ryh they can during the day I visit Orleans and Ver- 

rush back to Paris. With the help of ghosts I can 

turn everything in the house upside down - they overturn 

bottles and, glasses, plates and, while not breaking anything 

wai and not p role wai. I teach old people to heal famously 

Radku with the help of conspiracies. On the eve of the holiday 

St. And oanna, I wake up the locals early in the morning and they, 

not having breakfast and not having prayed, they go to collect 

herbs. To olduns I teach the art of becoming 

rotn yami. I make them catch and eat children 

they meet on the roads. I send to saddened 

                                            5 

to the people of the big black man a, who both 

wants to make them rich if they want to give it to him> 

their showers and I violate such an agreement 

eyesight. For those who read witchcraft books and gi without understanding 

ty me, calls me and does not endow me with anything, I turn off 

neck. But I peacefully go back if the one who called me 

gives me an old bash poppy, a hair or a bunch of straw. Everyone 

when you come to our shabash, I suggest kissing your ass 

goat sitting on a stool. And x I plentifully treat not 

salted meat. If someone else is not 

who knows customs, will make the sign of the cross over himself, then 

everything disappears. He himself will be in a deserted place, 

somewhere in the midst of a ram's thorn, three hundred leagues from 

places. I find depraved people in bed: women 

shch in with in to ubami, men with succubi. To those who sleep 

I didn’t cross myself before going to bed, I send a night to Osh Mar 

in the form of an infinitely long marble room. I will 



178 



tea, how to get rid of enemies: you need to make them wax 

Ia is depicted, pierce them or throw them into the fire. Then 

your enemy will suffer the same fate as his image 

female With sorcerers, do I feel the sensitivity of those places 

on the body where the goat left its mark. I bring in the peasants - 

us so that they put a tuft of hair under the threshold of the barn 

                                                    179 



or a toad if they want to send damage to the 

sya there cattle. At the same time, you need to say three times 

curse, so that the sheep, crossing the threshold, gradually 

withered. I give money, which then turns into du- 

bean leaves. I leave the sorcerers of the ordinary 

a demon that accompanies and protects and protects them from everything, 

what is constantly conceived by St. M artin. To deliver 

succubus of a bewildered person, I teach how to make tri- 

naked flatbread to y and give e "as alms per- 

whoever gets into it is looking for him. I turn werewolves 

a pitchfork between the eyes. According to my desire, the sorcerers can 

Gut feel when they are beaten, but only if it's deeds- 

eaten with an elderberry stick. I am teaching the making of witnesses 

corruption, magic, making seals, ta- 

lisman ov, divination by magic mirrors and stars. 

I train them to find the mistletoe, the grass of delusion, leggings, 

magnetic patch. I send lemurs, brownies, 

larves, llamas, ghosts, mans, ghosts. 6 N aco- 

man, I am the Devil... and chief jagermeister of the Forest of Fonteblo." 

   With these words, the sorcerer disappeared. Everything melted and 

covered with thick black fog. I discovered se- 

I was in my bed, my heart was trembling, my body was strong 

weakened from soul torments. I felt so 

tired of not having the strength to write you a letter. 

   Monsieur, your obedient servant. 





                                            7 

                  P OTI V   CO L D UN O V . 



   Monsieur. Tell me honestly, is it really my last letter 

didn't it horrify you? Whatever you say, but I 

think that the phenomenon of you is a big black man and 8 is 

the result of the emotional state of your soul and whether, 

at least your mind. Previously, I'm exactly the same 

I was afraid of ghosts, but now I was too much 

excited to describe this whole awful picture. 

Now, wanting to make amends for my fault, I will draw a wide 

some canvas of this phenomenon in all its light, with all the special 

bennosti and hue to ami. 

   Can you imagine how many co- 

burned about sorcerers caught in the conclusion of an agreement with 

the devil; how many unfortunates were confessed at the stake in 

that they participated in the Sabbath, and during interrogations they say 

told their judges that at these feasts they ate de- 

t "h. However, one cannot believe even a single word of a person, for 

! 80 



a person can say whatever they want 9 . For even if 

personal permission of the God of souls and can return to earth 

liu to ask someone to pray for her, then 

does this mean that ghosts or spirits, if they are all 

still exist, so frivolous as to take on se- 

being responsible for the reckless whims of the ignorant 

village villages, or appear on the field when 

in the silly head of the rural shepherd will intensify 

stupas of black melan holiya, or, like a falcon on a hand 

impatient hunter, succumb to the bait and 

the whim of this despicable person to perform all sorts of buffoons - 

skye plya sk and . Yes, I do not believe in sorcerers at all, although some 

some great minds hold a different opinion, and I 

I will not yield to any authority whose judgments are not 

agree with the arguments of reason, or do not come from God 

ha. H and Aristotle, more knowledgeable than I, nor Plato, 

nor Socrates will convince me of anything, if that, 

what they say does not agree with reason. For the mind is 

my only lord, whom I voluntarily 

I obey. And then, I know from experience that very often 

it so happened that the greater minds retreated before the greater 

less changeable, and a fall from a great height is always 

stronger. In the end, our fathers were also mistaken, mistaken 

now we are afraid, and ours and descendants will also be mistaken 

fight after us. 

   It is impossible to adhere to this or that opinion only 

only because it is the judgment of a great philosopher. 

As for me, I despise those pedants who 

not ar- 

arguments, but refer to the statements of the authorities, 

as if these sayings were more reliable than others. 

some arguments. However, I might believe them too if 

I would be given a philosophy, basic provisions 

which could not be questioned and 

where everything would fit together. Otherwise 

case, you can show whatever you want, because usually 

but relate principles to views, not views to 

principles. In addition, even if you give in to the authority 

that these great of their husbands, even if we admit that these 

principles formulated by former philosophers, not 

it is necessary to keep in mind that these ancient, like 

us, they wrote not everything that they thought. Very often 

the religion of their country forced them to conform 

their judgments with the interest and need of politics. 



                                                       181 



That's why I won't believe in sorcerers until I 

will not prove their existence. 

   If someone can prove my ego to me, bring 

more reasonable and serious arguments than mine, it is not 

doubt, I will not tell him: "Oh, monsieur, you are the one I 

waited. I renounce my views and accept you 

shi!" Otherwise, as if the dodger took over on a ^ 

a fool if he thought the same thing that a fool thinks? 

He must be able to handle the crowd by doing 

at the same time, a view that is inferior to the feelings of the majority, dub\u003e 

do not resist the general mood. On the contrary, filo 

Soph should form an idea about the layman, 

but do not judge as an inhabitant. I'm not that reckless 

so that, having got rid of the tyranny and authority of others, neo 

reasonably set your own. That's why me and 

I report the motives that prompted me to talk about the graft 

denia, and to get rid of this chimera, it is necessary 

much to pay attention to. 

   First of all, in all the stories told by MNG 

about sorcerers, it is alarming that their action is usually 

takes place three or four hundred leagues from the given place 

ness. I suspect that this remoteness of the races 

designed to beat off the desire and the possible ™ 

verify the authenticity of what is said. Add b 

this is that a gang of people, dressed as cats, find 

in the middle of the field, where, of course, there is no 

details. The faith of some one old woman in such 

an extraordinary occurrence should cause suspicion 

vision, because in the countryside it is easy to cheat 

kov is much easier. She is poor - need made her 

lie for the sake of money, she is old - age has clouded her race 

Sudok, over the years she becomes talkative - and here she is 

invents this tale in order to engage his colleagues in conversation 

rider, eyesight weakens with age - and now she takes 

waving a hare for a cat, the years make her timid - and now 

she saw fifty people instead of one. 

   Let's take a look at these wizards. You will see 

a rude dork who lacks the intelligence to unravel the 

a thread shaking him, in which the magnitude of the danger of killing 

gives the ability to think, which cannot justify- 

Xia, who does not even dare to answer the proper 

way for fear that the devil speaks with his mouth. But 

it turns out that if he does not say a word, then each 

the smoke cries out that he has been caught by his conscience, and he is immediately 

they are thrown into the fire. But is it really the devil who 

182 



de could turn into a cat, so stupid that now he can't 

turn him into a fly to enable him to fly 

aunt? But oh, they say, the fact is that sorcerers, barely 

fall into the hands of justice, immediately forfeit all 

witch power. Oh, I swear on my honor! This is a lovely do- 

water. It turns out that the meter Jean Guyot, having acquired the 

judge for twenty thousand ecu, and acquires power 

over the devil. Truly, the devil is experiencing great 

respect for scammers! 

    I also noticed that all these wizards tend to 

to be low and low like Diogenes 1 0 . Oh my God! Is it possible to, 

so that a person who has already doomed himself to the eternal torments of hell, 

I would also like to live in poverty, hunger, constantly 

fearing at the same time to be erected on a fire on the go- 

native square in front of the entire population? To oh- 

for the sake of the unfortunate from justice, Satan had to 

                             11 

give him not oak leaves, but pistols to buy dollars 

values. However, you see that so far the demons have 

were so stupid that they could not think of such 

tricks. And why do you condemn the poor shepherd, who 

who was recently imprisoned and burned to death? Behind 

the fact that he was convicted of reciting the prayer "Father 

ours" in relation to the wolf. Ha! Forgive him that he 

it repeats endlessly, see this as complete nonsense, 

besides, more harmless than wearing amulets and 

ra in their strength, for which, however, no one has yet been burned. 

It is to azn and whether, they say, also for the fact that he, allegedly, is about 

gave the herd, doing it either with the help of spells n an and y, then 

or with the help of the secret properties of some poisons. I don't 

I think that the twenty-four letters of the alphabet contain in 

a secret intent, and the harmful properties of the poison, when used 

which you can neither open your mouth nor squeeze 

jaws, n and move tongue to om, can either infect sheep 

plague, or cure them of their disease. You object to me 

that it could be done by virtue of a pact with the devil. I 

did not meet in the chronology of the date when he concluded an agreement 

a thief with humanity, according to which, when pronouncing an op- 

certain words stipulated in the agreement, he must 

destroy people and cattle, and when pronouncing other 

to heal. 

    Perhaps you agree with me that witchcraft 

words do not have any power, and all wizards, pro- 

by wearing them out, they actually use the poisonous properties 

V 

  and herbs, which infect livestock. In this case, 

why not burn them like poisoners, and not like kol- 

                                                          183 



dunov? They admit (you object) that they were 

the Sabbath and called upon the demons to take possession of the bodies of some 

people who are truly possessed. What 

As for traveling to Shabash, I am convinced that 

ointments used by them for rubbing the body even in 

                                                            12 

waking time, just cause I'm visible 

when they feel like they're flying on a broom through 

pipe and arrive where they should feast, dance 

wat, make love and kiss the asshole 

These visions struck their imagination so strongly 

that even such details as a broom sandwiched between the legs 

the field over which they flew, the goat, the feast, the ladies, 

seen in a dream, perceived by them after waking up 

denia to ak real things and. 

    As for the possessed, I will tell you my 

opinion with the same frankness. First, among 

there are ten thousand wives for one man 

sh i n . Is the devil really so oh depraved ik what with so im 

eagerly seeks connection with women? No, 

it's not, but I figured out the reasons for y. W omen — more 

gullible and impudent than men and, therefore, 

nature is more prone to pretense. She immediately 

thinks of itself beyond measure, it is only necessary for her to start 

torturing oneself Latino, grimacing, jumping, taking 

May various shameless poses. When will the deception 

discovered, they will hope that these quirks 

they will attribute some suffocation to the uterus and and, but a thin ko- 

nets, forgive to ak ailment of the genital organs. you may 

be, object that such a deceit has nothing 

in common with those who are truly possessed. 

    Let us dwell on this and, without offending the views of the custom 

tellers, let's say that the possessed existed as before 

yeah, so it is now. I have no doubt at all that they 

have existed before, for Holy Scripture assures 

that the Chaldean soothsayers through the art of witchcraft 

you drove the demon into the dead body of the prophet Samuel, and he 

spoke; David conjured by playing the Sa harp 

ula, who eventually became obsessed, and our savior, 

And Jesus Christ cast out demons from the Jews, driving them into 

herd of pigs 1 3 . But one must think that as soon as God 

went into the world, the power of the devil ceased. 

    That's why I don't believe in the obsessed of our days and 

I will not believe until the church orders this de- 

lat. In that case, I must believe in the possessed 

the devil penitent sinner n and k a Goffridi, nuns 

1 84 



from Loudun, a girl from Euro only because 

they dodged, grimaced and jumped. "How! They 

could only speak Latin and ! Some of the 

they even chanted quite convincingly, trying - torturing 

this yourself - repeat the phrases from the breviary after the ex- 

sorcist, reading his text with pathos. You see 

their pretense, listen to their worship 

and you will see that, not knowing Vespers, they begin 

tear your throat, you barely hear at "Gloria P at ri". 

    What I also find very amusing is that confusion 

tsu that occurs when performed by possessed 

certain orders of the exorcist. Every time for- 

the healer, pronouncing the sacred name of God, commands 

kiss the earth. The devil inside is possessed 

mogo, obeys, and everything looks very pious. 

When the order is repeated, but somewhat differently 

expressed and I x, inexperienced obsessed, not understanding 

theological tone of the bones, blushes and swears to those sa- 

for a while, until the exorcist calms him down more understandably- 

in words, after which he again continues to exhort 

nie. I have also observed this: as far as 

as the priest raised his voice, the devil intensified 

your anger, while the words might mean nothing, but 

act only because of how the exorcist 

wore - at the top of his voice or vice versa; so in their way, for- 

to the line of evil spirits terrified those present 

shch them, since the exorcist, tired of shouting, gradually 

I heard an ominous whisper. In response, obsessed or 

shouted very loudly, or it was impossible of them 

draw out a word even for a whole day. However, at- 

creativity seemed too rough to me. Yes and why 

I have to think that all this monkeying is doing 

devil, while how can a person do this 

more skillfully: bending like a wheel - I often saw this in 



    * Louis Goffridi, curate of a church near Marseč, bull 

burnt as a kochdun in 1611, with the help of a devil, to whom he 

Passed on, he was a sobchaznich 16 an even maiden, his parishioner named 

nemyu Madchen de Demandoch - Nuns from Loudun, from the monastery 

Ursulines at Loudun, on which the curate Urbain Grandier slandered 

and was sentenced to be burned in 1634 - Decho Madcheny Bovan, 

The Maidens of Euro, quite recently Mathurin Picart, curé, and his 

Tom B's accomplice, with the help of the devil, tried to charm this 

A nun and her friend from Louvier, and were burnt with her 

By the decision of the parchment of Rouen on August 24, 1647, this decho occupied 

• public opinion for five days - author's note 





                                                             185 



performed by ts y gan; jump - who can not, cro 

me paralities ty to ov; to swear - this is already common 

dom shagu. 

   If demons, as you claim, are capable of doing 

probable, let them convince us of this. Let them go 

will renovate the towers and the Cathedral of Our Lady of Paris in Saint-De 

nor will they dance the Spanish sarabande. Then 

we will believe. 

    They say that the devil is a terrible foul-mouthed man, but he 

when he did not incite the possessed to slander about the other; 

friend. On the contrary, they had mutual respectzyxwvuts\ 

could not have done otherwise, since the first one was offended 

naya n arush and la would tai n u. Why, reverend father, 

your court does not consider the atrocities that he does 

devil? The devil (you say) is the father of lies. Why don't 

days a sorcerer was burned and just for the fact that he was on 

called the devil? Because, I answer, imitating everyone, 

the devil is the father of lies. Confess, confess, my pre 

IMPROVE THAT THE DEVIL SAYS TRUE OR FALSE PS/ 

as far as your cunning pleases. Oh, oh God, i 

I shudder at the sight of how this devil is thrown i 

holy water 1 4 ; Is it really such a holy thing 

he can't bear it without horror? I'm totally surprised 

How, then, did he dare to enter the human 

the body that God created in his own image, God, the way 

able to see from an unattainable height, recognizing his real 

benka thanks to the rebirth acquired by baptism 

niyu, denoting the temple of the Holy Spirit with oil and daroch 

wounding of the holy relics. How is he, the devil, let's go, 

enter this place, more holy than the water, over which 

swarm just say a few prayers? However, at 

there is a good result - I mean obsessed 

unusually berserk at the sight of the floor 

the cross carried to him. Oh monsieur exorcist, you are incomparable 

us1 However, do you know that in nature there is nothing 

whatever has no cross, since everything has length and breadth 

Well. So, the cross you hold is in essence HI 

cross, and ebony; and the other one is not a cross, but a silver 

ro. However, both of them are crosses, because they do not 

cut length and width and ri n and. And so if this obsession 

my already has a hundred thousand lengths and a hundred thousand latitudes, 

constituting crosses, then why are they presented to him but 

you? However, we see a woman who takes 

puts on a puzzled look when more is brought to her lips( 

one cross. What a deception! No matter how much you sentence 



18b 



Valiate those possessed to the test of water, to the daily hundred 

lashes, it cannot be cured and it will never stop 

to rattling. 

   This does not mean at all that I doubt the power 

Creator and do not recognize the authority of the Church, but all 

these great magical deeds I would call stupid 

chatter or cr ed o 1 5 those who believe too strongly. 

   I notice that my letter is a bit long, 

however, this is indeed the question that prompted 

me to carefully finish this sketch. Du- 

May, however, that you will excuse such importunity 

a man who vowed to be yours until death 

root servant, monsieur. 



                                                  1 

       STATES AND I M P E R I AND THE SUN . 

                  (fragments) 



    Finally, our ship appeared in harbor and Toulon; 

first giving thanks to the winds and stars for the blessing 

successful journey, we hugged and said goodbye. IN 

I had nothing else to do with ap and tan, 

how to be content with the honor of transporting on a ship 

a man who fell from the sky, because in the lunar world 

re, where I come from, the money is calculated in fables. 

And so, nothing prevented going to Toulouse to one of the mo- 

their friends. I was burning with desire and I eat to see him, anticipating 

the joy that I will give him by telling him about my 

pri k lyuchen and i x. I won't be annoying talking about 

what happened to me along the way; I'm tired, I'm resting 

suffered from thirst, wanted to eat, and I drank and ate right to the act of those 

twenty or thirty dogs that made up a pack 

my friend. And although I did not look well, thin and 

blackened from sunburn, he still recognized me. 

    From delight he hung on my neck; trembling from ra- 

reach, kissed me more than a hundred times and carried me into his 

mock, where immediately enthusiastic tears gave way to 

words: 

    “Finally,” he exclaims, “we are alive and 

we will live, in spite of any accidents that 

rym fortune diversifies our life. Oh gods mi- 

losty! So, the rumor that you were burned in 

To Canada in a huge bonfire along with what you invented 

mechanism. After all, among those who brought me sad 

news, there were two or three credible 

                                                       I 87 



persons - they saw and touched this wooden bird 

tsu, which carried you away, and told that, unfortunately, in! 

went inside the moment they brought the fire, zyxwvuts 

                                                       and 

the speed of the rockets, burn down the fire and everything around, raised the birds ^ 

high, and those present have lost sight of you. They 

they assure you that you burned down, and in a fallen car 

you find only a small pile of ashes. 

    “This ashes, monsieur,” I answered him, “were 

mechanism, for the fire did not harm me in the least. Furs 

the nism was attached to the outside, as a result of which the heat sh 

could bother me. 

    So know that as soon as the saltpeter is over 

the lift of the rockets no longer supported the machines 

Well, she fell to the ground. I saw how she fell, s 

I was going to fly somersault with her, but I was 

extremely surprised, feeling that I was going up to L \\ 

Not. Nevertheless, it is necessary to explain the reason that everything is 

miraculously they didn't. 

    On the day of the incident, I rubbed my bruised 

part of the body by the bone marrow, so that when they say 

the box rose above the clouds, then moon a, being n, 

damage, greedily sucked in the substance that had soaked my 

flesh, and the body obeyed this attraction. Assure 

you, she continued to attract me until heh, by 

ka i, nak he ets, did not land in the world that shi 

called Luna. 

    Then I explained all the circumstances in great detail. 

trips; M. de K o li n I k, admiring heard 

nym, begged me to write about such extraordinary 

things, I resisted for a long time, fearing visits, 

which may follow after the publication of this 

works, because I love peace. He reproached me 

inattention to his requests. And I, ashamed 

n y, at last, decided to follow his advice. 

    And so I took the pen in my hands, and when I finished the notebook 

he, passionately desiring my glory (she did not give him 

more peace than his own), went to Toulouse\ 

present this work in the most sought after collections 

I. The praise of one of the most educated people in his 

his time made me famous. Already engravers, 

who have never seen me, cut out my image 

nie; the city at every intersection roared with hoarse 

sips, calling out: “Here is a portrait of the author of“ States and 

empires of the moon "1" Among the people who read my book, 

there were many ignoramuses who only poured it 



188 



froze. They applauded, like the others, imitating 

highly educated minds, and zealous in cotton 

panyi after each word, so as not to get into a mess, 

and in places they did not understand at all, they joyfully exclaimed - 

Lee: “What a charm!” But the herd mentality interferes with health 

sense; all of them without a shred of their remorse 

rather prefer to abandon the reputation of a philosopher 

(just as unsuitable for them, as well as poorly sewn clothes) 

yes), rather than oppose conventional wisdom. 

    And here is the reverse side of the coin in relation to 

those to whom praises are sung. It turns out that the essay 

which was given such importance, according to others 

readers, no more than a mixture of ridiculous stories, a bunch 

incoherent fairy tales for lulling children, like "Os- 

line sh to ura "; it is clear that the author has gone mad. 

    Divergence in views increased fame. Not- 

much later handwritten copies were being sold 

               2 

from under the floor; and everything from the nobles to the monk and even 

wives and nys, bought this essay. Judgments were 

are so different, and the passions are so intensified that 

Each family and the whole city were divided into two groups: lu- 

natyan and anti lun atya n. 

    It came to shootings; one morning I 

I saw how nine entered the bedroom of M. de K olin 

or ten bearded men in long dresses x 3 and said 

him: "Monsieur, you know that there is not one among us, 

who would not be your and m ally, relative or 

friend. Therefore, everything shameful that happened to 

you, casts a shadow on us. We know from reliable 

the faces that you hide in your sorcerer's castle." 

    — Damn it! exclaimed M.deKolinya. - Oh Gods! 

Call me and me, and I will give him into your hands and. But we have to 

beware, for it may turn out to be slander. 

    — Monsieur! interrupted one of the most respected 

nyh. — Is there any other parla- 

cop, versed in sorcerers better than ours? My 

dear nephew n and k, we will no longer keep you in 

notoriety: the sorcerer we accuse is the author 

"States and empires of the Moon"; he can't deny 

of what is the greatest magician in Europe and 

admits it himself. How did he climb Lung Wu? AND . nako- 

man, tell me, what was he doing on the moon? 

    - What a question! interrupted another. - — He co- 

was going to participate in the Sabbath, which, perhaps, 

stood there that day; in fact, you see that 

                                                      1 8h 



he had communion with a demon. Is it worth it after this surprise 

lie to him that the devil brought him into this world? 

There are so many moons and air travel that 

speaking between us (with these words he leaned towards 

his very ear), I have never seen sorcerers, not 

dealing with the moon. 

     After these good advice, they fell silent. M.de Koli 

n I to , stunned by their general folly, not MOI 

say not a word. The venerable dumbass spoke up 

that silent one: 

     — We know what makes you silent; sorcerer - 

the person you love but don't be afraid of anything, 

just hand it over to us and; out of respect for you all 

it will be decent; we, out of love for you, swear 

it is our honor to burn it without scandal. 

     After these words, M.de Kolinyak, who propped up his sides 

to ulak ami, could not restrain himself; laughter that shook him 

body, offended visitors a good deal; for each item 

to their solemn speech he answered only ha-a-a-a and 

ho-o-o-o; they retired greatly indignant, but did not 

very ashamed, for their shame is already on the way to Tu 

the hole dissipated. By the time they left, I dragged and l M.de K o 

I went to the office, closed the door and said: 

     - A shame! These ambassadors with long hair look like 

n and tailed comets; afraid that noise mind they 

raise, it will be more dangerous for me than thunder and lightning. About 

blame is ridiculous and is the result of their stupidity; And 

I will not stay alive from the fact that, seeing how I am under 

frying, someone will say that my judges are fools; 

then there are no more arguments in favor of my innocence 

I will not be resurrected; my lifeless ashes will be 

mow in a tomb or in a landfill. That's why me 

seduces the thought of leaving in this province only barely 

the days of your stay; but to die for what I myself 

I don’t believe in apelk, it’s doubly stupid. 

     M. de Kolinyak barely waited for the end of Comrade's monologue. 

began to make fun of my fears; but wow 

maiden that I take everything seriously, exclaimed with 

frightened look: 

     - Damn it! No one will even touch the edge 

your clothes while I, my friends, servants and all those kts 

 respects me, they will not die first. My house is impossible 

 but capture without n w to and ; it is very well located 

 and well fortified. Oh I'm not crazy to bo 

 swarm with paper thunder. 

140 



   - He is sometimes more dangerous than the thunder of heaven, - 

I objected. 

   From that time on, we talked only about pleasant things; 

hunted, took walks, received guests and 

paid visits; but always any entertainment we os- 

tavlyali before it had time to bother us. 

   Marquis de Cuussan, M. de C olinya's neighbor, well-known 

by his good deeds, used to accompany us; 

to prolong our and friendly meetings, we took a walk 

came from Kolya to Kyussan and back. These harmless 

private pleasures constituted a smaller part of leisure; 

they could not replace what the mind finds in the search 

yah and conversations; our society attracted many 

scientists. We combined reading with conversation; conversation with a good 

table, fishing, hunting or walking; 

in a word, we enjoyed ourselves and all that 

created by nature for our pleasures, limited 

waving the latter with your mind. 

   Meanwhile, my popularity, interfering with rest, 

spread to surrounding villages and even towns 

ladies of the province. Under the pretext of seeing the lord, everything 

wanted to see the sorcerer. By the time I left 

castle, not only children and women, but also men 

grew on me like a beast, especially the pastor from 

K olin yak, which is either cunning, or in depth 

to whom ignorance was my most sworn enemy. 

Under simplicity, he concealed malice and vindictiveness in his soul, 

in terms of slander, he could surpass any Norman, 

and his love of slander has grown into his main passion. 

He hated the lord because of impotence; venturing with him 

long litigation, he was afraid of revenge and in order to avoid it 

set out to exchange benefitsy 4 . Oh then changed 

his intentions or only postponed them, deciding to apply 

sti blow M.de K o li n i k u, using my and my name; however 

no matter how he disguised his plans, but his frequent 

trips to Toulouse aroused suspicion. He told 

a thousand ridiculous stories about my magics; voice 

this evil man, joining the choir of simpletons 

and 

  ignorant, brought curses on my name. 

                                             5 

   They talked about me as about the new Agrippa; due to pro- 

the cure's lawsuits were all against me. About it 

we were warned by people close to M. de Kolin yak and 

marquise; the rough manners of this paradise surprised us and 

settled, but I was secretly frightened, thinking over the most 

likely consequences of such delusions. 

                                                     1')] 



This fear was no doubt inspired by a good genius, oi 

enlightened my mind so that I could see the abyss where I was aiming. 

wanted to collide; but, content with the silent owl 

that he decided to warn more tangibly. 

    On one of the most restless nights that 

or followed one of the pr and i n it x days, 

money in Kolya, I got up with the dawn, and in order to scatter, 

anxiety, clouded my mind, went out into the garden, 

where greenery, flowers and fruits created by people and nature 

doi, enchanted the soul and look; immediately I notice., 

mark isa, thoughtfully strolling alone ps 

a large alley dividing the flower garden into two equal hours 

ty. I was quite surprised to see him against his usual 

n ia so early o; it made me quicken my pace to- 

find out the reason for waking up so early. He me with 

talked about unpleasant dreams that tormented him and forced 

to get up much earlier than usual; evil done 

darkness, he wanted to disperse with light. I told him and 

own anxieties, hinder avsh and x me to sleep. And lie t' 

the details failed - we noticed M. de Colinya, 

walking with long strides along the fence. More published! 

he exclaimed: 

   You see a man who has just 

lived the most terrible vision that could cloud the race 

doc. Having put on an amzol, I went down to tell the shaft; 

about it; but you were not in the room. Then I ran out into 

garden, guessing that you are here. 

   The unfortunate count was really beside himself. edv, 

he calmed down a little, as we begged him to be free 

get rid of the heaviness of the heart. 

   Arbor from jasmine and very conveniently provided 

us shelter and coolness; we entered it and unforced 

daytime settled down; M. de Kolin yak continued: 

   - Twice or thrice at night I dreamed that I 

absurdities: he took the dawn for twilight, he dreamed, 

as if a dear guest stood between the marquis and me, m> 

he was hugged tightly. Suddenly there was a huge black! 

a multi-headed monster that wanted to snatch it from us. I 

I even think that it was going to throw the guest into the fire 

a bonfire nearby; it has already rocked him to,, 

flame, but one of the girls, like Muse, th' 

is called E patient 6, threw herself on her knees in front of her th 

pozhoy, begging for salvation (this lady had an external ve; 

and attributes that serve our artists for; 

images of nature). Barely mistress listened to npocv 

192 



would be served to and, as the last one with the exclamation: "uwp jt o 

one of my friends!" - brought to her mouth something like 

sarbak an a 7 and so dun ula under the feet of my dear guest, 

that threw him to the sky and thereby protected and tyla from the gesture 

currents of a hundred-headed monster. I, as it seems to me, must 

I shouted after him, begging him not to fly away without me. Then 

a lot of plump angels, who called xia 

children of the dawn, raised me to that country, to which, it seems, 

elk, he flew away, and where I saw the most ridiculous things and. about them I 

I'm not going to tell. 

   We uppash and wali for a long time, and he said: 

   - I assumed that I was in the Sun, and that 

The sun is m and r. From this delusion I will save me 

fork neighing horse adi, driving away sleep; waking up, I 

found myself lying in my bed. 

   When M. de K ol n I had finished reading, Mark I asked: 

   - Monsieur Dirk, how was your dream? 

   “My dream,” he answered, “is the most ordinary 

and nothing remarkable. Ever since I exist 

I constantly dream of caves and fire. The reason is simple - 

I am both choleric and melanic holy by 8. 

   In my youth, in a dream, I easily rose under the cloud 

ka, in order to avoid the fury of the crowd of murderers, chasing 

Shih me; after desperate efforts, I managed to 

overcome many obstacles, but always came across 

some wall, and I was not able to get over it 

forces. It seemed that I was rushing straight up and already 

I wave my arms for a long time in the sky, but still 

the land was near; contrary to common sense, I do not feel 

spared neither fatigue nor his heaviness; to my enemies 

was it enough to stretch out your hands to grab 

by the leg and pull me to the ground. Ever since I 

I remember myself, do I have such dreams, except for 

this night. As usual, flying for a long time, I 

once avoided his pursuers and, finally, 

lost sight of them. In the clear and bright of the illuminated sky I am, 

incorporeal, flew in the direction of the palace, radiating 

Shem warmly and light. Without a doubt, I would like to distinguish 

chil and another: but, flying in a dream, I moved to the edge 

bed and fell between the bed and the wall; frightened- 

ny, with bulging eyes, I looked at the naked 

belly, and smeared with whitewash. Here, monsieur, a dream 

whose development, I think, was influenced by the features of my 

character; it differs from their former dreams only in that. 

that I flew in the sky and did not fall. After all, our 

                                                       ( ) 

7- 3400                                               1 * 



knowledge about dreams is very vague, about many things 

going to make guesses. 

    - I confess, - Cussan picked up, - you are right, 

it is a mixture of all those thoughts that dawned on us, 

while we were awake, a monstrous chimera; connect- 

the existence of vague fantasies that are not controlled by the mind; topics 

no less we consider it full of true 

meaning and consider dreams to ak oracles, predicted 

bodies of the future; to tell you the truth, dreams are the same as 

orak uly, usually p he I tn s. According to me nothing 

outstanding sleep, the rest are also worthless. To me 

I dreamed that I was very sad and met everywhere 

Dirk is calling to us. H about not tiring more 

Sudok florid explanation of all sorts of dark enigmas 

doc, I will reveal to you in a nutshell their true meaning. 

Since in Kolya one does not have too bad dreams, 

I can assume that in Kyussan we will feel better. 

    “So let’s go there,” said the count, “since 

everything here is so disturbing to us. 

    We decided to leave on the same day. I persuaded 

friends to leave before me, for I was glad of the occasion 

send a few kn and g there. They agreed and 

right after breakfast we set off. 

    In the meantime, I was packing books and gi, which, as 

it seemed to me that Kyussan was missing in the library, 

loaded them onto a mule and set out about three o'clock on a 

frisky trotter. However, the library required attention 

ra, at the same time I wanted to admire the surroundings 

nature, and I had to walk to om. P from about- 

a funny adventure happened. 

    Having crossed four leagues, I found myself in a place that 

which, no doubt, was a sign of Om to me. This landscape 

excited the imagination; I strained my memory and remembered 

that it was this area that I dreamed of in the past 

at night. Such a coincidence would take a long time 

me, if not for a strange vision. In the middle of the road 

a ghost appeared (at least I mistook him for that 

kovogo) and grabbed my horse by the reins. He was huge 

tall and it is impossible to understand - handsome or ugly, so 

to ak a long dress sewn from scrolls for the church 

p en and i, hid his figure; face was hidden 

                                    9 

a piece of paper with the inscription "At the beginning ...". 

    - Devil! Satan! exclaimed the ghost in horror, 

I close you in the name of the almighty God... 

1 94 



   At these words he stammered, repeating in bewilderment: 

"Almighty God," he searched in vain for a shepherd, 

so that he prompted him to continue; out of fear he 

trembled violently, which caused half of the teeth to fall out, and the pain 

most of the ukry of yours and its countries of eggs curled up in papillo- 

otk i. Nevertheless, he turned to me; in his empty 

eyes, I noticed doubt: he did not know whether to be angry or 

turn down the heat: 

   “Well, well,” he said. — Do I call you by my name? 

German God and Monsieur Jean om - do not prevent me from acting; 

if you move your leg or hand, damn it, I 

I will gut you. 

   I tried to pull the reins out of him, but bursting 

sh y me I laughed at the strength. At this time, about half a 

no villagers appeared from behind the fence, - 

                                                             10 

standing on his knees, he and, tearing up, sang L and tan and yu. 

The four strongest men approached, and, 

having washed his hands and in the ashtray, which was held by a servant from the house 

ma pastor, they grabbed me by the collar. Here 

monsignor Jean curled up, he tore off his bishop and trachil 1 1 and with it 

I have bound my hands and feet; then noisy crowd 

women and children, despite my protests, zash and la me- 

I was wrapped in a huge tablecloth - deftly wrapped, barely visible 

lol head! In this form, they carried it to Toulouse. One Cri- 

I thought that if they didn’t tie me up, then I would put a spell on 

fields, and famine would await everyone; another complained about 

sheep pox, which attacked the flock after one wax 

sweet evening when I patted him on the shoulder. N o not look- 

rya on these malices, one circumstance brought me 

to laughter - k ri k young k peasant k i, k ri k , full 

horror for his wives and ha (this is him in the form of a ghost from- 

took my horn from me, sat down on it and already as his friend 

spurred with all his might): 

   "Unfortunate one," the driver shouted piercingly. 

beloved, are you blind? Don't you see that 

the horse is a sorcerer and blacker than coal? It's the devil himself, who 

ry will take you to our shabash. 

   A man fell off his horse in horror, and she immediately 

usk gets white. 

   They consulted and decided either to take a mule; raspotro- 

sewed a bale and opened the first book that turned up - 

"Physics" by Decart 1 2 ; noticing the circles with which this fi- 

the philosopher noted the movement of each planet, all in one 

los yelled that Beelzebub 13 was allegedly called up by this. 

The holder of the book threw it away with fright; Unfortunately, 

7* 

                                                            Q5 



falling, she opened up on a page explaining to her 

properties of magnet and ta; it was here that the movement was shown 

magnetization of the smallest and smallest metal bodies, depicted 

female in the form of hands. Noticing this, one of the contemptible 

groaned, declaring that this is exactly the toad found in 

a ladle in the pot of his cousin, because of which his horse 

died 1 4 . After these words, even the most impatient 

folded their hands over their chests or put them in their pockets. 

Monsignor Jean hysterically warned of dangers and 

did not advise touching anything, they say, all these 

kn and gi are witches, and the mule is the devil. The rabble got scared and 

left the mule alone. However, I saw how M atyurin, 

servant to Monsieur Cure, drove the animal to the barn of the house of the saint 

the puppy, fearing that it would wander into the cemetery 

and did not desecrate the grave. 

     At seven o'clock in the evening we arrived in the city and 

drag and go to jail. As soon as the jailer left me 

into this gloomy cave, I said: 

     - If you give this shell of stone as 

dresses, then it is too wide and rock; if this is a grave 

then it is too narrow. Here we can only count 

chi; Of my five senses, I will have two, smell and 

touch: one to inhale prison stench, 

another to drop her. I confess, I was thinking 

that I am in hell, do not know for sure that 

they don't let innocent people in there. 

     On the word "innocent" my jailer and to the exuberant 

lurked: 

     “By my honour, you are one of our people. guilty 

don't get here! 

     After such a compliment, the kind man promptly me 

ransacked. His efforts were in vain, since 

meeting with a ghost, I put gold in my pants: and 

just as I almost died of fear, he barely 

did not die of grief, having found nothing during the search. 

     - A! Damn it! cried the prisoner, foaming at the mouth. 

shchik, - from the very beginning I understood that this was a sorcerer! B eden, 

oh the devil! Okay, think about your conscience until tomorrow. 

    He jangled a bunch of keys, looking for the one he needed. 

my camera. Wanting to appease him, I quickly pulled out 

struck three pistoles and said: 

     - Mr. pri vratn and to, here is one pistol; I did not eat 

eleven o'clock, I beg you to bring a piece of bread. 

196 



    He politely accepted the coin and assured me that he was sympathetic. 

vues my plight. I understood - ser- 

his cheek softened, and continued: 

    “And here’s another one for the trouble you 

delivered. 

    He was all out and man and e; passing the third coin, I 

begged to send one of his assistants to 

companies - prisoners are most afraid of being alone 

celebrations. 

    Touched by my generosity, the jailer promised 

to satisfy requests, to ritik oval existing 

horses, assuring that I immediately understood - I have enemies, 

but I will certainly restore my honor, he through 

three days I will wash my cuffs and . I am very cordial 

thanked him for his courtesy; hugging me- 

I x, a new friend locked the door with two bolts. 

    In deep melancholy, I lay on a pile of shallow solo- 

we, along which we ran to the lynxes. Vault, walls and ceiling 

armed with six tombstones, as if in edification 

about death and that I have no doubt about my burial. 

Whether cold worms and toads crawled over my face, 

don imali vsh and . I think I missed my wife and 

                                             15 

a broken pot to a, to resemble I about a. 

    Two hours later, the rattle of a large key and the 

The pores of the door distracted me from these woeful thoughts. 

By the light of the lamp, I noticed a mighty man. He in- 

put the bowl between his legs and said: 

    - Hey, there, do not worry, here is the soup from apusta. They say, 

not a single apellet or fat was fished out of it. 

    He put his hand in the bowl, inviting me too. 

do the same thing. I followed his example, not 

barking to annoy the merry fellow. Laughing, he exclaimed: 

    - You're a good guy! They say you have envy 

nicks? Traitors! Let them just come! 

    Seeing this innocence, I could hardly contain my laughter. Fate, 

seems to give la in the face of this despicable opportunity 

to get free, so it was important not to lose him well- 

me. I didn’t have to choose, - 

the architect who built the prison made several entrances 

Dov and forgot to break through at least one exit. All these thoughts 

wives made me check the jailer: 

    You are poor, my friend, aren't you? 

    “Alas, monsieur,” said the dork. 

    “Hold it,” I said, “this is a pistol. 

                                                    197 



     I put the pistol in my hand; it trembled so much that 

he barely closed it. This start seemed silly to me. 

p redzn amen ovan and em; no p y lk i e gratitude persuasion- 

li - the dork trembled with joy; then I continued: 

     - If you could help me realize one plan, 

then 20 pistoles (in addition to saving the soul) would probably 

and yours. Know, a quarter of an hour before your arrival, 

an angel appeared before me and promised to tell the truth about 

my business, would I say mass tomorrow for a big 

altar in the city's cathedral. I explained that I could not 

go out, but he promised to send a man through the jailer 

century, which will accompany me. He's had enough 

order to escort me to church and back to prison; 

he must submit without objection under pain of not- 

repulsive and quick death; his possible doubt i 

I will scatter the signs that are so dear to him, for he is a fellow monk. 

     For the reader I will inform you: through the hole of the dork's shirt 

flashed monastic clothes. She prompted me 

nya to fiction: 

     “Of course, my good señor,” he said, “I 

I will do the will of the angel. But you have to wait nine o'clock 

at this time our host will be in Toulouse for his son's engagement 

with the executioner's daughter. They say the daughter's dowry is enough 

for vyk upa king, get him captured. How he is, she is beautiful 

siva, but neither one nor the other will go to the poor young man. 

Alas, my good sir, you must know... 

     At this point I interrupted the flow of chatter. We carefully 

thought carefully about the plan of action, and the dork said goodbye. 

     The next day, at the appointed hour, he came 

Behind me. I changed into rags - we agreed on this 

stole in ak an un e. As soon as we were in the wild, 

I counted out the promised twenty pistoles. He 

looked at them with greed and surprise. 

     I swear they're gold and heavy. 

     “Eh, monsieur,” he answered, “that is not what I am thinking about. 

After all, the house of the elder Mase is being sold together with the land and 

wine cellar. I would have drunk him for twenty francs; 

to complete the transaction, you need a week. My kind 

sir, I want to ask if it's yours and in- 

la, make sure that prior to the transaction senior 

Mase kept yours and pistols in his chest, without turning 

they hide there in oak l and with tya 1 6 . 

     The naivety of this swindler made me laugh. One- 

but soon we came to the church. After some 

the solemn mass began; seeing that my 

1 98 



the security guard got up from his seat to make a donation 

niya, in three jumps I jumped out to the middle of the temple, and 

then quickly got lost in a distant street. In this mo- 

ment I was overwhelmed by various thoughts, and I followed one 

noah: to get to Toulouse, which was Pollier, and 

settle there. Pretty soon I reached the suburbs; 

I was embarrassed by the gaze of passers-by. At- 

the cause of their surprise was my outfit, for in a 

dew of poverty, I was ignorant, posture and gait were not 

combined with clothes, I looked in rags of the country 

but, more like a dressed-up man than a poor man. 

   Finally, I overcame shame, realizing that the universal 

vn immanie threatened with dangerous consequences. Noticing 

someone's gaze, I immediately held out my hand, begging for 

mercy. But often instead of following 

warnings of Fate, we ignore them, annoyed 

eating this pride! This conclusion led me to 

the event that followed; noticing standing towards me 

the back of a man, according to the clothes of a middle-class city dweller 

stat, I turn to him: 

    “Monsieur, if compassion can touch... 

   Before I had time to say the next word, how this man 

The catcher turned his head. Oh my God! This was my jailer. 

We were shocked by the meeting. He ate my eyes 

mi; I looked at him carefully. Nak he ets, general in- 

interest, although too different, brought us out of the 

opinion. 

    “Oh, how unfortunate I am,” cried the jailer, “ 

have I been tricked? 

    This exclamation led me to the idea of cheating: 

    - Hey! Help, gentlemen, help justice! — 

I shouted, turning into a squeal. This thief stole the dragon 

the value of the Comte iny de Musso; I've been looking for it for a year now. State 

yes, - I continued, more and more excited, - a hundred 

pistols to whoever arrests him! 

    As soon as I said this, a pack of scoundrels attacked 

on the jailer ik a. And the astonishment caused by my extreme 

tea impudence, he was so struck that for a long time 

he was in a state of shock, for I could not, like 

to the deity, be saved by penetrating the walls of the prison, 

without destroying them. Finally, the unfortunate man came to his senses and, 

Wishing to lead the crowd out of error, he began to convince 

to give everyone that he is a very respected person. However 

a dozen greengrocers, footmen and porters, and 

barking to serve them for my money, shut his mouth, 

                                                     199 



giving in the teeth; besides, they imagined that 

will be tantamount to insults, - everyone ran up to, 

to kick or punch him. 

    - Look at the respected man! - evil- 

fork this rabble. And he dares to speak like that after 

How was he identified by the master who caught him! 

    The most amusing thing was that the jailer, dressed 

festively, ashamed to admit that he was 

matchmaker of the executioner and returns from the engagement, fearing 

be beaten even more if they find out about it. 

    Running away in the middle of a fight and leaving his spa 

my feet, soon I found freedom. Oh, unfortunately 

the glances directed in my direction again caused 

previous concerns. Any onlooker could single me out 

crowds of hungry people, it seemed that I had written on my forehead 

but here is an escaped convict. When the person took out 

hand from his coat, he introduced himself as a sergeant, collecting 

We are going to arrest me. Even indifferent passers-by 

I convinced myself, pretend, and ready to pounce on 

me from behind. When I saw a merchant entering the shop, then 

dying with fear: “He will now remove the halberd from the hook 

doo!” In a crowded quarter, I thought: “Here I am 

are guarding!" Having met an obstacle on the way, meditate la l: 

“They blocked the streets, they surround!” Finally, fear at all 

paralyzed my mind? each person saw arrows 

com; any word - "hold", and the slightest noise - do not 

bearable clang of prison bolts. 

    I was exhausted by human fears, I decided to ask 

schine to start to cross without suspicion the remaining 

Part of city; but for fear of being recognized by his voice, on- 

began to portray a mute. I pointed with my finger under the 

rodok, then over his mouth and, yawning, opened it with an inarticulate 

with a separate sound, making it clear that the unfortunate pro- 

sit alms. I was sympathetically patted on the 

shoulder, thrust a crust of bread into a fist; I heard how women 

sch and we whispered, they say, probably, I am a martyr for the faith 

from Turkey. The truth was revealed to me that poverty is 

a book that teaches us the morals of nations better than described 

sleigh of all the great travels of Columbus and Magellan. 

    My invention could end badly. N o k o k o o 

other tricks to resort to? Dressed in miserable and e loh- 

motya, like Harlequin, I was still not sure that I would succeed 

it’s hard to get unrecognized through such a large city 

du, to ak Toulouse, for according to the engraving with the portrait, I 

Any trader would have. 



 Ludovico Maria Sinistrari 

O demoniality and bestiality 

     incubi and succubus 





   And the head. Origin of the word "demoniality" 

      (demonology). Than it's a crime 

   differs from "bestiality" (bestiality). 

            Opinion of St. Thomas Aquinas 

   The first author who, as far as I know, invented 

                                              1 

word "demoniality", was Juan Caramüe l in his 

• Basic Theology," and no one before him, how can I 

zhetsya did not distinguish this crime from the "bestialite- 

ta." Indeed, all moralist theologians from St. Fo- 

mine at the head is understood by the name bestiali- 

theta “all kinds of carnal intercourse between a person and a 

some object of another kind or species”; it's po- 

                                       2 

long expression of St. F ohms. K ae tan in his interpretation 

vaniya on this issue includes intercourse with the devil 

scrap to the kind of "bestiality". 

   However, it is known that St. F oma, touching on this question 

grew up, had no relationship with the devil at all. Once- 

talking about sin against nature, “when a dream occurs 

dealing with an object of a different kind, which is called "bestie- 

alitet, suggests under this name a creature 

of a different kind and kind than man; so he can't 

can use the word object or subject here in general 

sense." St. Thomas wanted to define intercourse here 

human interaction with a living object of a different kind, i.e. With 

animals, and did not think at all about intercourse with the devil. 

   And so, having a relationship with the devil is demoniality, be 

is an incubus or succubus, different from bestiality and not 

represent some special kind of this 

the last one, how mistakenly thinks K ae tang, because what 

no matter what ancient writers say and Caramuel, sins 

against nature are very different. 

   This doctrine and the contrary opinion were condemned 

                               3 

dened by Pope Alexander UP because each of 

these sins has its own special ungodliness, the opposite 

chastity, and prevents the reproduction of the human race 

lovable. You can also refer to quite well-known 

new teaching of moralists, established at the "Council 

Thirty” and “Meetings of Four Twenty”, recognized 

theologians that in confession it is enough to tell about 

circumstances that determine the type of sin. 

   If demoniality and bestiality are one and the same 

But, although of a special kind, it is enough for the penitent, if 

                                                   203 



whether he had intercourse with the devil, tell his spirit 

hovnik - "I committed the sin of bestiality." 

    But this is a lie, because these two sins are not the same 

what kind. 

    Perhaps they will say that the circumstances of intercourse 

with the devil must be opened to the confessor because of the 

the corruption they inflict on religion; really- 

but, this insult occurs, whether it be from worship 

denial addressed to the devil, or from sacrifices and prayers 

n ii, addressed to him, or from an agreement concluded 

with him (St. Thomas, question 90). But oh, how will it be seen in the 

consequently, there are incubi and succubi, before which none of 

this does not apply. 

    In addition, according to the recognition of all theologians, morality 

stov, the sin of intercourse with the devil is much worse than 

a similar act committed with some animal 

tn ym. 

    But oh, in the same special kind of sin, one sin 

cannot be more severe than the other, but all are the same 

how difficult it is: it is the same thing to have intercourse with the 

lyceum, with a dog, or with a mare. 



   II chapter. Intercourse with incubi and succubi 

  is not a figment of imagination, but reality, 

       as blessed Augustine testifies 

   Having defined the difference between the words "demoniality" and "besti- 

alitet" so that you can assess the severity 

this crime and determine the punishment, which 

it deserves (which is the most important thing for us), we need 

explore how many different ways this 

sin can be committed because the devil, in the form 

incubus or succubus, connects not only with human 

com, but also with animals. According to some 

authors, all this is nothing but the fruit of an upset 

imagination. Such things, they say, meet- 

Xia in stories about witches; when haunted by the devil 

people think they are attending night gatherings 

and have carnal intercourse with the devil; on the very 

in fact, they imagine all this, as it was established 

but two cathedrals. 

   But sorcerers and witches are really present 

attend nightly gatherings and have carnal intercourse 

niya with the devil. This is the opinion of theologians and Catholic 

lawyers, set out at length in the Compendium 

204 



M aleficarum" and whether the "List of Witches" by Francesco-Maria 

Guacco. 

   Finally, to resolve this issue, we have an auto- 

the authority of Blessed Augustine, who put it this way 

(“On the city of God” Kn.15, ch.23): “Very widespread 

but the opinion that sylvans and fauns, usually called 

vayed by incubes, often disturb women sch and n. There is so - 

but the devils whom the Gauls call Duzi I mi, who 

rye indulge in such and other impure dreams. This is whistle- 

detstvoval so and m and numerous authorities- 

mi, which would be impudence to deny them”4. These are 

long expressions bl. Augustine. 



    Chapter III. Relationships with the devil sorcerers and 

       sorceresses and rites at their initiation 

    Various authors teach us, and their opinions are confirmed 

waiting for numerous examples that the devil has 

there are two ways of intercourse with men and women 

mi. The first concerns sorcerers and sorceresses, the other - 

men and women shch and n, alien to sorcery. 5 

    In the first case, the devil connects with the sorcerers and 

to oldunya mi only after the solemn agreement, in 

by which these unfortunate human creatures 

are given to him. Some authors cite judicial 

confessions of sorcerers wrested from them during the 

the flow . 6 

    These stories are collected by Francesco-Maria Guazzo. 

    Such an agreement is accompanied by 11 rites. 

    First, the subjects must enter into an agreement 

with the devil or with a sorcerer acting on his behalf 

nor, to which he and, in the presence of witnesses, acted 

fall into service. The devil, for his part, guarantees 

give them honors, riches and pleasures. 

    Secondly, they depart from the Catholic faith, os- 

are freed from obedience to God by refusing to 

Christ and the protection of the Mother of God and all the saints of the Church 

to you 

    Thirdly, they cast away the crown or rosary 

Mother of God, the rope of St. French of Assisi, 

or belt bl. Augustine, on the shoulder and to the armelite - 

according to which order they belong to; 

cross, incense and everything that the priests wear, they are top 

chut n ogami. 

                                                         205 



    Fourth, they swear obedience to the devil and 

obey the rams, express respect and obedience to him, 

putting his hand on a special black kn and gu. They oblige 

never return to the faith of Christ, 

act according to divine commandments, do nothing 

what a good deed, but obey only the devil and 

diligently attend night meetings. 

    Fifth, they promise to take care of and use everything 

efforts to recruit others into the service of the devil 

li c. 

    Sixthly, the devil gives them something like a wicked 

baptisms, forcing them to refuse their godfathers 

and mothers and from to him f and rmatsii, appointing them other re- 

receivers, whom he instructs to teach them the art 

sorcery; they are deprived of the names and that they had, and 

get a new, most often clownish nickname. 

    Seventh, they cut off part of their clothes to 

offer it to the devil as a token of respect, and he takes it away 

and saves. 

    Eighth, the devil draws a circle on the ground and hold 

puts test subjects in it in order to fix all your vows, 

which they give, as mentioned above. 

    Ninth, they ask the devil to strike them out of 

to the books of Christ and inscribe them in your own. Then is that 

the black book they touched when 

and if you submit your obedience, and the devil brings them there 

names with their claw. 

    Tenth, they promise the devil to bring 

divided time of sacrifice - every Friday for 10 days 

or at least produce every month 

killing some child or creating a soul 

murderous sorcery, and perform weekly 

other evil deeds to the detriment of mankind, namely: 

heat waves, storms, epidemics, etc. 

    One tenth, the devil marks them with some 

a sign, and especially those whose firmness seems to him 

suspicious. However, this sign is not always of the same form 

we and the species: sometimes this is an image of a hare, a paw of a toad, 

spider a, small dogs, squirrels. He puts a sign on 

more hidden parts of the body, for example, under the eyelids, on 

lips, shoulders or somewhere else. Seal 

this one is nothing but the sign of the claw of the devil. 

When all this is done, then, according to the instructions 

those who taught the subjects, these last, that- 

to prove their final appeal, they promise 

206 



despise the Eucharist 7 and especially the Virgin Mary, top- 

to thrash and vilify the sacred images, the cross 

and relics; never participate in the commission 

sacraments, not to perform sacred rites, unless 

ko for divination; do not show and hide your relationship 

sheng ia with the devil. For his part, the devil undertakes 

provide them with prompt assistance at all times; fulfill them 

wishes in this world and make them happy after 

of death. 



  Chapter IV. Tricks used by the devil 

             to get a body 

    They may ask, who is the devil who has no mother? 

al body, can have intercourse? But it is possible 

reply that he sometimes borrows a human corpse 

or forms a body for itself in other ways. If 

women will not come fantasy I get pregnant from the devil 

(which can happen only with her consent and by her own 

lan yu), then the devil previously turns into 

women sch in y (succubus) and connects with men oh, or 

causes in men some kind of voluptuous dream 

a vision during which she steals sperm from him and 

transfers her to the bosom of a woman, which gives rise to the conception 

tie. So says Guazzo, citing for reinforcement 

opinions, a lot of references and notes, mutually 

studied by various scientists. 8 

    And sometimes the devil, in the form of an incubus or succubus, is connected 

is taken from a man or a woman, not rendering - 

mi to him special respect and not bringing them to him 

sacrifices, which he usually requires from sorcerers and 

sorcerer, as it was said above. It's just 

a passionate lover who has no other purpose than 

possessing the person he loves. But this is the mass 

examples from different authors and, by the way, the story 

about M elippe Luts and and who, after a long time 

lived with one woman, wished to marry her, 

but a certain philosopher who was present at the wedding party 

ru, told Melippus that he was dealing with a kombuza, i.e. 

with the devil-succubus - and the bride immediately with a groan 

fainted. 

    Hector Boetius 9 also relates a case 

walking with a young man whom he visited 

ala for several months, despite 

tightly closed doors and windows to the rooms, devil-bitch- 

                                                      207 



captivating beauty cube; caresses and, kisses, hugs, 

prayers - he set everything in motion to persuade him 

to sin, but could not, however, overcome the virtuous 

young man. 



             V chapter. Incubi attack 

               not only for women 

   Many examples can be given about women, 

seduced by the devil-incubus, who first and 

resisted temptation, but soon bowed to it 

requests, tears and caresses and; is a crazy lover who 

Roma has to give in. And sometimes it happened when 

through some sorcerer whom the devil 

used to a to an intermediary, but often, however, he 

acted himself, as Guazzo describes it. Devil co- 

unites not only with women, but also with a mare 

mi; if they give in to his desire, he showers them with 

boots and caresses: braids the mane into pigtails, which 

then it is impossible to unweave; but if they resist 

sue, he beats them, rewards them with glanders, harms them in every way 

skis and eventually kills them, which is proven o 

life experience. 



      chapter VI. Spirits "follets" not afraid 

                    spells 

    A wonderful and almost incomprehensible thing is incubi, 

which are called in France and in Italy and follet- 

mi, and in Spain - duendes, and who do not obey 

zak li n atelya m, ne strachatsya zak li n an i j i, pri pri 

approach of sacred objects, do not show any 

slightest fright, as opposed to devils, mu- 

looking for demon-possessed ones, because no matter how stubborn these 

evil spirits, however stubborn in their unwillingness to appear 

obey the caster's orders, ordering him to 

to produce the body of the possessed - it is enough, however, to produce 

bear the Most Holy Name Jesus or the Virgin Mary, or 

a few verses of Holy Scripture, lay the re- 

whether to vie and, mainly, a particle of the tree of the Holy 

To the cross, or whether to bring the sacred images closer, which 

to immediately hear how they roar with their mouth demonically 

moreover, and see his gnashing of teeth, excitement, trembling, 

- in a word, everything is a sign of fear. N o n a follet nothing 

such a thing has no effect: if they 

stop their persecution, then only after a long 

208 



\ time and when you want to. 1 0 I was this 

 ^ personally a witness and I will tell one incredible story 

  Riyu 



             VII chapter. Interesting story 

                   gentlemen and heron ima 

     About twenty-five years ago, when I was 

 professor of theology at the monastery of St. Cross in Pavia, 

 in this city there lived a highly moral married woman 

 a woman about whom everyone who knew her, and, most importantly, 

 all at once, the monks spoke only good things. Her name was 

 And eronymous; she lived in the parish of St. Michael. Once- 

 this woman kneaded the bread, which she then entrusted 

 bake to the owner of the public oven. He brought her 

 ready-made bread and a large cake of a very strange shape 

 we, made from Venetian dough and kneaded 

 in butter, like a pie. 

    She refused to take this cake, saying that she 

 did nothing of the sort. 

     “But o,” answered the owner of the bakery, “I have a se- 

 there was no other bread but yours. Take 

 this cake; you probably have a bad memory." B uduchi 

 convinced, the good woman took the cake and ate it 

 her with her husband, three-year-old daughter and servant. Following- 

 that night, when she and her husband fell asleep, she suddenly 

 woke up from the sound of a, similar to a quiet gentle whistle, 

 who whispered in her ear very clearly: “Was there 

 delicious cake? And the frightened woman began to overshadow 

 yourself with the sign of the cross and call on the names of Jesus 

 and Virgin Mary. 

    "Don't be afraid of anything," said the voice, "I don't want to 

 evil to you; I am ready for anything, if only you would like it; I 

 captivated by your beauty and my greatest desire 

 enjoy your hugs. At the same time she 

 felt that someone kissed her on the cheek, but 

 light and gentle, as if fluff touched her 

 the thinnest cotton. She resisted, did not answer 

 tea and limiting itself to repeated repetition of the sacred 

 names and the sign of the cross. The temptation to continue 

 huddled for about half an hour, then the tempter left. Ut- 

 rom the wife went to her confessor, a man 

 sedate and intelligent, who supported her in faith and 

 Persuaded to continue courageous resistance, 

 advised to stock up on a few holy relics. 



                                                      2 0 f) 



In subsequent nights, the same temptations were repeated. 

n and I, with kisses, firmly sustained by a woman. 

Tired of these painful and lengthy 

tested by yami, she decided, on the advice of her spiritual 

to a, turn to the casters to test, w 

Is she possessed by a demon? Casters, not found in Hei 

nothing that would indicate the presence of an evil spirit, 

sanctified the house, the bedroom, the bed and ordered the incubation 

end your harassment. Oh all in vain! And sku 

the scheming continued: the cunning man pretended to be dying from 

love, p lak al, sighed to soften a woman, 

which, however, by the grace of God, remained 

poor. Then the incubus changed his ti to y: he revealed 

to the beauty in the form of a young man, extraordinary 

beauty, with golden curly hair, with white 

chicken beard, shimmering with gold, with gray-green 

eyes, hair like the color of flax, and to 

add charmed iya, in the clothes of an elegant Spaniard. He 

did not cease to appear to her, even though she found 

was in society; he, like lovers do, pla 

to al, sent her kisses, in a word, used all 

possible means of seduction to achieve her good 

inclinations. She alone saw and heard him, for 

others he remained invisible. But a good wife 

yet remained in surprising firmness; nako 

nets, a few months later, an enraged incubus with 

running to another kind of pursuit. First he stole 

she has a silver cross with holy relics and consecrated 

of the blessed pope's wax "Papal Lamb" 

Pius V, 1 1 of which she always carried with her; Then 

it is the turn of rings and other jewelry, which 

rye he stole without touching the lock and shkatulk and. Finally 

he began to beat her severely, and after each 

tea on her face, hands and body were visible traces of shock! 

and blue I to and who remained a day or two and suddenly at once \ 

disappeared, then to how the natural bruises and decrease, 

gradually. And sometimes, while she was feeding. 

breastfeeding a little daughter, he filmed the child from her with a 

flax and put it on the very edge to the rysh and or hid 

yes, but never caused her any harm. 

Then he turned the whole economy upside down, smashed 

shaft pot to and, plates and other utensils, and a moment 

restored them to their original state. One night 

when she was sleeping with her husband, the incubus appeared to her in his own room; 

normal state and strenuously begged her to give in to her 



210 



, deeds; she resisted, as always. He removed- 

 >Xia furious, but soon returned with a huge load 

  stone tiles, which the inhabitants of Genoa and Liguria 

  cover their houses. And from these stones he built her 

  around the bed such a high wall that she reached 

  the top of the canopy, and the spouses would have to take flattering 

  bow to get out of there. However, this wall 

  built without lime; destroyed it or, but to amn and folded 

  to a corner where they remained for two days, and 

  then disappeared. 

     On the day of St. Stefan's husband invited him to their house not- 

  how many of his friends, brave soldiers, and arranged in 

  honor their guests with a grand dinner. At the time when 

  custom, before sitting down at the table, they washed their hands, 

  suddenly the table disappeared, dishes, bowls, kush anya, the whole dining room 

  dishes from the kitchen, all utensils, bottles, glasses. 

  Imagine the surprise of the guests! Among them was 

  panets, kap and tan, who exclaimed: “Do not be afraid, this 

  obsession, but damn it! There was a table here, and it 

  here. Just a moment of patience and I will find him.” Having said that 

  the brave man walked around the room with outstretched forward 

  hands, trying to drop the table. Individual guests, 

  knowing that he couldn't find anything, they started laughing and went out 

  into the hallway to leave, but suddenly they heard a scary 

  noise in the dining room. They came back to find out why 

  and, running into the dining room, they saw a table filled with 

  Kosh utensils with kushanyami, which were not previously 

  lo. Near the wall stood a large sideboard with crystal, se- 

  ribbed and gold decanters and bowls, filled 

  by the Anarian, Rhine, Cretan and others 

  wines. In the kitchen there was an abundance of various dishes 

  in bowls and dishes never seen before. Not- 

  which of the guests hesitated to try first 

  these kush an and y, however, encouraged by the more daring, se- 

  whether at the table and set to dinner, which our pre- 

  sunrise. As soon as they sat down in front of the fireplace, 

  after dinner - everything disappeared at once, and an old table appeared with 

  dishes prepared by the owners; But 

  all the guests were so full that no one wanted to have dinner. 

  nay, and this proves enough that the spoofed 

  the dishes were real, not imaginary. 

     The investigation by the incubus had already been going on. 

  a few months, when the wife turned with mo- 

  Lithuania to Blessed Bernardin Feltrsky, 12 May 

  The soup of which rests in the church of St. Jacob, located - 

                                                       21 1 



is near the city. She made a vow to wear gray for a whole year. 

the cassock of the Minorites, to whose order Bla 

wife Bernardin, in the hope of his intercession 

free from the persecution of the incubus. 

    Indeed, on September 28, on the Christmas Eve of the temple 

feast of hic a st. Archangel Michael, he put on both 

that cassock, and the next day I went to church. It was about 

ten o'clock, when a large crowd was heading towards 

mass. But only the poor woman entered the porch, as 

suddenly her clothes fell to the ground and disappeared, as if 

blown by the wind, leaving her completely naked. Luckily 

Stu, among the crowd there were two elderly people who 

who, seeing what had happened, hurried to take off their 

u and to cover the nakedness of the unfortunate, and, having seated her in 

carriage, escorted home. As for clothes, uk- 

given by an incubus, she was returned only in black 

cut six months. 

   I could tell you many more stories 

more fun, but there is a limit to everything. 

   It remains to be added that, in the course of many 

years, the incubus stubbornly pursued his victim of temptation 

i mi; but, like him, being convinced of the failure of his 

effort, he was forced to leave. 

   In the above case, as in many other 

some of which you sometimes hear about, the incubus does not 

concerned religion, but only chastity. Investigator- 

but even if they yield to temptation, they do not sin fearlessly. 

                              13 

we live, but we do not restrain ourselves and eat. 



    Chapter VIII. People born from incubi 

   It has been proven by theologians and philosophers that from intercourse 

sometimes people are born with the devil; so and m zyxwvutsrqp 

                                                     same 

way, according to many scientists, will have to 

                                           15 

родится ан тихрист (B llarmin, S varets, M aluenda i 

etc.). At the same time, they notice that, quite naturally, 

for other reasons, children born from incubi usually 

very high, strong, ferocious, proud and evil. 



   Chapter IX. Incubi are not spirits, they give birth, 

  therefore, they have their own substance. 

            A few words about giants 

   However, without violating respect for such great 

scientists, I don’t understand how their opinion can stand 

reap to ri ti to u. Indeed, Alexander the Great 

'' 1 zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC 

      2 



sk ii, n aprimer, who, k ak mi upomyan uli, was born 

from an incubus, was small in stature. Further, although tsa, for- 

chat under these conditions, usually and surpass 

other people, but not always with depravity, but sometimes 

likewise with virtues, even highly moral ones, 

For example. Scipio Africanus, Augustus, philosopher 

P laton, which, according to Titus Livi I, Light- 

niya and Diogenes Laertes, were excellent people 

qualities. Likewise, we find in the Holy 

Jesus (John 6:4), who was born as a great 

we are from the intercourse of the sons of God with the daughters of men; So 

say the words of the sacred text. But about these great ans would- 

whether people of great stature, as the prophet Baruch says 

(3, 26), and in many ways surpassed other people. To ro- 

me of their enormous growth, they still differed in their 

by force, indulged in robberies and were tyrants; and these 

the crimes of the giants should be considered the first and main 

cause of the flood, according to Cornelius Lapidsko- 

go (“Comments on the Book of Genesis”). Some approved 

expect that under the name of the sons of God it is necessary to understand 

mother of the sons of Seth, and under the name of the daughters of men 

the daughters of Cain, because the first were used 

full of mercy, faith and other virtues, then 

how the children of Kai na were distinguished by all the opposite 

properties and vices; but without violating due respect 

She is married to Zlatoust, Cyril, Ilarius, and others 

admit that this is at odds with the obvious 

the meaning of the text P and san and I, since from the union above- 

of the persons mentioned were born people of monstrous growth. 

And so, it is clear that these giants did not exist before, and if 

their birth was the result of this union, then not- 

it is admissible to be able to attribute this to snoshe- 

the union of the sons of Seth with the daughters of Cain, who, being 

themselves of ordinary height, could give birth only in this way and x 

same children. 1 6 Therefore, the union from which 

beings of gigantic stature have come into being, it is necessary to 

look not like ordinary intercourse men's with 

women, but what about the incubi, who by nature 

their own can easily be called sons of God. Ta- 

What is the opinion of the Platonic philosophers and Francis-George 

ha from Venice, and it does not contradict the opinion of Andosif 

Flavius, Philo of Alexandria, Justin the Martyr, 

Limen of Alexandria and Tertullian, who 

they say that these incubi were angels in the flesh, falling into 

into the sin of voluptuousness. Indeed, how are we 



                                                      213 



we will show further, here, under the guise of a contradiction, we hide 

the same thought emerges. 

    Although, according to the general opinion, incubes and 

whether these "giants" with the help of vital energy, 

borrowed from a person, this, however, is not 

possible, and we come again to the conclusion 

knowledge that giants are not born of human seed; 

and therefore an incubus to procreate, 

consumes seed not borrowed from man. But 

What's wrong with you? 



         Chapter X N e v e v e n g e l b e s t e l s 

    A white representative of the Church, or catego- 

I declare rhytically that the incubus in his dreams with his wives 

shch and nami produces a child completely independent 

But. Many will find this statement heretical and ma 

lo reasonable, but I ask my readers not to 

condemn him so soon, because, to ak says 

T sels: 1 7 

looking comprehensively at the situation, as well as unfair 

to condemn an opinion without weighing and refuting it 

arguments." Therefore, I need to prove my conclusion 

and for this I must go into some detail 

ness. First, I base myself on an article of faith that 

there are purely spiritual creatures, having nothing 

what material th, as it was established by Late- 

                                                  18 

early council under popes I n n ok en ti and III. 

    Such are the blessed angels and condemned for eternity 

the torment of the devils. 

    True, some scientists proved even after 

Council that the spirituality of angels and devils is not established 

lena the dogma of faith, while others, going further, affirm 

whether that both angels and demons are bodily; from here 

B onaventuro Baron concluded that there would be nothing 

logical in that if attributed to angels and devils 

dual nature: physical and spiritual. I am the main 

based on the Council's formal explanation that Boi 

created everything that exists out of nothing, both spiritual and 

and bodily, angelic and earthly - I affirm that it is barely 

must acknowledge the existence of certain creatures 

then spiritual - like the angels of the highest ranks. Many- 

some theologians admit between angels so 

great difference, that some angels are pure 

spirits, therefore - of a higher nature, and others - 

214 



bodily, not so perfect and differ only from 

others with their essence, corporeal and incorporeal. This 

doctrine has the advantage of reconciling the decisions 

niya of the seventh ecumenical council 19 and the previously mentioned 

Lateran. 

    Indeed, at the meeting of the second Nicene 

Council was presented to the book of John of Thessaloniki- 

nap and sannaya against one pagan philosopher, 

where he says this: "As for the angels, the archangel- 

fishing and strength, to which I reckon our souls and, then 

The Catholic Church teaches that they are spirits, but not 

completely incorporeal, devoid of bodies and invisible essences 

Society, as you say, is a language of chn and to and. Church in 

recognizes them, on the contrary, the body is refined, created 

from air or fire, as it is said: “He made a 

hove with your angels and from the blazing fire of your 

slan n and k a "". And further: “Although they are not corporeal, like us, 

those. not composed of four elements, but nevertheless 

it cannot be said that angels, demons and souls and incorporeal 

us, because they were clothed many times 

into the body of those whom the Lord has pleased to open their eyes. 

And after reading this book in its entirety, 

before the fathers who were present at the Council, Tarasius, 

Patriarch K. Stantin of Poland, proposed it for approval 

the opinion of the Council in the following terms: “Father’s explanation 

And John proves that angels can be depicted 

emma because their shape is limited and they were 

in the form of a human figure. Why is the cathedral unanimous- 

but he answered: "Yes, O Lord." 



   Chapter XI. About the existence of rational beings, 

    similar to man and having both soul and body 

   And so, with this approval of the cathedral, the position 

nie regarding the corporality of angels, since nikei- 

the cathedral leaned towards the opinion of the Platonists, assuming 

angels who were bodily, and the Cathedral of the Lateran, on the 

borot, followed the authority of Aristotle, who defined 

in the 12th book of his Metafizik and the consistency of spirits 

incorporeal - a judgment that was a great success 

Many scientists have x. 2 0 N to reconcile the views of the two 

Cathedrals, it must be remembered that Nikeisky speaks of the body 

nom form of angels, and Lateran y - about asexual. 

   The name "angel" (Latin N untius - messenger 

nick) is not a designation of nature, but is it a kind of source 

                                                       2 1 > 



the functions they fill. Many agree with this 

Church of the Church: St. Ambrose (letters to E vr. ch. 1), St. 

And Larius (On the Trinity, 5), bl. Augustine (On the city of God, 

to n. 15, ch. 23), St. Gregory (George of Evan, ch. 34), St. 

And sidor (De Sim.Bonit., 12). And from this it follows that 

sent by God for the execution of any assignment 

n and i, whether it be a spirit or a person, can be called an- 

gel; and indeed they bear this name in St. 

Scripture, when speaking of preachers and heralds 

to ah God's will. Malachi (3, 1) gives this name 

And oanna To the baptizer: “Behold, I send my angel, and 

he will prepare the way before me.” What is this prophecy 

refers literally to John the Baptist, a witness 

                                              21 

according to the Gospel of Matthew (11, 10). 

     Even Jesus Christ Himself is called an Angel, 

since he was sent by the Father into the world to proclaim the 

con a mercy. 

     Therefore, there is nothing absurd in the fact that 

we say that some angels are corporeal, for they are called 

The name of angels also applies to people who are already without 

bodily doubts. It should be remembered that it is still not enough 

neither the essence nor the nature of things in 

world, and one cannot deny the fact only because it is not 

researched. 

     What if there is another world than the one that 

which we inhabit, and other people live in it, 

coming not from Adam, but created by God in some 

in another way (as this one is supposed by those who consider 

well inhabited), or that in the same world that we 

inhabit, there are other intelligent beings, 

me people and angelic spirits, which are usually 

invisible and do not open to people otherwise than when 

special occasions, an act of their own will or 

their own strength? All this has nothing to do with 

decisions to faith, and to know or not to know is not necessary 

to save the soul of a person in the same way < how to know the numbers 

and nature is a thing. 

     Philosophy and theology do not represent any 

anyone object to the fact that there may be creations of 

smart, gifted in spirit and body and different from humans 

century; such an objection, if it were really 

le, will be nothing more than inconsistency or 

from the side of God (which is impossible, for God is infallible 

wim), or from the side of creatures and things, which is also 

false, for these latter are either creatures 

216 



purely spiritual, like Angels, or purely material 

nym, like the inorganic world, or, finally, the spirit- 

but-material, rough, earthly-bodily, as 

Human. It is also possible to admit the existence of co- 

building and I, gifted with a reasonable spirit and physicality, 

less coarse and more refined than man. No 

doubts that, after the resurrection from the dead, souls and 

the messenger will be connected with the body of the blissful and drowned 

chen nym; from which it can be concluded that God could 

to create a rational and corporeal being, but with a body more 

tone to them, like the body of the blessed ones. 



    Chapter XII. How are these creatures different from 

                    human? 



   In order to better determine the possibility of the existence 

these creatures, we refute the arguments that 

can be brought against our conclusion, and we will answer 

questions that may be asked of us. 

    First question. Can these creatures be called 

reasonable, and, in the affirmative case, how do they differ 

teasing from a person? 

    And this can be answered that these creatures have a 

zoom and carnal organs, as well as man; however, they 

differ from it not only in a more refined nature 

doi, but also with finer matter. Indeed, human 

the age was created, as Scripture says, from the most 

former parts of the elements, then to and to these creatures, on the contrary, 

created from the purest parts of the elements: some from 

earth, others from water, still others from air, four 

the faithful are out of the fire. 

   Second question. To which epoch should the pro- 

the origin of these creatures: whether they come from the earth 

or water, like animals, quadrupeds, birds and 

etc., and whether, on the contrary, are created, like a man, by God himself 

gom? 

   And this can be explained that God, through 

angels, created their body in the same way as the human body, 

adding to it an immortal soul. Valid- 

but, because . this body is inherently more noble, 

than the body of other animals, then it befitted to him 

unite the incorporeal and noble spirit. 

   Third question. Do these creatures come from the same 

no other creature, like all people from Adam, or, on the contrary, 

several of them were created at the same time, and there are 

                                                       2 1 7 



they are like various creatures that originated from the earth 

and water? 

    Here is what you can answer to this: it is possible that they 

all come from one being, and to people - from 

Adam. They also notice that they are born and die, 

that they are divided into males and females, that they have, 

to how people, feelings and passions, that their body is fed and 

develops. But in any case, their food should not 

to be so rude, like food, required by human te- 

scrap, but nutrition should be gentle and airy. 

    As he is, he probably lives in society; have them 

there may be different conditions for merit and primacy 

wa; it is possible that they are engaged in the arts and sciences 

to ami, occupy positions, maintain an army, build 

cities and, like him, do everything that is necessary for their 

security. 



   Chapter XIII. Form and organization of language incubation 

    and succubi. Comparison with wine formation 

   The fourth question. And do these creatures have external 

human nature or some other? P constant 

whether the form and their bodies are like those of animals, and whether they are only 

tea, like a cloud or liquid substances, on- 

example, oil, water, etc.? Is their body made up 

similar to human, and from various substances: bones, 

muscles, etc. 

   But these questions I can answer, what to determine 

the shape of their body is difficult, because its composition is not amenable to 

to the control of our senses, being too subtle 

important for our physical sight and touch. 

It is possible, however, to assume that their appearance is 

good for human, but more perfect than it, because 

these entities are less material and, therefore, are 

are located on the highest degree of evolution. As far as 

essential parts of their organs, it is necessary that 

they were elastic and less tender, meeting the requirements 

organic action. Concerning Doubt 

in the extreme refinement of their bodies, I will say that 

the hardness of the parts of their organism will not be unconditional 

only in relation to other, more refined parts, 

what can be observed in all liquid dk and x bodies, but to 

example: wine, butter, milk, etc., composition difference 

which can only be found with 

chemical analysis. 



21 8 



   Thus, if we apply this natural 

rule and assume the refined corporeality of their or- 

ganism, similar to liquids, then there will be no 

hundred for the assumption of any difference, i.e. dock- 

claims against their existence, because, as 

we said, the heterogeneity of wine particles and their case- 

relations does not in the least harm the essential 

order of parts, which can be said about 

the refined body of our beings. 



     Chapter XIV. Are these creatures susceptible 

   sickness, injury and death? Are they born in 

  original sin? Are they redeemed by Jesus 

   Christ for bliss or they gravitate 

                    a curse? 



   P I you th question. Are these creatures susceptible to disease? 

yum and mutilation, like people? Do they get tired of 

bots, do they need to recuperate during 

sleep, food and drink? What is their food like? P omitted 

whether they are death and whether they can be killed by accident 

or the action of other beings? 

   But it can be said that no matter how refined 

were their bodies, they are still material, subject to 

smoldering and therefore may suffer from harmful 

strength and be sick, i.e. their bodies may refuse 

work, or will perform only with difficulty and 

completely its own functions, which is a consequence of all 

which disease. Indeed, since the matter of their body 

not so dense a, but to a human body, because it does not contain 

lives of elements mixed together, they do not suffer 

so easily from harmful forces and less susceptible to man 

diseases, why their life is longer, because 

for the more perfect a being is in its kind, the 

where it lives, of which man is the evidence, 

whose life is longer than other creatures. I don't 

I know the age-old life of crows, deer and some other 

animals about which Pliny tells us 

fables, and as for his writings, although they were published, 

but no one took the trouble to check them. From here 

it is necessary to draw the conclusion that the beings about which we 

we say, surpass man in longevity. 

   As we will show below, they are nobler than human beings. 

ka, therefore, being subject to other bodily 

senses, they need rest and food. What 



concerns their prudence and education, they may 

be ignorant if their mind was not developed by learning 

and instruction. In general, he and probably more 

knowledgeable than a man, because their body is more refined 

but, the mind is more active, and life is longer, which 

helps them learn more than humans. These are 

ranks, specified bl. Augustine (Divin. D aem. p. 3 and 

The Spire. it An im a, с. 37). 2 2 

    They may probably suffer from elemental forces, but 

can hardly be killed with astral vision 

ion and speed of movement. And x can probably 

mutilate during sleep or at the time of an oversight when 

the help of a rigid body, for example, a spanner, which can 

cause them injury and even death, since the soul, 

which is indivisible, unable to revive a few 

parts of one organic body. 

    Six question. Can their bodies enter others 

bodies, such as wood, metal, glass, etc.? Mo- 

can they live in large numbers in one place (ma- 

terial), and to what space does it extend 

Xia their body? 

    On this occasion, we can say that all bodies, to which 

whatever flesh they were, they have pores through which 

other, more subtle bodies can enter them, although 

if these pores were impermeable to liquid, gases 

and similar bodies. If a few angels can 

dwell in one space, very limited, 

although not to infinity, as it proves 

C to ott, 2 3 it would be reckless to attribute the same 

property of the bodies of the beings in question. And x body 

have a certain extent, are impenetrable one 

for another, and if two angelic bodies cannot 

walk in the same place at the same time 

an angel can, if desired and and, move into a person, to ak 

some scientists claim, but they cannot do it. 

to make creatures possessing, though refined, but all 

same material body. 

    Seventh question. Are these beings born in the first 

native sin, were they redeemed by the Savior and 

Can they count on the afterlife? 

    The article of faith affirms that Christ freed the soul 

w and all intelligent creatures. Another dogma says 

that bliss is granted to an intelligent creature when 

it will become worthy of him. These merits are 

perfect observance of the commandments of God and x. 

220 



   Are these creatures born in original sin, we 

we do not know, but knowing that God never leaves the mind 

creature, as long as it lives, without a means of correcting 

leniently, we may assume that the mission of Christ 

touched them too. 

   Further, it must be assumed that they obey 

some laws ordained by God, keeping 

which can give them bliss. 



      XV chapter. Existence proofs 

                incubi and succubus 

   Platon ("The Demon of Socrates") and Plutarch ("I wall i 

Osiris") 24, they are considered to belong to the category 

animals with a subordinate spirit, gifted with reason, 

with airy bodies, and give these creatures a name 

"demons", which in itself has nothing to offend 

beating, so to ak means - full of wisdom; when- 

Yes, these authors speak of a fallen angel, i.e. diavo- 

le, they don't call him a demon, but "cacodemon"; V 

in relation to a good angel, they use the expression 

"eudaemon". Concerning the Holy Scriptures and the Church Fathers, 

then they also mention these creatures, as we 

we will show this. 

   Now that we have established the possibility of 

of these creatures, let's go further and prove the action 

validity of their existence. Installing first 

the reliability of stories that relate to intercourse 

incubus and succubus with people and animals, stories 

so numerous that it would be audacity to 

to reject them, as Blessed Augustine says, the testimony of which 

which was given above, and having determined this, we can 

we can conclude that where there is suffering, there must 

to be a feeling, because action and process are 

only its outward manifestations. And so, among the incubi and 

succubi observed actions, processes, passions, 

those who walk from the senses, that means they have a feeling; 

but feelings cannot manifest themselves without complex organs, 

without the union of souls and bodies; so they have a body 

                                           25 

and the soul, and therefore, these are animals; their action 

viya are consistent, which means their soul is reasonable; So , 

they are intelligent animals. Our second premise proves 

is easily called analysis: a passion that requires carnal 

sky dreams, there is a feeling; grief, sadness, anger, 

frenzy due to denial of dreams - also 

                                                      22 1 



the essence of passion, feeling; birth through intercourse 

clearly a process of feelings. And all this is observed in incubus 

how did we prove it above; they harass wives and 

and men, and if they are refused, they are upset, 

fall into a frenzy, like lovers. They are perfect 

but they fulfill relations and sometimes they give birth. Itah 

we must conclude that they are endowed with feelings and, consequently. 

importantly, they have a body, i.e. they are perfect animals 

Further, they penetrate houses even with the doors closed. 

ryakh and ok na ah, their body is so refined. They know 

predict the future, they reconcile and quarrel; it's in ( 

actions representing the properties of the rational soul 

therefore, they have an intelligent soul. 

    In this regard, scholars usually say that 

these vicious actions are the works of an evil spirit, and he alone 

mu is credited with passion, love, chagrin at 

ze in relations, and finally - the falling of souls into sin. But 

we will object, there are Ying to ubi, choosing subject- 

his passion for horses and other animals, and if 

they do not find in them the obedience of their passion, i.e. 

cause harm to them, and therefore it cannot be said that 4i 

the demon pretends to want dreams in order to pop 

whether to beat the soul, because the soul of the animal is not subject to 

going to eternal damnation. In addition, love and anger 

produce in them their actions are completely opposite " 

nye. If a woman or an animal submits to them at 

though, the incubi treat them well; and on 

turnover - very rough with resistance. And so, ink 

would actually have passions, feelings. Besides 

evil spirits dealing with sorcerers and possessed 

mi, force them to idolize themselves, feeling 

commit evil deeds and terrible attacks. Inc.> 

would not require anything of the sort: these are not evil ghosts 

To drive away the demon, to make him tremble 

and tremble, enough, as Guazzo writes, names 

And Jesus or the Virgin Mary, the sign of the cross and I, approx. 

women and I of holy relics or consecrated objects! 

incantations, incantations or commandments of the priest 

this can be seen daily on the possessed, and Guatsp' 

gives many examples borrowed from history 

night gatherings of sorcerers, where, with the sign of the cross! 

one of those present, and with the name And Jesus, disappear.< 

                                 26 

whether all the demons and k o ldun yi. And n cubes, I will subject 

similar and tested, do not run, do not show HI 

when there is no fear, sometimes they even meet 



222 



I am an and I ridicule and tear the clothes of the priests. 

Ltak, it is clear that incubes are not evil spirits, not good angels 

dy; it is also clear that these are not people, although they are gifted with 

zoom. What are they like? Assuming that this 

pure spirits, then they would be either damned or blessed 

clear, because, according to theology, there are no blameless 

spirits on the path to bliss. Damned, they feel 

there would be an aversion to the name and cross of Jesus Christ; 

blessed, they would not incline a person to sin. 

Hence, they are something other than pure spirits, and consequently 

therefore, they have a body and stand in the way of bliss. Ma- 

the material active force cannot act otherwise, 

as soon as on the same material and suffering 

nuyu; purely material things cannot act on 

hundred spiritual. There are natural forces that can 

act against incubi; it follows that these 

Incubus is material or physical. What does the parcel do? 

kazan and the evidence of Dioscorides, Plin and I, Aristo- 

telya, Apuleius and approved by the knowledge; we have not- 

how many herbs, stones and animal creatures that 

have the power to drive away demons, such as: rue, animal 

fight, verbena, hare garlic, bream evina, golden thousand 

nick, brilliant, coral, black and tan, green, leather 

from the head of a wolf or a donkey and hundreds of other things; to that 

who is attacked by the demon, it is allowed to have 

such items, but do not resort to magic. From here 

it follows that stones and herbs can, by their natural 

mi properties to curb the efforts of the demon. Before the church 

the forged charter did not allow their use and forbade, 

like superstition. A good example of this we find in 

Holy Scripture, where the angel Raphael tells Tobit (6, 8) about 

fish that he caught in the Tigris: “If you leave 

on the coals of a particle of her liver, then the smoke will make disappear 

         27 

Demon". Experience proved the truth of these words, because 

the liver of the fish has not burned down yet, k ak incubus, in love 

V 

    Sarah, vanished and hid himself, never to return again- 

    28 

    But theologians usually object to this that the natural 

natural forces drive the incubus away, but only at the beginning, 

and 

   that the full action must be from the supernatural 

the power of God or an angel in such a way that the super- 

is 

  natural force is the first cause a, p and may 

main, and natural force is only secondary, 

Indirect and subordinate. To explain how to smoke 

°t of fish liver burned by Tobit could make be- 



                                                     21 i 



press the incubus, Valesi th 2 9 admits that this smoke will get i 

from God the supernatural power to drive away the incubus ta> 

same as the material fire of hell has the power to torment 

demons and souls and gods of hell. Others, like Liran us j, 

Cornelium, prove that the smoke from the liver of a fish pr.. 

drove the demon at first by natural force, finally 

but he was removed by the power of angels and heaven, and this 

the opinion is shared by all authors who rassul 

give about the way to conjure an an and I demons 3 0 . 

   However, as we said, it cannot 

be applied: they do not precipitate the body, do not 

illnesses, their malice is limited to blows and bad -, 

walking around with timeless ones. 



      XVI   chapter. The story of the incubus and the young 

             nun. The Story of the Deacon 

    The first of these stories I borrowed from the confessor.4 

n and a monk ahin, a man of power and deserve. * 

th trust; the second I myself was a witness. 

    She lived in a convent, as a pa> 

Zionerki, a young maiden of a noble family. Oi 

was tempted by the incubus, which I was to her during the day, • 

at night with relentless requests, as the most fearful 

lover, constantly urging her to sin 

She, if you resisted, by the grace of God, and ost • 

was firm in her resistance. But in spite of 

her piety, fasting, vows, despite the spell 

n and i, blessings, commands of conjurers and n k uo. 

renounce their persecution, in spite of the multitude!>, 

relics and other sacred items collected .. 

in the room of a young girl to and , I did not stop the incubus 

pouring under the guise of a very handsome young man. 

Finally, between scientists who discussed this 

case, there was one theologian who, observing • i 

tempted girl and noticing that she has krl. 

not phlegmatic temperament, guessed that 

the incubus must be a water spirit (exist, de 

Indeed, according to Guazzo, incubus: fire'1 

air, ground, underground, enemies of the day) > i 

ordered that in the room a young girl 

or steam fumigation. Prin if a new boiler from ch ' 

we put in there an ounce of aromatic canna, sh 

tsu, cubela, aristolochia roots, cardamom a, large 

and small ginger, long pepper, cloves, korish • 

'24 



nutmeg, nutmeg, dewy frankincense, 

benzoy, aloe tree and mixed all this with three bottles 

kami of semi-refined vodka. Then the boiler was placed in 

hot ash, so that the smoking steam goes out, and com- 

natu tightly closed. Fumigation made to appear 

incubus, who, however, this time did not dare to penetrate 

rush into the room, and only when the girl went out into the garden 

or went to the monastery, he immediately came to her, 

invisible to others, hugged her, kissed her, 

which made her suffer a lot. After a new meeting, 

our theologian ordered the girl to carry a small 

some kat sh k and from such and x incense, as, for example, 

nutmeg, amber, Peruvian balsam and others. Voo- 

married in this way, she went out into the garden, and immediately 

an incubus appeared. Embittered and formidable, he did not dare 

to get closer to her and, finally, the man disappeared in order to 

do not come back. 

    The second case occurred in Pavi and, in k artesian - 

monastery where he lived a deacon named Augustine, 

who was subjected to various harassment from 

succubus crowns. Several spellcasters try in vain- 

lis to release him; all means failed. 

Vikary mon astyr came to me for advice. 

Seeing the invalidity of ordinary spells n an and d and 

remembering the above example, I advised the 

burning incense, like those of which 

speech, and instructed the deacon to wear hats on himself, on- 

scented with the same fragrances; and so how did he use 

kid tobacco and was very fond of vodka, then I recommended him 

gave me tobacco and musk-scented vodka. 

I appeared to him as a succubus in various forms: a skeleton, 

pig, donkey, bird, sometimes took the form of some 

some mon aha of this mon astyr. Once he even 

took the form of an abbot and urged the deacons to purify his 

message, trust God and confess mysteries oh, read 

mate with him psalms, E xsurgat D eus and Qui habitat and 

Gospel of John; at the words "Verbum caro factum 

     31 

est" he knelt down, and then, grabbing the epitra- 

khil and sprinkled with holy water, blessed the cell and 

bed, like a real abbot, commanding the demon not to 

bother henceforth di ak he a. After that, he suddenly 

disappeared, revealing his deception. I don't care about the eye 

the interruption that I advised, the succubus still does not interrupt 

shortened his persecution and once even accepted 

sight of his victim and appeared to the vicar, who 



8- 3400                                                   22 5 



asked for vodka and tobacco with a nutmeg smell. Get it 

both, he instantly disappeared, showing them the 

zom vik aria that he was deceived by a succubus, what would • ., 

then certified and the deacon, who is sworn, 

assured that he was not in the cell of vie to ariya. Then I conclude 

                 32 

that this and n kub was not watery, like an incubus, falls in love, 

ny in a young girl, but fiery or airy 

and therefore enjoys warm fragrances. Tev 

the spirit of a young deacon, angry and sanguine< 

sky, only reinforced my suspicions, because lp 

incubi never chase people, temperament> 

which is similar to their own (new evidence 

my opinion about their corporality). I advised in and k a r t 

give diac he is near the grass, cold by nature, i 

namely: to uvsh and n to a, liver full-time, euphorbia, wild chess 

nok, plantain, henbane, etc., making up of them others i 

beam, one of which hang at the window on a, and the other 

at the door. To the room, floor and bed I advised 

drink these herbs. And, strange thing! the succubus came 

but remained outside the threshold, not daring to enter, and when the deacon 

asked him about the reasons for such unusual modesty 

then, instead of answering, the succubus burst out cursing and 

I scolded me for advising this remedy 

Then he disappeared and did not reappear 3 3 . These two ate* 

teas clearly identify the removal of incubus and succubus only 

to the natural power of herbs or fragrances, without any 

whom the influence of divine power. And so, na inc \ 

bov affect the known properties of material objects ^ 

Comrade, and, therefore, they contain this essence 

ness. Hence it must be concluded that they have a body, 

which is what we wanted to prove. 



      Chapter XVII. And the exile of the incubus who disturbed 

           Sarra; cure of old Tobit 

   In order to better substantiate our conclusion, we should 

to mention the error of some scientists, for example 

mer, Valesia and Cornelia Lap i dskogo 3 4 , claiming 

sh them that Sarah was freed from the incubus by the power of ar 

khan gela R af ai la, and not with the liver of the fish that Tovig 

caught off the coast of the Tigris. 

   Without violating due respect for such mail!' 

scientists, it is necessary to recognize such an explanation of the 

completely contrary to the meaning of the text, from which 

should be removed. Here are the words of the angel to Tobit: “If 

226 



who is tormented by a demon or an evil spirit, then with his heart and liver 

must smoke in front of both men and women 

Noah, and it will no longer be tormented; and bile 

name a person who has an eyesore, and he 

be healed” (Kn. Tobit 6:8-9). 

   The words an gela refer to the properties of the heart, liver 

and bile of fish and are certainly of a general character, 

because he does not tell Tobit what exactly he will remove 

demon. If he had said it, I would have admitted it, along with 

commentators that Raphael did everything on his own 

supernatural power and that the actions of breath- 

ma and bile were not able to do this. 

   It may be asked whether the angel told the pure truth about 

the power of things or he could deceive, and did her eyes heal 

old Tobit, fish bile or the strength of Arkhan Gela Rafa- 

silt? It’s impossible to say that an angel could deceive, because 

the demon was and was banished by the smoke of the liver and, without intermediary 

supernatural power. 

   The doctor who says that such and such an herb heals 

completely pleurisy or epilepsy, would lie without con- 

opinions, if this herb had not cured diseases, and for 

complete healing, it was necessary to add another 

the grass 

   Let us now turn to the old Tobit. B elmo was 

removed from his eyes, and his blindness passed from natural 

the strength of the bile of the fish, called in Italy and bocca in capo, 

possessing, according to medicine, bile, 

curing walleye; agree with this Dioscorides, Gali- 

en, Pliny, Aklanius, Valesius and others. Greek text 

Tobit (11, 13) reads as follows: “He poured gall into 

his father's eyes, saying, "Believe my father," and when 

etching began, he rubbed his eyes and removed 

thorn "35 . So to a to, according to the same text, an angel from- 

Winged Tobit the power of the liver and bile of the fish and healed the 

sweat of old Tobit, then it should be concluded that so and m 

in the same way with its natural strength and the smoke from the liver 

chased away the succubus, and this is certified by the Greek text 

book. Tobit, ch.8, v.2: “He took ashes or heat, 

The heart and liver of a fish lived there, and when the smoke went, 

then the demon, not being able to endure the smell, used 

Chaz. As for the Hebrew text, it says: 

"Asmodeus smelled it and ran away." From here, barely 

It blows that the demon was saved by feeling the smoke that 

was harmful to him, and not at all from the action of supernatural 

venous power of an angel. And if in this liberation Sar- 



8*zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

                                                   To 



ry from the pursuit of the succubus Asmodeus action smoke:! 

from the liver and was accompanied by the mediation of R af ail 

then only to chain an incubus in the desert 

Upper Egypt, as it is said in the book. Tobit (chap. 8, 

Art. 3). Here we can reconcile our opinion with 

the above conclusion of scientists who, when 

write this miraculous deliverance of Sarah to the action of Ra- 

file. According to them, Sarah would not have been completely 

released if the incubus had not been chained zyxwvutsrqpon 

                                                  in are empty 

not, and this we admit, but actually liberated * . 

the exorcism of the demon from the bedrooms and Sarah was direct, 

                                    36 

natural action of fish liver. 



      XVIII chapter. St. Anthony meets in the desert 

                  Faun. Their conversation 



   The third and main proof of our conclusion 

opinions about the existence of these creatures and about corporality 

incubus is the testimony of St. And eronym. 

    • St. Anthony, - says this scientist, - 

I went one day to Saint Paul. 

    After a few days of travel, he met a centaur, 

whom he asked where the hermit lived, and what he was doing. 

muttering a few harsh words, showed him the hand 

which way and ran into the forest. Walking a little, St. Anto 

met, but this time, a little man, almost 

dwarf, with twisted arms, with horns on his forehead. 

whose body ended with legs to the top. At sight 

his st. Anthony stopped and, fearing the wiles of the devil, 

made the sign of the cross over himself. N o little man 

century, not thinking of running away and not even being afraid, almost 

carefully approached the holy elder and offered him 

the fruits of the alma, as if testifying to their peace-loving 

your intentions. 

    Then St. Anthony asked why he was so oh. "I'm dead- 

tny, - he answered, - one of the inhabitants of the desert, 

whom paganism, in its error, honors 

various names: fauns, satyrs, incubi; I am sent 

with a commission from my people-flock; we ask you 

pray for us to God, who came down for bless! zyxwvu l 

the whole world and the glorification of which is distributed throughout 

earth." 

    Hearing such reverence for Christ, 

St. Anton ii, full of joy, turned jio on- 

board to Alexandria and striking the ground with a stick 4. 

228 



exclaimed the street: "1'ore teye, depraved city, which 

loves animals, like gods. 

     Such a story has a saintly tone. 

     Doubt the veracity of this story when it 

testified by the great scholar of the Church himself, 

St. And Eron and Mom 3 7 , whose authority is never challenged 

rushed by any Catholic, it would be impudent. 

     Consider the details of this story and decide how 

In this way, it confirms our opinion. 

     First, it should be noted that if any 

that object was subjected to the machinations of the devil, in the design 

whose ly he penetrated and gained victory over him, 

then, of course, it was St. Anthony, as he claims 

                                      38 

life written by St. Af an Asiy. And so, St. Anthony 

did not recognize the demon in this little man, but 

mistook him for an animal, saying: “Woe to you, depraved go- 

a kind that adores animals like gods. From here 

confesses that it was not a demon or spirit, and expelled from heaven 

and cursed, but some kind of animal. St. Anthony, on- 

placing his monks and warning them against 

measures of the devil, says, as mentioned in the breviary 

(celebration of St. Anthony): “Believe me, brethren, that 

Satan is afraid of pious people, as well as prayers, 

fasting, voluntary poverty, mercy, humility 

n and i; but most of all, ardent love for Christ, our 

my Savior, and therefore, in order to put Satan on the run- 

the holy cross is enough.” 

    And the little man, when St. Anthony thought from 

protect him with the sign of the cross, did not show any 

no fear and did not think to run; on the contrary, he 

approached the holy elder with a trusting air and 

titelly offered him a f and n and k and . Here is the proof 

that it wasn't the devil. 

    Secondly, it should be noted that this little man 

century said: "I am mortal," whence it follows that this 

there was an animal - the object of death, which appeared on 

light through generation; the spirit is immaterial 

- immortal, because it does not receive life through 

of generation, but through creation according to the kind of pre-existing 

and therefore does not lose its life even through smoldering 

life, otherwise through death, and may cease to be 

through destruction by the Creator. And so, saying that he 

mortal, he explained that he was an animal. 

    Thirdly, the little man said that he knew 

This is about the suffering of God in the human body. These words 

                                                     229 



prove that he is a rational animal. Beasts nor 

what they do not know beyond the perceived present and cannot 

can have no idea about God. If this 

The little man said that he and others like him 

talk about the suffering of God in the human body, then, 

Certainly, thanks to some revelation, they 

have the concept of God in the same way as we have open 

that faith to us. Note that God became incarnate in man 

century and suffered, testifies to the two main members 

of our faith: about the existence of the One God in three 

tsakh and about the incarnation, suffering and resurrection. All this 

shows, as I said, that it was reasonable 

a being ready for divine knowledge by way of 

blood and endowed, like us, reasonable, immortal 

in spirit. 

    Fourthly, on behalf of all his people, who 

was sent, he asked St. Anthony to pray for them 

universal God. From this I deduce that this little 

man was ready for both bliss and damnation, and 

that he was not "in term in o", but "in via""39; if he was 

intelligent being endowed with an immortal soul, 

as I proved above, the logician also recognizes that he 

ready for bliss and damnation - this is the property of 

intelligent creature, angel or person. He was on a pu- 

ty (in via), i.e. ready for feats and deeds, so 

to how, if he were in term in o, then he would be already or 

blessed or damned, but he was neither one nor the other, 

because the prayers of St. Anthony, to whom he addresses 

if 

he would be completely damned; and if he was 

already in bliss, he would have no need of them. P oto- 

that is why he turned to the prayers of St. Anthony, that they 

could help, therefore, he was on the road to well- 

                                     40 

женству "in the state of the road and m er it i" . 

    Fifthly, this little man with the words - "I 

sent by his flock-people on a mission," announces 

himself as a messenger of other creatures of the same kind. 

From this we can derive several consequences: 

the little man was not the only one; to ak and m- 

or by an exceptional miracle, but they did not exist 

how many one ax connected together, they make up 

the people (herd) were lying, and he, I, appeared on behalf of everyone. Then, 

these creatures live in society because they send 

one for all, as a representative. Nak he ets, living in 

desert, they were not attached there permanently 



230 



time. St. Anthony had not had a chance to visit before this 

meeting is a secluded place that was significant 

but far from his cell, and in the desert they could not 

find out - neither who he was, nor to any degree of holiness 

he has risen; it is necessary that they recognize him somewhere 

somewhere else, and consequently, they were also 

outside of this desert. 

   Sixthly, this little man said that he 

a being from those that speak and to and in his blind za- 

wandering are called fauns, satyrs and incubi, 

which proves the veracity of our main 

thesis, i.e. that the incubi of creation are intelligent, powerful 

either achieve bliss or be damned. 

   The appearance of small people of this kind can be 

freely often in mines, as Agrico- 

                                          41 

la in her book "De Animal, su bt err." . They show- 

are given to children dressed in the same dress as those; 

they play, joke, laugh, have fun, throw clothes 

tyam in the game to am esh k and , and this is a good sign, says you- 

the aforementioned author - you can be sure that 

some rich vein will be discovered. 

   Where do these little people live, these incubi? On this 

I will answer: according to Guazzo, some of them are earthly, others 

some - water, third - air, fourth - fire 

neny, i.e. their bodies are made up of the most delicate parts 

one of these elements, and they live either in water, 

either in the ground or in the air, according to its nature. 

And their dwellings, therefore, are located in one of the elements 

cops, which is mainly part of their 

body; fiery incubes, for example, never live 

in water or in a bog, which are opposite to them, and 

water ones cannot rise to the higher layers of the ether, 

since this area is too thin for their natural 

dy. The same is true for people who 

accustomed to condensed air, cannot live on 

the heights of the Alps, where the air is too fine for them. 

   Moline cites several testimonies of the Holy Fathers, 

which can confirm to us the corporality of demons. 

And meya decision of the Lateran Council on incorporeal- 

angels, we must understand that the Holy Fathers had 

in the mind of the incubus demons, who are still on the way 

to salvation, but not already cursed angels. However, not 

going further, we will confine ourselves to a reference to St. Augustine, 

this great scholar of the Church, and we shall see how far 

degree, his opinion converges with ours and m. B l. Augustine 

                                                      23 i 



speaks of the being of demons in his commentary 

blowing (book 2, ch. 17): “They know some truths 

either because their feelings are more alive, or because their 

bodies are more refined, ”and further, in k n .3, ch. 1: “Demons - 

creatures are airy because they have a resemblance 

by nature with air bodies. In his 115th envoy 

nii "To the Jews" he says: "These air or 

ethereal beings have a very sensitive feeling towards them- 

mi". In "The City of God" (kn. 11, ch. 23) he says: 

"The demon has an air body." In book 21, chapter 10 of that 

the same essay writes: “Some demons have a body, 

how philosophers think, from thick and humid air, 

which we breathe w and m. In k n . 15, ch. 23: "You can't re- 

to decide whether angels equipped with air 

scrap, to feel the passion that pushes them to women 

sch and n am. In his comments on Psalm 85, he teaches 

et: “The bodies of the blessed ones after the resurrection will be like 

bodies of angels", and in the note to Psalm 14 add 

et: "The bodies of angels are more material than souls and." 



      XIX chapter. Another proof of physicality 

      incubi. Man anna of the Jews or bread of the angels 

    Our opinion can moreover be confirmed 

even the following testimonies of St. P and dignity and I, to ak 

no matter how different the interpretation given to them 

commentators. In Psalm 78, v. 24 and 25, it is said about: “And 

He rained for them food with manna, and gave them heavenly bread. 

Man ate angelic bread; He sent them p and u to 

satiety." David is talking here about the manna that he fed 

All the people of Israel all the time, until they wandered in 

desert. It is not said about the man, as about the bread of the angels. Except 

manna, the angels delivered to the Jews pillars from the cloud and 

fire, quail, rock water, and Holy Scripture does not say 

rit - an angelic pillar, water of angels, etc. Why 

also called manna, prepared with the mediation 

angels, the bread of angels, and not called the water of angels, 

which was also called a from the rock with their mediation 

nothing? Then it should be noted that if in the Holy Scripture 

speaks of bread, then "someone's bread" is always called 

"the bread of the one" who eats it, but not the one who eats it 

cooks. Examples of this are countless: And the gathering. 

ch.23, v.25, "He blessed your bread and your water." 

K n .2 Kings, ch.12, st.3, “of his bread she ate.” K n . 

Tobit. chapter 4, art. 17, “Give out your loaves at the tomb 

232 



the righteous”, in St. Luke and, ch. 11, art. 3, “Bread is ours 

existent”. All this proves enough that bread 

sometime” in Scripture is the bread of the one who feeds it- 

Xia, and not the one he does, brings or prepares 

lays. And it is quite natural that in P salma, on which 

we refer, we must understand under the bread of angels pi- 

I seek not incorporeal angels (who have no need 

in material food e), but bodily angels, i.e. ra- 

sentient beings that we are talking about here, which 

live in the airzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP 

                    and which, by the refinement of the body and 

giftedness with reason, so they approach the incorporeal 

angels that they were even given the same name. 

From this I deduce the consequence: being animals, i.e. 

appearing through generation, and subject to corruption, 

they need food to restore 

bodily substance, the loss of which occurs through 

spending. The life of every creature is 

in the assimilation and eruption of the elements, as he taught 

Ettmuller ("I n st. M ed. P h ys.", Ch. 2) 4 2 . And so, if they 

bodies are refined, then their food should be the same. 

If certain substances are contrary to their nature and they 

they are avoided, that is, in nature, and such substances, which 

which they eat and enjoy. 

   The manna of the Jews consisted of various elements and, 

long before precipitation, dissolved from the rays of the sun. 

And the gathering, ch. 16, art. 21: “when the sun warmed, she 

that la». 

   The manna of the Jews had an unusually delicate composition, 

because it contained the vapors of water and earth, which 

from the heat of the sun dissolved and disappeared. Possible 

but that this is the food of the creatures we are talking about, and 

David, not without reason, called it the bread of the angels. 



 XX chapter. How should one understand the words of Christ: “There are 

 I have sheep that are not of this yard.” Talk 

 Apollo with Emperor Augustus: the end of the gods. 

 The Great Pan is dead. The death of Christ proclaimed 

        Fauns, Sylvans, Satyrs 

   To reinforce our thesis, we use the words 

John the Evangelist (ch. 10, v. 16): “I have 

and other sheep that are not of this fold; and those should 

Bring me: and they will hear my voice, and there will be one 

flock and one Shepherd. If we ask how and how 

it may be sheep not of this yard and how oh this yard, oh 

                                                     233 



which the Savior speaks, then all commentators to us 

they will answer that the only court of Christ is the Church, 

into which the preaching of the gospel of helium must lead the tongue 

n iks who are not of this court, i.e. not the courtyard of the Jews. For 

in their court of Christ was at first the synagogue, so 

view says, P s. 95, v.7: “We are the people of His pasture and the sheep 

the hands of his hands," because the promise was given to Abra- 

Am and David that the Messiah would come from their tribe, and He 

expected by the Jewish people, and a prophet was proclaimed 

to ami who were Jews, and His coming, His de- 

I n and I, His suffering, death and resurrection were to ak 

would have been depicted earlier in sacrifices, rituals 

dakh, and in general the cult of the Jewish law, he a. Oh, despite 

to our respect for the fathers of the Church and other scientists, 

this explanation does not satisfy us. Really, 

believe that from the beginning of the world there was one Church 

faithful and that it will last until the end of the world. Chapter 

this Church - And Jesus Christ, the Mediator between God 

gom and people. Faith in the Holy Trinity, incarnate 

knowledge of the Word was revealed to the first man who 

taught the same to his sons, and they, in turn, 

their descendants. Although most of them fell into 

paganism and pok inula the true faith, but nevertheless many 

who kept the faith of their fathers and, observing the natural 

n y law, remained in the Church of the faithful. This remark 

does to ardi n al Tole about Iov, who did- 

holy among the languages of the chn and k o v. Although God has given His 

mercy to the Jewish people, for whom He has established 

he forked a special law and rites, and which he separated from 

languages, however, this law was not mandatory for 

linguists, and the Jews did not constitute a Church other than 

churches of those languages who professed the faith 

into the One God and into the coming of the Messiah. Between I speak 

n and kami were so and e, who prophesied the coming 

Christ and other dogmas of the Christian religion, on- 

example, Mercury, Trismegistus, Hydaspes and the Sibyls, o 

                                             43 

who are spoken by Lak tan ts and y and Baron and y. What am I loud and - 

we were waiting for the Messiah, can be proved by several months 

tami u i sai and and especially in the prophecy of the patriarch 

And Jacob (Genesis, ch. 49, v. 10): “The scepter will not depart from 

And the hook and the rod from his feet, until rest comes, and to him 

                         44 

obedience n ar o to v * . 

   And also in the prophet Haggai, ch. 2, Art. 7: "And I will shake 

all nations, when the Desired of all nations comes.” 

Kornely Lap i dsk i y comments on this as follows: 

234 



at once: “Pagans and to and who believed in God and observed 

whether he zak, waited and desired Christ, like the Jews. 

Christ Himself I curled up and proclaimed Himself, how loud I am and - 

to us, and to the Jews, because at the same moment, to ak 

angels announced the birth of Christ to the shepherds, so 

but they learned about it with the help of a wonderful star of the sorcerer 

you 4 5 , which in this way were the first between 

I speak chn and kam and, like shepherds among the Jews, they are called to 

bow down to Christ (SF ulgen tius. Serm. 6 de Epiph.). 

The Gentiles and before the Jews knew about the coming of Christ 

through preaching (I'm not talking about the preaching of the apostles). 

The Venerable Sister Marie d'Arpega wrote about this 

in his Life of Jesus Christ and the Blessed Virgin Ma- 

rii”: “When the Virgin Mary fled from St. And Osif in 

Egypt from persecution and kind, then she stayed with 

baby And Jesus in Egypt for seven years; and at this time 

The blessed Virgin herself preached to the Egyptians to us faith in 

true God and the coming of the Son of God in man 

com body. By the way, at the birth of Christ, 

there were many miracles not only in Israel, but also in Egypt, where 

the idols were destroyed, the oracles fell silent; in Rome - 

a fountain of oil appeared, a golden ball appeared, descending 

descended from heaven to earth, three suns appeared and 

an extraordinary circle of rainbow shades surrounded the sun 

tse; in Greece, the Delphic oracle fell silent, and Apollo 

lon, asked by Emperor Augustus, answered: “Eu- 

reyskoe child cha, which commands the gods and Himself is 

B oh. I was told to leave my throne and go down 

hell. Now our altars have fallen silent, and we 

need to leave." 

    There were many other signs announcing them 

I speak to you the coming of the Son of God. About their story- 

but in the Baron and I (“Church Annals”) and in Cornelius 

(“Comments on Haggai”). 

    And from all this it is clear that I speak chn and k and, like the Jews, 

belonged to the court of Christ, i.e. to the same Church 

faithful. Therefore, these words of Christ: “Me- 

other sheep that are not of this yard," cannot 

to speak the languages of chn and k s, which, together with the Jews, had 

knowledge of God, hope in the Messiah, prophecy, miraculous 

sa and the prediction of His coming. I say that 

the words "sheep not of this yard" can be attributed to the 

intelligent creatures or animals, which we are talking about here 

we talk 

                                                       2 3^ 



    We have established that they are also capable of bliss, 

and to damnation; but since Christ is the Mediator 

between God and people, as well as every reasonable person 

beings (because through the merits of Christ, 

intelligent creatures achieve bliss with the help of 

of the mercies that He bestows on them), then from here you can 

conclude that every rational being must 

have at the same time faith in the One God, on- 

hope for the coming of Christ, the revelation of the incarnation 

nii at birth and the commandments of beatitude. 

    Behold, the sheep are not the "yard" of men, and they must be brought; 

these are the sheep that are to hear His voice, i.e. 

announcement of His coming and gospel teaching 

or directly from H him, or from the apostles; here ow- 

tsy, who, being, as he is, connected with people in 

heavenly bliss, must fulfill the words about one 

nome court and about one P astyr. This explanation is under 

It is also confirmed by those mentioned above, the words of St. 

And eronym about the little man who asked the saint 

of that Antonia to pray for him and others like him 

to God, Who suffered like a man. From this 

it is evident that they knew about the coming and death of Christ, 

wished to earn His mercy as God, and resorted to 

to the help of St. Anthony. 

   Another fact supporting my conclusion is 

this is a mention of the Baron and I about the signs that are erected 

or the death of Christ. During the time of the emperor Tiberius, 

during the suffering of Christ, sailors on the road 

from Greece to Italy approached the shore at night, 

far from the islands of Echinada. Suddenly everyone heard Ali go- 

los, who called the helmsman Tramn. He replied: "I'm here" 

and the same voice said: “When you reach the swamp, 

then announce that the Great Pan is dead. Tramn is used 

n country, and suddenly loud noises were heard from behind. 

Besides, it could be, if not demons or bodily an 

gels, or intelligent beings that live near these 

swamps, since they were, no doubt, water 

khami and, learning about the death of Christ under the name of "Great 

Pana”, did you start crying and sobbing? Likewise among the 

the ray present at the death of Christ were many 

go, remove yours and xsya with an expression of grief. And from all this 

it follows that there are creatures, incubi and succubi. 

who have feelings and are subject to suffering 

pit of feelings. They breed through birth and mind 

soar through decay; they can achieve bliss 



236 



and God bless you; they are nobler than man, so they have 

a more refined body, and if they happen to have a flesh- 

intercourse with a person, then they commit such 

her sin, like a man who has intercourse with livestock. 

Often these incubi, after long intercourse with humans, 

whom or animals kill their accomplices, and this 

explained as follows: having sinned, they must repent, 

so kak are on the path to bliss. So is the human 

the age, having sinned with the animal, receives from its spirit- 

n ika command un to destroy this animal, so that again 

do not fall into sin. It may happen that incubi, race- 

repenting, they kill a person or an animal with whom 

sinned, and by killing a person, in this case the incubus is already 

commits no sin by this murder, just as 

and man does not sin by killing an animal; ratio in- 

cube to a person will be similar to the attitude of a person to 

animal. 



   XXI chapter. How can a woman get pregnant 

 from an incubus. Why aren't giants born now? 

   Pregnancy from an incubus does not come from sperm, 

borrowed from a person, as you mentioned 

she, because an incubus, k ak a creature that breeds 

through generation, possesses natural sperm. 

   Thus, it is easy to explain the origin 

giants as a result of the intercourse of the sons of God and 

through human. You are a giant, although you are human-like 

ku, but of greater stature and, borrowing from the incubus his si- 

lu, have neither his courage nor his power. That 

we see the same thing with the mule, descended from the donkey and 

mare - he is higher than the first, but does not have a perfect 

stva second. 

   Nowhere have we read that the giants produced other 

gigantic giants; they were born of incubi and daughters of 

lovable, i.e. created from demon and man, forming 

average between them and mi, but not having the power to reproduce 

their own kind, through generation. 

   It can be argued that the demon's sperm, being 

nature is not as thick as human sperm cannot 

mix and produce generation. But I will answer, ssy- 

Laying on the above, that the origin depends on 

The life force of the actor, which he 

divides. 

                                                      237 



     One could argue that if you're a giant, you're real 

descended from the intercourse of incubi with women sch and us, ot. 

would still be born, because even now ecu 

women who have intercourse with incubi, like races 

say St. Bernard, Peter Alkantarsky and others 

the author. 

     I will answer that, according to Guazzo, there are incubi of the earth 

nye, water, air and fire, and each of them? 

lives in its own element 4 6 . And it is known that 

here are all the more significant sizes, zyxwvutsrqcheh 

more the element in which they live. For example, fish 

many of them are no doubt very small, as is MI 

we also see in terrestrial animals, but since the water 

space exceeds that of the earth, so also some breeds. 

fish are larger than terrestrial animals. 

     It will be clear if we look at the whales, skoom 

bry, kash alot and some other viviparous 

Further, since air is greater than water, and fire is greater 

air, then fire and air incubi are superior 

children of the earth and water, as in the size of the body, so!• 

by strength. Perhaps they will say that the birds that live 

in the air, which is more than water, in general, there are fewer lynxes 

and quadrupeds, but that doesn't prove anything, so 

birds flying in the air belong to the land where OHI 

rest; then it would be necessary to consider the fly 

sneeze fish, like animals of the air, which, of course, will be> 

wrong. 

    Now it should be noted that after the flood 

the spirit that embraces our land and water has made 

sya, thanks to moisture, denser than before the flood 

and since there are reasons for humidity, but decay, then maybe 

be, from this the life of people is not so long, 

to ak in antediluvian times. This same air density 

is the reason that the incubi are airy and fiery 

we can no longer live in such thick air and, her 

whether they descend sometimes, then not for long, like anyone 

dyam, diving them into the depths of the sea. And so, before the flood, when 

the air was not so thick, the incubi descended to the ground 

and had intercourse with women, creating both 

at once giants almost the same height as themselves 

Currently having intercourse with women in 

dynye incubi, which are sometimes under the guise of small 

k and x people. You confirm their water origin; 

because voluptuousness and moisture are elements corresponding to 

rushing among themselves. So, Venus, according to mythology 



238 



\ 

    born from sea foam and it is natural that her children are not 

    giants, but of ordinary height. One more note: 

    when incubi, connecting with women, do not change 

    of their body, then women do not see them or see how 

    a barely perceptible shadow: such is the case told by us 

    higher, when an incubus kissed a lady, and she barely felt 

    wala is touch. If, on the contrary, incubi 

    want to be visible to their beloved, they 

    take on a visible shell, and their body becomes tangible 

    we M. How and how they do it is their secret, 

    and we can't open it. We only know that the 

    an incubus loch cannot consist of one condensed 

    air, because its compaction comes from 

    constriction, that is, from the cold, and the body formed 

    thus, when touched, it will be ice; 

    this would cause trouble for women and us, then to ak 

                          47 

    the opposite happens. 



              Chapter 21. The Significance of Sinfulness 

             "demoniality" and "beastiality" 

             (demonology and animal science) 

        Considering the distinction of disembodied demons, which 

    have intercourse with sorcerers, and incubi who have 

    dealing with wives and nami not sorcerers, we can only 

    to consider the severity of sin in both cases. 

    Intercourse of sorcerers with demons according to circumstances, 

    who accompany them, such as: a deviation from the 

    ry, devil worship and other iniquities, about which 

    ryh we said above, there is the largest of all 

    sins that a person can commit. If 

    considered from this point of view, then of course demo- 

    Niality is the greatest of all bodily sins, 

    what a person can do. But if the 

    to judge this as bodily sin, cast aside sin 

    against religion, it is only a desecration. Cause a 

    very convincing, is that the devil, 

    having intercourse with sorcerers, is a spirit incorporeal 

    ny, who has reached in term in o and damned, and he is 

    acts with the help of the body, borrowed or co- 

    created by himself, and although it is set in motion, 

    n 

      yet not alive; therefore, a person who 

    intercourse, commits the same crime as if 

    Having intercourse with an inanimate body. Intercourse 

    etc 

      which kind can have a different character: if 



the devil borrowed the body of a man, then this is wickedness, zyxw, 

if the body of an animal, then it is sodomy. 

    As for relations with the incubus, here 

meets even the slightest insult to religion, i 

it's hard to say why this crime should be 

more sinful than sodomy and bestiality. If you bestial! 

more sinful than sodomy, because a person humiliates his 

dignity, uniting with cattle, then in intercourse < 

the incubus is quite the opposite: the incubus in terms of reasonableness is equal to 

man, and in regard to the body - nobler than man, 

and consequently man does not degrade his nature, 

connecting with an incubus. Considering the demoniac 

from this point of view, we see that he is no more sinful than the demon 

tiality. 

    But the general opinion tends to be that demonia 

it is more sinful, and for some reason, e. In all 

sh e n i x with a demon people sin against religion: bud} 

then love dreams or a request for help, advice 

or the desire to know the future through it, or to know i 

hidden and past. Men and women, coming down; 

so in the same way with the incubes, they do not know that it is alive 

so many, but they think that it is a demon, and they sin or with a hint 

rhenium or from error, and their sin with incubi that 

but, as if they had intercourse with the devil, 

hence it follows that the severity of these crimes 

even this one. 









240 



  PART TWO 





But there is no salvation 

in the forces of the dark 



                                               I   I ' M ('" 

                                                          f ,   j ^   , 



            1 

L- *' 

                , 4 и . H i "< 

                                                       • >J_7 °"^ 

                     ") н ! I ^ VI 

                                                       G7- -       17 

                |-     05 1999         L.L 

                                                        2- 1- Г' 4 l 

                - . 105 1^99 

1 

                                                        , : s>0 .6 

                     - - 1071W 

                                                               4 к 4S 

                            l 

                     '0 01 i ' 9»                         65 1 - 0 6 

    ,                 i2 0 5 P 9 c >                       4 J - ? 7 ('^ 

    '                 2" 08 199VzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQP 

                                   v 

                                                          Ш: чп 

    i             21.06 1S»W               , 

    i             U ) l 2ч»"0             д 

                  Q, (M * 999               i 

        1 

                " i OL- 19H 9 



                        1.09.1999 

                                            ^5- iJ 59 

                        6 12 1990 

                                           68- 48G43 

                        9.02 2000 

                        4.08 "1999 

                                           - - 21, 67- 81- 90 

                        10.03.2000 

                                             38- 26L9 

                        26 03 L 999 

                                             62- 26- 70 

                         7.12.1998 

                         25 0" 2000           "65- 79- M 

                               \'^' 

                         10.03zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ 



                          19 07   W                                   b^- ~T) 

                           - 02 P99 



        92- 75 



Stanislav Pshibyshevsky 

    Synagogue of Satan 





                      Part one 

                 SATAN TO THE SYNAGOGUE 



   Two gods are eternally opposed, two creators and two 

master, beginningless and eternal. 

   The good God created spirits, pure beings; his world is 

the world of the invisible, the world of perfection, not knowing and wrestling 

would and pain. Evil God created the visible, corporeal and transcendental 

fiery. He created flesh and passions, the earth with its struggle, 

her torments and her despair, an immeasurable vale of weeping, 

created a nature that eternally produces only pain, 

despair and evil. 

   A good god is the norm, he is the law, humility and submission 

ness. He says to his children: “Be in spirit, 

for only thus will you come into my kingdom! Be more 

children than children, mortify the will, follow me! Not 

strive to know the causes and purposes, for only in 

me all the past and all that is to come.” 

   An evil God is the absence of rules, stubborn, clear 

visionary leap into the future, it is the temptation of the innermost 

the most secrets of iks and titanic stubbornness, which, 

not recognizing borders, subverts all laws, all 

norms. He is the highest wisdom and the highest depravity, 

may di k aya pride and the most crafty humility, for 

that's the only way to break the rule. He sanctified you 

arrogance, courage and lust for power - and he calls it Ge- 

swarming; he taught man that there is no crime, 

except against his own nature. He sanctified 

curiosity, he called it science, he made man 

centuries to explore their own origins and called 

this is philosophy, he let all the ins- 

tin ktam in line with the floor and called it art. 

   The Evil God was good, a good father and leader 

Lem: “Are you sick, do you want to get well? Look! Earth 

mine is replete with all k and mi injuries that can heal 

pour you, replete with dangerous ladies, but you can 

make them serve you as medicine. 

   Do you want to be rich, do you eat treasures? ABOUT, 

I 

   I have a thousand resources that you can 

lure your own soul out of its hiding place to 

she opened to you the precious veins of the earth. And more soul 

yours knows everything. She and I have the same beginning. 

                                                       24 5 



    Do you want to look into the future and guess your destiny? 

boo? And di, watch the flight of the birds, listen to the shelg 

leaves, look at the stars, look into the mirrored cree 

stalls, guess whether n and hands and - in a thousand kinds .-, 

pre-created your future, but also u and , explore, unravel 

wai, for he is my zak - sharpness and dexterity, observer 

nost and farsightedness, creative curiosity. 

    You want to kill and live your enemies and you don't want to 

be overtaken by the law? And di! Teach your soul from 

divide from the body, and I will carry it thousands of miles away, which 

would you invisibly satisfy the hunger of your heart. Ib^ 

your own good, your own development and boo 

may the highest laws be to you. 

    Have you lost your wives taken by death? I am sharp 

I give to your love, for love, continuing your kind 

to my heart. And di! I have thousands of funds, a thousand 

chi zak li n an and y to wrest what is dear to you from death! 

    I promise you everything, you will see everything and you will receive everything, 

if we go by my friends. But my ways are difficult, i< 

any accomplishment is difficult.” 

    Thus spoke the Evil God, thus spoke the Lightbearer 1 i 

                     2 

S atan a-Parak years at the time when the bishop was not yet born 

great enemy Youth of Nazareth 3 . And many walked 

paths, and long-term labors and torments, researched 

whether the secrets of heaven and earth, and turned objects so 

that poison became their medicine, water showed IU 

the future, and the volcano has its own vapors, which have flowed out. 

earth, revealed to them the innermost nature of things 

And further and further pron and kali they are on the path of the contemplator 

n and i. To the circle that they outlined around themselves, a row < 

sounds that they uttered in a certain aftermath 

valence, movement and hands and - it was already enough 

to connect their souls with the whole universe, expand 

push all the laws of space and time, and without barriers 

contemplate endless chains of cause and effect 

their origin to the farthest edges of the future. 







   Satan the Antichrist was not yet born at that time. 

   The evil god was two in one. 

   Satan is the father, Satan is the Samiaza, Satan is the poet and philo 

sof lived in a proud, omnipotent and omniscient kind of ma 

gov 4 . He lived in the silent mysteries of the Chaldean 

temples, and its priests were gak ami m (doctors), hart> 

246 



       (magicians), k azdi m and gazrim (astrologers). Egot Satan 

yas     in the doctrines ah mazdei zma 6, and his children, magicians great 

which were guarded by the holy fire 7 that came down to them from heaven. 

                    8                                         9 

From Agura-Mazda, the Good God, Zarathustra learned 

                          10                   11 

the secrets of the plant with ma; Egyptian T o t, thrice ve- 

wild, expounded in 42 books x 1 2 secret knowledge and 

knew the chosen ones the structure of the human body, and the horror 

naya Hekate 1 3 endowed her chosen ones with the gift of magic 

vision and creativity and, above all, 

rum secret murder. 

    But along with Satan-Thoth, Satan-Hecate lived in 

                       14               15                   16 

world S atan a-Satir, S atan a-Pan, S atan a-Fallos. 

    He was the god of instincts and carnal lust, 

equally revered and higher by them and n and zsh and mi by the spirit, he 

was an inexhaustible source of life's joy, 

inspiration and intoxication. He taught the women the secrets 

temptations, forcing people to satisfy their 

lust in the mutual attraction of sex, he luxuriated 

in k paints ah, invented the flute and brought it into rhythmic 

muscle movements until a holy mania seized the heart 

child and the holy phallus did not fertilize with its excess 

fertile womb. 

    For Pan was Apollo and Aphrodite at the same time 

But. He was the god of the hearth and the house of tolerance. 

He created philosophical systems, he built museums and 

sumptuous temples, he taught medicine and mathematics, 

at the same time, his temple was in Astarteion, a huge 

brothel, in which priestesses in long-term 

razzheniya studied all the ways, all the various 

means of satisfying sexual passion. 

                                                     17 

    At this time, in the era of Emperor T and take I when 

the great migration of the gods began in Rome, in the era of 

the highest refinement and the most aristocratic 

enjoyment of life, Good God, until now the king of yours and th 

V 

    his invisible kingdom with an enviable imperturbable 

Indeed, he saw, as he did, that the measure of sin had been fulfilled, and 

sent his Son to earth to tell peace 

to the laziness of the Evil God the sad truth. 

    And he came into the world, the Son of the Good God, and appeared 

first to the poor, the oppressed, slaves and day laborers, 

when you don’t taste the holy joys of Pan. 

    Why are you baking your daily bread? To the same clothes 

V 

  gives lilies the most beautiful flowers, in comparison with 

Which crimson and brocade are miserable rags? To that pit- 

meat 

    birds that neither sow nor reap? Why strive 

                                                           247 



you to the blessings of the earth, which are fleeting? To ako. 

what matters is your pride, if the highest on earth. 

will there be n and zsh and m in the kingdom of heaven? And carnal n oxoi. 

yours, is it not the gate of hell? 

    Oh, poor desire of the flesh, poor lust, the source of all 

to and x passions, an inexhaustible source of love of life and 

the will to eternity of life; she had to be destroyed 

woman, so that the kingdom of the invisible may reign on earth. 

    The teacher said that you are already committing adultery 

feminine, if you look at her with lust; study 

nick goes much further: St. Cyprian 1 8 says 

a girl who can make men sigh as a leader 

leniya that she is shameless, and if she ignited in the room 

be, even without knowing it, love flames, then she vooo 

she is no longer a virgin. 

     - Woman! What do you and I have in common? - question 

the teacher is shaking. But much further than the teacher is the student 

“Tu es diaboli jan ua,” shouts Tertullian an 1 9, “tu e- 

Resign the tree of that tree, you are the first of the divine law. 

deserter, you are the one who persuaded him, the diabolical one 

He did not want to attack.* "All evil from women". 

                       20 

pissed off St. I er about n and m. Yes, he even claims that 

shch and n a is not at all created in the likeness of God, for in the Holy 

Scripture does not say anything about the soul at creation 

rhenii wives and nys. 

    The good God of the invisible hated earthly beauty 

    He hated everything in which Satan a-Pan I did my best. 

bloodshed, for he preached insignificance and passing 

the essence of this world. Every desire, the slightest possibility 

flesh, was a sin that was punished by debt 

gimi years * repentance. Tertullian rampages 

fanatic hatred against every band of pur 

the pura with which the woman wears a dress. Lak ta 

      21 

ts and y curses the poets and philosophers who 

cabins unguarded souls and perish, destroys life 

cry out, because "what is not learned is the work of God; ergo quoi 

fin gitur, diaboli negotium".*** The theater and the circus were established 



      You are the threshold of the devil, you are the one who violated the prohibition against 

this tree (i.e. Eve. - comp.). You are the first to neglect 

divine law, it was you who persuaded him, whom the devil did not 

wished to pursue. - lat. (Hereinafter translated by the compiler) 

  * "All evil is from women. - lat. 

      Everything that is born is the fruit of God's work, investigator^ 

what is depicted is the work of the devil - lat. 





248 



"diaboli figmenta"*; the holy fathers even warn 

from paints, from flowers, for the demon, the evil enemy, is more willing 

just dresses up in bright colors of luxury. 

    And savry I kon o klast 2 2 competes with Gregory Ve- 

L i k m 2 3 in the destruction of works of art. Theodo- 

these II 2 4 orders to destroy all temples and erect 

make crosses everywhere. Destroy the meaning of the most beautiful 

works of poets or completely destroy them, since 

the demonologist K and prian teaches that in poems there are hidden 

you are "varia daemonia" "*. 

a public woman who can be abandoned by anyone 

rubbish, and love - oh, God, love - "amor si 

vincitur, diabolus vin citur! ***. All nature falls into 

proscription, and, mainly, healing nature 

Yes. God sent sickness to give man atonement 

at least part of his sins here on earth; sin hinders 

to follow the Divine Providence. In extreme cases 

                                     26 

exorcisms of the possessed are still allowed, not for that 

th, of course, to heal the sick, but is it for 

so that I can see the power of the Good God, triumphant 

over Z lym. 

    U bique daemon!" """ By the eronym, all the air is full 

demons, trembling from their cry to a and crying about the death of the gods, 

in every flower, in every tree there is a demon, because 

that he is joy and fertility, wealth and beauty. IN 

                          27 

as lutz and fera he brings the day and concludes 

with its light of Venus, evoking luxurious, voluptuous 

real dreams. The first centuries know only one religion - 

fight against the demon. 

    But the fight was not easy. 

    In a fanatical frenzy, the church attacked deep 

the most and most holy bonds that bind man to 

universe. She forcibly pulled a man from 

nature, hanging it between heaven and earth. Secret 

connections, united with nature, the human soul, spirit 

This is the absolute, the phenomenon, which depends on the mind. 

were declared by Satan insk by them, a devilish deceit 

eye. 

    People of antiquity were intimacy with nature 

the most rela tively osh en and I x. Did they live directly with 



  , * Creation of the devil. - lat. 

 .** Various evil spirits. - lat. 

**** if luoov eats, the devil eats   - lat. 

      Demon everywhere! - lat. 





                                                         24<) 



nature and in nature, they were part of it, a piece. 

nerve, showing them outwardly the slightest changes during 

dy. And if all the inventions of the human spirit are soup 

only projections of his organism, then polytheistically 

the cult was a direct projection of nature to 

all its blessing and destruction power. And zyxwvuts     kn 

the soul projects outward the mechanism of the matter, considering 

wipe it from the inside, so nature revealed itself in a powerful 

pagan cult symbols. 

    In a frantic battle, the church is torn piece by piece. 

that artery through which the blood of the earth flowed into the chelch 

century. She destroyed the unconscious selection of nature ( 

dy, manifested in beauty, strength and power; she ochrl 

n Yala everything that nature wants to reject, against which 

she rises so powerfully: dirt, ugliness, disease, k,1 

leku, castrato. The church would most willingly castrate 

the whole world, would put out the light, would give the whole earth 

a sacrifice to sulfuric rain; and her only aspiration 

I mean, her burning desire was one thing - to be promised 

The dreadful judgment has come at last. 

    But the nerve, the artery did not let themselves be destroyed so easily, 

live. Especially the people, the earth-born, still crash • 

rooted in the earth. The smallest case was used by oi , 

to return to their beloved earthly gods. 

    In the most bloodthirsty laws he poured out his fury 

Christians are against the languages of chn and k s, but Dem on n 2 8, that is, ze 

la, nature, was indestructible to them. He went into the woods, thai. 

Xia in impregnable caves, gathered there his faithful 

and celebrated wild wak khan ali and. 







    But the fanatical fury of hatred is strongest of all" 

ruled against Satan the magician, Satan the healer 

Be low and low in spirit and humble, be humble, by. 

rave, don't think! Such was the supreme law of rel>. 

gies of the dark masses. But the magician was proud, for he opposed! n 

all zak he am. Against the law of gravity, he rises 

fell into the air and did not sink in the water. If he wanted, he could 

was to throw him into the fire, and he came out unharmed •>' 

The magician was too proud to imitate. "I'm that • ' 

I can be deified by virtue,” said Theode 

from M op sues sta 2 9 . The magician despised the poverty of the spirit, for <•' 

he knew all the secrets and unraveled all the secret. P 

he determined the heirs of the kings by the stars and knew 

2 50 



the soul of all nations. The magician was a stubborn criminal 

against all laws, knowing them as a clairvoyant. Christ 

democratized his doctrine. accomplices of their 

rebellion against the Old Testament he made the settlers and 

slaves who were more children than children. Mage on- 

planted his teaching only in the proudest and most powerful 

shower ah. 

   Against this stubborn titan, a christ 

Stian's fury, hatred n is looking for their spirit, worship 

He also foresaw those who were not capable of anything but 

imitation. Already laws 

wish n ak azan and me for magic. And behold, the law follows 

om law, one stricter than the other, while under the emperor 

          31 

Valen those were not exterminated all the philosophers, between 

them and the brilliant Yamvlix 3 2, poisoned in the dark 

tse. It was enough to have a philosophical book to 

put your life in danger; avoiding this teaching 

sti, the inhabitants of the empire burned everything to n and gi. And here is the beginning 

elk terrible martyrdom of the proud children of Satan, in 

compared with which the persecution of Christians under N e- 

rone seem like cute fun. 

   By this time the Magician had become a priest. Around him 

pagan communities were taken, all remnants of paganism 

join magicians and. True, they lose their 

symbolic power, its content. No one knew, 

what the sign and symbols mean, but even here the magician found 

exit. He gave the signs a mystical meaning, which 

swarm little by little began to act like a powerful suggestion 

nie. Words whose meaning no one remembered became 

powerful magnetic means, with the help of which 

his magician established intercourse between his Lord 

lem and my soul oh. 

   The Church saw that she was punished by me and torture 

can't do anything. In her ability to imitate 

and only to imitate she turned to the "reverse delete- 

ru", to this "choc en retour", which plays such 

an important role in magic. 

   Spells have been replaced with magic signs 

Church rites. Magic spells n an and I para- 

licked with mass 33, cast out Satan with holy water, and 

if a magician in the name of Satan collected a thunderstorm, then a Christian 

He could dispel it with the sign of the cross. 

   But the longer the struggle lasted, the more 

was to give way to the church. She was forced to mix 

                                             34 

pagan cult with its own. Va k khan na li and during the holiday 

                                                        25 1 



the masses of Ceres Libera were carried in procession to the idle; 

vakh Virgo 3 5, and until the thirteenth century the people, together with St. 

puppies celebrated the oval orgiastic festivities, 

the feast of the donkey, the feast of the fools; remnants of phallic 

th cult crept into the church, the capitals of the columns from 

beaten with pornographic figures, and a favorite 

The main plot was Noah 36, committing adultery with his 

our daughters. Especially hell. God! How beautiful! 

   Here the poor brain of church scientists and theologians, who 

who so willingly and so naively and so voluminously copied 

whether each other, did not have to strain. Ai d 3' 

very much strikes the good E vsevi I 3 8 . N y yes, sometimes de 

mon may have good revelations, but still udi 

It was remarkable that I was a native speaker and knew Hell so well. 

Rabban Mavr 3 9 in his description of hell does not even forget 

F legeton, K ocyte and S ti k sa 4 0, and during all average 

                          41 

For centuries, Haron takes the boat for the boat of the Demon. 



                           *zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQ 

                               - To * 



    Demon everywhere. With atana triumphs. Before - 

only a scarecrow, a means of strengthening the power of the church - - 

he now becomes the almighty master whom 

the world is afraid and tries to propitiate. almost afraid 

breathe so that the evil spirit does not enter the body. On Thursday 

In that century, the monster sect of the Massalis appeared 4 2 . 

who consider themselves possessed by the devil; they are demon 

constantly beating in all directions, shouting, spitting, 

writhing in terrible convulsions in order to defend themselves 

from the unclean, whose name is "legion". 

    Satan takes on a thousand forms. He becomes god 

in a word, he goes into the wilderness and torments the holy fathers 

with the most serious questions, he sows in their souls thousands of 

opinions and hesitation, he goes to monasteries and excites 

the tormented brain of the monks in the most seductive form 

n and i mi, he visits virtuous wives at night, from 

takes away from them their will and reason and compels them to shamelessly 

the worst depravity; it intrudes into the brains of many thousands 

the faithful and cry out wild curses and blasphemy. 

    The church was almost unable to defend itself from Sa 

Tans. Exorcisms occupy more and more of the breviaries and 

more space. And one mass did not take place with such 

splendour, as was the case with exorcisms; Not 

decide to undertake more religious ceremonies 

ny, without first disenchanting all the corners of the church 

252 



in and. Under Pope Sixtus V4 3, demonic spells are cast out yes- 

same from an Egyptian obelisk, before putting 

it in R and me. 

    What is more fiercely fought on the part of the church, 

the stronger Satan becomes. Obsession overpowered 

wails, Satan mocks the church with roaring voices 

themselves obsessed, he performs miracles in front of crowds of 

roaring. He reveals to the priest and his secret sins, 

he foretells things that really come true 

sue, he lifts the body of the possessed into the air and stitches 

throws him with all his might to the ground, without causing him any 

the slightest harm. 

    The Church seizes on the most desperate means. Co- 

quite rightly assuming that every strong 

passion predisposes a person to obsession, it 

forbids the slightest manifestations of passion. Every 

passion has its demon; if passion is killed 

kill the demon. 

    The world is in despair. How to defend yourself from Satan and his 

temptations? How to protect yourself from forever, hourly 

lingering lustful hallucinations, from thousands of products 

wailing and xia, laughing voices that Satan on- 

rules against God? Every thought is a sin; girl, 

unconsciously calling out the amorous sighs of a young 

neck, sins, and already by this alone, according to the saint 

K and pri ana, loses her virginity. Woman who 

beautiful, unconsciously sins, because as a result of beauty 

her honeycomb she became like a sickle, with which Satan 

                                44 

reaps his harvest (Anselm). M onah, whom the demon 

distracts from the cross, sins, for it causes impotence in 

fight. The husband sins if the matter of childbearing is given 

more interest than love for God. M he ahin me, 

washing more than twice a month, sin it. All- 

du sin, eternal damnation everywhere; one thought, one 

with his only act you lose the right to heaven and 

you fall into the power of Satan. To the one who once fell 

Satan's power, there is no salvation. And even the holy confessions 

they say that many devils despise e-zorcisms and co- 

everyone is not afraid of them. 





   And at this time of mass psychosis, contagious 

thero-epilepsy, spreading with terrible speed 

throughout the world, at this time, when hourly 

expect peace and live in wild despair before 

                                                      253 



approaching the Last Judgment, there is faith in Para 

poor, triune S atan y- An ti hri sta 4 5 . 

     And the time when he was to reign is already near 

zilos. I n tem pore saeviet *, says Kip prian, and Lak- 

tanci claims that the time has already come. 

     The most terrible assumptions of the kings about 

An ti christ. He is a man of sin, he is the son of whiteness, without 

lawyer, scolder, criminal. He was born from pa- 

py and bitches to uby, and whether from "mund issim am eretrice et 

crudelissimo nebulone"**. Sin is his poetry, but it is great 

in sin. Everything that Christ taught, he will overthrow, everyone 

sin will raise to virtue. He will rise to heaven 

will make an entrance to the church "and orders the Lord to glorify himself 

house. He will order to kill the servants of Christ and the 

with loud and proud lips exclaims: “Their blood is on us and 

                     46 

children of ours" . He will perform miracles greater than 

the Son of God did not do it. And his power will be, to the act of that, oh to 

Toroy sk azan ov k n ige Iova, 41: "N ichyu vlast n a zemlje 

cannot be compared with the power of one who is created in such a way that 

is not afraid of anything; who sees everything exalted and the kingdom- 

no need for all sons ami high sok om eri i »4 7 . 

     And the Antichrist came. But not the Antichrist material 

nogo domination, but the Antichrist of the spirit, pride and led 

chi ya : divine Mani 4 8 . 

     Satan is not tired of rampaging epic 

leptics, he was fed up with living in the debauchery of a monastic 

dreams, the stupid game of exorcisms is no more fun 

la la him. He wanted to become God, God, earlier than 

to be able to produce a real Antichrist. B o 

gom in the realm of the spirit, proud, wild to and m Against God, who 

who would push the Son of the Good God back into his 

the realm of the invisible. 

     And so, said Man and, eternally a holy wisdom: there is 

two gods, equally strong, equally powerful and opposite 

false: the invisible God of goodness, who reigns in heaven, no 

baking about the earth and living and only for perfection 

their own and elected n and k s; and there is another god, the God of Sin, who 

Roy rules the earth. There is no sin, for sin also happened 

walks from God, like virtue from another, carelessly 

God, who says: “do not strain, imitate 

wait for me only.” 



      Soon he will be rampant. - lat. 

      an unclean harlot and a most terrible villain. - lat. 





254 



   Gnosis s 4 9 and Man and Cheist 5 0 spread as 

fire cord, throughout Christendom, 

and for the first time the question arises: the church or the mani- 

heystvo, a fairy tale about free will or reality 

determinism, meaningless imitation or self- 

everyday fantasy and mysticism, submissive slavery or 

proud sin in the name of Satan, Satan's nature 

dy, Satan's curiosity and Satan's passion. 

   The church has won again. In a three-century struggle, Satan 

was forced to surrender. His first grandiose, en- 

tychrist Avi nyo n 5 1 was destroyed with terrible cruelty 

well, and Satan blasphemes in gloomy despair. 

   “I am the God of Light!” You, God of vengeance, have cast me down, 

because I was light. Your jealousy of my beauty 

to my brilliance and light was more than my might- 

property, but be afraid of me now, be afraid of my pride and 

hatred of the mighty. I, the eternal light, do not sleep, 

and my children, whom I nursed with eternal light, neither 

when they don't sleep. But your children, who do not see the light, are afraid 

shining lights, your children, crawling in low servility 

at your feet, your children, tired of fighting 

me, I must sleep. Look! I k n i z among k n i zey, 

I treat them, I dance with them. 

   B beware! 

   Millions of mine I have sacrificed for revenge, still darling 

I will sacrifice lions, I will sacrifice millions more 

I willingly, for millions are only fertilizer for that 

of the One who will give birth to the One. 







   And the revenge of Satan came. He entered the ground and 

the earth became possessed. 

                    52 

   In the thousandth year, mankind began to despair 

in God. Signs and wonders have been done on earth. 

   The army of Otto Vely to th 5 3 saw the fading sun. 

yellow, like shaff ran. In the name of the devil himself 

visited Pope C and lionestra 54; the seasons have changed 

its sequence: it snowed in the spring, 

a thunderstorm broke out in the middle of a frosty winter. "Saint 

fire "devoured the meat of people, scorched by shreds 

it fell from the bones, the earth went mad, and people 

turned into beasts. During the famine that visited that 

At the time, all countries began to eat human carrion. Go- 

lod on human meat has become a mania. P neglected 

                                                            ''5 5 



meat of animals, did not even pay attention to him 

n and i. People were supposed to devour people: so 

Lal vengeful Satan. First they attacked me 

from children, then they began to fry those who were dying in pain 

on our roads, until, at last, a man was found, re 

sh and vsh and y xia openly sell human meat. And an ox 

to and appeared in countless flocks from the forests and 

whether those who were still alive. And the great country 

reigned over the earth, that it would be deprived of a population. It 

prelates and elders of cities gathered and discussed 

whether, how, at least, to keep alive 

n it w and x, so that humanity does not die out! 

    In vain they tried to propitiate God, in vain they angrier 

our enemies swore to each other in "treuga dei" *, vanity, 

kings, wearing a crown and with a scepter, sang along with the singers 

My prayers full of despair and I are all in vain. 

     If God does not help, Satan must help! And on 

began to blaspheme God, to trample his St. body, op 

left his holy sign. Satan's harvest has begun 

Long enough he whispered, mocking, to the desperate 

Xia: “Look how merciful your God is! Can't you see 

know that he has already cursed you and know more about you 

wants? » 

    Well, if we are good for you, then nothing else will 

Maybe. Allons"*, let us surrender ourselves entirely to Satan. 

    Christ shed his blood for the good of mankind 

Heh! B lago?! What is good if people have to 

to fatten each other, if the earth is like a red-hot jelly 

zo, burns the legs, and the plague rots the meat on the bones. 

    May this blessing be ridiculed three times! What on-, 

the good that is to come after this is earthly.' 

hell; in the end, this is the future good - roofing felt 

a dream, like everything that was promised by the Good here on earth 

that. And look! Church, the holy bride of Christ, sta 

la a whore, and I sell myself to her, leading a pose |. 

the worst trade. 

    At this time when it was a shame to be "without land" 

when there were no landless masters, the land was something 

n inalienable. It is indivisible, like a person, and must 

remain indivisible. She passes to the eldest son 



    Divine truce. - lat. 

    Well, Zh R. — f r. 



     What was left for the other classes to do? And so, 

Why did the church exist? The Temple of God has become 

the synagogue of Satan, that father who needs the dirtiest 

my passion is to create evil. 

     The innumerable children of barons and dukes became 

abbots and bishops. The people were convened and here: “you- 

take it or..." The people never expected this "or", he 

chose. Atto de Verseille tells how six 

                   05 

ok year old child was chosen as the highest zealot of souls 

many thousands of sheep. He climbed into a chair, muttered 

a couple of phrases from the atechism and was declared a bishop. 

And sometimes the child forgot his phrases. Well, then they took 

to the aid of a dove, which suddenly landed on him 

head: and this was an even more auspicious sign. 

    At the same time, the whole world was scanned by the respectable 

ny successors of St. Peter. Two women see off 

                                      56 

children of their beloved in papas. The fates of Christ 

                                 57 

The kingdoms are ruled by the son of a Jew             and a twelve-year-old 

boy. 

     The merciful father of sin is pleased. Now he's sure 

in the fortress of his dominion. The church changed its mind. Re- 

church forms! to rich chi t the whole world. And Pope Gregory 

      58 

VI I     embarks on reforms. W omen, oh, again 

woman must be destroyed by the church. With di- 

with which jealousy proclaims the fanatical monk-papa- 

n a 5 9 celibacy. The monk himself, he restores the Mona- 

hov against the white clergy. M onah throws his 

torches to the people, and now the terrible terror begins. 

The destructive instinct of the people, this eternally hungry 

the bottom of the beast, expands boundlessly. Was there a better 

an opportunity to take revenge on the bloodsucker who went on a rampage 

against the people is a thousand times worse than the owner of the 

what? And the people rush to the priests, who 

stubbornly desperate n and I refuse to let go of my 

Wives, they are driven from the altars, showered, maimed or torn 

into parts. The people trample, desecrate, spit on what 

which until recently was sacredly revered. 

     Nature is raped, the church repels women 

disgust, like an unclean animal, satanic 

snake, as the embodiment of the eternal death of a man. Fana- 

the typical madman Pietro Damian and 6 0 travels all over Italy 

leah, and in countless sermons, falls upon 

Женщину: “I am addressing you, cume 

Paradise, bait of Satan, poison of souls, sword of 

hearts, hoopoes, jewels, owls, wolves, blood gsues insa- 

9- 3400                                                 257 



tiables ... "*". Theologians announced that they should stay away from 

neigh from women, because the earth has enough population 

Lena and will die soon anyway, and Peter Lombard 

c and y 6 1 establishes how the basic provision is that 

marriage is a sin, in extreme cases, permissible. 







    The church coped well with nature. Holy 

to be torn from his wife so that he indulges inexpressibly 

hypocritical sexual swine. His marriage was dissolved 

bent, and now he begins to cuckold men 

his flock. But, as already mentioned, there was celibacy 

carried out almost everywhere. 

    Now the church had yet to deal with 

mom. If earlier it was forbidden to explore nature 

God, now, in general and in everything, they forbade 

go to the mind. 

    Each word corresponds to an idea, and each idea 

there is a being. Therefore grammar to a is logic, 

and logic is knowledge. 

    This got rid of the mind. If the idea exists 

Well, you don't have to explore anything. Worth only 

contemplate the world in your thoughts, and you already contemplate 

subtle and real. 

    They gave up thinking and enthusiastically began to 

                                                    62 

rush at a few passages of Aristotle, which 

                           63 

which Haroun al Rashid has just translated into Arabic 

Russian language. And so, they comment on poor Aristotle, 

write long comments on comments, kale 

chat excerpts, make the language of Christians different, outpost 

let him subtly prove the divinity of Slo 

wa, to predict his martyrdom at: the whole si- 

the theme of Christian doctrine is found developed and 

philosophically justified by Aristotle. Empty head 

Avicenna 6 4 becomes the prince of thinkers; two devils 

fetal mules both became great scholars of the church 

        65 

Foma       thinks about the psychology of angels, and Dun1 

       66 

Scot invents the fabulous "machina cogitationis" "*" • 

if the dream corresponds to being, then the word corresponds 



     I appeal to you, outcasts of paradise, Satan's private household, poison d \ sh 

sword of hearts, dochgomanes, christians, owls, votchitsy, insatiable 

leeches - fr 

     a machine that can think - tat 





258 



subject! Fabulous! N o next: all combinations 

words are combinations of things and realities. Unite 

words mean to know. This connection is defined 

known formulas, gives us machines for 

I think so. 

    To think without thinking is what the Church decided. 

    Satan is a philosopher who created dizzy- 

the most philosophical systems of the East 67, who found 

satisfaction in the poetic refinements of Plato- 

na 6 8 , Satan, who crushed mani- 

Heiian heresies are the best heads of the faithful, with evil satisfaction 

smiles indulgently at this childishness. 

     “But how,” he asks the church scholars. 

nyh with an indescribably sly wink, - how 

will it happen if a man drags a pig to the market? Who is here 

pulling, man or rope? 

     A whole century painfully racks its brains over 

this question. Opinions were divided, and the most resourceful 

You stupid athletes cannot resolve this issue. 

     The machine for thinking broke thinking, and the church 

the cow breathed a sigh of relief. But at that very moment, 

when the church calmly wanted to surrender to its quiet 

mu and tender work, the collection of tithes, breaks out 

                              69 

terrible storm. Abel R         allows herself a little 

a word: “And the idea is not being, abstraction is not re- 

ality". 

     To handsome and majestic, to like a god, so, by 

according to the chroniclers, in all of France there were no 

                                                   70 

a woman who could resist him, not- 

usually a scientist for his time, armed 

brilliant gift of eloquence, Abelard began to speak, 

as a person, to people. He developed and popularized 

terrifying emptiness of church teachings, and came to 

new unexpected conclusions that overturn 

gave all the teachings of the church. 

                     71 

      If Anselm wanted to believe in order to know, then Abelard 

 I wanted to test and learn in order to come to faith. 

      Sin is not in the deed, but in the intention. Hence, 

 there is no sin, but there is k ara. But why all the work saved 

 niya? It was an act of love. God wanted to restore the law 

 love, and therefore sent his Son to earth. 

      It was a terrible heresy for that time, but fi- 

 Abelard's philosophy spread with terrible speed 

 stu throughout Europe; at his feet sat the color of the then 

 intelligentsia, from which subsequently stood out 

9*                                                   2 59 



two popes, twenty cardinals and fifty bishops 

Church philosophy penetrates the people. Abelard teach zyxwvu     • 

incessantly that everyone should express their thoughts 

according to your mind; spiritual power of the church 

was broken; everyone started to make new conclusions 

niya. Great and small, scientists and ignoramuses, yes, even children 

they talked about the sacred and the secret, and St. Bernard 

complains in his denunciations about Abelard: "lrredetm 

the faith of the simple, they had eviscerated the secret from God to him, the questions of df 

He is deeply concerned with these matters. 

                             72 

    Arnold of Brescia, the most gifted of students! 

Abelard, rebels against the papacy, he wants a transfiguration. > 

to build a church like the first Christian communities. 

    With wild enthusiasm, the people listen to his disciples. 

about the power of the church, which should be only spirits 

noah, as Christ wanted it, and for the first time it is distributed 

the unheard-of battle cry: “Rome must be free 

nym!" Pope Lucius II 7 3 is put to death, and his successor 

Eugene III 7 4 must run to hide from on 

native anger. 

    The kings of Castile are ordered to translate all of Aristotle 

and Arabs and Jews with pantheism come to their retinue 

            75                             76 

Averroes         and the subtleties of Kabbalah. Under cover 

                                          77 

Emperor Frederick II,             Arab doctors 

allow themselves the unheard of - to open humanly " 

corpse, and Friedrich II, freethinker and atheist, witty 

and a subtle philosopher, asks, smiling, Muslims 

"Gentlemen, what do you think of God?" 

    The spirit of skepticism and unbelief embraces all human beings. 

quality. "I" comes forward with drunken enthusiasm. All di 

prove and, at the same time, refute the proven, consider 

concealed by his greatest philosophical art, and CHMOI 

de Tournay, having expounded the truth of Christian teaching, 

suddenly exclaims: “Ah, petit Jesu s, petit Jesus, 

how I have raised up your law! If I wanted, I could still <1 

better put it down!”**. 

    Richard the Lionheart 7 8 declared himself brother of Mr. 

                                   79 

the weapons of Sultan Malek - Adel and offered him a 



   * The faith of the truthful is ridiculed, the mysteries of God are destroyed, in: 

                                                                  1 1 

dews associated with the most majestic things, everyone is discussed! .' 

with recklessness. - lat. 

  ** Oh, little Jesus, little Jesus, how I exalted the law of TBOI" 

But if I want, I can lower him more than raise him up. 

— FR- 





260 



my sister Henry II 80, King of England, Gro- 

told the pope that he would accept Mohammedanism, and the king John 8 1 

laughing at the church. 

   A man of the 11th century despises the church, he thinks so- 

I know that the kingdom of the Son has ended and that the time has come 

St. Spirit. Messiah succeeds messiah, innumerable 

sects, man no longer seeks God, he has found our 

Him within himself, God speaks through his mouth. 



                           *   *   * 



    In this era of hitherto unheard-of power of the individual 

dual aspiration, at this time of disbelief and spill 

instincts, a terrible reaction ensued after the failure 

dacha crusades. God was sleeping at that time 

Muhammad showed his power in the victories of the Muslims. 

The troubadours sang melan holistic songs in which 

blamed God for treason, for the fact that he patronizes 

Muslims against Christians, and even St. Louis 

then th 8 2 warns God to give it to the people 

calmly get to the homeland, "qu'il ne suit con trein t 

deny your holy name”*. 

    But the warning did not help. Instead of 

stop terrible tortures, God brought down even more pain 

great torment on desperate humanity. N people is 

feces of only a suitable occasion to completely 

fall from H him. And the case came. 

   From the Slavic Satan, who, along with the Good Bo- 

gom, as an equal principle of n t and p and evil rules 

world, Black god 8 3 or the devil, got ready to go to 

to shake the foundations of the church with iron studs. 

    From Bulgaria, via Constantinople and Italy 

go bogomi ly 8 4 and are based, having greatly thinned out on 

way, in the south of France. 

    The south of France has long been the promised land of all 

some heresies 8 5 . It was Satan's favorite residence. 

It was the classic soil of sorcery and witchcraft and 

from here, later, the plague of witchcraft spread 

throughout Europe. The whole south was crowded with Jews and 

racin ami. Rabbis everywhere had open 

schools and served as a connecting link between the Arab 

bami and christian ami. Through them penetrated from 



    otherwise he will agree to renounce your holy name.zyxwvutsrqponmlkj 

                                                          - fr 



                                                           261 



Salerno and, in particular, from Cordoba, different knowledge, 

so generously used for criminal purposes: de 

styles, syrups, ointments, the first surgical instruments 

rumenty, Arabic numbers and phrases, arithmetic and algebra. 

    At the same time, a great influence on a completely price < 

Christian-minded people had Kabbalistic 

Jewish teachings. Already in the magical rooms of Ashmi 

                                                          8 

give me wonderful recipes, how to call Smae la ' 

(cf. Samiel German their fairy tales) and force him to 

meadows. Naturally, it served only evil purposes. Be 

any power given to him by God, and his servants are devilishly 

Lys (Satanim) always live in a person and tempt him. 

    Here on the grand and European and significantly superior 

its mystical culture of the East re-seeding 

the old Manicheism poured out in a rejuvenated form, and from 

here Satan began his monstrous triumphal neck 

action across Europe. 

    Contrary to the teaching of the Church that good is the only 

the basis, but evil only joined it, as 

something accidental, through the sin of mankind and in essence 

of its own means only an exception, new manichei, ka 

containers, teach: good and evil are equally substantial 

n s; both, although opposite, but equal to su 

essential, and this opposition goes deep into 

the very roots of being and extends even to God 

thing. 

    Sin, therefore, is not the fault, the product of freedoms. 

noah will, it is not repeated, as a consequence of free 

akta, but there is the work of the Black God. No, it means sin, 

since an evil deed is a consequence of the desire and I of the Evil Bo 

ha, eternal damnation is a ridiculous invention, worthless 

confession and repentance are funny and funny, for repentance is 

a barely evil deed is just as useless as “if dogs 

                                            87 

bitten by a stone,” as Nietzsche would say. 

    Here we are in full satanism!* 

    But just as they recognize the Good and Evil God 

they also separate the spiritual from the corporeal in man. That 

Scrap man belongs to the Black God, soul - 

Light. 

    And so a division occurred in the sect: those who decided 

Xia to follow the Light God, did you live in an incredible strp 

guests of morals and deadly asceticism, they were jealous 

  and 

      Full satanism! - f r. 





262 



distributors and distributors of the sect, they were worshiped, 

to the saints, and they had power by a mere imposition 

hands to purify a person in his dying hour and betray 

him into the hands of the Good God. 

    Others, swearing to the Evil God, founded 

secret societies and celebrated in forests, caves and 

on the tops of the mountains their dark, carnal mysteries. 

    Thus the opposition between the Christians is repeated. 

anism and paganism within the same sect, 

but this time the opposition is necessary and sanctified 

puppy teaching. 

    Possessing the eastern secrets of magic, "perfect 

shennye” 8 8 , “perfecti”, performed strange miracles, and 

The sect spread at an alarming rate. Educational 

there were thousands of small and x sects, which all, under the name 

German k atar o v 8 9, decomposed and destroyed the Christian 

faith: secret communities were founded that persecuted 

exclusively frivolous goals. Little by little lost 

exclusively philosophical and speculative core of manipulative 

Hei doctrine, but the main feature remains, in it 

converge all the various sects - wild, fanatical 

Skye, brought by cruel persecution to the 

9 0 . 

    They especially hated the God of the Old Testament 9 1 . 

He, in their opinion, was unjust and untruthful. 

After all, he knew that Adam and Eve would die from the tree of 

knowing why did he give them a taste? But he didn't say 

truth, for the forefathers did not die! He killed without 

boron. He let the guilty and the innocent perish in So- 

house and Gomorrah, etc., etc. 

    Christians do not say that the Good God suffered on 

earth on the cross. This is a profanity, they said 

• perfecti”. How can God suffer, how, in general, He 

can descend to earth if the earth already belongs to 

one God? How can God eat and drink what he did 

Christ? What about sin? Hehe, what is the difference between the functions of qi and 

sex glands from func to c and th gastric? If we don't 

we sin with food and drink, then how can we sin 

Detorojdeniem? No one can sin from the navel and 

below!* 

    Terrible was the wrath of the Cathars against the Church. R im - 

priton razboin ikov, R im — apok alypsichesk aya blud- 



    No one can sin from the womb and the umbilical cord. - lat. 





                                                            26 3 



the nation that is written about in the Apocalypse ... Well, in this 

they weren't so wrong. They swore at the priest 

and kill them wherever they came across 

hands ; used sacred objects for the most 

dirty targets, and much of their ritual 

is exclusively a parody of the Catholic 

to ult 9 2 . 

    In their meetings, in their parody masses - already 

the shabash is completely transformed, even in detail. In pos- 

today's Sabbath, it is hardly possible to find a new detailed 

ness, except for the heightened ecstasy caused by 

artificial means of stimulation. 

    Upon acceptance and every neophyte had to renounce 

from the Catholic religion, spit on the cross, refuse 

                                           93 

from baptism and chrismation. After that, everything 

scolding kissed him, and they laid hands on him 

lo vu 9 4 . 

    The church was powerless against a sect that grew from 

moving speed. She was well organised, 

had a powerful pope in Toulouse and kept a cathedral in 

Lee o ne 9 5 . The inhabitants of Languedo 9 6 beat the priests, for- 

setting them up for ridicule and serving mass, tore at them 

liturgical robes and adorned women with them. 

"Hugo the carpenter just from the altar cleaned the ven trem and in 

then he wiped his posterity with the altar cloth"*, po- 

narrates a chronicle and a story about one of the fanatics. 

    And so they began to preach a crusade against 

                               97 

heretics. St. Dom and n and k, the creator and n to the vision, was 

assigned this matter. He, tireless sad ik, spilled 

who poured tears during prayer, became one of 

the most cruel executioners, as the world history remembers 

ri i . At the head of the crusade was Count Simon de 

Monfor 9 8, the greatest Christian of all the princes, most 

whose stvo was to the Atars. 

    And so the terrible massacre began. 

    When taking and Bezier, 60,000 people were massacred, 

Christian and Catholic, indifferent. «Caedite omnes, novit 

enim D eus, qui su nt ejus!" "" shouted Abbé Sito, when 

Yes, they wanted to spare the Christians. He asked for forgiveness 

niya at the pope Innoc entia III, that he could only kill 

twenty you s i h 9 9 . Women and bodies fled to the forests and mountains; only 



     Master G\go cleansed his intestines zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZY 

                                             at the altar and, in the know 

contempt for God;,, wiped his ass with an altar cloth - chat 

      Kill all, for the Lord knows his own' - tat 





2 b4 



to the Ark Assons remained. But no one dared to protect - 

sh ut Karkasson. Hundreds were hanged and five hundred 

          100 

zhzhen about . 

                   101 

    Albigoyts       scattered and fled to the castle and nobles 

n s. But oh, one by one, the fortresses were taken. 

    When the castle was taken, Minerva promised life to those who 

will turn. However, they were burned. S'il m ent il n' aura 

that he deserves, if he really wants to be converted, the 

feu expira ses pechesl*. This was the usual formula 

with this too frequent procedure. 

    The knights of the Holy Spirit killed, hanged, burned, 

popped not one single person, but hundreds and thousands of chi. Under 

Lavour - several hundred "avec un e joie extreme" *", 

near Morillac and Toulouse - twelve thousand "avec 

unspeakable joy”***. 

    The entire south was destroyed. There was no stone left 

to amn e. All the castles were demolished, the counts and barons 

shens or burned, and noble ladies, out of gallantry, 

                       102 

beaten to a m n i m and . 

    The Church considered itself triumphant. oh never 

Satan did not feel more powerful than 

Now. Destroyed and whether only the form of his church, but what 

means for him a visible form? In their hearts 

the clan remained faithful to him, he disappeared into the underground cata- 

combi, hid in mountain gorges and never before 

did not worship him so sincerely, so criminally, 

right now, after the fall of the anti-Christian Tulu- 

    103 

zy. 

    Hardly fell silent on the fires of the last, foaming boxes 

the poison of the fortune of the Albigensians, how proud and powerful 

the new priestess of the devil raised her terrible head, 

witch... 





   But the soil should have been well cultivated in advance 

tan oh, maybe more should have seemed 

poisonous seedlings so that the plague can spread 

as quickly as possible. 

   An old allegory tells that Satan decided one 

once again take a woman to multiply your offspring 



     if he is lying, then he will get zastugs, if he is sincere 

Wants to turn, then the fire will cleanse him of sins - fr 

     with extreme joy. - f r. 

     with unspeakable joy 





                                                          2b 5 



in. He united with Godlessness and gave birth from her 

daughters. When they grew up, he married them off, 

of people. Elder, Pride, he gave the mighty of this world 

Avarice - rich, Infidelity - mob, Envy - 

artists (critics were not known then), Vanity - 

wives and n am. The seventh daughter, Blud, was left alone 

Satan did not give his beloved daughter to anyone, he left her ( 

for all. 

    And, it seems, people have never been so crazy eq 

salted, as by the end of the historical XI-II century. 

    Hystero-epilepsy was then as common as 

in our days, consumption; almost every person was a little 

lepers, and it is known that lepers have special 

but the thirst for sexual satisfaction is strong. Succubat and 

the incubat destroyed ali anemic humanity, everywhere 

women were visible, who suddenly threw themselves to the ground, 

lifted their skirts and writhed in sexual convulsions. AND 

this sexual hysteria was only fed even more 

niem albigotsev 1 0 4, deeply penetrated and ksh and m into the people: “nemc 

he can sin from the navel and below" *. 

    The priest and went even further. They taught that 

every deed of a saint is holy, and that the priest sanctifies 

spares all the women with whom he sins. These theories 

were so popular that the people in Spain and France 

called the monk “consacrees”, i.e. metressa- 

the priests. 

    Influenced by these teachings, the church moved towards 

                                                           105 

to its complete disintegration. Fran ciscan Ed R u g o             t 

marks in his days evn and k ah proof of a terrible 

the depravity of the monasteries, and the stories of St. B er 

t and n a 1 0 6 are filled with both and m and terrifying stories 

about monastic life and what was common in the Middle Ages with 

Domia seems innocent in comparison with all this 

bavoi. 

    The church was boundlessly humiliated, ridiculed, but 

the last blow was dealt to her by Philip Krasivy 1 0 7 . He times 

destroyed to the roots that insignificant authority, as 

still remained at the church in the eyes of the people. 

    In the midst of people, and health hawsh and x from hunger, in the midst of MI 

n archy, decomposing and hsya from a lack of money, in an era- 

when every king had to become false and 

coiner, the church alone possessed immeasurable 



   * No one can sin from the umbilical cord and the womb. - lat. 





266 



riches. In Germany, the bishop was knyaz, who could 

maintain an army, in England the church owned half 

all over the earth, the same thing happened in France. 

    To onf to look for a church, such was the universal sword 

              108 

that. Edward I       incited soldiers against the clergy 

and forbade the judges to accept his complaints, and Philip 

The rasivy imperiously demanded either a tenth or a fifth 

the immeasurable income of the church. 

   On the throne of St. Petra was sitting at the time of perjury- 

   u           1 software               o 



n y and dvokat 1 and 9, who received very sad news 

ness thanks to a very dubious critique, wild 

atheist, un and zhavsh and th church with dirty blasphemy, 1e 

peret tres fecond*, Pope Bonifation VI II. 

    The church could be scolded and ridiculed for how long 

whatever, dad himself did it, but as for the requirements 

tithes from him, no, he could not allow this. 

Pope issues one bull after another against Philip 

To the racist. The answer to n their dad gets from N ogar, to an - 

tsler F and li p p a; in this answer between other beautiful 

your words say: "Sedet in cathedra beati P etri 

master of lies making himself, since he is omnipotent 

an evil-doer, to be named Bonifacius"** 

   Pap is on a rampage. N ogar and Colonna go to R and m, 

to personally convey the answer to him. Hell octogenarian- 

the old man is mocked at him, insulted by him, 

most of them curses and when he dares 

boil, iron glove and N ogaré slaps 

to the deputy Hr i s ta 1 1 0 . 

   This overflowed the measure of people's patience. People 

frees the pope, whose mind is clouded. Pap a yes- 

give the people a remission from all sins, except for blasphemy 

wa, and dies possessed by the devil. "You will rise to 

the throne, like a fox; you will rule like a lion, and mind- 

you’re slashing like a dog, ”said his predecessor about him. 

                            111 

p a p a nick 

   The church is sinking deeper and deeper. Benedict XI 1 1 2 , 

successor to B he and fac and i, issues a rabid bull on June 7 

excommunication, and on July 4 he is already dying. He was poisoned. 

   His death finally gives the church into the hands of Fi- 

lippa K beautiful. Philippe appoints Bertrand de 



     very prolific father - fr. 

  "" On the pulpit of blessed Peter sits a false teacher who 

who, being an absolute sorcerer, orders to call seoy Bo- 

I'll do it. — lat. 



                                                            2 b7 



  113 

Go, Bishop of Bordeaux, Pope under strict condition 

to which he was to swear. 

    New Pope Kliment begins his glorious reign 

journey, during which he robs and robs 

wherever he can, and ruins the entire French clergy 

His mistress Brun Issen da Talleyrand de P erigorstoy • 

more than all the crusades put together 

    N o tithing from the income of the church, which Klimen • 

undertook to pay Philippa, does not satisfy the short 

la . Papa gives him the Jews. The operation was made 

day fast. Under the protection of the pope, the king reduced 

coins and raised their price. P happened unheard of; 

confused itza, it came to an uprising, after which the king npii 

to hang several hundred of the main screamers of the cart * 

around the walls of Paris. 

    But the king was not enough, but what papp agreed to 

The king wanted more: he is plotting against papa B o t ' 

facies accusation of heresy. 

    THIS was a fatal situation. If pap a Bonifg> 

tsy was a heretic, then his cardins were heretics 

ly, and they chose Kliment, therefore, his silt 

scolding is also invalid. 

    Kliment writhed like a snake. He tried CMHI 

nominate the king by appointing new cardinals, put 1 

thus the choice of any future pope depends 

bridge from the eagle; Eighteen-eighth B onifation VIII 

which gave the king permission for all kinds of sacrilege, 

he gave his son F and li p p a the title of King H of Avarr, zyxwvuts 

                                                          l 

also made his brother Charles Valois head of the knights 

By the way. 

    Still not enough1 

    The process against B he and fac and i was postponed, but pap.' 

was supposed to give the king there p lier about in 1 1 4. 

    Destruction of this Order, process, hindsight •; 

launched against papa Bonifacia VI II, wild bl \ '\u003e 

the popes in Avignon led the people into a terrible outrage 

we. 

    Satan, I used to do my work only through ma 

gov, living in several secret communities, a hundred. 

now the only god. Man Yichean traditions 

again they give a magnificent color, its power becomes white *, 

boundary. 

    Everything that could not be expected from God was demanded from Sagas.' 

n s. God has kept all his gifts for the other world! • 

world, nothing but torment, he sends to this world 

268 



    This is where Satan comes in to help. He alone was 

who could give strength to the weak, honor to the humiliated, revenge 

offended, reciprocity - loving. He was alone 

father and god of the poor, the afflicted, the despised. 

    He is everywhere, in every house, at every step he meets 

a man, it is sold even in corked bu- 

ah on the market to ah and he fabulously breeds for it 

time. H about the calculation of Bodinus 1 1 5 , the population of hell is 

put 72 princes and 7,405,926 simple devils. 

    Complaints are pouring in. Bishop of True, Gishar, around 

who gave Philip's wife a wax image, which 

                                                    116 

which he pierced with nails, was burned. Daughter-in-law F i- 

lippa, Margarita, was accused of magic and bro- 

shena to the underground prison, another daughter-in-law - Zhanna, 

strangled, and the third, Blanca, raped in prison 

assistant executioner and became pregnant from him. 

    A horrifying series of crimes follows. W hen the king 

poisoned, Phillippe 

Nistr, and to the Count of Flanders his own son. 

    And the same thing is repeated with the son of F and li p p a, Ludov- 

ke H«7. 

   Enguerrand de Marigne 1 1 8 hanged because his 

wife wanted to bewitch the king's wife. pierre de la 

tilly, Bishop of Chalon, is on the wheel, because, probably, 

apparently, he caused the death of the king by sorcery; Same 

fate     is subjected to           Raoul       de Prelle, advocatus 

praecipuus * - each bone was broken separately 

during torture. 

   Those were glorious times! Satan rubbed himself 

hands at the sight of an immeasurable harvest. 

   And zabella, daughter of F and li p a K rasi vogo 1 1 9 , actually 

manually gouges out the eyes of Spencer, her husband's favorite, 

Edward II of England 1 2 0 , and with pleasure 

vues when an offensive operation is being performed on him 

tions. When this did not help and the king could not leave sodo- 

mia, And Zabella asked Bishop Hereford what she wanted 

to fight with the king, and received the following pythic answer - 

vet: "Don't kill Eduardus tim ere good e st" 1 2 1 .zyxwvutsrqponm 

                                                             So 

as the bishop did not put a comma, the queen put 

her after occidere instead of nolite and the king was treacherously killed 

servants of his tender wife. 

   I gave another mild example. 



     eminent lawyer. - lat. 



                                                         269 



    "Gold," says Christopher Columbus in a letter to 

                   122 

Ferdy nandu         after the fourth trip, - gold 

that is a beautiful thing. And treasures are made of gold 

sh a. And from gold they do anything they want in this world. WITH 

With the help of gold, you can lead the soul to paradise. 

    Yes! Gold was needed, and gold became in 1300;, 

new god. The church turned him into a dead mate 

Ryu, in crosses, keeping and li sch a, cups. Grands of use 

whether gold is for decoration and luxury. There was no more 

just gold. Already Richard the Lionheart wanted to 

give London, but no one had gold. With a frenzy 

greedily rushed in search of gold: Raymond Lul- 

liyu 1 2 3 , Nichol Flamelyu 1 2 4 , Helm ontu 1 2 5 , it seems 

already managed to make gold, but the secret is always different 

lurked. 

    The people in particular, the people needed gold zyxwvut                 i 

whatever the price. The prince of the earth owned it. 

kept it and gave it, but for this it was necessary to give: - 

give him a shower Yes, it was a fatal subject. 

    But oh yes, it was gold! F and d, it's impure alive 

that which was in connection with the devil knew where the gold was. AND 

they rushed at the Jew, burned him, robbed him, but also his gold 

not enough. Nothing helped, I had to give 

to the devil. 

    And gold became the real antichrist, Satan 

turned to gold, made the church a corrupt fornication 

nicey, the government is a mob of counterfeiters 

kov, judges - scoundrels, priests - shameless 

covetous, the purest woman shch and n y - a whore, and 

The truest conviction is a slanderer. 

    The Templars had gold, and they destroyed them, cer 

the cow had gold and was enslaved, the Jew had gold 

lotto - and they burned it. 

    Nobles, driven to despair by bad quality 

vom coins, rush to men to a, take away from him 

everything and, if he has nothing else, put him on 

hot coals. Of course, the man buried the gold, he 

just doesn't want to give it away. 

    And the people, driven by despair to madness, revolted 

no with terrifying atrocities, inflicting unheard-of horrors" 

and falls again, thrown to the ground. 

270 



   Already in the time of St. Louis 1 2 6 crowds of men 

Coves roam all over France, robbing and killing. They re- 

they terrify the priests, they desecrate St. gifts - again the same 

most! - until they are dispersed and destroyed 

“quasi canes rabidi passim detrun cati,” says N an zhi 

with malicious satisfaction. 

   In the next generation, again the terrible peasant 

insurrection. Again it is suppressed and the men to and, after the horror 

saiyuschih pytok , poveshen y: illic vigin ti, illic trigin ti 

according to more et m in us suppen den s in the mantels et 

trees...** 

   The heaviest and most violent uprisings are repeated 

rushed to Languedoc in 1381. Throw to the rustic 

relied on nobles and priests. They took care of a lot 

curled up with us. P rière de la Bruyère, leader 

shai k i , ordered to cut off their fingers, peel off the skin 

with tonsure and then burn them a petit feu """. 

stood very badly: L'on craign ait que toute la 

gentilesse ne perit """ *, says Froissart. 

paid for centuries of suffering, for beatings and hunger, for 

know bloodlust. 

   Again the uprising was crushed with terrible brutality; 

nobility was more refined in the use of torture than 

peasants. 

   The peasant had to surrender to the devil. He is alone 

had compassion for him, he alone gave him a few 

to the hours of happiness, for he alone gave him the opportunity 

take revenge on the nobility, for whom the peasant was not at all 

man. 

   Numerous were the torments and with which the nobleman 

could the peasant here on earth redeem part of his 

sins. 

   The famous Hugo Guise made it fashionable to regale 

yang kicks and make them bark like a dog. 

   Another traditional pastime was to throw 

a peasant in a box, in which they usually put the dough, 

turn over to hell, drag his wife and rape 

put it right there on the hell. And if another child came across 

OK, then the pleasure reached its full size. 



   "who were crippled everywhere, like crazy sooak. - lat. 

  "~ there are twenty, and there are about thirty hanged on the 

villages and trees. - lat. 

 """ on a small fire. - fr. 

      We were afraid that the gate had not disappeared at all. - fr 



                                                           271 



They tied the child with a short rope to the leg to the osh and 

The more the child screamed, the more furious she became 

cat. 

   And here’s to Artyna: the men are getting out of the barrel, completely.-. 

white with agony and looking like the funniest in the world. 

clown, his wife cries and trembles all over, a child behind 

splattered with blood, torn madly to osh to oh. J us prima, 

noctis* was also a good invention to rasss 

boredom know ati. 

   True, in the sense of sexual pleasures, he was known. 

sufficiently tired, but the divine sight 

Liu e - to see the desperation of a horned husband! And if oh 

resisted, God, how funny were his cries when 

he was given a beating. And if he did not calm then 

sya, then his weight ali. 

   These were the three main amusements of the nobility, rips- 

at the first they laughed, at the second they laughed to tears, at 

the third - with the grimaces of the hanged man - straight 

burst with joy. 

   And under such and such circumstances, the people should.' 

be godly! 







    And then the time came when it seemed that the whole person 

the world has gone mad. From the plague that broke out in 134 " 

and lasted 16 months, a good human died out 

turn the population of Europe. Behind the plague came famine, people; 

ate evil spirits and dogs, "chair et trippes" "*. After that - 

again the epidemic and again the famine. All people wander from places 

in place, no one is working, everyone is in a crazy desperate 

awaiting death. “F aisons,” the rural zhp shouted 

тели, — in the woods with wild beasts. Farewell women 

and the fans! Let's do the worst we can. Let's give back 

us in the hand of the Devil”***. 

                                                   127 

    Eight hundred thousand crazy flagellans           are in the country! 

wailing all over France, the whole nation is infected with epilepsy 

plague and begins to dance and in the face of faith 



         Right on the first night. - la t. 

         hell and need. - f r . 

         We go to the forests with predatory animals. Goodbye, oh yeah! 

w and n s and children. Worst of all, we are separated. Let's surrender to r\ to\u003e 

D ya v o l a . - f r . 





27 2 



i noah death falls into orgiastic delirium, sweeping away 

I all obstacles. 

 \       Crazy people run by crazy people 

  ^k my eagle. 

        In France, the pitiful idiot Charles VI 1 2 8, having lost 

   w and th the last remnants of reason on their wild orgies avin- 

   Onsky papal court. In Bohemia, the Emperor Vac- 

         129 

   lav, whom no one has ever seen sober, 

   he's a madman, in front of whom no one was sure for 

   own life. In Portugal - a gloomy manya k don 

   P edro 1 3 0 , who went mad with longing for his deceased 

   wife. Pope Benedict XI II is expounded, and the Romans are not 

   rage against his deputy Bon and Fatz 1 3 1 . 

        They neglect all heavenly joys and do not 

   are in ecstatic orgies of terrible despair 

   hearts. “Rien ne n iest plus, plus ne niest rieu!” ~. These 

   desperate words of the widow of the murdered Duke of Orleans 

   to be the epigraph of the whole century. 

        No more king - and what's worse - no more pain 

   she pap s . Pierre O'Ber reads to the audience in Paris 

   a royal message to the people, which from now on should not 

   to obey both the Pope and the Pope of Avinyon; 

   papal ambassadors are dragged through the streets in papal tiaras, and 

   some eminent monk shouts to the greatest pleasure 

   Лению народа, «what is a sordid sordid ae om asariae 

   he would rather be kissed than Peter's mouth"**. 

       Magic gets incredible honor; Satan became 

   swirls popular and all sorts of magical arts 

   enjoy great success. In the palace of the king sobi- 

   sorcerers of all countries burrow and conjure demons, which 

   the eye is possessed by the king; on colossal frying pans 

   they burn rare herbs brought to Europe by chicks 

   gan ami; the poor king amuses himself with a magic book 

   Emerald; crush pearls and give magicians precious 

   dust, so that they can subdue the demons; all the people 

   even klir, take part in these spells n an and i x. 

   Nicola Flamel builds a gigantic laboratory that 

   to get gold; in the middle of Paris, very close to 

   the Church of Saint-Jacques, the compiler of 1 3 2 poisons makes 

   fine deeds, selling their products to dukes, and in 



      ~ Nothing exists anymore, nothing more and nothing more. - f r . 

     ** that it is preferable to kiss her behind the dirtiest slut, 

  if the mouth of St. Peter. - tat. 





                                                                             27 3 



this time the people perform on all the peaks of the ah dissolution. 

nye dances in honor of the prince of darkness. 

    Satan is no longer feared, he is loved. Even in clothes 

they imitate him. A woman wears horns on her head 

shamelessly exposes her breasts and voluptuously exposes 

life. 

    The men's dress becomes narrow and m, to the leotard i 

embroidered with magic signs ak am and. Shoes finish}, 

with a sharp claw, and the genitals are placed in special 

                                 133 

pouch to be on and in and do . 

    The chairs of the ladies are like church furniture, the beds are 

on the confessional, and the cloth in which they dress - 

on precious brocade of priestly robes. 

    The time has come. In an instant, the dia sect flourishes powerfully 

volitions, from French and it spreads 

around the world, growing and growing non-stop. Not 

became such a village where there would be no faithful and devoted 

of the community of Satan, who committed innumerable 

steps, and at night celebrating dissolute or- 

gies in honor of the Devil. 



                    Part two 

            SYNAGOGUE CULTURE OF SATAN 



    With sad resignation to the Athars, they admitted that 

matter is evil, that everything that happens through development, 

everything that exists by birth and procreation - 

lot of darkness. 

    The people fully shared this conception. After all, church 

forge herself, in her hatred of nature and instinct, 

Satan has shaped the world; and in those cunning and smart len and - 

i x, with which the church tried to save the moral 

freedom, the people understood nothing. For the people, all those 

theories about evil were mere denials, all sophistical 

sky and thought about sin and incitement to sin - 

completely alien; all this was something closed, 

over which several church fathers have troubled their brains. 

For the people, and for the whole of Christian reality in general 

Indeed, there was a very definite dualism 

between the worldly and the heavenly. One was evil, the other 

good. 

    And did evil become evil only gradually, or did it 

existed and signified, like the second infinity, until 

no one cared about this. 

    The Middle Ages know nothing about God; He is also on the 

tin ah appears next to the Son only from the 11th to the 2nd century, and 

The people gave their son to the theologians; all the Middle Ages knows 

only one religion, one fear and one hope - 

Satan. 

    Evil demons surround man on all sides, 

“as if someone dived into the sea and was surrounded from all sides 

ron, below and above with water. And sometimes they surround him 

“a tight vault, so that between them there is not even an opening 

stiya for air. “The number of demons is just as great, 

to ak and the number of atoms of the sun; in every fold of life 

sitting demon. No time and no place 

a person not protected by n and x». 

    Satan is the only true ruler of the earth 

even a person, he is not a servant, not a “monkey of God”, as 

viciously calls him Irin she, but eternally - god, sphere 

whose influence penetrates deeply into the area of white, 

infinite God, for he is the one who taught children the light 

the logo of God to arouse ecstasy in himself, he was the one who 

led the saints to the idea of paralyzing evil miracles with 

                                                    27 5 



                             1 

help "choc de retour" ", and he alone is the father of life, 

procreation, development and eternal return. 

     Not evil, but good is a negative concept. Good< 

is the denial of passion, by which everything is created, for even 

giving passion has its demon. Good is the denial of life 

nor, for all life is evil. 

     Satan is positive, eternal in himself. He 

god of the brain, he rules over the immeasurable realm of thought, 

which again and again overturns the law and breaks it 

scree sting; it kindles curiosity to guess secrets 

venous, read in the runes of the night, he gives a criminal from 

wag un and destroy the happiness of many thousands to da n 

a new one arises, it incites evil lusts, 

who, in their hunger for new conditions for the existence of an explosion, 

yut the earth, bring the remotest distances closer, bringing them together! 

heaven to earth and mix like dice, 

realm of peace. 

     Persecuted, destroyed, it grows again 

from your own ashes more powerful and more beautiful than ever 

yes either, and, eternally defeated, remains eternally defeated 

ditel. A thousand times the church thought it had destroyed 

him, and at the same time she herself became rabid and died and came to life, with 

head to toe. 

     For Satan is eternal evil, and eternal evil is life. 

     Everything that was great happened against the law 

like furious denial of denial. Z lym was stubborn 

the property of the great e pur si n iuove "', curiosity was evil 

in which drove Columbus to unknown countries, and the asterisk 

all misfortunes, hailstorms, epi- 

demy and famine. 

     Good was the pride of Gregory the Great 1, praised 

who forbade his shameful ignorance and forbade the spirit 

hovenstvo to study even grammar to at. Good was the 

the cunning naivety of St. Francis of Lysis 

go 2 that all day long I imitated mi ad raajorem Dei 

glo riam "" to ri to the donkeys standing around the manger Save 

body; good was the mortification of the will, the slightest self 

standing aspiration; good was stupid, to hell 

understood what was brought • imitatio»**"*". 

     return blow. - f r. 

     and yet it spins (words by G. Gali Tiey) - it 

     to the saint of God, - lat. 

     imitation. — chat 





2zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

 '' 6 



   In the name of Satan, Nietzsche 3 taught the revaluation of all prices 

in his name the Antichrist threatens to transform 

laws of the world, in its name the artist creates, produces 

whose speeches are read or watched in secret, but not his 

contemptible stupidity rules over the immeasurable 

crowds of people for whom the only law is su- 

existence, development, there is a crime: development in 

religions - demonic heresy, development in art - 

a sign of softening and I of the brain, development in politics - 

state treason, and development in life - naka- 

izable perversion. 







   Such is Satan in the history of human development, 

He himself is a philosopher, a demon, a hero, and all things*, 

a torch illuminating mankind's deepest 

life, the desperate thinker who is eternally 

you must draw your own, destroying the stupidity, 

circle, bezzak, he is a nickname and a rebel. 

   This Satan Samiaza is the father of magicians, "mathematicians", 

as they called everyone who was engaged in secret sciences 

to ami . He was an inaccessible, gloomy aristocrat, 

                                                        4 

who opened their riddles to them and only a few: Agri ppe, 

             5 

Paracelsus, van Dee, Helmont. Only strong yes- 

he would conjure himself, and he sent his servants 

on the ground, so that they inflate passions, sow hatred 

whistle and crimes, taught people pride and high 

mayor, infuriated their sex, so that the blood would wash away 

caution and prudence so that they wake up 

a beast that will not stop at any kind of pre- 

stepping stone to satisfy his passion. 

   In the kingdom of Satan, only one law lives, and 

rebours "", revaluation of all values consecrated for 

with a horse. 

   And the servants of Satan-Samiaz came into the world at that time, 

how he, Lucifer, the paraclete of mankind, dealt with 

magicians in closed labs by "black" secrets 

mi magic. 

   The servants of Satan soon took possession of the earth. 



    he is a philosopher, and a demon, and a demigod, and that's it. 

    law is the opposite. - f r. 



                                                       277 



    It was not difficult. The people are in their hearts.” 

I’m quite pagan and m. But the people were in despair and, were before 

driven by despair to the point of madness. He hated Christians 

and hated “the one who promised salvation and prepared 

she only torment and. But most of all people hated 

church, unfaithful, treacherous, dissolute and treacherous 

new church, which in insatiable greed extorted 

la excommunications, interdicts, curses after 

ny penny from the peasants and the last piece of land \ 

nobles in a. 

    The people despised the bishops, who in their quarrel> 

reproached each other for "adultery, depravity"zyxwvuts     v 

perjury." Synods of Tours, Arles vainly old 

fought against the immeasurable drunkenness of the clergy, oi 

hurt him at least enough to li ri k and sh 

fell off their feet during worship; from the 10th century! 

Bishop before consecration to the dignity had to swear 

Xia that he was far from the following pleasures: pro 

Arsenochita, qu. e. with a male for a handmaid consecrated to God 

which is called France Nonnata; for four feet and so forth 

muiiere - married to another man, or if she had a spouse; 

another thing called deuterogamy by the Greeks. А к ак высош 

Christians have risen up, heavenly love and meekness 

diem, testifies to the extremely characteristic and completely HI 

A single month will be the emission, which is Climent VI 

gave against Louis V April 13, 1346 6 and in co 

with which he conjures divine power to 

it would beat him (Louis) with the power of his right hand, 

followed him and plunged him into unexpected snares 

"May he be damned when he comes out, may he be 

to la t when he returns. God bless him 

madness, stupidity and delusion. May God devour him 

heavenly". After that, it is imputed to the earth that he;> 

opened up and swallowed him, then it says: “Pup 

his children will be expelled from their estates and in front of 

father will fall into the hands of enemies. 

   And at this time of constant forbidden th sacred 

Kam visit the tavern and appear drunk at the altar 

engage in unnatural debauchery, in epochs \ . 



    "in arsenochitia, i.e. with a man: with a slave dedicated to Boi 

whose name is Francis N onnata; with a quadruped and a woman, Op" 

lingering (by marriage) with another man; or else he had ta k h 

a connection that the Greeks call deuterogamy (bigamy) 

cap 





278 



when, as the introduction to a meeting says, 

“our sins have accumulated above our heads, ours and crimes 

debauchery rose to the skies, debauchery and debauchery spilled 

fornication, godlessness and murder, and the blood mortifies 

blood" - at this time, the servants of Satan were not too 

it is difficult to renounce the divine and holy, to desecrate 

take him and in the most disgusting orgies laugh at 

his powerlessness. It is easy to understand that the people did not know how to separate 

lyat personality from the subject, on each occasion threw 

used sacred objects and defiled churches 

dirt. 





     The people hated Christianity. Just imagine- 

the notion of hell and hellish punishment kept him in check. pix, 

nix, nox, verm is, flagra, binds, pus, modesty, horror*, 

who expected every Christian in a place to azn and, 

in a deep, terrible, smelling gray hole, where the devil 

they play with their souls in bast shoes, and also use a vise 

for fingers, Spanish boots, a wheel and a rack, is 

wild, unspeakably dirty idea of hell was 

the only means by which the church bound 

man in the Middle Ages. 

     The sermons almost exclusively revolved around 

the devil and hellish punishments; the priest confirmed 

fruits of his wild fantasy, relying on the Old and 

New Testament. Night gatherings of heretics and their gloomy 

the ministries provided a real ground for preaching. Ev- 

rheas and arabs spread magical arts among the people 

arts, taught the preparation of ointments, infusions; gypsies 

distributed throughout the world poisonous nap and mk and, op- 

I n I am the people; epidemic mental illness 

proceeding with terrible symptoms - all this 

led out of balance the weak brain of the peasant, and 

his rhetorical imagination was richly nourished. Ma- 

the simplest incident grew to monstrous 

sizes, the quietest noise became unheard of 

roar, and the swamp light grew to the size of a gigantic 

Gantian sun. But even if we discard the additions 

and monstrous exaggerations, yet there remains enough 

accurately factual material to draw in-depth 

   * Resin, snow, darkness, worm, whips, chains, pus, shame, \zhas   - 

Latin 



                                                            279 



some attention of a psychologist and an artist - for only 

for them I sketch out the impressions collected from running 

numerical wealth of sources. 







    Satan loves evil because he loves life, he 

hates good because he hates stagnation, survive 

denmark; he loves women, the eternal principle of evil, breath 

innovators of crimes, yeast of life. 

    And from the beginning, the woman was the beloved of Satan, 

and lovingly he used it to spread and 

strengthening your cult. 

    Already Babylon to Janam and the Chaldeans is the night side of life. 

secret, preparing the death of all things, represented 

                                      7 

lyatsya in the form of a woman, M elita, the goddess of disastrous 

voluptuousness and sexual immensity. By her people are lying 

stalked to dancing and singing, to fun, cruelty and 

murder. 

    Among the Syrian tribes hostile, vicious and destructive 

sewing deity is also female, Astarte 8 . She - 

goddess with the head and horns of a bull, the goddess of destruction 

soup wars and the mother of all their disasters. 

    The temples of Asia Minor K and Bela 9 were in some places utons 

the purest debauchery and sexual orgiism, Assyrian 

ek aya Semi rami yes 1 0 un tormented her lovers with her 

human passion, Maya 1 1 Hindus - the goddess of 

mana and lies, making it inaccessible to human 

the eye is the only thing that exists, and among the Iranian peoples the evil 

De you 1 2 have all feminine qualities: lies, slander, wasps 

twisting clean from the creation of human souls and. 

                               13 

    The Hellenes from the bosom of Gaia emanate gloomy demons 

death, and the terrible Hecate is attributed to everything terrible 

and creepy. She rushes through the air in society at night 

          14 

lam and th, sows heavy dreams and oppressive nightmares. She - 

the terrible mother of Scylla and the daughter of N Ochi. With torch and sword 

in her arms, surrounded by big black dogs, she 

drives people to madness. Demons whom the Romans 

                                   15 

feared most of all, there were str and gi. "In a vile guise, 

with a beak and claws of a bird of prey, with a large head 

howl they come at night to suck blood from de 

tei, devour the brain and entrails and fly away with noise " 

All this, as is well known, was also attributed to medieval 

witches. 

280 



     With the most terrible demon of antiquity always appears 

zkenshchina. She is the demon of death, madness, debauchery, 

obsession, crime, night terror and fear 

ghosts; as L and l and t 1 6 - she is a succubus, destroying 

shaking men into the most destructive sexual rages 

stvakh; as Golda - she is the leader of a fierce 

a strong army, a gloomy mistress, in a retinue of a cat 

a swarm of witches go to the night satanic place 

su. She is the host on the “bald mountain” and celebrates there with an evil 

coven with their Druts, deftly weaving achi hami, weaving 

weaving the yarn of misfortune. 

     Along with this night side of a woman, in ancient times 

sti, of course, was revered and her fertility, vitality 

the beginning, but always men but was protected and tn and to om life zn and from 

the designs and destructive inclinations of a woman, 

man, in essence, was known as the mother of life. 

     The Middle Ages knew only an evil woman 

personified her in Satan. But here, too, it manifested itself 

the desire of the Middle Ages for women. She could not even 

be evil in its own right. From the original wife 

of the nature of Satan, only breasts remained, hanging 

stretching, like two bags to a, to the stomach. Little by little Satan 

takes on a completely masculine appearance, and women 

they shrink to the position of a cursed slave of the devil, shamelessly 

noah procurer, producing souls for Satan and, dirty on- 

a liar, who must a limply obey the devil 

the fetal lust of an incubus. 

     While the magician could command the prince of the earth of darkness and 

compel him to discover the hidden forces of nature, 

the witch has always remained an obedient henchman, 

which comprehended only the art of sowing death and pain 

she did not use anything from a terrible connection. 

     The army of witches was well disciplined, 

kept in submission and obedience, the devil often 

beat them if they did little evil, and not one visit 

I had to moan under the yoke of the master. 

     In his immortal Hammer of the Witches, Shprenger 1 

dwells on the question why women have witchcraft 

occurs in a disproportionately higher degree than in 

men, so ten thousand condemned witches 

V 

  R poison whether one sentence falls on men y. 

     He gives many reasons for this. And it is known that su- 

there are three things that do not know the measure either in evil or 

V 

   good: the tongue, the priest - by nature something 

with 

  Rednee between a man and a woman, and a woman. 

                                                       281 



Further, women are gullible, and since, like the devil, the heads 

destroys faith, then he is most willing to 

falls on n and x. They are also due to their flexibilitatis* 

natures are more susceptible to impressions; main 

in the same way, their tongue is slippery and they cannot help but 

tell other women and us what they learn "mala 

arte"**. But deepest of all evil is rooted in a small true 

sti shy and ny, which can be proved etymologically: 

"for the feminine is called a fe and m in us because it is always smaller." 

alphabet et servat fidem"***. Sh pren ger spreads about 

vices and sins of women and n, about her jealousy and impatience, 

her ambition, voluptuousness and unbelief, her fickleness 

ve and vindictiveness. All kingdoms perished because of women 

shch and n, and with melancholic humility distressed 

the demonologist dreams of a land that would never exist without women 

would be the abode of the gods. 

    He tells to confirm his view 

on a woman the story of a man whose wife 

drowned. He was looking for her against the current, because this 

woman in life and contradicted everyone and always acted 

acted contrary to reason, so she, even after death, 

had to swim against the current. 

    Then he refers to S and r aha 1 8 , to Zlatoust 1 9 , to- 

calling marriage "eternal torture", and on Senek u2 0, go- 

speaking in one of his tragedies: “A woman or 

loves or hates, and she has nothing third. Next- 

zy women and ny - a lie, she has two kinds of tears: or true 

noah pain or deceit and deceit. If wives and on du- 

thinks alone, then she is plotting evil.” 

    Finally, the scientist and inquisitor declares: “From everything 

From this we can conclude that women in particular 

subject to the vice of witchcraft heresy, and to give thanks 

God that He guarded men from such and such vices. 

    Schprenger has greatly simplified the question. N o not look- 

to the fact that his judgments about women do not show 

great importance of the matter, all this is far from being the case 

Just. 

    Causes should rather be sought in physical features. 

news of women of that time. Immediately the gaze 

suffers from a peculiar disease, which is then called the basics 



      hyobones. - lat. 

  "" with the help of bad art. - lat. 

      they say that the word "woman" comes from "faith" and "me- 

her," for they have and retain less faith. - lat. 



282 



Vali obsession and the fetus and which were almost in 

every person of the Middle Ages. 

   Possession, demon omania was, apparently, 

only a variation of that frequent in the Middle Ages 

pain is clearly of an epileptic nature, associated 

with clairvoyance, somnambulism, accompanied 

hallucination mi and able to rise to terrible 

paroxysms that would seem to modern man 

a terrible exaggeration, if it were not for 

so well attested. 

   At the lowest level, where there is only a predisposition 

relation to this disease, the symptoms are obviously 

caused by the use of narcotics and 

ointments and, probably, were the basis for all sorts of demo- 

nic manifestations of witches. 

   A witch is born a witch. From the very beginning in it 

all bases are reversed. Top turns to n out, 

right to left, front to back. Already this one 

the vicissitude of all relationships puts a person in half- 

a contradiction with the nature of things. These first sym- 

the symptoms of possession are not painful for the witch and 

do they appear when a person does not want to 

voluntarily surrender to the devil. In paroxysms obsessively 

This vicissitude of relations stands out clearly. Body 

obsessed rolls up to the ak ball h, he gets on 

socks and throws itself on the back of the head and face, so that the back 

arched. Suddenly the situation changes: in 

for a moment the possessed lies on his back, so that his hands 

and his legs are entwined at the top. Hair stand up 

Bom, as if they want to scatter. He always backs off 

backwards or it circles without rest, from right to left, 

face out. 

   In moments of ecstasy, the witch is characterized by unheard of 

resourcefulness and flexibility. Its members may 

weave to like flexible rods, her whole body can stretch 

bend to inhuman proportions and shrink again 

to be. Its proportion changes in moments of ecstasy, 

the body does not sink in water, very often it becomes easier to 

spirit, rises up and may take a few minutes to 

hover in the air. Often seen obsessed running 

through the roofs and monasteries, they run up the walls and, 

playing, they ride on the tone of teas on their branches, which are broken 

lis under the weight of a bird. 

   The surface of the body of such a demon-possessed person 

century is marked on the outside with special signs. Is not- 

                                                   2iva 



large, no larger than a pea, places to burn, 

                                                   21 

insensitive, bloodless and lifeless. They 

sometimes form red or black spots, but rarely; 

just as rarely they are marked with a depression to the ozhi. Pain- 

with their part they are invisible from the outside and are located on 

genitals ah. If you prick such a place with a needle, 

then the blood does not go and there is no feeling and I have pain, which, one- 

which is felt by all other parts of the body. De 

Lankr 2 2 , one of the most witty demonologists, 

who in 1609 had the task of clearing 

witches an entire province - the Basque country - found before 

3000 faces, marked in this and that way. 

    Often this sign is also located on the eyelids, on 

gpine, on the chest, and sometimes - but rarely - they change 

place. 







    But not only the sign of the witch marks the witch. 

Magical mental activity that governs 

with her whole being, bodily sensitivity is extremely 

lowered, sometimes completely destroyed. The witch is 

very insensitive to the most terrible torment and torture, 

and cases of complete catalepsy and insensitivity are very 

often cited in demonological literature; 

even on the rack, about which the executioners said: “you 

stretched out so that the sun would shine through 

you,” the witch didn’t admit to anything, laughed or 

sleep 

    This maleficium taciturn itas* which the devil gave, 

by the "Hammer of the Witches", their chosen ones and which 

were also attributed to secret amulets, as a result of which 

the witch was stripped naked and all vegetation was shaved 

on her body, was associated with a strange restorative 

strength of the organism, so that the most severe wounds healed 

easily and quickly, wounds that would normally lead to disaster 

imminent death. There were many witch trials when 

the witch was tortured four, five times in a row, but 

always "she slept on the rack, closing her eyes so that 

Lachs had to mess around a lot, while they managed to 

open one eye. 



  -   the ability of witches to keep a secret. - lat. 





284 



    In this ecstatic-meaningful state of 

all laws are changed or completely destroyed, usually 

                                                        23 

governing body. Witch's fire resistance 

was so well known that Shprenger completely rejects 

                              24 

tested by fire. Delryo, quite competent in 

in this respect, the specialist speaks of a witch who 

remained unharmed even under the terrible torture of resin 

boot. 

    There is even less doubt about the veracity 

these indications, if we take into account that in 

our time, quite a few similar facts have been made public 

                                               25 

Comrade; the most famous is given by Wallas (“Protection 

ta Spiritualism"), when M rH ome stuck his head in 

the fire did not burn a single hair. 

   Also associated with an ecstatic state of change 

specific gravity is quite consistent with the truth, although 

it, like the aforementioned quality, is inexplicable. 







   It is quite understandable that such a complete revolution of the physical 

logical laws in the physical orsh and change 

gave a wild "a rebours" soul and . 

   Insensitivity to pain killed everything in the witch 

compassion; she is cruel to the point of atrocity, she does not know 

mercy, but she knows acomo ecstatic voluptuousness 

stie causes pitted pain. She love g voluptuousness 

atrocities, and her sexual lust is always mixed with 

cruelty. Sadism and masochism govern her position. 

howl with passion; but it's not enough for her to hit or be bi- 

toy: only when she is greedy, burning hands who 

soldered in the entrails of a murdered child when she 

bites into his chest with her teeth and vomits a shuddering 

Yes, still a warm heart when she is naked 

with cries of voluptuousness squirms in his ripped 

stomach, then she probably experiences a little 

satisfaction. 

   The same boundless passion - in her hatred 

sti. She hates everything called law, she 

feels rage against everything that could deliver 

barriers to her demonic debauchery and most of all 

she hates the church and re institutions. 



     change to the opposite. - f r. 



                                                      28 S 



    Witchcraft madness is epidemic where 

to the athars in repulsive forms hatched their 

sick hatred for the Christian church. 

    The Church, in essence, still could not help 

curl with man and heya mi. With unheard-of cruelty, 

the cow haunted them for decades; burned and wheeled 

thousands, but they appear again and again, 

forge secret alliances, intensify by hiding, and even 

where they were completely exterminated, keep 

the traditions of their eerie and x masses, which once they 

celebrated at night in the forests and on the heights, and the people 

has long been turned on end, with a sword, a wheel and a fire, 

new to the only saving church, did not stop 

visits to night gatherings where you could 

pouring souls, striving for frenzy. 

    And n and this is quiet, it would seem, in fact, they are really 

sabbath orgies and again the woman incites 

a man to an inhuman scope in stin to that. 

    The woman of the Middle Ages was anemic to the extreme 

ness, she struck with mud, because all the average 

century painfully afraid of air and water; enslaved- 

nay men oh, rejected by the church, despised yes 

God, who created her from Adam's crooked rib, 

the wife was a perfect beast. Her evil instincts 

Many people have grown up, and the land has grown in the sea. 

Her brain was generating wildly vengeful designs against 

neighbor, who gave her an evil look, against 

husband, who treated her to p and n to am and, against the landowner, who 

sometimes, in order to dispel boredom, to order it 

flog. 

    Anemia, various, generated by dirt on the skin 

her sensuality constantly irritated her sensuality; 

she was given to every man e, i.e. reluctantly give- 

I raped myself, but I never experienced pleasure 

let-creation. 

    One ever-growing craving for pleasure, satisfaction 

tormenting, prolonged sexual orgy tormented women 

schinu-animal. 

    She was always in an excited state. 

With a diabolical "melancholic" temperament, in 

this "devilish kupeli", for every thought, every 

the feeling becomes poison. The question is when this 

wife will become a witch, it's just a matter of when 

286 



all the germs of obsession that she carries within herself, 

come to manifestation. 

    And then one day it comes. H i- 

when she hadn't felt so uneasy yet. She 

tormented by       a sick thirst to kill, tear people into 

shreds, go on a rampage, scream and suddenly, as if 

driven by an outside force, she rushes unconsciously 

into the forest, she does not run, she flies, she feels that she is being carried 

through the air until, finally, it falls. 

    And then an incubus appears next to her. He is very beautiful 

sen, dressed like a hunter, limps a little, hides his tail, 

as far as she can, and her horns are not visible, but she probably 

n I to a, knows what the hell it is. She's scared, but she's awful 

curious. She knows his power, she knows that 

he can give her whatever she wants; in this moment 

she does not think about the fact that his money after the eye- 

called sand or mud, she is very scared, but 

curiosity overrides fear. 

     Meanwhile, the devil is approaching with affectionate, but 

very unambiguous movements and mi. He knows de 

the need of her heart, knows what she lacks, he agrees 

I also want to fulfill her if she gives herself to him and - 

conditio sine qua non* - will not repent of it. 

He becomes more and more insistent. She is still defending herself 

but she already feels how his weight descends on her, 

and she lets the terrible happen. 

     This is not voluptuousness; it hurts and it's cold, oh 

So cold! 

     Recovering herself, she notices that two miles away 

fled from her village. She shivers to ak in chills, she 

shattered with her whole body, she drags herself with the greatest difficulty 

back, and only a timid hope that her desire 

performed, keeps her on her feet. 

     But none of her wishes come true, terrible 

torment, repentance and fear of hell, fear that her life 

Vuyu is dragged to hell, drives her to madness. She survived 

waking, side by side with the snoring husband and I, a terrible night. Hell 

with the most terrible tortures opens up before her eyes - 

mi, with insane despair she fixes her eyes on him, 

wants to pray, but she is forcibly torn away from prayer, 

hellish laughter is heard in the room, small green 

lights rush back and forth, then she hears 



  * 

      indispensable condition. - lat. 

                                                    287 



ki in the walls, growing to a terrible roar, her in 

the bed to ruzhitsya, the rags with which she covered herself 

starts dancing, she wants to wake up her husband, but lie down • 

how shackled and unable to move, and suddenly again 

child him. 

    And again she experiences torture at the cold ice 

sexual intercourse, but now she is less afraid, she even ( 

questions his hellish lover. In essence 

hey, he's a kind sir. He advises her to go 

witch who lives alone in the forest and trust 

to her; then she will receive from her herbs possessing miracles 

noah force. 

    When the devil leaves her, she falls into a heavy, 

dead dream. 

    And the next morning, after waking up, her first., 

thought is an old witch. Her husband was sent somewhere else 

but she has no children. She is looking forward to 

draw 

    With timidity in her heart, driven by fear, she 

nez, comes to the witch's always locked house. 

    No one remembers when the terrible old woman came 

to the village. They are afraid of her, a terrible pan and follows when;. 

she is walking down the street. Mothers run away with children, azyxwvutsrqponm 

                                                      eslg 

this is no longer possible, then they make the sign of the cross or 

pronounce the name of Jesus, with the greatest care 

avoiding touching her and trying not to give eii 

take a look at yourself. 

    But the witch, apparently, does not pay attention to anything 

niya, she just mumbles something under her breath and time; 

from time to time throws at this or that house a short 

sharp look. 

    She would have been beaten to amn a long time ago, for there are countless e< 

crimes, but they are afraid of the landowner who guards f * - 

because he receives poisons from the witch for secret purposes. 

    Between a woman and a witch, who, however, 

zhetsya, waiting for her, a long conversation is tied up. She who 

turns home, full of determination and courage, and su 

travelly squeezes in his hand a pot of ointment and a stick, which 

which she must hide in a place where her HI 

finds none other than those belonging to the "same sec" 

they»*. 



      This wand, often found in the processes of witches, splinters 

everything indicates that we have a relationship with a sect that continues to munch 

heinousness - adj. auth 





28 8 



   As soon as the desired moment comes, she knows 

schen that on such and such a day there will be a visit to the “sin- 

gogi ». 

   At midnight she strips naked and rubs herself 

ointment received from the witch, rubs the whole body, pre- 

mainly under the armpits to ami, under the heart, crown and 

fishing organs. 









   She immediately falls into "hard as a stone" 

sleep that lasts a very short time, often only 

for one moment. 

   She "wakes up" and goes to the synagogue. 

   How she gets there, she doesn't know. She knows 

all the circumstances of her journey, she certainly 

knows that she went on foot to om, she recalls that by do- 

they spoke to her, but nothing more." 

   Whether she walked for a long time or a short time, she does not know. 

The place where she finally ends up is not entirely un- 

familiar. This infamous macabre 

one hundred and one mountain, about which she had already heard before - 

la, desert glade, without a road, without a dwelling nearby 

to be hungry 

  * The witches of Remigius and de Lancre, for the most part, "go" zyxwvutsrqponm 

                                                           н<. 

coven. - note auth. 



Yu-3400 

                                                         284 



    She already finds a large gathering - men (their 

few), wives and children. Some of them, it seems, 

recognizes, but not completely, because it is very dark and hopeless 

the flame of torches, gently oscillating, distorts the figures, 

turning them into scary ghosts. 

    She sees women, half-naked, rushing i 

their wild jumps back and forth, in torn dresses 

i x and with loose hair, easily and quickly, to 

like they weigh nothing. Raising from time to time 

there is a deafening howl: “Gar! Gar! Shabash! Shabash! 

Suddenly, as at this sign, all of you present 

line up in a circle with their hands behind their backs, 

men a (he is mostly a devil-lover) and women 

shchi and on, back to back, and now the furious 

vortex p la sk and . Heads are thrown back faster 

ass, slutty songs are loudly yelled, interrupting all the time 

breathless, hoarse “Gar! Gar! Devil! Dya 

ox! Jump here, jump there!” 

    In the wildest jumps, in dizzying 

prostitute ice orgy reaches the top and n s. The beast is released 

greedy lust mixed with bloodlust, madness 

voluptuousness ignites in the pains of dizziness. 

    The dance is upset, people rush at each other, 

men and women indiscriminately, father against daughter, brother 

on the sister, the men on the men, the whole assembly twisted 

in the most incredible, unnatural debauchery 

ve; to ak dogs they lie on top of each other, frozen in sudo 

horny convulsions, and disgusting groans of inhuman 

lovable, painful copulation bursts 

hoarse "Gar! Gar!" 

    The woman manages the gathering and brings it to the eq 

zaltats i and . To renounce even the slightest of them 

as a sign of shame, she clasps her hands behind her back, rushes 

on his back, raises wide-spaced but- 

gi and with hoarse screams is given to the phallus. Ancient 

the priestess of the priest of Kibela wakes up in her with double strength; 

nymph-obsessed omania fury with inhuman times 

growing sensitivity, which dirt and disgust 

lusts serve as lustful pleasures. P hunting 

ends in bloodlust; she tears her own nails 

venous body, pulls out thick strands of hair from the head 

you, scratches his chest, but all this is not enough 

just to feed the beast. She throws herself at the child 

which is sacrificed to Satan, tears his pile! 

teeth, pulls out the heart, devours it, drenched 

290 



blood, or rips the arteries in his neck and drinks 

blood splashed from there, or clamps his soft 

head between the thighs, saying "And go there, from- 

where are you! B listed modifications to this 

lustful murder, and always the child is horror 

a victim of the bloodthirsty Satan, who reigns in women 

Sh needle. 

10* 



    After this preparatory orgy, which 

чается девутительный ий, real ий шабаш, шабаш ва 

vilon yan, Greeks and Roman mln, shabash doman Ichaean, on 

It is thought to be from the post-Manichean period. 

   The actual disappears, consciousness fades, opens 

there is an immeasurable kingdom of the eyes. 

    Satan appears 2 6 . He most willingly accepts 

an image of an evil, but they often see it in human form. 

It seems that he is sitting on a chair, he has something, 

reminiscent of a human appearance, but it is not clear how 

would be clouded en o. 

   It is only very rarely possible to see it clearly. OK 

scary! All his members have grown to monstrous ones, 

gigantic sizes. On his head he has a crown of black 

horns, one of them is so brightly red-hot that the whole 

shabash illuminated by him brighter than the full moon. his eyes 

large, wide open and perfectly round. Floor 

man, half-goat, he has human limbs 

sti, female, flabby hanging breasts, but what is special 

catches the eye - it's his giant twisted 

phallus, similar to a huge dog's tail, 









292 



flax red-red, ending with female genitalia 

my organ, well. 

    His voice is terrible, but silent and hoarse; its hard 

understand. “He always shows great courtesy 

ness, coupled with the manners of the melancholic 

a prince who is bored. Under the navel he has another 

a face even more terrible than the upper one - the face used 

expression with a wide gaping muzzle and protruding 

I'm sorry to om. 

    As soon as He appears, Mass begins. She 

begins with a general confession and everyone repents in 

that he did good. They swear in a terrible sin 

wisdom, in the mortal sin of humility, patience, 

devotion and love for one's neighbor. They live in terrible and 

unnatural sins, consisting in the execution 

the ten commandments of Moses, and bitterly regret 

that they missed the opportunity to commit a crime. 

    Kozel listens attentively and inflicts terrible 

punches because he doesn't like the half of the chat. K azh- 

whoever enters his church must fully fulfill 

take his laws. 

    P after confession - the presentation of those who want 

join his church. Trembling with fear, appear 

they are in front of the throne of the lords and. 

    - What do you want? Do you want to be one of the 

their? he growls at the stranger. 

    — Yes! 

    “So do it and do what I want.” 

    Then the speaker pronounces the following formula: 

“I renounce first God, then Jesus Christ, 

Holy Spirit, St. Virgin, saints, holy Christ, etc., 

I surrender myself in everything to your power and into your hands, and not 

I recognize another god, so you are my god and I am yours 

edge". 

    After this, the neophyte kisses Satan on the face under the navel. 

and by this he swears eternal slavery and obedience to power 

Devil. 

    Satan scratches his forehead with his nails 

baptism, in a dirty font, the neophyte is subjected to 

to his baptism, and he solemnly swears nothing 

when not to take communion otherwise than as for a criminal 

purposes, to spit and desecrate St. vei relic, 

keep secrets at the coven, recruit new devotees 

For the church of Satan and dedicate all your strength to him. 

                                                       293 



    The ceremony reaches its climax 

in the terrible request of the neophyte to Satan to draw 

the book took him out of the book of life and entered him into the book of death. 

The devil puts his mark on the eyelids, shoulders, lips neo- 

fita, women and us on the breast nipple, more often on the 

fishing parts. 

    An agreement with the devil is concluded, a person is irrevocably 

succumbed to the devil. From that moment on, the nature of his perfect 

changes dramatically, in his soul everything turns upside down 

upside down, the law is he, tying up and still the beast, 

becomes powerless over him, all the virtues 

bound to him by law are discarded with mockery 

vom and zhensch and na returns to its ancient nature, 

which they carefully tried to tame in it. All her own 

stva throw off the bridle. W omen become fallaces, 

treacherous, talkative, chatty, sticky, sticky, 

ardent and lustful, light rebellious and voluptuous, 

noxious and dangerous, compare tur U rsis, Vento. 

To the Scorpion, to the Lion, to the Raccoon, and to the Snare*. 

    The whole gloomy, desperate history of the Middle Ages 

revels in the horrors of shabash. Shabash is an organism 

wildly curbed instincts, a powerful uprising of the oppressed 

flesh, gloomy halle lui nailed to the cross 

stu of paganism. 

    And indeed, the shabash is ugly distorted 

synthesis of all orgiastic cults of antiquity. Service 

nie To ibele, where hysterical lust poured into 

forms of refined cruelty, peculiar, long 

forgotten tricks of debauchery in the service of Astarte, 

crimes and incantations by which the Greek witches 

we compelled Hekate to hand over the dead - we are all 

we find collected in a shabash e. 

aligned to a new religious outlook, but still 

recognizable. The medieval shabash hardly has anything 

something of its own, it is a phenomenon encountered in 

all times, among all peoples, universal historical 

sky f aq t. 

    But at that time, the mysteries of antiquity had an impeccable 

deceptively positive character, while their 



      traitors, traitors, talkers, noisy, 

obstinate, clinging, passionate and arrogant, harmful 

mi and capricious, jiei ko excitable and dangerous. And x can be compared 

a thread with bears, with a storm, a scorpion, a lion, a dragon and a trap- 

who. — lat. 





294 



the goal was to bring everything into the circle of the divine, to sanctify 

all and nsti n to you, honor the deity with the highest manifestation 

ecstasy - the shabash of the Middle Ages has exclusively 

negative meaning. 

   On the one hand, it is rooted in a terrible hatred 

sti Manicheans to the Catholic Church and undoubtedly the 

nik in the bosom of manichaeism, or rather, developed under it 

patronage. The teaching of the Manicheans was almost artificial 

exclusively polemical content and is a 

devastating criticism of Catholicism. Everything in 

the doctrine of the Atars was the main creed, according to 

perished in this hatred, which is from fantastic 

persecution has been growing from generation to generation. 

    On this hospitable ground of hatred, naturally 

but, in huge quantities, everything that 

haunted the church, everything that still lived from the remnants 

paganism in the minds of the people, all views and customs, 

brought from other countries, but for some reason 

we are greedy for those perceived by the people, and against which 

The church has raised its cruelest weapon ever since. 

   On the other hand, shabash was rooted in a painful 

the hatred of the obsessed towards everything churchly. Church 

declared that demons rage in the possessed, she 

tried to heal the sick with holy water and prayers. 

P mouth so. This made people believe even more 

they are demon-possessed; they carried the devil in them and yes- 

let him roar terrible blasphemy towards 

to the church And at the lower stage of these diseases, which 

which is observed in the witch, we see how those good 

freely and with growing pleasure indulged 

trait, which as a reward gave them inhuman ra- 

reach shabash a. 

   Thus Manichaeism mingled with a strange passion 

medieval man to sacrilege. 

   The main primordial god of the Cathars, quand 

                                   27 

meme", positive mother and I, became furious 

wives and I, in polemical fury and sighing and x 

Albigensians, a rebours**, matter of dirt, disgust, 

poison and them 

   For k atara the basic position is "nemo potest 

to sin from the navel and below 



    contrary to everything. - f r. 

    vice versa. - f r. 

    no one can sin from the womb and the umbilical cord. - lat. 





                                                           29 5 



basis, like the sacrifice of Hymen for the priestess of Astarte. Not 

for the witch, this principle became a means of 

return the sacred. 

   Convinced to the Athar renounced the Catholic 

religions with the holy seriousness of the neophyte; for a witch 

the renunciation formula became an infernal pact that 

she made a deal with the devil. 

   And so, the witch took la from the cathars' creed to ak 

times what she could most painfully hurt God 

Christians and provoke his wrath. N people, with a brutal gesture 

converted to Christianity by tokenity, entered into power 

denial of the gloomy legacy of murdered fathers. Faith more 

did not exist, but in desperation vsh and y xia, enslaved and 

tormented by torture and the people did not leave the festivities from 

tsov, festivities and nst n kts, sin, which should 

to be mortified by the sin of the phallus en eveil and furores 

matricis* And who once visited the church dedicated to them, 

"braves hommes" *", he irrevocably fell under Satan. 

   And the historical shabash, the cult of the Albigensians, who 

they honored the evil "god" 2 8 , spreads into the wild of their fantasy 

max of the possessed; originally natural forms 

are distorted into monstrous hallucinations and cannot be 

more to establish where the hallucination ends and where 

reality begins. A wild mix of a thousand 

figurative fragments of cultures of all peoples and times, whether 

freakish confusion and ts and the foundations of the faith of all religions, volcano- 

a natural explosion of opposing instincts in the wild 

chaos and fierce struggle. 







    Visiting the Sabbath acts as a habit 

opium eradication. After a few times it becomes 

a passion that you can never get rid of 

All pok azan and I witches agree that "the Sabbath - 

true paradise, and there is more joy in it than you can 

say". When the sign was given, it became glad 

stno, “as if they were invited to a wedding. The spirit is so binding 

heart and will that there is no place for any other 

I m". 



       tense - fr, ecstasy of females   - tat 

       swept people - fr 





29 b 



    The judges asked in surprise how the Sabbat could 

act so lovable oh when it's just the place 

terror and fury? What did they get the answer that 

“they enjoy these horrors with amazing joy 

and furious passion," so that time, "full 

some pleasures, flies like crazy, with regret 

you part with him and with incredible longing you end up 

return to shabash." "That his joys are truly 

inhuman essence and unearthly origin 

n and I. 

    So in this way, the witch gradually lost her 

purpose to desecrate the church; shabash became her religion, pre- 

stepping - by her virtue; perversion of instincts 

happened almost imperceptibly, and she suddenly became a new 

being. Shameless orgy became self-sufficient 

purpose; the witch no longer thinks about the attitude in which 

whom her cult is to the Christian church, she 

throws himself out of his head into the abyss of rage of instincts, 

no longer thinking about the blasphemy committed at the same time. 

And so, orgies began to be celebrated without any relation 

n and to anything, according to the once planned order 

ku, with all the traditional customs, the purpose of which 

ryh originally was blasphemy. Celebrated or- 

gia because of the orgy itself, gave scope to rage in 

painful convulsions of voluptuousness, human 

the creature became a wolf, a vampire, a goat, 

pig, raged in the consciousness of eternal damnation 

but what is the meaning of all heavenly joys in comparison 

with the inhuman pleasures of the coven! 

    And, in this way, shabash, on which for the first time 

were present with horror, with an eerie consciousness of 

the loss of the gates of the salvation of souls and, little by little, became 

the only cult without any opposition, 

without any other meaning and I, except for desire and I experience 

voluptuousness elevated to superhuman levels 

measures. And Satan, the original "anti" of all Catholic 

cheskogo, became the only god, gracious father, 

providing immeasurable bliss. If the first 

initially, surrendering to him, sought to receive earthly 

goods, gold and power, now everyone forgot 

this, nothing more was demanded of him, praised 

him and gratefully kissed his body. For he gave everything 

volcanic upheaval of the flesh, in the spasms of which 

every gold seems to be an insignificant dust, and every 

power with stupid vanity. 



                                                      2Q7 



   Stage of denial, conscious blasphemy, which 

mountains, the witch was introduced into the vicious circle of worship 

kov of Satan, did not last very long; in furious 

the whirlwinds of the floor soon forgot the cult of Christians, and not 

there was no god but him, the hanging phallus and 

when the goat raises the black host and barks: "Here - 

my body!”, the whole community falls to its knees with the same 

earnestness, with which until recently every 

my communion, and from the depths of his soul the goat groans: 

• Aquerra goity! Aquerra boyty!” (To the lake above! To the lake 

at the bottom!). 

   The witches that de Lanc judged in the Basque country, 

justified by the fact that they did not know at all that the 

shat that they do not admit any guilt; on the- 

turn, they thought it was the only religion. 

They described the bride with incredible complacency. 

the finest details of their ministries. "Girls and wives- 

instead of blushing and lamenting, 

to blame their crime, they told everything before the court 

circumstances and all sorts of dirty details with such 

Kim pleasure and shamelessness, which was evident, 

that they are proud, telling how everything was, and' found 

children take special pleasure in this, for they prefer 

dirty caresses and the devil to everything else. They neither- 

no matter how much they blushed, as if they were immodest and dirty 

they were not asked questions, so our translator, who 

who was a priest, was more ashamed, translating 

them our questions.” 

   "Thus this pestilence spread like a contagion,"* he says 

Wi r 2 9 in his beautiful book "De prestigiis 

              5 

daemonium"* ', and Henry IV's adviser Florimond from 

Bordeaux writes in horror: "Et le diabbe est si bon m aistre, 

that we can only send so many (т.е. 

ведьм) аи fire, that from their ashes none shall be reborn 

new others'***. 

   Shabash is undoubtedly the greatest cultural history 

a logical riddle in the history of the world. In the era of Enlightenment 

the task was greatly facilitated. Everything is indiscriminate 

was declared stupidity and medieval hypocrisy 

   * It spread like a touch of the plague. - lat. 

  *" "On the deceptions of demons." - Lat. 

     And the devil was such a great lord that we couldn't 

send such a large number of them to the fire, so that it does not rise 

brought them out of the ashes in another guise. - f r. 





298 



eat; the processes of witches were used to ak stupid and shady 

a sensible pretext for attacking the church. So 

the so-called cultural historian is often hastily 

skating through too reliable facts, because 

that they were uncomfortable for him, and he did not know what was wrong with them 

do. Lish lately, after that it’s impossible 

began to deny the strange phenomena of the occult phenomena 

new, after numerous scientists who 

K roux cleared the way, seriously and without prejudice 

subjected to an inquisitive study of the facts of mediumship 

ma, the darkness began to dissipate. 

    One thing was overlooked, that there was an actual 

telny shabash, just as real and undoubted, 

how black mass 3 0 under Louis XIV, shabash, where 

the witch did not fly, did not send her astral body, 

but where she walked, often miles away. Ut- 

to say this gives us the right not only to everything that we 

we know about secret sects and their secret gathering places; No 

not the slightest reason to doubt the fact that 

these gatherings were unexpectedly found by the uninitiated - 

mi, and the participants hastily fled. In one 

in the case of uninvited guests, they treated me to beatings, 

that they soon died of their effects. 

    Naturally, the participants in the Sabbath and due to the 

a dance of dance and uniform zak and duvan and I of the head so- 

in exactly the same way as a modern fak and r, they came 

into a state of orgasm that did not allow them to distinguish the actual 

resistance to hallucinations. The use of scary 

nyh narcotic drugs, the description of which is 

full of all demonological books and gi, this state 

increased and reached hystero-epileptic 

predisposition throughout the entire Middle Ages 

kovya to utter somnambulism. The fact that everything 

those present stood in mutual connection, is explained 

one-sidedness of hallucinations which, however, 

were predetermined by the Satanic code, so that the participants 

nick of such a satanic circle, without knowing it, naturally 

venously, fell into some "communion of souls" with others 

participle am. 

    The effect of hypnotic drugs is indicated by neop- 

sparseness of indications describing all phenomena as 

would be shrouded in mist. The image of Satan is rarely seen 

distinctly: then it appears in the form of a monstrous fog- 

mass, then they see him in the form of a tree stump “with something 

something like a human face, but as if covered with 



com"; sometimes it appears again in the form of a "seeming 

sya ”a human face, red and swaying like 

fire escaping from the furnace, and whose forms are visible 

only half and then vaguely. 

   The same is indicated by various epileptic symptoms. 

volumes - ossification of the members, an icy feeling of cold 

yes, penetrating body when mating with an incubus 

or when accepting a black host, abnormal we- 

cervical excitation when dancing, feeling of flight, 

a complete perversion of natural feelings, 

terrible convulsions into which many fall and some 

which are then presented to the witch by blows received 

from the devil. Particularly characteristic of this co- 

standing light phenomena and I, which in our time are 

taken in the presence of a good medium. 

   This historical, real shabash little by little 

disappears, gatherings may be limited 

at night under I van a K fell or completely disappear, for 

the witch found a remedy that gives her the opportunity to enjoy 

to enjoy all the joys of Shabash, without being present at 

it is personal, which, of course, from the very beginning was 

themes of death. 







   Already de Spina in his Fortah tium fidei con tra 

judaeos etc. ""31 speaks of a witch sect, called- 

scurry xurgin ami or brooks and consisted of male 

rank and women shch and n. They voluntarily associate with the devil 

who gets their souls and and with the help of magic 

gives them the opportunity to imagine that they are flying 

a space of two hundred miles at four or five o'clock. "What 

then it happens at the shabash e - a deception of the imagination, 

body stays in bed. 

   He then tells that one witch in the presence 

Vii and N to the visitor and the princely court boasted, 

that, visible or invisible, the devil will appear who 

will carry her through the air, if only she is allowed to use 

hit the magic ointment. To be sure, 

she was given permission, after which she thoroughly rubbed 

smeared with ointment. But o' she remained lying motionless, and 

nothing out of the ordinary happened, what left the living 



      "The fortress of faith against the Jews, etc." 





300 



you are witnesses. And from this it is clear that the assumption about those 

forest flight of witches is wrong and that when they seem to 

that they fly, this is a deception of the devil. 









   Extremely interesting in this regard, Chapter XI I 

va "Demonomania" B odinus. One witch confessed 

and assured that she would fly to Shabash, if she was allowed to 

lyat rubbed with ointment. Permit her or, after which she 

rubbed herself with a stinking ointment, lay down and immediately fell asleep. Her 

tied to bed, beaten, stabbed and burned, but she did not 

showed not the slightest sign of life. Another 

day she talked about her trip to Shabash, and 

in her story it was possible to distinguish how in a hallucination 

her nation was intertwined with the pains caused to her 3 2 . And the action 

Indeed, in all demonology there is not a single worthy 

correctly established case that the person in question was 

Carried away for a long distance "by air>". 

   In all cases, it was observed that the witch prepared 

rushed to the flight by stripping naked, rubbing 



certain places with ointment, and then fainted 

new state. This ointment that plays the main role 

in all witchcraft processes, again, there is not something 

specifically medieval. She meets everyone 

childbirth and at all times. 

    Sleep drink of the Brahmins, which serves to excite 

clear vision among yogis, Homer's nefentes, potantes, fa- 

lasegle, gelatophilis at Plin and I - all the same means 

to separate the soul from the body and to receive sensations 

joy and happiness. Especially famous was the heliocabus, 

also called helicacabon and moths; this plant 

mentioned already among the Egyptians and must be identical, 

с an th rope m an dragora или a. belladona*. 

    The mazes of medieval witches were often described, and 

Paracelsus, who must have known this, speaks of 

ointment consisting of baby fat ra, poppy a, solarium 

furiosum**, c and k ori i . Vir calls another five-finger, 

bat blood and oily juices and seed 

dope, hemlock, c and k uta, poppy a, poisonous lettuce 

and wolf berries. In our days, Carl K isevetter did. i 

on myself a few experiments with witches' ointments and before 

beat amazing results. So, n a tiranie gr \ 

called homemade di tostianin! 

dreams of rapid spiral flight, as if eri 

wore a whirlwind. 







   At higher stages, the witch can get by 

without any artificial means to arrive at 

sh abash; she needs some sleep. 

   Witches judged by de Lan kr, and there were about 

thousands, everyone agrees on the fact that first you need to 

fall asleep. But o, no matter how deep the dream is, always “wake up 

eat up." Sometimes it is enough to close one eye, and in 

the next moment you already "wake up" and uno 

you sit on a shabash. “N already there was only an interval of one 

a moment, and no matter how far the place is, 

whether it be in Terra nuova or at the end of the world, everything 

you are transported there.” 



      To mandrake root, belladonna root. - lat. 

      mad nightshade. - chat. 





302 



   And again, all witches claim that after 

a short sleep, the departure takes place already in reality. "All 

it happens so real that it's not a dream, it's not 

dreams and hallucinations cannot cast doubt 

face the reality of what happened." 

                                    33 

   Here, then, the som ambulism zm is completely separated 

from natural sleep, and it is not surprising that the dark 

the genus is not aware of the difference that ideas about it are even 

do not arise in his consciousness; I only ate one of our 

measures where the witch has doubts about reality 

                                                    34 

shabash a. Zhanna Mishelis announces to Rem and Gy that 

you don’t have real eyesight at the shabash. All ca- 

is mixed up, so you can't see anything 

precise and definite. The feeling is as if 

if you see everything drunk or awake, or it’s unclear 

some other reason e, or blinded by the tap 

eye. But these cases of incomplete somnambulism are extremely 

rarely and; we, on the contrary, have often seen somnambulism increase 

sh n y to such an extent that the passage through the dream- 

state is reduced to a transcendentally small 

time interval i. So, E to ate n a Lan dal told 

says that she does not need sleep at all, but when she 

rum is sitting by the fire, she has such a passionate 

longing for shabash y that she can't compare 

not with any lust, and she is immediately carried away there. 







    B counted the crimes committed by the witch- 

mi. With the greatest precision in a systematic order, 

                                                          35 

ke lists Johann Nider in his "Form icarius" 

all these crimes. Among them, he names negative 

desecration and desecration of the Christian church, an agreement with 

The devil and the unchanging act of worship when the devil 

appears in human form, air flights, 

bewitchment of bread and cattle, excitation of anger and 

passions, an obstacle to conception in people and animals, 

turning witches and wizards into beasts (lycanthro- 

piya), the killing of the fetus in the womb of the mother through the 

dovostvo, the use of parts of children's corpses for ointments 

and, like him, adultery with an incubus and a succubus. 

    Of course, are you accustomed to ascribe to witches incredible 

the latest crimes, but also those that it actually 

did meticulously, enough to take under protection 

the most cruel and vizitor. And the perversity of all her 

                                                         303 



nature, the perfect elimination of laws s, acting 

shch and x and controlling their normal body, had the following 

the consequence is that she became a criminal; not with conscious 

with our intention, not with free will, but by virtue of that 

the same necessity, as a result of which the other does 

bro or in an evil deed is aware of this. eternal question 

each religious doctrine is explained by the witch 

most importantly, features of an organic nature. 

    All civil and divine laws are of themselves 

turn over in her brain, and by itself is born 

The code of sale is: "Sales must be sold." 

love, honor him like God, and no one but him. Name 

Christ's you must despise and desecrate. The Saints- 

the days of the Synagogue you must a honor; despise father and mother. 

You have to kill men, women and n and, mainly 

at once, children, for by this you will grieve Him most of all, 

who said: "leave the children to come to M not." You must- 

to break a marriage, to liberate in every possible way, it is better 

everything, contrary to nature; you must rob, kill, 

destroy, you must make false oaths and 

bear false witness." 

    The magical abilities she possesses, yes- 

it has a terrible power over people. One look from her 

enough to paralyze the enemy; this look so 

they were afraid that the witch was brought to the judges with her back. One 

the movement of her hand is enough to mesmerize 

man, act on his brain so that on his body 

I call, and her will is so strong that it can 

wear it for a long distance and enter into relations with 

people living far away. 

    But she did not despise natural remedies at all, 

desiring to achieve their disastrous goals. She is fierce 

solid poison mixer. There is no poisonous plant, which 

which she would not investigate and the actions of which she 

would not know. But to boost natural strength 

actions to be able to "conjure" 

disease, it needs the parts of corpses, the fat of murdered children. 

    And she steals children wherever she can, most willingly 

the unbaptized, in order to steal their souls and from the unbaptized at the same time 

hated F and li p p a (that's what the witches called Christ), she 

kills them with terrible torture to please 

to beat their master with them, cooks meat, interferes with it t 

dirty with the most dirty ingredients, with decoctions of various poisonous 

twisted plants and constitutes a terrible "anthropo- 

you". 

304 



   Hunting for children was very common and due to 

favorite sport in the Middle Ages. Number of unfortunates 

the casualties are incredible. The famous Gilles de Rais 3 6 one killed 

about a thousand children for satanic purposes, for "he was 

born under such a star that no man ever 

could not have committed x crimes like him.” It is his 

own proud words. At every coven, at least 

at least one child was sacrificed. Jews and Christians 

the Stians competed in infanticide: the famous bishop 

Gibourg at each of his countless black masses 

killed a child, and his blood, mixed with menstruation 

al blood, turned a blasphemous host. 

   Sometimes used for this and adults. Yes, from 

there is a case when one Italian to ardin al for- 

dug chest-deep into the ground of his newly born roar- 

I chew my concubine, let a snake to her breasts, and 

juice flowed out and found in reptiles, consumed 

rebil for poisonous mixing. 

   This is how I was composed, of which the most famous 

ny - aqua Toffana. His action is scary, no 

the antidote for it does not help, and no matter how careful 

ness does not warn against it, because it is colorless 

shady and tasteless. You can carry it in yourself for months, feel- 

acting healthy; you only feel bad 

a feeling that keeps growing until the body dies, 

poisoned. He captures the noblest teas 

body, not causing convulsions or any special 

past pains, but only a slow fading, withering, 

exhaustion. Only after death is the actual 

ve poisons: members separate; at the funeral of ardin ala 

Gatanelli being carried in an open coffin, one leg 

fell out of the grave. 

   As a result of all these poisonings, ali arose, 

but, whole epidemics; all these strange and nervous worries 

levitation in a certain part can probably be explained 

poisons, and an endless series of processes about the preparation 

this "poisonous beast". These processes were very 

lawful and thorough, and in most cases on 

judge's table as a corpus delicti" lollo this 

"Poisonous piggy" found during a search. In 1605 

du in Bohemia, in Silesia and Lausice was a km. 

lo two thousand poisoners. And since the human 



    composition of the offence. - lat 



                                                       40 



justice was to receive a special enforcer 

ness, then they were tormented with red-hot tongs, wheel- 

wali, and then "smoked", that is, slowly fried on 

fire lit all around; "there was a great stench from that." 

     Very interesting is the story of K Arrichter about how 

such poisonous nap and tk are prepared: “Not surprising 

cry if this person feels great pains: after all 

ma took the herbs (followed by the names of the names of the plants, par 

posited in astrological botany. - auth.). 

also said some spells li n an and I, which 

taught her by an evil spirit, for these villains do not understand that 

what they say, but they have it from an evil spirit and nothing 

do not add, except the imagination of a false belief, for 

they squeeze the juice out of the plants, wash their hands with it three times 

k and , hold herbs in hand until they touch the one whom 

want to destroy; when they come to him, they serve 

his hand; if he did not entrust himself to God, then the insidious 

plant poison enters it and closes, obviously, three 

natural spirit blood; then instantly under fire 

tie is a frenzied pain, like a lick, hour by hour \ 

spreads throughout the body, convulsions begin and do not 

happy shouts "Ah!" and "Alas!" 

     Of course, the effect of both means depends on the transmission 

chi energy, from susceptibility and suppleness internally 

to the decision of this person, but the man of the Middle Ages was 

extremely susceptible, and, in most cases, 

bny means should have been successful. 

     I must limit myself to the few that I have said. 

about witchcraft, but this is enough to be convinced of 

the legitimacy of the grounds for the witch trials. Medieval 

the cow was in a condition of self-defense, it must 

was to eradicate a criminal sect, just as 

in our day the British are trying to eradicate crime 

new sect of the Tugris. Crimes increased from year to year 

year, and if here and there they tried to stop the Vedas 

processes, it was always necessary to re-excite them 

give. And, no doubt, a hell of a fear of a rack, nipce 

mi, wheel, tar boot kept many copper 

mentally located persons from the worship of Satanezyxwvut   and 

application to "service to suffering humanity" 

products of a poisonous pack rel. Indeed, many were 

innocently "smoky", but for eight million witches, 

which, on average, were burned, falls out, indisputably 

but, a very insignificant percentage of the innocent. 



daughter 



     And you know how hard it is now to get some 

good medium. We owe this to Shprenger, B o- 

dinus, remigius, de lan to roux, all these innumerable 

judges, who far from affectionately disposed of the count 

sect and tormented all mediumistically pre- 

located n s. On the one hand, if we take into account 

attention well-being - hehe! — human ro- 

yes, that was good. And bo, except for the fact that 

all these people are tainted with "moral in sanity" *, that "moral 

in sanity", which in the miserable age of electricity expressed 

huddled in the innocent deception of professors, the Middle Ages 

destroyed the predisposition to hystero- epilepsy 

these, all germ and from which blossomed more terribly- 

some nervous epidemics. 

     Free-thinking citizens Ying, with such indignation 

whoever speaks of these processes should be blessed 

to thank Remigius for the fact that he, citizens of the 

dances wildly in the market, does not see his own 

double, that at night he is not tormented by hellish noise and 

similar divertissements. 

     By the end of the 16th century, Satan begins to get bored 

di shameless sk opisch and witches. Ecclesia m ilitan s became 

ecclesia triomphans**. He does not need agitation, does not need 

for propaganda yes. B innumerable crowds flock to 

his wives and nys, and with disdainful indifference 

he looks at how they rage around him, fuss 

in the mud and make wild cries. He became violent 

thirst for new pleasures, he invents terrible 

refinement. And if earlier copulation was only 

but an unpleasant sensation of cold, now it has become 

new terrible torture oh. The woman he made 

took, screams, like in labor pains, it expires 

кровью “both in front and behind, depending on where 

il est alle heurter"***. This is pokazan and I girls from three 

thirteen to sixteen years of age, who in their lives and 

were quite pure and virgin, and which, - 

as Paracelsus says, they didn’t even want to “actem 

I would come!**** 

  same 

    moral impurity. - English. 

 ** church militant, church triumphant. - lat. 

    not only in front, but also behind, depending on the place where he went 

    your push. - f r. 

    sexual intercourse. - lat. 



                                                            307 



    No, he doesn't want it anymore, his fantasies can't 

can endure the variety of orgies more. He doesn't ho- 

even more to hide in the remote, un- 

foot places. Now he's powerful enough 

to penetrate into the church of his opponent, the table- 

whip him off the altar, sit on him himself and make 

priests with their most devoted servants. And this 

it was not difficult for him with the success that he achieved 

at the end of the 16th century, at a time when, as Re- 

migiy, out of three people met on the street, two 

and probably guilty of witchcraft. There was enough 

a certain number of priests who suffered 

bash to church and in the circle of the dedicated, they celebrated 

wicked black masses. Already de Lan kr burned three saints 

puppies, in which he justifies himself with all sorts of 

arguments; a few years later the black mass 

becomes universal. She mainly manages 

in women's monasteries, in these nests of demons 

magical predisposition, developed spiritual 

my fathers and served to satisfy the carnal 

lust for other purposes. 

    The Madeleine process is especially famous. 

B o v a n 3 7 , which in her memoirs gives us good? 

explanations about this dissolute cult. Place 

actions - the chapel of the monastery in Louviers. No gray- 

li shch, light from candles, burning them, like torches on al- 

container and, probably, how it was at that time in the custom of black 

masses made from the fat of hanged men. P 

There are several priests, including Pikar, his 

vicar Boulet, and several others whom Madeleine 

n a B ovan does not know, and several nuns, five or 

six. 

    Maria Sen tells that those present are ok- 

they spit the blood of Christ with a shout: “Sanguis eius 

supra nos et filios nostros! The Mass itself is accompanied 

s. 

exclaimed by yami. Some show language, others 

completely throw off their dresses, others bare their 

and turn him to the altar, others masturbate 

in the most shameless way - and all this while elevation 

grows to hellish their frenzy, which, as he ets. 



      Its blood is on us and on our sons' - l 





308 



are concluded by rabies 

gii 

    By the middle of the 17th century, the black mass became more 

popular. She became almost public; there was no pain 

it is a secret that it takes place in Paris, with pain 

a flood of hysterical women in the church of St. Du- 

ha, in the monastery abbey and the like. 

    P process, which in the brilliant reign of the king- 

the sun was excited against the Abbé Guibourg, so heavy 

ko compromised the highest aristocracy, which 

I had to hastily stop it. H o was installed 

there are enough facts to give us a complete picture. 

a typical picture of such a mass, typical for 

subsequent and for our time. 

   In the chapel, upholstered in black, stood an altar surrounded by 

black candles. Here Gibourg awaited his 

client tov. And they came running in droves. Great time- 

gatekeeper and poison mixer, court poet Rasin, ma- 

dame d'Argent son, de Saint-Pol, La Boullion, Luxem- 

burgh, perhaps, and Lord Beckingem, but today - in 

the last day of January 1678 is the sign of China March 

behind Montespan. 

   She is obsessed with the desire to become a queen, she is ready 

you sacrifice everything, do everything to achieve this- 

go, but she had never been so far from being satisfied 

rheni my vanity, how exactly now, when 

Louis XIV, who suffered from satyriasis, began to cry 

cool down for her. 

   Gibur, sign amen and you th Gibur, who supplied poisons 

the whole aristocracy, infected it with love vibes, 

Gibourg alone could help her. If only she entered the cha- 

as if she had already thrown off her clothes and lay naked on 

altar. And so the shameless ceremony began. N a lively 

her priest spread out the cloth and put a cup of tea on it 

Shu, put a cross on her chest. Then he celebrates mass 

according to Catholic ritual, only quotiescum que 

while he was kissing the altar, P resbyter kissed the body, 

and he consecrated the sacrifice over the shame, to which the sacrifices were made 

he entered the portico*. 

   The moment of dedication drew near. Daughter of the famous 

toy La Voise en 3 8 , too well known for 



      Every time he had to kiss the altar, presbyter 

He kissed the body, and consecrated the host under the genitals, where he 

Substituted a piece of it. - lat 





                                                          VISIT 



Bren Villiers, the poisoner's wife, calls three times. 

The door opens, the terrible witch des Eilier appears 

lyatsya with a two- or three-year-old child in his arms. His 

they drank from their mother for a gold piece: the children were cheap then 

var. Now he must do what he said, for Gibuu 

mutters: "Christ said:" leave the babies 

ty to M not. I want you to go to him and stand with 

it's one thing." 

    Gibur will raise the child over the cups to her and shout: 

“Astaroth, Asmodeus, princes of friendship, I conjure you 

to accept the sacrifice that I present to you of this child 

for the things I ask of you”*. Он кладет ре 

Benka on Montespan's stomach and cuts his throat. 

A terrible cry, and the sacrifice is done. Go- 

the child's dexterity leans back, blood flows into the bowl, 

spits out the liturgical robe of a priest and naked 

members of the living altar. Des'Eilly takes the murdered child 

and rips out his insides, which 

should serve many more purposes M. Giburmesha 

no blood with wine, puts it there to usk and host, zyxwvut 

which contains the ashes of burnt children's scythes 

children (children, died ersh and x without baptism) , and one and mav: 

bowls at 

    He drinks and passes the cups at Montespan. P after consecration 

the priest conjures the dark forces so that they 

fulfilled everything desired and I Montespan, so that the king de- 

poured a table and a bed with her so that the queen was persecuted 

and barren, so that she, Montespan, should become queen 

Fran ci and . Then something outrageous comes: 

                                                          ( 

When the mission was over, P resbyter went in with the woman, e 

with his raans in the cup, his shame and his wife, 

lavabat "*. The owner of one of their glorious and bless 

of the city names of France indulges in filthy lust 

an old man in the presence of La Voisin and des Eiliers! In for 

the conclusion of the priest prepares from the remnants of the state 

tii, from the blood and entrails of the child, incense to u, ko 

which he gives to Montespan. The Mass was a success, for 

the next day M he tespan succeeded again in the 

   I 

     Astaroth, Asmodeus, friendly lords, I beg you at 

take 

  wx 

     this child as a sacrifice, for the sake of what I ask you. - fr 

     Finally, the mass is completed, the presbyter approaches the woman and. 

plunging his hands into the bowl, washes the genitals, his own and the 

tires. - lat. 





'AND ABOUT 



make a king and attach him to you stronger than 

ever before. 





   For our time, it is shown and I are very rare and few 

reliable. Little that we know about this 

only with incredible difficulty came to the attention of those 

occultists who do this; the main 

at once, Guy sm an s 3 9 in his immortal "La bas" * and in 

preface to a very, however, mediocre book 

Le Blois: "Le satan ism e et la magie"**, gives some 

clarification on this matter. 

   The liberal bourgeoisie recently triumphed in 

Paris, when Leo T axil 4 0 was busy with his jokes 

kami over cleri to alami, but, nevertheless, you can apply 

take for certain that the sect of worshipers of Satan 

split at present. 

   One branch, Palladists - in what respect are they 

belong to Italy and Freemasonry, remains 

with a question - simply and returned to the Catholics and zm. This is something 

like a neo-gnostic sect for which Lucifer is 

Adon ai 4 1 . He is the god of light, the prince of good, while 

                  42 

And Yehovah- Adon ai - an evil god, a god of darkness. Apparently old 

Manichaeism has incredible vitality. 

   Satanists, on the contrary, are well aware that Sa- 

tana - fallen angel, great antagonist and great 

cue serpent, and tempter. He is what he was to 

medieval Satanists - the great prince of darkness, with 

with which you can become the owner of the most 

wild abilities and under the protection of which it is possible without 

punished to commit all kinds of crimes, especially 

that the art of black magic is not envisaged nowadays 

him by law. They are usually headed by a saint 

a puppy who recites blasphemous masses and who 

at the same time, like the famous Catholic Docre, 

endowed with rare magical abilities and knowledge 

niami. 

   Such a mass of Huysmans with amazing power and 

Powerfully describes in his novel "La bas", giving to those 



     This novel was first published in Russian in 1891 under 

Titled Down There. And it was also built under the name "Abyss" (in 

1 9         y               P       I M         e 

      **       - )-   ~~       R         -   R d- 

               "Satanism and Magic". - f r. 



                                                             5 I1 



in addition to purely artistic details, the document 

of paramount importance. 

    It's still the same blasphemous mass, desecrated 

the sacrament, the final sexual orgy, brought 

naya to inhuman proportions by inhalation of narcotic drugs 

sky substances. And again the same thing: a priest, suffering. 

satyriasis, and hysterical women with somnambulists 

chesky predisposition. Psychological obyag 

denial of these monstrous actions is also impossible, 

like any other religion. And bo satan ism so aya re 

li gi i , as all to aya other, but he religion is a rebours, re 

he seduces them, seduces and debauchery. In an abyss skirt 

everything is possible, all sorts of crimes are born there, 

there rages a terrible passion for madness, which 

can only be satisfied by the inhuman 

the destruction of all laws, usually binding them to 

hand shower 

    A normal person can understand just as little 

black masses, as he cannot understand sodomy or 

identity, and yet it does not occur to anyone from 

deny them, which, as you know, with a strange rage 

done in relation to black masses. And so, sect 

grows under the protection of that liberal bourgeoisie and liberal 

ral church, defending and that, due to Darwinism 

mom and materialism and basing its foundations on 

achievements of materialistic teachings; she grows and 

become powerful. 

    The Church, which, as you know, was the greatest 

the enemy of every mystic and, the material church, renounced 

repenting of her origin, does not want anything 

know about it, although she would have every reason to 

join this sect, even at the risk of providing material for 

stupid and cheap witticisms of several newspapers. 

    In conclusion, a few more words about the sect founded 

noah Ventra, called Carmel, in the bosom of which, on 

next to blasphemy, the worst kind of hell thrives 

travel. P a ri s i m rozen to ra tsers 4 3 s inexpressible 

                                                            1 

Through our difficulties, we managed to get a full explanation of the 

esoteric teachings of this sect. Stanislav de Gnkh< 

   44 

and published them in his very interesting book" 

“The Serpent of Genesis”*, p. I. 



  * "The Serpent of the Book of Genesis." - f r. 





312 



   The sect is based on the rising redemptio*, existing 

operates from the lowest to the highest, the brightest level. 

Everyone should work on their perfection 

and take part in the community. How to get salvation? On 

this, as an answer, is the great secret of Carmel: 

“by an act of sinful love (Eve, who sinned with the serpent), we 

lost paradise; an act of religious love can again 

purchase it." Sexual communication can, therefore, 

occur in a sinful way, as it happened in paradise, or 

heavenly, like in Carmel. And so the Carmelites mutually co- 

perform an act of "heavenly love in order to improve 

deal with the lower and m and elemental spirits as in the sukku- 

bate, and in the incubate to their celestifier**". 

   H ors des un ion s, point de salut!*** All the men of the sect 

possess all the women of the sect and vice versa. Tin 

communism is the essence of all these teachings. Al- 

tar - bed, kiss - liturgical action; And 

the unnatural vice of Onan serves to 

to elevate beings; public copulation, 

which the light is not extinguished further, as the Gnostics did, 

the most shameless prostitution becomes the greatest 

brooding, an act of inner sanctification. 

   Rozen to the Reitzers, who explored the secrets of the sect with 

the greatest care on the basis of colossal 

material and handwritten letters of the prophet of the sect 

Jean a Baptiste, pronounce on him a sentence that must 

wives was to be executed by a secret judge 

lisch, if he does not stop within a few years 

their orgies. 

   Here are some examples of how the prophet sanctifies his 

their adherents. 

   The G family ...have only two beds, the 

Unions took place in one where the Father slept with the 

two girls at the same time****. 

   In March 1883 the Carmel was in all its action**'"'* 

- it's about a black mass, and it came to shameful 

scenes of jealousy. One lady "ne trouvait pas une 

    p 

       redemption. - lat. 

   ** make heavenly. - f r. 

  *** Outside marriages, a place of salvation! — Fr. 

 **** Family G ... having two beds, they chose as 

marriage bed only one of them, or the father went to bed immediately 

* Two daughters. - f r. 

***** In March 1883, Carmel was completely absorbed in his work. 

he. _ f r . 



                                                             313 



sufficient compensation for the loss of her husband, who is 

violemment epris de M- lle G .G .... "*. She threatened extradition* 

secrets of the sect. This was followed by something incredible, us- 

tanovlennoe pokaya vsh and m and sya eyewitnesses. lady get it 

la back her husband, while k ak young lady n i dir 

beg forgiveness on your knees from Madame, while saying that this. 

lady, lying with her husband, performing a unio: 

celeste**. 

    Surrounded by mediums and somnambulists, with 

whose relics he wants to know the secrets of black magic, 

plunging them into a somnambulistic state, the head of the pain 

shoi sect, the number of adherents of which, naturally 

venously, rapidly growing, the modern prophet forms> 

a danger that the liberal bourgeoisie must not. 

would be overlooked from purely social views. 

    C is the mouth to eat, created su nt genitals ao 

coeundum ***, here is the highest, forever new and forever old 

the principle of immortal gnosticism. And then the next 

reinforces what we already know from the coven.h 

I am a learned witness that he is not bound by any sanguinary bond, when 

and let the faithful join together: neither a father with a daughter, neither 

with his son, mother, nor with his brother, his sister 

it was wrong to mix "**". 

    This sexual mysticism, sanctifying the anti-nature 

real fornication is nothing new. New 

it contains only what was new in the original 

teachings to the Atars; positive character of the sect, due to 

Why is it a thousand times more dangerous than its own 

satanism, because the latter is rooted in the negative;; 

n ii, denial ii, full of fear and bad conscience. 





   Paul is the main axis of all these phenomena. Uto 

pouring the ever-growing demands of the floor, will satisfy! 



   * did not find sufficient compensation after the loss of her m. 

Ms., who was passionately in love with the girl Zh. AND . ... - f r. 

  ** on her knees asked for forgiveness from the lady, while this lady • 

used a heavenly union to get into bed with her mother 

I will. — f r. 

 *** Mouths are made for singing, genitals for mating." 

— lat. 

      I testify that no blood was forbidden there.zyxwvu 

                                                                 • 

connection that the "faithful" had sexual intercourse with each other, ' 

it was not considered sinful to copulate, following the rite, the father with d 

Cheryu, mother and son, brother and sister. - lat. 





314 



thirst for revenge, to find out the secret forces that can 

can give sexual happiness, here are the reasons why 

to Satan. 

     But there is no happiness in this. Let be! But in the realm of the night, in 

abysses and pains you find intoxication and madness. Bro- 

you go to hell, but you fall into madness, into rages 

which can be forgotten, forgotten. 

     Erase me from the tablets of life, write me in 

the book of death! This majestic formula is the key to 

to all these sects. 

     The day is a heavy, formidable burden of life, a terrible 

a new torment of the need to live; night is madness 

intoxication, oblivion. 

     For all these facts there is no moral measure, it 

let the fat bourgeois who compensates 

his cretinism with accumulated money; these facts 

must be comprehended, comprehended in their inconsolable 

Noah, excruciatingly sick abyss. 

     Desperate humanity has only one outcome: 

get drunk. And it gets drunk. Intoxicated with poison, drunk 

vanishes with mud, and all this intoxication ends in extra- 

zom the floor so that the nerves are torn, the person is split in two, 

endures the most terrible, cruelest tortures, but forgets 

at least the most terrible, that which surpasses 

filth and disgust of his nasty ointments, his frogs, 

his nasty guests, mixed with disgusting 

secretions, he forgets life. 

     The fact that he was in the ascending line and indulged in criminal 

vengeance, what he killed did not know the boundaries in his revenge 

and betrayed himself more willingly than allowed himself to be held back. 

sting from the crime, it was only his great 

 the right, the right of the one who ordered to write himself in the book 

death, he denied a hateful life. 

     Why did he break the law, he turned it over, mocked- 

sitting over him, dirty silt and defiled him; that he is right 

 to the public, whether it be a religion or a civil institution, 

treated with the deepest contempt; that he is more willing 

 agreed to die rather than repent of his errors 

 niyah - this was again his right, the right of the desperate 

 gosya, who does not find a way out, peace, an hour of pain: 

 he buried the conditions of life. There was greatness in the cry 

 witch whom the executioner agreed to release if 

 she will give herself to him: “I, who kissed the ass of Satan, will give myself 

 etc 

   hey, doer of the law?!” 

     Isn't there something positive here? 

                                                      315 



    The Atars tried and the prophet Carmel tried to sanctify 

tying madness, nymphomania and satyriasis. 

    Sad and pathetic hypocrisy! Satan the Paraclete 

in the sense in which one can call the Spirit so - without 

mie; Satan who creates life and destroys it again 

shch and y, creating development and again destroying it. 

Satan cannot be a savior. 

    But he becomes the paraclete of evil, he proclaims 

great law, he drowns sin in even greater sin, he 

teaches oblivion of evil through denial, through ecstasy 

Tinktov is an opian. 

   This is the only Satan a-Paraclete: “Ennivrez- 

YOU! *. 









  * "Get drunk!" - f r. 



31 b 



  Roger HART 

And stories of witchcraft 





                     Chapter first 

                HOW IT STARTED 

           GREAT WITCH HUNT 





   The bulk of the population of medieval Europe 

for a long time she maintained her belief in the supernatural. 

The Kingdom of Darkness, inhabited by devils and evil spirits, 

was as real and tangible as the Kingdom 

Heavenly. That's why for many people the magic was 

the same natural phenomenon as, for example, every 

daily prayer. were widely distributed and 

knowledge about supernatural spirits, so most 

people in all countries of the world believed in demons, demons, 

brownies, devils, poltergeist and other similar su- 

society, as well as the existence of mysterious creatures 

such as vampires, werewolves and unicorns. 

   These vestiges of the past continued to exist 

in Europe and in the 16th century, when society had already 

had mercy on the ancient scientific and cultural heritage 

thanks to the figures of the Renaissance. Confirmation of this 

we meet, for example, in the plays of William Shakespeare 

(1566 -1616) - his works are full of references to 

magic and miracles. Here's what he says about his magical 

the strength of the elf Pek in A Midsummer Night's Dream: 

     Now I'll pretend to be a horse, then I'll light up with a spark, 

     I will grunt and neigh, burn, roar and growl, 

     Now like a dog, now like a horse, now like a burning fire! 

                          (per. T. Shchepkinoy Copernicus) 

   People were afraid of all sorts of signs and bad omens: "Es- 

whether the hare crossed the road in front of us, if the mouse 

gnawed at our clothes; if someone spilled three k apli 

blood on the nose or on it, salt woke up, and on the legs - 

black spots appeared on him and so on ... "1, etc. 

   Another writer, who lived a little later, was 

her superstitious: “I am no longer seized by a superstitious feeling 

if I see all this - fall to artin, karkanye 

a crow, a hare crossing the road that turned over - 

the salt shaker, the scallop of the chicken, and the like miraculous 

                                           2 

sa." So wrote in 1779 Arthur Wilson. 

   Another example of popular prejudice is 

faith in vampires. The following description is yes- 



dated 1733: “Night vampires come out of ev 

their graves, attack people, sleeping peacefully in the CBOI 

beds, suck all the blood out of their bodies and still 

destroy them in a way. They lay siege to men, women wi and n, zyxwvuts 

                                                         , p 

and children, regardless of age. Under and under 

lethal impact complain of suffocation, m 

breath, and soon these people fade away. 

    English writer Reginald Scott (1538-159'< 

talks about how mothers and n 

gali small ck and x children all sorts of stories about the house' 

out and ghosted x: “We began to be afraid of already 

you only make one terrible sound of "Whoo!". And they're so frightened 

us all to them ghosts, spirits, witches, houses 

vymi, sorceress mi, karli kami and, fairies, satyrs, Pa 

nom, fauns, Silenus, wandering lights, rub 

us, centaur, gnomes, velkans, imps 

wizards, n ymphs, children thrown by e> 

f ami, and ncubes, the spirit of Robin Hood, terrible l< 

children, inhabitants of oak groves, hellish wagons, 

fire eats them as a dragon, elf om-prankster, boy 

com- with-finger, lesh and m, whether with utami, monsters, at k 

there were no bones, and other things the same way 

that we were horrified even by our own shadow. 1' 

if before that a person was not afraid of the devil, except perhaps toly 

at night, now the newly sheared sheep is turned. 

lass into a dangerous beast and this one in the recent past but * 

the little man no longer dared to walk in the sum*, 

to ah through the church yard - at the mere thought of; l 

his hair stood on end." 

    Priests called on their parishioners to stay} • 

swear by the evil influence of the old witches: "Look back" 

around, my children. If you have strange sheep' 

pigs or sick horses or scammers 

chi sh k a school age, or you see girls 

a spinner or a gloomy and sloppy public girl 

which is not enough for ash and and which does not have enough 

no bread, no butter, or if she can't 

get rid of epilepsy, or if the spasm is persistent 

twists her mouth, and she always grinds ' 

bami. and her body trembles incessantly, and her hands p; >' 

they stiffen, and if the old mother k a Nob calls • - 

accidentally "young and dissolute", then there is no doubt 

matush k a Nob is a witch, and this young girl is a 

to la taya, succumbing to the spell of the night spirits”5. 

G20 



     On December 5, 1484, Pope Innocent VIII published 

forged a historical bull, which marked the beginning of the 

thoroughly prepared official action and pro- 

against those suspected of witchcraft. B ulla this was nape- 

chatan in many copies and sent to all 

corners of Europe. And she endowed me with huge half- 

powers of visitors to visitors - people responsible for 

fight against heresy. “With all the strength of souls and, moreover, 

there is pastoral care, we strive to cato- 

personal faith in our time has been growing everywhere and 

flourished, and every heretical wickedness was uprooted from 

environment of the faithful; and we gladly proclaim and once again 

declare the ways and methods through which our 

Christian aspirations can be fulfilled; 

for ... zeal and striving for our faith can still 

more powerful influence on the hearts of believers. 

    Not without excruciating pain, we recently learned that in 

some parts of Northern Germany and ... many faces 

of both sexes neglected their own salvation and, 

turned away from the Catholic faith, fell into carnal 

sin with demons, incubi and succubus and your own count 

dovostvo, enchanted and I mi and conjured n an and I mi and others 

terrible superstitious, vicious and criminal deeds 

I n and I cause women to give us premature births 

dy, send damage to the offspring of animals, grain 

cereal and grapes on the vines and fruit on the trees, 

how they spoil men, women and n, domestic and other animals 

here, as well as vineyards, gardens, meadows, pastures, 

fields, grain and all earthly growths. 

    Moreover, they mercilessly torment both internally with them, 

and external terrible diseases of men, women 

china, domestic large and small livestock of various types 

dov. They prevent men from producing, and women 

rights to beget children and deprive husbands and wives of the 

ability to fulfill your marital duty. 

    Moreover, with blasphemous lips they renounce 

from the very faith they received at holy baptism, 

and, at the instigation of the enemy of the human race, they dare 

perform countless other kinds of un- 

said atrocities and crimes to their perdition 

SOUL, to an insult to the Divine Majesty and to the temptation 

and danger to a great many people.” 

    Then it is said: 

hi named ink to the visitors when they perform their 

duties, and may they be allowed to correct, 

                                                       D 2 1 

H-3400 



detain and punish persons who commit the specified 

nye crimes, as if in plenipotentiary letters 

tah were named accurately and by name s districts, cities 

dioceses, localities, persons and crimes »6 . 

    These Inquisitors were appointed by the Sacred College 

Before them, two goals were set - to eradicate any 

kind of heresy and see to it that all heretics suffer 

worthy of punishment azan and E. Bulla of 1484 was important because 

that she regarded witchcraft as a heresy. In 1501; 

Pope Alexander VI further strengthened his positions and 

torov, zan and mavsh and xya witch hunt and travel 

for this purpose throughout Europe, including 

And thali and . This was due to the fact that "in the province of Lom 

bardiya men and women indulged in various ma 

magical spells and diabolical superstitions, con 

doing bad deeds with poisons, and all other 

things, casting spells on people, animals, crops 

and sowing around him an unusual sin. That's why for is- 

fulfillment of our pastoral duties, as 

written by the Lord, we intend to destroy these 

steps and prevent, as far as our strength.x 

(and God help us!), spreading these shameful 

and sinful deeds. 

    And that is why we order you to... diligently 

search - one, or with the help of selected 

we and the same honest people - men and women 

(described above) and punish them by punishing them with azan and and ' 

                               7 

in accordance with the law.” 

    Today, the fact that already . 

Bible we meet indicated and I on the need for 

to call everyone zan and mayusch and hsya witchcraft. In confirmation 

This opinion can be supported by many correlations 

relevant biblical quotations. "The fortune-tellers do not leave 

alive” (Jo 23:18). Elsewhere there is so aya fra 

for: “Do not turn to the callers of the dead, and to the ox 

do not go to shebn ikam, and do not bring yourself to desecration 

from them” (Lev. 19.31). Or else: “And when they say 

to you: address the summoner of the dead and the sorcerers 

to whisperers and ventriloquists, then answer: no 

should the people turn to their god? Ask 

do the dead speak of the living?” (And p. 8.19). The other pag 

soot in the bible shows what to do with 

dunyami: “A man or a woman, if there are ong 

call the dead or magic, let them be betrayed 



322 



  death: stones and I must beat them, their blood is on them " 

;(Lev. 20.27). 

\     That's why already Bernard of Klervaux (1091-1153) 

  very emphatic about the retreat 

  from orthodox faith. In order to keep any 

  day in the bosom of the church, he believed, you can use any 

  other means: “A person should be persuaded to faith, but not 

  you have to bind her. However, it would be better if 

  ih prin udyat k tomu magistry, ne derzhach ie mech c 

  no need than they will be allowed to involve in their 

  delusions of many other people." 

     Many books about "demons" appeared in Europe 

  already in the Renaissance. Most of them contain 

  there are extensive descriptions of a wide variety of demons, which 

  which, according to then-existing beliefs, infected 

  witches. Before you is an example of such a list, compiled- 

  go and taglia n by the monk and scientist Francesco-Maria 

  Guacco 8 : 

     “The first type of demons is Fiery, for they are inhabited 

  they are in the upper layers of the air and they never descend 

  yutsya vn and z. And so it will continue until the Day of Judgment. 

  These demons have no connection with people living in 

  earth. 

     The second type of demons is called Airy, for 

  they live in the air that surrounds us. They can neither 

  go even to hell and, composing his body from the air, 

  can at this time be visible to people. Very 

  often, with the permission of the Lord, they stir the air and 

  raise storms and tempests, and all this they plot 

  to destroy humanity. 

     The third type is Earth. They were spewed out with no- 

  demon on the earth for their sins. Some of them live 

  in forests and trees and set a trap for and for hunting 

  kov; others inhabit the fields and, on a dark night, lead the way 

  nicknames from the right path; others live in secret places 

  and hiding places while others enjoy life 

  new, being among people. 

     The fourth type is Water. These demons live under 

  water, in rivers and lakes. They are full of anger, violent, un- 

  calm and misleading. They raise boo- 

  Ri on the seas, sink ships into the ocean ah and destroy people 

  on the water. Appears, so the demons are more like 

  women rather than men, for they live in places 

  wet and life is easy. Those who offend 

P*                                                       323 



h 



melt in less comfortable and drier places, usually 

look like men. 

    The fifth type of demons is underground, for they live in 

caves and mountain gorges. They have a very mean disposition 

and most often they pester people working in 

mines and pits and looking for gold there. They always go- 

you do any harm. They call 

earthquakes, storms and fires, shake foundations 

buildings. 

    The sixth fork of demons are gelnophobes who are afraid of the light. 

So they are called because they hate the light and neither 

when they don't show up during the day. And that's why it happens" 

that they cannot turn into normal beings 

until the night comes. comprehend the essence 

these demons is absolutely impossible, it is located 

beyond human understanding, for their dark 

souls shaken by cold passions, malice, demon 

calmness and confusion. And when they meet a person 

centuries at night, they forcibly crush him and, with the permission 

God's grace, often kill him with their touch 

breeze or breeze... This type of demon has no 

what to do with witches and intimidate them with 

amulets are also impossible, for they avoid the light, 

human voices and all kinds of noise. 

    English writer William West9, who lived in the era 

hu of the reign of Elizabeth I, gave the following description 

sorcerers: 

    “Spellcasters, these are those who, by uttering un- 

what magical words dares to test things 

contrary to nature, while causing the ghosts of the dead 

shih. They falsely claim this kind of 

deeds, allegedly showing some secret and remote 

nye things in a wide variety of sizes and types. 

    Sorcerers are soothsayers who proclaim the divine 

present and future. They call the souls of sinners 

through various spells and special verbal forms 

mule. And to these words they - as they demand - answer 

a certain voice speaks, and in front of them at that moment stands either 

a glass, or a precious stone, or a ring, or an 

fermenting a thing to be found. 

    Soothsayer prophets are masters of the art 

predictions full of prophetic spirit. They can 

Specify 

Mr 

          who stole this or that thing, and tell 

  where is the missing or stolen item10. 



   Magicians and imaginary doctors. These are the ones for 

in order to heal all diseases and I call human and 

animals - also use certain spells 

or pieces of paper and with inscriptions, which they call 

“amulets” or “spell n an and i mi”, hanging them from a wok 

around the neck or any other part of the body. 

   Sorcerers and soothsayers are those who, with the help of 

various spells, formulas, rituals, herbs and others 

things, believe that they are able to create anything 

wish. The devil leads them into this delusion, deeds 

ing, perhaps with his own hand, what these gates are about 

zhey say. In this they are somewhat different from witches, 

sorcerer, soothsayer, guessing by the flight of birds 

and foretelling them from the entrails of the sacrificial 

animals. 

    Kolduns (witches): a witch or a sorcerer is a woman 

shch and na, which - being deceived as a result of dog 

thief, concluded by her with the devil on the conviction of silt!< 

inspiration, or thanks to the tricks thereof - du 

thinks that she is able to carry out all possible 

sinful deeds and I, either thinking about it to myself, or ( 

having sent the prophecy of ty - for example, to shake the air of thunder 

mom and lightning and i mi, cause hail and storm, endurezyxwvutsr 

                                                           Mr. 

other places crops and trees, move tops 

on their own washed spirits (taking them at that moment 

the image of a goat, a pig, a calf, etc.) in any 

lazy mountainous areas, spending on this surprisingly 

a very tiny fraction of time; and sometimes even 

thief on a broomstick or pitchfork, or on as and x others with 

abilities and then spend the whole night with CBOHV 

beloved, and playing, running, feasting, dancing, entertaining 

escaping, indulging in devilish lust and various 

decent entertainment, demonstrating this and that 

a thousand such monstrous and mocking deeds 

n th". 

    Witches were usually considered women shch and n, committing, 

bad deeds: “The witches are those whom, n ^ 

reasons for their great crimes, they call the usual 

malefici or "those who do evil". These witches, if you please 

niya of the Lord, excite the elements and confuse the minds of 

dey, not enough believers in God. Not using any 

what am I, yes, they kill with their extraordinary 

but powerful charms ... And more they collect devils and, imek 

for that courage, excite them so much that the last kill 

defeat enemies with their vicious tricks. And the witches 

326 



then use the blood of their victims and often desecrate 

corpses of the dead ... And they say that demons are blood 

love, and therefore, when witches are busy with their 

In other words, they mix blood with water so that 

the color of the blood to more easily be able to evoke these 

          11 

demon ov ". 

   Things got to the point that even the king of Scots himself 

James VI wrote a very serious work on witchcraft 

stuyu, which was published in 1597 under the title 

name "Demonology". It was written in the form of a dialogue 

two people. Like most of its modern 

kov, Yakov never doubted the existence 

witches: “A terrible abundance at that time in the country from- 

vicious servants of the Devil, sorcerers or sorcerers, 

moved me - oh, dear reader! - hurry up 

explain this in that treatise, I wrote 

nom ... in order to resolve the doubts of many who 

who boast that such attacks and satanic 

are very common and that, consequently, tools 

him (Satan) deserve the strictest punishment 

niya. It is also directed against the unfortunate judgments of 

of our time, expressed mainly by two 

me people, on which one, nicknamed Scott Ang- 

Lichan Ying (Regin Ald Scott) is not ashamed in print from- 

deny the very possibility of the existence of witchcraft, 

thus supporting the ancient error of the Sadducee 

ev, denying their existence of spirits ... 

   Wishing to make this treatise more pleasant and useful 

positive, I put it in the form of a dialogue, dividing it with 

this on three books: the first gives us a general picture of 

magic and, in particular, nek romance; the second - about the Vedas- 

witchcraft and witchcraft, and the third is a discourse on the most 

different spirits and ghosts, which, I appear, are restless 

yat people. This is followed by a conclusion. In this work 

I intended to show only two things, what I mean 

already said: firstly, that such devilish 

the arts existed and continue to exist 

to understand today, and the second: how and x exactly the methods of investigation 

they deserve the domination and the punishment of the azan and I.” 

   And indeed, it turned out that the first judicial 

other processes associated with witchcraft took place in 

XVI century in England and Scotland. In July 1591 

King James even personally took part in one of 

similar cases that took place in Scotland. The court rejected 

neel accusations against a certain Barbara Napier that pro- 

                                                      327 



got out, oddly enough, thanks to perseverance 

Jacob. Witchcraft, he said then, "is the thing that 

Paradise is found here and there. I know it's the best" 

heinous sin, and for about nine months I spent. 

this year, occupied with the laws of God and man 

calic, and I realized that this sin is really 

vile. And according to the law of God, they can be pok arap 

death. According to human law, these are 

maleficium (crime) or veneficium (sorcerers 

stvo), committed with the help of sickness, poison, n < 

also punishable by death. 

   The decision reached by the court was influenced by 

that its members had no evidence of witches, which 

which the members of the court considered insufficient. And I know, 

that according to secular laws am so to them wicked creatures 

it is not allowed to act as eyewitnesses, for 

excluding cases of heresy and lèse majesté. G 

in other cases it is considered inappropriate. However 

in this situation with a witch, you can allow 

bnoe with good reason. First, not a single time 

the child personality cannot know about these matters, 

ryh, one witch will never accuse another. And in 

third, because none of the deeds committed 

not a single person has seen them. 

   Next, I turn to those people whom the witches 

forced to abandon God and surrender to the Devil. If 

they renounced it and really repented > 

deed, then I believe that they are no longer sorcerers, with 

their evidence is quite satisfactory. 

   It may seem strange to us that such images 

bathed and knowledgeable people often turned out to be so 

superstitious. So, for example, when in 1608 one de 

the senile priest cut his own throat, only 

would only avoid being burned at the stake on charges' 

in heresy and witchcraft, some Italian monk 

explained this: “Then the devil appeared to him and became so with 

tempt him that ... he cut his throat with his F1 

knife. And although the wound was not so great that 

cause instant death, however, this demon 

taking advantage of such a desperate act, forcibly 

took possession of his soul and dragged her to hell to the great 

amazement surrounding them. I saw this man 

yours, though still warm, lying on the straw. After all, according to 

since he led a bestial life, now he was lying 

what the cattle eat. So did the divine right 



328 



judgment, for it renders to each man according to his merit 

din him. And the Lord willed that he who is ninety 

years lived as a follower of Satan, and his life 

finished in the satanic embrace x»1 2 . 

    However, already in 1656 the English writer 

Thomas Ady suddenly announced that there is nothing in the Bible that 

4JO could justify a witch hunt: "So where on- 

written in the Old and New Testaments that a witch is 

killer, or that she has the ability to kill 

go-either or harm someone, sending illnesses and not- 

power? Where does it say that witches have devils who 

whom do they feed? Where is it written about what witches have 

the nipples they give them to suck... and what the devil puts 

on their special marks ... and what witches can hit 

crops or animals ... or can fly through the air 

huh...?"1 3 

    The English philosopher Thomas Hobbes (1588-1679) also 

rather skeptical about witchcraft. Oh and he 

nevertheless, believed that the guilty should be punished 

to azans: “As for witches, I don’t think that 

they have some kind of real magical power 

loy. But even if so, they are justly punished for 

false belief that they can commit 

similar evil, coupled with their intention to act 

as if it were within their power; their craft is worth more than 

to some new religion, rather than to science or art 

           14 

to the mouth." 

    However, at the end of the 16th - beginning of the 17th century, so 

there were very few skeptics. From the date of publication 

more than a hundred years have passed since the papal bull, on this pre- 

met hundreds of voluminous works were written, on which 

A whole generation of superstitious scientists has grown up. Qty 

dovostvo, especially on the European continent, is considered 

elk heresy and, by all accounts, threatened the security 

religion. It is also important that "the great hunt for 

witches" coincided in time with the Renaissance, then 

is that period of history when the church was 

need to keep all-round defense, fighting off the encirclement 

living them on all sides of the internal and external of their enemies 

gov. Its ideologues thought that the devil was present in 

everyone and everywhere, and the forces of darkness envelop all Christian 

in. Thus began the first k azn and the first processes, 

Who gave the green light to the greatest and most terrible hunt for 

witches, thanks to which Europe entered the strip 

a kind of hysteria, the victims of which fell on 



                                                    3 29 



according to our conservative estimates, 100 thousand people, mainly 

way, n evin ram s. This madness was destined 

subside only at the beginning of the eighteenth century. 





                    Chapter Two 

            WITCHES OR WITCHES? 



   Residents of numerous cities and villages of Euro- 

we usually represented the witch in the form of an old, ugly 

of a living woman, bent under the burden of the lived 

years and various vices. As a rule, he is a traveler 

wove in a company of mice or toads, or other 

"close spirits", secrets about the devils sent down to her 

ox. English poet Edmund Spenser (1522-1599) 

so imagined a typical witch, living alone 

shui in an abandoned hut 1 5 : 

          There, in the valley deaf and dull, 

          Suddenly a modest hut appeared to her, 

          And from the branches and bark created, 

          It is covered with turf from above. 

          In this house the sorcerer ya lurks, 

          Dwelling in the silence and among the roots, 

          And without caring about anything, in an effort 

          Run away human eyes. 

          And lives far away from neighbors 

          Hiding the deeds of hell. 

          And she harms people in that corner, 

          While grinning devilishly. 

    It was believed that the sorceresses were burning with an inexplicable 

goy to toads and lynxes. "To lynxes and toads are considered 

harmful creatures, and therefore all people feed to 

aversion to them, for they have a natural antipathy 

tiyu to this kind of parasites, except for witches, who, 

                                  16 

as they say, they cherish and x ". 

    The sorceress's label could be with extraordinary ease 

pasted on any old woman who just can't 

lucky in life and he got very ill, or semi- 

suffered a severe injury. So, for example, it happened in 1612 

year in England with Elizabeth Davis, who became a defendant 

in our able lankash and rsk witch process: 

"This disgusting witch has been marked with a seal from the very 

birth, he is such by nature: her left eye 

330 



located below the other, one looking up, the other 

down; she was so ugly that the best people 

present at that venerable meeting and the great 

committee of the meeting, confirmed that they did not have to 

                               17 

see something like that." 

     One of the few writers who lived in the 16th century 

and did not accept the mawsh and x doctrine of witchcraft, considering it 

wandering, was Regin ald Scott. True thanks 

This made him many enemies. He is always sympathetic 

treated elderly women and us, exposing 

we are persecuted on charges of witchcraft. They were 

“old, lame, dull, pale, wrinkled, 

dirty; poor, gloomy, erring and papist 

to and, or who do not know any religion at all. In their 

sluggish brains, the Devil really occupied much 

greater place than any other troubles, sorrows and 

misfortune. They very often believe that all this is wrong. 

sh or just them, that's why on their minds lies 

such a heavy and strange imprint. 

     They are crooked and hunchbacked, their faces are constantly 

the seal of melan cholia lives, plunging into horror all oc- 

scolding them. And x the skin is covered with like mi - then five tn ami, 

they are constantly scolding; some spirits live in them and 

sometimes they are just crazy. However, they are so 

firm and unapproachable in their convictions, which 

dy, who listens to their speeches, without much difficulty 

be able to believe in their sincerity. 

     In 1593 an English bishop left us 

such a description of the old woman-witch: "old, shabby 

life to an arga, with a decrepit physiognomy and wrinkled 

mi hands ami; she walks bent over and leaning on 

on a stick, with sunken eyes, toothless, with 

born by mami and wrinkling in the face, her members are 

shaking constantly. Walking through the streets, she is something 

always muttering under his breath. She already forgot to pray 

you are your Lord, but I still speak to her 

                                              18 

sharp and whore she will always call a whore ho . 

     That is why it is not surprising that the 

so their poor were easily burdened with the guilt of others: 

“It is doubtful, as he is, that her neighbors were dying or 

fell ill, and their children picked up a fever, various 

nye ailments, seizures, etc. due to the fact that these 

virile people considered the sorcerer's revenge. 

     Nevertheless, such judgments and predilections 

Found ground and support among inept healers 

                                                     33 1 



lei, as the well-known proverb says: “ve 

sorcery and sorcery are a sign of ignorance." Ybbs 

in life and the causes of these diseases were 

the bad state of a person, and by no means secret words, 

witches or spirits. 

    In the meantime, some cattle were dying either 

due to reasons of illness, or as a result of any non- 

happiness. That is why those who have experienced such 

u and , take into account everything that people say 

talking about these women and ahs (about their speeches, irritable 

pronunciation, uttered by them and implemented subsequently 

threats to life), not only assuming, but also re 

that all their misfortunes come from them.” 

    And further Scott added: “These unfortunates are so unfortunate 

all their neighbors see them and they are so afraid of them that maybe a little 

who dare insult them or deny them anything 

anything. As a result, they imagined that they could 

to steal what is inaccessible to anyone. 

    They go from house to house, door to door, you 

p rush and vaya a pot of milk, yeast, drink, stew, 

or something else, without which they can live, there is no 

to some possibility. But neither with my own spells, nor 

I am also suffering, nor with the help of the Devil's ox (with whom, as 

they say they made a solid deal) they don't 

gained neither beauty, nor money, nor wealth, nor help 

no pleasure, no worship, no honor, no knowledge 

                        19 

not anything like that.” 

    Written in the middle of the 17th century, the play “Edmoy 

Tonskaya witch a "2 0, one old woman complains about the fact that 

she would never have become a witch if she had not been 

people contributed to this with their gossip: 

      Oh why me? Why is all the envy of the world 

      Is he looking at me with wickedness? 

      All this because I am poor, stupid, 

      Ugly beyond measure 

      Bent like a bow and bound by people, 

      Whose share is a hundred times worse than mine! 

      For this, I must become a sewer 

      For dirty, rude, vile languages, 

      N rushing there! 

      To them, I'm just a witch. 

      I don't know me at all, 

      They want to show me 

      How should I be. 

332 



     After all, my bad tongue - so it became from their words - 

     And spoiled the harvest, bewitched their cattle 

     Themselves, their servants ok, to nurses and children. 

     So they say in ominous constancy. 

     Forcing me, too, to partly believe them. 

    In the 16th century, in rural areas of Europe, many women 

shchi and we have acquired a bad reputation downright real 

witches. But how could one prove the very fact of their 

sorcery? It was believed that every witch had 

"devil's trail", a special mark that 

her on the body. They said that this is a sign of an agreement, signed 

sledge by her with the devil, and very often given a mark 

served as evidence of guilt. On this occasion 

one and Talya nsk and th demonologist wrote this: “The demon left 

leaves a certain seal on every witch, especially on those who 

who is most devoted to him. However, this sign is not always 

Yes, they are the same shape and size. And sometimes he reminded 

hits a hare, sometimes a toad's paw, sometimes a spider, a dog 

or sleepy. He puts it on the innermost parts 

body - in men under the arm to oh ichi on the eyelid, or on 

lips, shoulders, buttocks or anywhere else. Women- 

chin - mainly on the chest or on the genitals 

organs The Devil leaves a mark with his claws »^ . 

   In 1611, the French doctor Jacques Fontaine celebrated 

said: “Some say that Satan remains 

fork on them these signs and with the help of red-hot iron and 

some kind of ointment, which he rubs into the witch's skin. Dru 

some say the devil marks the witch with his finger 

tsem, appearing at the same time either in the form of a spirit, or in general 

times human. If this were done with 

the power of red-hot iron, then it would not be burned 

scar left in some place, but the witches say that on 

they never had a scar in this place ... however, 

there is no need to prove it, for the devil, who does not use 

lacks in medical knowledge and I x and in full 

possesses them to some extent, should have only 

sewing ago place sensitivity. As for 

scar, then the devil is such a skilled craftsman that he 

it costs nothing to apply a red-hot iron to a person 

eternal body without causing burns”2 2 . 

   One of the ways in which one can 

to determine whether a given person is a sorcerer 

or not, there was the so-called "piercing". "This 

The method was associated with the theory of the devil's mark, then 



there is that place on the skin, on which there were a mole 

birthmarks tn a, scars, presumably due. 

who want to demonstrate a connection with Satan. If 

matured in witchcraft did not have x obvious signs ^ 

kov, then she could have invisible evidence, 

which could only be discovered with help, 

rock alyvan and me. All such devilish marks counts, 

were abnormal. And if Ali is stuck there, the length is on a zyxwvu 

                                                      t 

pin, they did not feel any pain, and blood 

in this place did not set foot ala "2 3 . 









                                                      1 

    Usually, before the start of p rok alyvan and I, the whole body of the ved 

we were carefully shaved. This was done in three npi 

chin am: firstly, the suspect could have k ak sh 

some tiny amulets protecting her; in-vk 

ryh, the devil could well dig into the witch's hair, 

finally, each devil's mark was followed by npi 

believe in the most careful way: “This mark is on! 

den to those who pierced it, because it is his business 

tie, and he does it the same way as everyone else. Oh i 

However, all this is a terrible deception, because if from this * 

blood does not flow in places, and a person does not feel anything, i 

he is immediately considered a sorcerer om ... That scoundrel who 

did this with us and who was in 16b< 

arrested for other crimes, confessed to 

it was all just a scam”2 4 . 

    Guazzo believed that the witch's abilities could sh 

be passed on from generation to generation: “Vedovskaya z- 

times can often be transmitted under the guise of a disease 

to their sinful parents, because they are trying to 

ek at the location of the devil. And the greed of Satan 

has always been boundless and insatiable. So, once in>> 

having grown up in the family, he will never refuse zs 

taken place, except perhaps after a long struggle 

And the fact that one of the parents turned out to be guilty of 

committing such a crime, and there is one of the 

my strong and unshakable evidence against <t 

accused of witchcraft. 

3 34 



     Every day we come across examples like this. 

  children spoiled by this infection, for the Devil is always striving 

  wants to increase the number of its supporters. And there is no beam 

  better way to do this than to call him, or 

  induce those in his power to spoil their own 

                  23 

  venous children ". 

I     At the beginning of the 17th century, when witch-hunts in Europe 

  was in full swing, finding a victim was unusual 

  tea is easy. If an ordinary mole or scar is 

  were taken for the "devil's mark", then not a single person 

  lovek did not feel safe - especially 

  did he not enjoy special love and popularity 

  in your village, etc. In the next chapter, we will 

  and let's see how these witches were doing - in general 

  I believe in my craft. Some of them, without co- 

  opinions, was engaged in magic, just as they did 

  in due time the alchi m and k and ; however, most of the "witches" 

  fell victim to the ignorant, though endowed 

  violent fantasy, in to visitors. 





                      Chapter Three 

               SATAN WORSHIP 



   For two hundred years - from 1500 to 1700 - in Europe there was 

a huge number of books have been published, devoted to one 

problem - the problem of witchcraft. In fact, ma- 

an insignificant number of people were engaged in logical "arts" 

number of people. Therefore, what is reported in these works 

moose about sabbaths, black mass, spirits, pacts with satan 

was new to many. As the fear grows, 

before the forces of darkness, first in Europe, and subsequently 

in the New World, scientists increasingly began to expound in 

absolutely everything they heard in their writings. Sometimes 

it so happened that their books were used as 

authoritative instructions by judges and lawyers, 

shim witch processes. The tragedy was 

that in such an atmosphere of superstition, ignorance and 

fear served each other as a breeding ground. 

   An integral part of the witch's business, especially on 

the European continent and in the Protestant Scotch 

Dee, had a pact with the devil. The witch was known 

noah magical power and, perhaps, "his spirit", 

which she received in exchange for her shower. Exactly 

                                                     3 15 



Thanks to this provision, religious leaders 

personal and Protestant churches wanted to "narrow" in> 

instigation to heresy and accordingly apply to it, 

necessary measures for nakazan and I. 

     The first complete description of the contract with the devil of dates, - 

rutsya 1435 year. It is placed in one of the 

the first printed books about witchcraft. About the idea, this church 

moniya should parody the Christian rite kr> - 

shch en and i . “Firstly, on some Sunday, even D ( 

how the holy water will be consecrated, the future student 

and his masters must go to church and there, in 

presence, he must renounce Christ and his Bepi.i 

baptism and the Catholic Church. Then he must 

testify your respects to m agisterulus, then zyxwvutsrqponm 

                                                      eci) 

"to the little master of y" (for that is what they call the devil) 

After that, he drinks from the flask the liquid taken from the ubg 

ty babies. Having done this, he immediately begins pronp 

go and stick to our sci ence and fundamental rights 

forks of this sect » 2 6 . 

     In 1662, a Scottish witch, I Zabel Ga\ 

di, admitted that she had entered into a similar agreement 

devil: “Passing somehow past the farm in Drumdevin 

in Heads, I met the devil and there I made a deal with him 

agreement. And I promised that I would meet him at night 

Aldirn Church, which I did. And the first thing I 

did it that night, there was a renunciation of baptism. P rg 

this I put one hand to the crown, the other - J 

p i m e. And then I betrayed myself from head to toe 

hands of the Devil, who stood behind the pulpit and held 

hands ah Black to the nigga. 

     Margaret B rodi of Aldirn handed me over: 

Devil, so he christened me I, and he put mt' 

mark on his shoulder, sucked the blood and spat it out 

in the palm of your hand. After which he sprinkled it on my p 

                                                         l 

and said: “I baptize you, Jeannette, in my name 

After some time we left there. Next 1 

once I met him at the New Ward, at the Yinsh oh, and TG'" 

he copulated with me. It was a big dark 

this person, very cold, and I felt that 

his seed, caught in me, is as cold as ah! 

and spring waters. And sometimes he has boots on his feet, otherwise; 

yes - bash poppy and , but his feet are crooked and parted 

data. He told me that sometimes he appears in (/ 

                          27 

like a deer or to a donkey ". (And it is interesting that with credit- 

The devil gave Izabel a new name Jeannette). 



336 



      The Italian scientist Guazzo believed that such 

  the treaty was a parody of the Catholic litur- 

  gyu: 

      "1. Rejection of the Christian Faith: "I reject 

  creator of earth and heaven. I reject baptism. I renounce 

  I repent from the worship that I used to render 

  God. I remain faithful to the Devil and believe only in those 

  bya." From a very early age, an important part of this ritual is 

  ala was the trampling of the cross, which took place during 

  pronunciation to la you. 

,     2. New baptism by the Devil with a change of names. 

      3. Symbolic removal of the baptismal oil. 

      4. Renunciation of godparents and consolidation 

  for new godparents. 

      5. Preliminary transfer to the Devil of a piece of clothing 

  of 

      6. Taking an oath of allegiance to the Devil, with 

  this man stands in the magic outlined on the earth 

  circle. 

      7. A request addressed to the Devil to enter their name 

  on to the Book of Death. 

      8. Promise to sacrifice children to the Devil. This 

  step served as the basis for later stories about how 

  how witches kill children. 

      9. Promise to pay tribute annually 

  nomu demon. Gifts are accepted exclusively in 

  if they are black. 

      10. The devil puts his mark on various parts 

  bodies - on the buttocks in men and on the chest or genitals 

  organs in women and n, and the marked place loses 

  sensitivity. This sign can vary greatly 

  in outlines - a hare whose paw, a toad, a spider. 

      11. Making an oath to serve the Devil: never 

  do not worship the holy sacraments, break the sacred 

  relics, never use holy water or 

  candles, keep silent about their travels with Sata- 

  n o i »2 8 . 

      Reports of such pacts with the devil can be 

  found, in particular, in the documents of the English Vedas 

  processes, although they may occur 

  not as common here as on the continent. speaker 

  as a defendant in the famous Chelmford 

  In the Dove trial of 1589, Joan Prentice said, 

  that “The Devil appeared to her in the aforementioned almshouse. 

  It was already about ten o'clock in the evening. With its appearance and 

                                                    437 



in size it resembled a gray ferret with flaming 

eyes. The same defendant was sitting at that moment on 

bench in his room, getting ready to go to bed. AND 

then this ferret stood up on its hind legs, and the front legs 

lived on her knees and fixed his burning gaze straight 

into her eyes, and so he said to her: “Oh, Joan Prentice! 

Give me your soul!" 

   The defendant, greatly surprised, exclaimed: “Mr. 

come on my God! Who are you?" And the ferret answered: "I am Satan, 

do not be afraid of me. I do not cause you the slightest harm, 

Do I need your soul, which I must store 

beam before I leave here. And I'll get my way." 

The same defendant also said that he asked for 

give him something that does not belong to her, and she said, 

338 



that her soul belongs only to Jesus Christ, whose 

she was redeemed with precious blood. 

   To which this ferret replied: “Then I need not- 

a lot of your blood, ”and to which she willingly agreed and 

gave him the index finger of his left hand and. Ferret 

took it and quickly bit it. When will the defendant again 

asked what his name was, he answered shortly: “Og- 

lashenny ”, after which the mentioned ferret disappeared from view 

two" 2 9 . 

   In the documents of the trial of Anna Bodenham, which took place 

going in 1653, we meet another description of the pre- 

conversation concluded between a certain girl and the devil 

crowbar: "After which this witch took her index finger 

right hand of the girl and pierced it with a pin, then 

collected some blood, dipped a pen into it, and putting 

pen in her hand, made me write something in some 

book yoke. And one of the spirits laid his paws on his hands 

witches while this girl moved her pen. And when that 

When he finished writing, the witch, without taking her hand away, said 

la: "Amen", and made the girl say the same 

the very thing, after which the spirits muttered: “Amen, 

ami n. And I felt the girl to and that the palm of this 

the spirit is cold, like ice. And it was when the witch drove 

                                        30 

slapped it with her hand, scribbled something in the book. 

   William Shakespeare also mentions a pact with the devil. 

feast in his Comedy of Errors (act IV, scene 3): 

           Other devils need a nail trim, 

           B catch a, to a la blood, a hair, 

           Nut, stone from cherry; this - 

           Give me dear chain! 

           Be afraid, my lord! Come on 

           And then the devil will put us in chains. 

                                         (пер.zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedc 

                                                A. Nekora) 

   It was believed that the new witch is part of the family of witches, 

or joins them during the Sabbath, worship 

while giving in to the devil. P about common belief, there 

witches went through the air: “Sometimes witches 

rush from one place to another by the devil himself, who 

who, taken in the form of an evil or some fanta- 

sistic animal, delivers them to the witch's sha- 

tower ... All theologians and jurists adhere to this opinion 

sts And thali and, And spain and Catholic German go- 

states, as well as many other people also follow 



                                                       3 39 



to him". So wrote already known to us Francesco-Maria 

Guapco. 

    On his confession in April 1662, I Zabel Gaudí 

stated that he and other witches were participants in their gathering 

ri shcha, could fly through the air with the help of a magical 

straw: “I had a small horse, which 

it was only to say “Horse, fly, in the name of Sat- 

n s. And then we could fly anywhere like a solo 

me carried by the wind. Likewise, we flew wherever we wanted 

Instead of horses, we were served with a bunch and straw and stalks 

to the uk uruz. We held them between our legs and talked. 

"Horse horse, fly, in the name of Satan." And if someone saw 

this straw, carried by a whirlwind, and did not overshadow himself with a godfather 

a sign, then we could kill him with our own fun 

for the sake of The souls of those killed by us ascend to heaven, while their bodies 

stay with us; they shrink to the size of straw, 

                                     31 

we sit on them and fly to the country house. 

    In another way, which the witches resorted to, 

wanting to go somewhere, was the use of special 

ointments. The composition of the so-called "volatile ointments"zyxwvutsrq 

                                                      -> 

described in a play by the famous playwright Thomas Mandlto 

na (1580 -1627) "Witch". She usually prepared 

from children's corpses: 

       Take the unbaptized motherfucker 

       Cook well, but save the fat. 

       He is dear to you because with the help of him 

       You will be transported to the Lunar Psla, 

       Climb to the top and the bell tower, 

       At the top of the pines - they are just for you. 

       Here cities will appear to your eyes, 

       And temples and palaces, which are the essence of the whole Earth. 

       But they are all insignificant and small, 

       Like a birthplace for a girl on the cheek. 

   The English playwright Ben Jonson described the flight 

witches in his play "Royal Masks", presented 

owe them to Prince Henry, eldest son of King James 

       Dear ladies! The time has come, 

       Hurry up quickly! Here! We are all welcomed! 

       Living in forest tracts, lakes, 

       In the swamp and in the mountains, 

       In caves, in courtyards 

       parish chapels, 

       In the graves, on the trees, 

L4 O 



         The living, the dead, we all came here. 

         How ? Isn't she there?! 

I         Strike again! 

I         And here the Owl flies - it is from afar, 

         From there, and Mouse, and Toad, with them - K from. 

         Look! K mouth and Muraway are sitting in their hole, 

         La gush to and then to ak here, bathes in a fountain. 

         Loud barking of dogs, the noise of the muse to and ... Wow! 

         To the red moon, the incessant rain of stars 

         And the sky is dark in the fire of crimson lightning. 

       The description of the witch's shabash appears in the material 

    the hall of the judicial investigation in 1591 in Scotland, 

    It was the case of Dr. Fian, who was considered the 

    a witch driver from North Berwick. One of the last 

    veins, Agnes Thompson, spoke about the Sabbath itself 

    and about what happened there, directly in the 

    the presence of the Scottish king James VI: “She recognized 

    it was said that on the night of the anun e of All Saints (November 1. - 

    approx. trans.) she was in the company of the already mentioned 

    ty personalities and a huge number of other witches who 

    ryh was about two hundred. And then all together they entered 

    into the sea, and each of them sat in a sieve or sieve, and 

    they sailed on like this, and each had a flask with 

    wine, which they drank and whether, and they rejoiced all the way 

    the road, sitting in their sieves. So they got to the church 

    qui in North Berwick, in Lothian. 

       After they went ashore, they laid down their ru- 

    ki on the ground, danced the reel dance (fast Scottish 

    sky dance. - approx. per.). As they did so, they sang in unison: 

          Come quickly, come quickly 

          And if you do not come, then I will come. 

       At the same time (as they said) came forward 

    J and l Dun k an and played this reel, dance, on his small 

    our trumpet, which is called the Jewish trumpet, and 

    this continued until they went to the church 

    N ort-Berwick's shoe. 

       The king, having heard such confessions, came 

    in extraordinary admiration. He sent for the mentioned 

    Zh ilem Dun k an om, who played in front of Him 

    Majesty this melody. But the king received a huge 

    new pleasure, being present at this strange event 

    cesse ». 

                                                          341 



   Agyness Thompson then confessed, "that the Devil is 

was at that moment in the church of Nort-Berwick, waiting for that vi 

their life. Outwardly, he resembled a person. Seeing 

that they were somewhat delayed, he decided to punish 

them as soon as they arrive at the place. Nak azan and e is for 

was that each of those present should 

wife was to kiss his buttocks as a sign of his humbly 

give him; it happened in the pulpit i 

everyone did as he said. P uttering your be.ch 

a divine sermon in which he denounced King Sh from 

lan di and , he listened to their oath of allegiance, which 

ruyu those brought to him and then disappeared. P o ok he chan ii ^ 

ceremony they returned to the sea and the same way 

n headed towards home" 3 2 . In this passage, our 

Attention should be drawn to the wording in which! 

it is said that the devil "reproached the king" - case • 

that, according to the general opinion, the witches were fraught with threats^ 

not only to the heavenly churches, but also to earthly authorities. 

    The main part of the population of France is very strongly 

rela to the fact that thousands of witches regularly gather 

nights to perform their diabolical ceremonies 

One Normandy curé left us a description of the shab 

sh a, dated May 1669: <? This shabash was accurate 

but in the same way, as it is written about in all the books, in " 

all times and all peoples. Witches smeared the body 

with your ointment and some tall men with horns you 

carried them through the chimney to the outside. Zanimalsya same they 

than usual: they danced, calling it “pleasure> 

they cut the corpse and the children into small pieces, boiled 

them in the same cauldron along with snakes, they took a special devil 

Volsk powder for committing atrocities, signed 

made a pact with the devil with their blood, command them 

lem, which I was like a huge cat, with and devsh her 

surrounded by black candelabra. 

    The hallmark of this shabash in La Haye-d' 

P yui was that the devil for the sake of greater protection and you often ^ 

put a special mark on the bodies of his subjects. countries 

it was also the fact that among them it turned out to be more from.' 

priests. And as far as I am concerned, I am completely 

I believe everything that was said during the investigation, 

I believe that the devil, being in the guise of a lynx, acts 

spoke carefully to one of the accused, the boy 

ten years old” 3 3 . 

    A description of the Scottish shabash has also been preserved, sd r 

given in 1662 by And Zabel Gaudí during his trial. In non- - 1 



there were thirteen instead of twelve people, which 

at the time it looked pretty weird. "Through 

Every four months there should have been a Ve- 

whether to and e meetings. For each shabash gathered three 

11 people, and each of us had one spirit, which 

who had been waiting all this time for our call. I don't 

I remember the names of all these spirits. One of them was called Swain, 

it belonged to Margaret Wilson of Aldirn. He but- 

bright green clothes, and Margaret Wilson had 

even his own nicknames: • Minx, close to the wind. 

    The next spirit was called Rori, and he was expecting Bessie 

Wilson of Aldirn. He was dressed in yellow. She has 

was the nickname "Throw on the threshing floor". 

    The third spirit was called the Roaring Lion, and he was waiting 

And Zabel Nichol of Lochlow. On him were clothes of color 

that sea wave, and she was called the “Ruler of the Bes- 

you are». 

    The fourth was named Mak-Hektor. He belonged 

Jean Martin, daughter of the said Margaret Wilson. 

It is a young spirit dressed in bright green. Jin Martin 

was the registrar (secretary) of my coven, and 

she had her own nickname e: “S-N im-nad-rvom”, because 

that the Devil always takes her hand when we dance 

gillatripe and then he jumps... and then they both go- 

they say: "S-N im-nad-ditch." 

    And I am the fifth spirit - Governor Robert and he is dressed 

in dark brown clothes, and, in my opinion, he 

commands all other spirits. He is waiting for Mar- 

Gareth B roadie of Aldirn. 

    The sixth spirit is called Thief-from-hell-wait-her and he is waiting 

Bessie Wilson. 

    And me of the seventh spirit is the Red River. This is my personal 

ny spirit and he is waiting only for me. He is dressed in black. 

    The eighth spirit is called Master Robert. On him clothes 

brown in color, and in appearance he is too gtar. He 

very n euk luzh, this half-witted fool. He is waiting for Bes- 

Xi Hei, whose nickname is "Capable and Courageous" 

   The name of the ninth spirit is Lai ng, and the wife he 

Waiting to be called Fat Bessie (this is Elizabeth N and w and ). 

   The tenth spirit is Thomas the elf. To rum it is available 

disguised as our master, the Devil, there are others 

Spirits, but this one is the biggest and most terrible, not that 

that the rest, and therefore they all obey him. Their 

*I know because they appeared in character 

people". 



   There are many different descriptions 

of how the actual act of worshiping the Devil takes place. H and 

The following passage is taken from a work that appeared- 

Xia in Italy and the 17th century. “Where are these servants of the devil with 

walked all together, then at first they kindled a terrible and 

terrible fire. The devil is the head of this congregation 

wherefore he sits upon the throne in the guise of an abominable goat 

or a dog. They approach him in order to perform 

declination, which, however, does not always happen in the same way 

And sometimes they fall on their knees and, as if asking for something. 

sometimes they lift their legs so high that they themselves 

lean back, while throwing back their heads far 

You. And sometimes they turn their backs forward and so on 

they go, as if to slaves, while twisting their hands and back, and 

trying to touch him. Speaking your speeches 

do they turn to the earth, and in general do they make the 

                                    34 

in a way that ordinary people don't do.” 

   Many contemporaries of these events noted that 

extraordinarily luxurious pi 









344 



ry: “There you line up in rows of ladies and a multitude of tables, for 

which he sits down and begins to absorb food, which 

whether the demons prepared for them, or what they themselves 

take if take with you. But about everything, si devsh and e at those tables, 

admit that all these celebrations are disgusting as 

in its external appearance, and in the smell that reigns in 

there, so that even in the most hungry it caused nausea 

wow... They say there was abundance for just 

and eat bread and salt » 3 5 . (Bread and salt were the main 

elements of any normal table). 

     An interesting (and rather unusual) reference to 

a similar coven, but already in England, is contained in an additional 

Documents of the witch trial in Lankashire in 1612. 

One of the defendants, Old Chattoks, recalled: “There 

was food, but menno: meat, butter, cheese, bread and nap and t- 

to and ... After that, to and to everything was eaten, the devil 

called Fancy and another spirit who called himself Tibby, 

removed all the rest and . And they also said there that although we 

we all ate it, but we never get enough of it. 

at that feast the spirits gave them light so that they could see, 

which they do, although in their hands they didn’t have a fac e- 

fishing, no candles. They were male devils and 

female spirits » 3 6 . 

     When did all this witch's assembly sit down 

at the table, the time came for reading and I, so to speak - 

the so-called "black prayer". And Zabel Gaudi in the process 

1662 confessed that “usually we came at 

Cham in n esk only houses. At the last Meeting, we 

went to Gray 'n' Dhall, where we had food in abundance. 

broy food and drink. At the head of the table sat the Devil, 

but the witches - participants and tsy shabash and sat around the non- 

go. This time he - before serving the meat of his own 

venous and prepared and I - p and ordered to say a prayer 

Alexan dru Elder and Erlsit. She taught like this: 



            In and m I eat the Devil - 

            We are ashamed of us and sad for us. 

            R a rush and m house we and ovin n, 

            And all the sheep, live vushch and x there! 

            We will leave a little here - 

                                        37 

            And so there is nothing to eat! 

   English scientist Henry Moore (1614-1687) claim- 

lyal that he even managed to discover a document aza- 

the evidence of the devil's dances at similar sabbaths in 



                                                           34 5 



England: “In the place where they danced, a 

a certain circle in which there were clear traces of the dance 

savsh them - footprints bifurcated at the end, which 

could be seen from the day I discovered de- 

lo N and to oli, until the next winter, when it is me- 

one hundred was plowed about. All this happened in 1590. 

two" 3 8 . 

    And so, before us appeared various descriptions 

treaties, meetings and covens of witches made in 

the time of the mad hunt for na n and x. Of course, some and ) 

these messages are based on some real 

facts, because throughout its entire history, man 

Lovek was constantly engaged in certain types of 

of magic. However, many recognized and I of this kind were 

made by victims of the Inquisi- 

tions, which, being in such a state, could 

to repeat everything that their accusers told them, in an effort to 

len and avoid the horrors of the chamber of torture and indefinite 

prisoner and I . 





                   Chapter Four 

            THE DEVIL AND HIS PICKS 



    For people living in the 16th and 17th centuries, personal 

the Devil's being was just as real, 

like the Lord God. But the struggle between the forces of light and 

The darkness was fierce and endless. witches count 

were agents of the Devil, and therefore they should have been demon- 

mercilessly seek out and kill. After all, if the power of God 

and was superhuman, so is Satan with his 

ministers were endowed with a similar supernatural 

natural force. In the descriptions of thousands of witch processes 

owls, held between 1550 and 1750, we are on 

there are numerous references to the fact that witches 

possessed the most extraordinary abilities - they 

caused a storm, bewitched people, destroyed from 

the power of magical spells n an and th harvest, caused more 

sickness and death, turned into vampires and wolves. 

    In the previous chapter, we have already seen how, in general, 

believe me, there is a conclusion of the contract of the witch i 

the devil; besides, we learned about how the Vedovsko 

the congregation governs its shabash and worships 

the devil. However, what kind of force is obtained at the same time 

346 



are we witches? Some of them stated, for example, that 

with the help of Satans, they can turn into the most 

various animals and animals. In this case, usually 

used this kind of spell and an and I: “When we 

took the form of a hare, we repeated the following three times 

current: 

     I will acquire a hare disguise, 

     Though I will sigh and even grieve. 

     In the name of the Devil, I will turn into a hare 

     And I will be until I return home. 

   And then we turned into hares. When will we 

it was necessary to return to its normal form, we said: 

     Zaya ts, hare ts, the Lord takes care of you. 

     And although now I look zai chi ha, 

     But this very moment I will appear in the guise of a woman. 

   If we wanted to turn into a cat or to osh to y, 

it was necessary to say the following words three times: 

     I will acquire to osh achya a mask, 

     Though I will sigh under my blackness. 

     But the name of the Devil I will turn to osh to u 

     And I will be with her until I return home. 

   Information about the use for witchcraft purposes is true 

pov are found in the materials of the English Vedovskie 

processes are extremely rare. One of these cases 

we discover in the course of the Malmesbury process 

witches of 1612. Fourteen years old I'm a girl Grace 

Sauerbette swore under oath that the defendants you- 

dug up a child's corpse and used it to 

to give yourself a different look. They, "getting it, sva- 

part of it was boiled in a pot, and part was roasted on coals, 

moreover, Ellen and Jennet mentioned ate it all. 

After that, these Jennet and Ellen rock and roll 

this child in a pot, but with fat extracted from these 

bones, they said they rubbed their bodies, so that 

now they could change their appearance from time to time to »4 0 . 

   However, under cross-examination of Grace Sauerbette 

refused to show azan and y, saying that she came up with 

this whole episode. This, in fact, was the most 

Terrible in most witch processes: rumors and 

Various kinds of rozn pits, which circulated in abundance 

then among the people willingly believed, and there was nothing neo- 

                                                      347 



common in that if some old woman who accused 

being in witchcraft, she began to tell all sorts of things in court 

nonsense that she heard on this account for her debt 

it's a good idea. 

   Much more magic spells 

niy was described by Isabel Gaudí at her trial in 1662 

year: 

   "If we wanted to turn into a crow, we 

you said: 

       I will acquire masks from a crow, 

       Though I will be sad at the sight of black feathers. 

       In the name of the devil I will turn into a crow 

       And I will be her until I return home! 

   And when we wanted to return to our old look, zyxwvutsrq 

                                                 i<- 

said: 

       Oh, koshka, koshka (or "raven, raven")! 

       The Lord sent you an arrow, blacker than the night! 

       I would be a cat (or "black") now, 

       I will immediately turn into the image of a woman. 

       Oh, to osh to a, to osh to a (or "raven, raven")! 

       The Lord sent you an arrow, blacker than the night! 

    If we, already being in the guise of k osh k and, a thief. 

on a or a hare, equally in someone else's image, let's go 

in the house of neighbors nash and x, who are also engaged in vedog 

property, then we say: 

   I implore you, come with me! 

or: 

   We conjure you, follow us! 

   And then they become just as mi as we are, t<. 

there are k osh k am and , crows, etc., and go with us, 

wherever we want”4 1 . 

                                                         1 

   In one of the fairy tales, born in the 16th century on eepi 

gakh Balti k i , in particular, the case of lik antropsh 1 is described 

(turning a man into a wolf) - one of the samyl 

terrible transformations: “At Christmas, a certain 

jeon ka-ka-alek-a walks around the country and convenes for everyone' 

gathering of followers of the Devil, whose number is true*- 

immeasurably. Those who do not want to go there, or who 

goes very reluctantly, they beat with an iron whip until they / 

until the blood flows. 

348 



    Then their human features disappear and this whole crowd 

turns into werewolves. And many of them are going to you - 

thousands. A leader steps forward, holding an iron 

whip, followed by his army fully convinced 

n s in that they finally turned into waves 

cov. They attack the herds of cattle and sheep, but 

they don't have enough power to kill a human 

century. When they reach some river, then 

then their leader touches the water with his whip and 

it parted, leaving a passage in the middle, but which 

mu this flock and crosses it. This transformation of action 

only for 12 days, after which the wolf 

the face disappears and they regain their human 

externality»4 2 . So aya and similar tales were not 

something unusual for Europe in the 16th and 17th centuries and 

very often accepted as the truth. 

    As for the corpses, it was believed that the witches, 

tearing them out of the ground, use them for various purposes 

when doing x black magic: “Wishing to make a person 

centuries to die from a bad disease, witches dig out 

corpses, preferring especially the bodies of those executed or 

spring And from these bodies, as well as from torture weapons 

diy executioner, they extract the substances they need 

for magical operations, endowing them with the help of 

a line of extraordinary power »4 3 . 

   In the process of 1662, And Zabel Gaudi described how 

her friends sent corruption: “Before the Meeting (February 2) 

ral) we went east from K inloss and there we 

harnessed to the plow for gush ek. The devil held that plow and 

John Young of Mobstown, our eldest, ruled over 

hom. La gush to and drag and whether the plow instead of bulls. R emn i, 

with which they were tied to the plow, were made 

from a special grass, the blade of the plowshare is half from the horn 

castrated ram. We walked twice 

circle and each participant in the shabash walked behind the plow 

back and forth, praying to the Devil for the fertility of this land and for 

so that thistles and thorns sprouted here in abundance - 

      44 

Nick" . 

   And Zabel Gaudí adds that her comrades could 

perform other magic tricks They could, 

for example, to give black color to any paint. "We 

took a thread of each color from all types of yarn, which 

was in the spinning mill of the aforementioned Alexander Kam- 

mings and in the name of the Devil tied on every thread 

Three knots. Then we wrapped these threads in tea 

                                                    i44 



us with paint counterclockwise. All this was done 

in and me the Devil's ox and in this way and in the way the colors deteriorated, 

so they all became black, i.e. Dia-colors 

the ox, for the sake of which we destroyed the colors, the first 

initially in these vats” 4 5 . 

    In many deaf and distant villages * 

wreaths, the locals simply went sometimes 

crazy with fear when they considered some local 

an old woman endowed with witch power. Would they be afraid 

mainly maleficium, i.e. criminal force, 

which could be directed against them. One pi 

satel defined maleficium k as “a terrible deed, con- 

done against the body through the power of the devil, which 

which he expresses in a secret or open contract 

re, concluded by him with the witch, as well as thanks to the con- 

control over nature and with the help of some of their persons; act, 

satisfying his sinister thoughts, 

mine always, even if secretive, connivance 

           46 

Gosp ode» . 

    During the witch trial of 1612, which took place 

in Lankash and re, a certain mother Demdike told how 

How can a witch manifest her maleficium. She 

can kill with the help of wax figures: "For witch- 

we are the easiest way to deprive a person of life and conclude 

hopes to make a clay model, according to 

similar in outline to the person he 

intended to kill her and carefully dry her. And if 

you had to hurt him somewhere, 

then a sharp spike was taken, or a pin and this sculpture 

Turka pierced in the place that should have 

lo get sick. If you wanted this person 

dried up to some part of the body, then it was necessary to take 

this doll and, having broken off the necessary part, burn it. Here to a 

in this way it is possible to destroy the body »4 7 . 

    In the case of I Zabel Gaudí, there are also moments 

associated with maleficium caused by manipulation 

with clay figurines. Witches 'made clay n i n yg 

an image in order to destroy the sons of Le yard il 

Park a. John Taylor brought for this in the floors of his 

sh otlan dk and clay. His wives filled her with hot water 

in the name of the Devil, making her soft, like custard 

flour pudding, and molded figurines of sons out of it 

Layard. 

    They had all the features and characteristics of a child. 

to a - they had a head, and eyes, and a nose, arms, legs. 

350 



mouth, tiny lips. It was immediately clear that they were children; 

their arms and sticking out to the sides. In terms of size they were 

exactly like a barley cake or a bun, like 

mine of a skinned suckling pig. 

   We laid them facing the fire and so they lay 

until their faces were wrinkled from the heat. A 

then we made a fire around them and waited until 

they will glow red-hot. And so we burned them time- 

me from time. And every day we have a good ride 

poured another new body part. Because good- 

giving it the healthiest of Lay Yard's children from Parka 

should have begun to experience suffering, (and so 

was) until they found and smashed x” 4 8 . 

   When wax images came into play, then no 

before throwing them into the fire, the witch had to 

read special magic spells li n an and i. "Having made fi- 

gurkas with which we wanted to destroy children 

Layard of Park, we said the following: 

   Praising Satan, pour this water on the ground, 

   For people to die and suffer there longer. 

   We will throw all this into the flame, and we will eat branches there. 

   They will be burned by the power of desire, they are like 

   Old sts that often blaze on the tops 

                                               mountain. 

     The Devil taught us these words, and when we memorize 

if they were, then everyone fell on their knees, looking at H him, lowering 

at the same time, hair on the eyes and raising hands to grief, and thrice 

We spoke them while all this was going on. And then 

                                                      49 

in the name of the Devil we put them in the middle of the fire > . 

     And talya nsk and th scientist Guazzo explained how 

determine if a person is suffering from witch maleficium. 

In support of his opinion, he cites the following 

Here are twenty symptoms: 

     "1. First, if the illness of the bewitched patient 

it is very difficult to determine, so the doctor stays 

are in doubt and wavering, constantly changing 

in opinions and being afraid to do any positive 

locked her. 

     2. If, with the measures proposed from the very beginning 

the disease does not disappear, but rather intensifies and becomes 

it's getting harder. 

                                                       1 

     3. If there is no deterioration in health, then: 

p 

  R and normal diseases, gradually, but sick 



suffers from the very beginning, although there is no O4t- 

visible pathological grounds. 

   4. If the disease belongs to the so-called 

"wandering" and happens periodically. It's almost 

never regularly. And although it may sound like zyxwvutsrq 

                                                       and 

natural disease, however, it is strong oi 

differs from the latter. 

   5. And experiencing severe pain, the patient, nevertheless, 

cannot say in which part of the body he feels this pain 

exists. 

   6. From time to time the patient makes a heavy sigh 

without any obvious reason. 

   7. Some lose their appetite, others vomit food at i> 

their stomach is so upset that during bi 

as they age, they decrease in growth. At the same time, they can 

but to observe a certain semblance of w and w k and , one and all 

from stomach to throat and descending backwards; and if ONR 

trying to spit her out the moment she rolls 

vay to the throat, then all their efforts are in vain 

although it may happen that she herself will come out on- 

a rose. 

   8. They feel a stabbing pain in the region of the heart. 

they say that it is about to burst into halves. 

   9. For some it is very noticeable, like on the arm and sh- 

pulse beats. 

   10. Others feel terrible spasms in the region • 

neck, kidneys, in the stomach, as if an ice vein. 

passes through the stomach and disappears. Either they feel 

yut, as something similar rolls on them, only in 

like a fiery cloud. 

   11. Others lose their sexual power. 

   12. Some people sweat, especially at night. 

despite the fact that the weather and season are clearly not summer 

   13. In others, the members of the body seem to be tied in knots. 

   14. The disease of those bewitched by a witch is usually zakl " 

results in a weakening of the whole body and loss of strength, combined 

my with deep fatigue, dullness of mind, mellch 

cholic delirium, various types of fever, with ° 

giving them a lot of work for doctors; with epileptitis^ 

skim convulsions and hardness of the limbs. Wherein 

sometimes even the head increases in size and that's it; 1 

luo embraces unusual fatigue, so these liu. eleven 

almost unable to move. 

   15. Sometimes all skin, but more often only on the face, sh 

acquires a yellow or deathly pale hue. 

'L s 7 



    16. For some, the eyelids stick together so much, 

that they cannot open their eyes. This can be checked 

through certain tests. 

    17. Bewitched people cannot even look at 

priest, let it askew, for they rotate the squirrels 

their eyes in different directions. 

    18. When the amulets are burned, the disease usually 

the mind changes for the worse and the patient begins to suffer 

even more in accordance with whether it is strongly stabbed 

did it or not. Often they are forced 

utter terrible screams and screams. But if not 

detect any changes or new 

organs, then there is hope that this para- 

the patient, with proper care, will be able to improve his health 

rovier. 

   19. If the witch accidentally comes closer to the pain- 

nomu, then he immediately begins to overflow with a strong demon 

calm, he trembles and trembles with fear. If 

is a child, he immediately starts crying. Eyes at 

it is immediately blackened. At the same time, the patient can see 

children and other strange changes. 

   20. Finally, if the priest tries to heal 

sick from the disease, laying a sacred ointment on the eyes 

behind, ears and, forehead and other parts of the body, and in those places 

is sweat, or something else, it becomes clear 

but that this patient is bewitched.” 

   Thus, it is not difficult to imagine how in the era 

underdevelopment of medicine, all sorts of ailments regarding 

were worried about witchcraft: paralysis, tonic spasm 

jaw muscles, fever, anemia, sclerosis, epilepsy 

this, hysteria. With this kind of disease, it is often 

symptoms were observed that were very 

Gale even educated people, not to mention the 

vom inhabitant. 

   Very often, witches were accused of being 

some ointments were prepared, with which you can 

bewitch other people. In many cases, mi at- 

tyranny was prepared from children's corpses. In 1616 

year at the trial in Chelmsford, Susan Baker is accused of 

las, in particular, that she “criminally 

dug up a skull from a grave in the cemetery of the aforementioned 

church at Upminster, and the skull was part of 

the body of one man who died from an infection, recently 

combed there, with the intention of using that skull 

For your vile and diabolical occupations, namely: 

12- 3400                                             3 tZ 



witchcraft, spells and sorcery in order to 

                                                 50 

bewitch and charm a certain Mary Steven e. 

   It has been said above more than once that witches often 

used the spell n an and I - magical prayers - with 

aiming to enhance the impact of their infusions of herbs and amu- 

years. However, there were also peculiar “counter-contracts” 

li n an and i ", with the help of which it was possible to heal p 

bewitched person, for example, the following: 

   From Good Friday, I will pray, 

   Until they come to life, I ring in honor of the Lord. 

   The Lord and the companion and his (twelve are their number) 

   They stand, grieving, in that service and listen to him. 

   And what does N have in his hand? 

   Znak ohmy flexible wand. 

   In the other hand He holds 

   To the keys to the gates of heaven. 

   Open the keys, the gates! 

   Close the doors of hell! 

   And let the child this very moment 

   He will go to his mother. 

   And it's further: 

   And this ... there ... that from afar pours light on us so richly 4 

   That is my dear, poor Son, on a tree 

                                               crucified 

   His holy head, heart, two hands and 

   Already nailed to the post with long nails. 

   With a Friday prayer, the child learns about the cross - 

   About red, and about blue, and about Christ himself. 

   Truly great is the Lord crucified on the cross! 

   Gabriel made up his mind to lie down and rest, 

   But Gethsemane was the land, yes, yes, not anything 

   Then the Lord walked by and thus spoke 

   "Are you sleeping, aren't you, Gabriel?" — 

                              “Oh no,” he replied. - 

   Here I can neither fall asleep nor stay awake 

                                                no power > 

   “Arise, Gabriel, quickly, the Lord 

                                        proclaimed. 

   Get up and come here, and let this time 

   And someone's malice, no disease will descend on the nag' 

   Oh Jesus, you are our Lord, amen, amen, amen!' 

354 



    Here it will be appropriate to note that zan and mavsh and hsia so 

called "white" witchcraft was also subjected to go- 

n and n iyam, as well as the practice of oval and x "black magic". One- 

but white magic was used rather in positive 

purposes, not for the sake of harming anyone. One- 

him from the most famous "white" magicians of his time 

nor was Alexander Drummond. In 1630 in Edinburgh 

he was charged with "curing by 

sorcery from madness, as well as ordinary patients, crazy 

demented, deranged or suffering from mania and me, 

patients with fever and "touch me" disease, 

lump, worms, who suffered to hemorrhages and other non- 

ordinary illnesses... He admits that he produced such 

treatment, however, he denies that he used magic 

cal formulas and spells. To test these fables 

his own shows were used, as well as 

testimonies of hundreds of eyewitnesses, after which he was convicted 

                     52 

day and with burning » . 

    One Scottish sorceress, living in the 17th century, 

how to use white magic 

for and zgn an and I diseases: “If we wanted to heal from 

any ailment, or fix a broken arm 

or leg, we repeated three times: 

    He connected blood with blood - and in an instant everything was held together, 

    Member with member, he connected - and instantly they seized. 

    To our lovely Lady, beloved son 

    Teeth, hand, tongue and other fascinated. 

    In the name of the Lord the Father and the Son, the Holy Spirit be with them! 

    By saying this three times, we, in this way, were amazed 

the disease and it disappeared, and the damaged members of the growth 

li s» 5 3 . 

    Zakli n an and I m and white magic were used even then, 

when they wanted to cure ish ias or "pain in the thighs": 

“We, three girls, conjure over the stalks of peas; human 

age from the womb of the earth, beaver color, earthly fever, 

secluded stocks, the Lord scared the devil with candles 

I eat a huge stone with my own. Here she sits, and now 

gone. And let her never come back here "0 4, 

    And with these words it was possible to heal any sh 

ferret: "I exorcise sea shaking and fever 

coastal and all fevers and that have ever been 

the Lord commanded, from the head and from the heart, from the back, 

everywhere - and from the knees, from the hips, from the tips of the fingers, 

from heels. So go away, fever, how ah - to the mountain, 

to ak aya - where it is necessary: to the stone, to mon and. In the name of St. 

12*                                                     355 



tyh Peter, Paul and all the saints that are in heaven 

                                            55 

In the name of the Father, and the Son, and the Holy Spirit." 

    The so-called "white sorcerers" used their 

power for good purposes - they cured more 

health, protected and protected from hatred. However, Catholic 

the church does not accept witchcraft at all, independent! 

from its variety: “If the child of any person 

to a, or his friend or cattle a get sick some more.? 

new or they will be tortured by a strange and rare 

ailment, the first thing he must do is 

mother and remember some wise woman 

a man, and then send to them for help ... But about the 

so and so will not be able to say with Yes 

“The Lord is my helper,” but “The Devil is MOJI 

helper, "for with his help he was healed" 5 6 . 

    Many believed that witches possessed all kinds of 

supernatural forces. So, for example, it was considered, h-k> 

they can cause storms: “They tie three knotszyxwvutsr 

                                                        n,, 

one of the straps of a conventional whip. Dissolving one 

knot, they cause a moderate wind; two - vetet 

grows stronger. Well, if the third knot is untied, then on 

a real doomsday is happening, like THAT, 

they used to cause thunder and lightning » 5 7 . 

    Guazzo noted that "the witches admitted that they 

their covens they caused hailstorms, or —p<~ 

desire - they caused damage to earthly fruits. For this. 

according to their confession, they beat the water with a rod, and then throw 

they put into it or just into the air a certain powder given to them 

Satan. Thanks to this, a cloud appears, carrying P 

themselves hail that falls wherever they wish. If 

there is no water, they use their urine.” 

    N a few magic formulas spelled n an and I called \ 

beginning and in recognition of Izabel Gaudí (1662). She pa1' 

she said how they caused a storm: “For this my 

took a piece of cloth, soaked it in water, and then, taking 

in the hands of a bat, which is used by the laundresses, washing clothes, 

beat this piece of matter, putting it first 

n a stone; while we repeated three times: 

    I beat this rag, putting it on a stone, 

    So that, in the Devil's me, the wind rises. 

    And it will not subside until I want to. 

    When we wanted to calm the wind, then we 

dried this rag and said three times: 

    In the name of the Devil, we tame the wind 

    And it will not arise until we want it again 

35 6 



   And if the wind doesn't die right away, we call 

our spirit and say to him: “Thief! Thief! Sun and wind 

and make him calm down!" Hell we don't rain 

had no power, but we could at any 

ment to cause a strong wind. And He made us 

to think that there is no God besides him. 

   So how did the accusers and judges decide, bewitched 

on the accused or not? Some scientists have compiled 

and published lists of symptoms characteristic of 

enchanted person. And we present one of 

and x lists, serving them as a kind of 

handbook for German lawyers: 

   "1. The bewitched prefer the worst food. 

   2. They cannot swallow their food, constantly 

throw her back, unable to digest her. 

   3. Others feel heaviness in the stomach, while 

them as if a lump rolls up to the throat. They want out 

burp it, but it goes back to the stomach. 

   4. Some people feel like something is gnawing at them. 

lower abdomen. Others feel either very strong 

and a fast pulse in the neck, or pain in the kidneys. Third 

feel constant and unbearable pain in the head 

ve, which oppress and kind of like to ak bore them. 

   5. Bewitched by a witch, the heart often hurts, when 

it seems to them that they are being torn to pieces by a dog, or 

bitten by snakes, or as if they were pierced with nails or 

needles, press and squeeze. 

   6. At times their head is so swollen that they 

the body is covered by an unprecedented fatigue, and they are not at all 

can move. 

    7. Some people feel frequent and sudden pain, 

which they, however, cannot describe. At the same time they 

scream loudly. 

   8. Others weaken in body and turn into real 

shadow due to extraordinary exhaustion, falling 

ka strength and extreme lethargy. 

   9. And sometimes they feel how their members become 

softly with them, as if someone is tearing them apart, twisting them, yes- 

vit, especially bones and heart. 

    10. Some people feel like if 

a cold wind blowing through their stomachs, or 

a lump of flames and, at the same time, causing compression of the internal 

stei and severe and sudden swelling of the abdomen. 

                                                   3 57 



    11. Many of the bewitched are subject to melanle. 

lii. At the same time, some of them are so weakened that 

do not want to talk or communicate with people at all 

    12. Those affected by witchcraft have sus 

eyes, and their body, especially the face, almost 

face has a yellow or pale gray tint. 

    13. When a witch acted on a patient, he 

You are always seized by some kind of anxiety, fear, and even <. 

catfish; if it's a boy, then he immediately starts n lak at! 

while his eyes darken. Occur and friend 

change. And descending from this prudent exorcist, 

(exorcist of evil spirits. - approx. per.) and cares < 

is to discover and show relevant 

recognition to relatives and all present > 

in order to avoid a scan. 

    14. It is especially important if the learned healers are not ysepf 

we, what is grief, and cannot come here to ed1! 

nomu opinion; or if medical measures are prescribed 

sledding to the patient does not improve his condition, but, n? 

against, make him worse. 

    15. And sometimes the only evidence 

this can only be indirect data - this is 

the participation of witches in matters of love and hatred, 

fruition, storms, circulation of blood and harm to living 

here's one." (From the book: Vincenty von Berg. “Instruction * 

we..."). 

   The list of symptoms peculiar to people is a charm! 

bathed by witches, extremely strongly reminiscent of 

a similar list given by Guazzo (see you sh?' 

This just shows how widely they went zyxwvutsrq 

                                                       p 

Europe, all these witchcraft-related ideas, and then, HJ 

how strongly they believed. 

   Another spell against bewitched encounters. 

Xia in the materials of the Lan Kashir Vedic Trial 

1612: 

   Three K mustache bit you - 

   Patients with Hearing, Eye and Tongues: 

   These three will be stocks for you. 

   Father, Son and Holy Spirit, 

   In the name of God! 

    Five "Our Father", five "Theotokos, Virgin" 

    And "I believe" read 

    In worship of the five wounds 

         Our Lord. 

358 



    Any person could be freed from witchcraft 

spell using the following techniques of white magic: "Es- 

if a child is bewitched, then we take a cradle ... 

we put it three times through the charmed hoop, 

a ring or belt, and then the dog must throw it; 

after which you need to shake this belt over the fire ... bro- 

sit on the floor and wait for a dog to pass over it or 

cat. Thanks to this, the disease can leave a person 

                                        58 

century and enter this dog or cat. 

    One could, of course, try to do away with 

witchcraft spells or possessed in a person 

demons and with the help of Christian-exorcist 

means: “Looking intently into the eyes of this person and 

laying hands on his head, secretly calling the devil 

lu, for he is the origin of all evil, the exorcist de- 

barks a symbol, while calling the infected 

person: 

    "So-and-so, a servant of Christ and the church, in the name of 

And Jesus Christ I command you, unclean spirit, es- 

Are you hiding inside this man, created 

God, or if you disturb him in some way 

be different, let me know about yours right away 

stay in it ... how did you usually do it and before 

my coming." (And from "Instructions ..." Vincetia von 

Bherga). 

   However, not everyone believed in the power of the Eccorcists. IN 

people went to this account and so and e satirical 

press : 

  Go and bring holy water, 

  And don't forget to season with salt, 

  And a brush - it's more comfortable to spray. 

  Naley then saliva sacred oh, 

  Add flour and mix everything well 

  And flavor the mesh en ying with this oil. 

  Then light small candles 

  At the same time, ring the bells like that, 

  To be frightened somewhere by the devil-sinner ik 59 . 



   But even today, exorcism remains recognized. 

weapons of the Christian Church in its struggle with the forces 

darkness, and sometimes priests resort to exile 

spirits, if not even from a person, then at least from a place 

the one that, according to common belief, is inhabited by evil spirits 

all 

                                                       359 



                    Chapter Five 

        WITCH PROCESSES IN EUROPE 



    In spite of the fact that the inkvisi t and I - Sacred Col 

Legia, whose task it was to fight heresies, was the main 

wana in 1199 6 0 , the witch hunt practically did not start 

until the publication at the end of the 15th century 

the corresponding papal bulls and their publication in 14861 

Witch Hammer. From this time until your sunset 

which came at the turn of the XVII-XVIII centuries, quantities' 

victims for witchcraft reached an incredible figure 

one hundred thousand people. And from n of them only 5 thousand died He- 

the territories of England and Scotland, the majority -zyxwvuts v 

Germany, which is difficult to oppose i 

in terms of the cruelty shown against the suspect 

smoke. N o in France, Italy, Spain, Scandinavia 

Wii and other parts of Europe also reigned injustice 

ruthlessness, cruelty and prejudice. 

    The persecution in Germany began approximately at the moment i 

publications of The Hammer of the Witches. Soon, in 1532, to me; 

some states that made up the Holy Roman 

Perium adopted the so-called Caroline Code, which 

which provided for the use of torture and death 

kazn for witchcraft. In 1563, the Council of Trent 61 at 

made the decision to return Protestant Germany to 

Catholicism - one of the consequences of this step was 

intensification of all kinds of religious persecution: witchcraft 

was the heresy against which fiercely fought< 

There were both Catholic and Protestant churches. 

    And the history of witchcraft in France begins at a. 

at least in 1398, when Paris 

announced that the pact with the devil is not just an ordinary 

magical act, but real religious heresy. 1 

In 1431, even himself was accused of heresy and witchcraft. 

Joan of Arc . However, the real witch hunt begins.) 

was there only at the beginning of the 16th century, as well as iv 

the other side of the Rhine. In France, this mania is very 

a strong degree was reinforced and zysk an and I mi mnog- 

well-known scientists, as well as x, for example, as Jean Vaudin 

whose book "Demonomania" (1580) became notable 

hoi in the history of these persecutions. 

    The question is often asked: how did the prodo appear.) 

sorry to exist in the Renaissance so cruel' 

and inhuman delusions? How could educated 



scientists, bishops and lawyers to believe in such a manipulative 

current ideas? The answer is not easy to find here. Some 

historians have argued that the Renaissance brought back to 

life and survival and paganism and their pagan cults, 

whose roots go back centuries. Others claim 

expect that the Christian church, seeing itself surrounded by 

noah from all sides by the resurgent teaching of ancient 

sly, unleashed cruel, like all medieval 

fore, and n to vision and yu, while applying maximum effort 

liy in his quest to crush the kingdom of darkness. 

    The cruel methods used by her, concluding 

lis, approximately, in the following: 

    "1. The accused is considered guilty until 

and he will not prove his innocence. I n to vi zi t and i 

accepted this provision of Roman imperial law, 

however, in works of faith, justification was practically non-existent. 

possible. 

    2. Suspicion, rumors or open accusation were 

sufficient grounds to represent 

to bring a person to court and to visitors. 

    3. In order to justify the activity and inquisition and these 

attacked and always made dependent on heresy. So, 

the man who killed in 1252 in k viaitora- f an atic a 

Peter the Martyr, was interrogated not for murder, but 

for heresy (because he was an opponent and n to the vision of ts and and). 

    4. No witnesses were identified. Very often they are 

guilt eniya were not known to the defendant. In 1254, pa- 

pa Innocent IV granted anonymity to the accusers. 

    5. Witnesses who were forbidden to speak in 

other cases, were allowed to participate in the investigation of 

against heretics: these were those convicted of perjury 

in, persons deprived of all rights, juvenile children 

those excommunicated (including those convicted of heretical 

in). If this witness renounced his 

Kazan and y, then he was punished for perjury, one 

to his application remained in force. However, co- 

according to the statements of the visitor Nicholas Eymeric 

(1360), if the refusal contained any additional 

significant evidence incriminating the accused, 

then the court could accept as evidence this second 

the call to prayer will come. 

    6. And one witness was not allowed to give 

to the azan and I on behalf of the accused, was not accepted anyway 

in attention and his former self a good reputation for ac 

foreign citizens or foreign Christians. 



    7. The accused was not allowed to keep any> 

advice, since in such a case the lawyer could 

fall under the charge of defending and those heretics (for some time 

my lawyers were allowed to take part in the pro- 

cess, especially if the visitors sat in the episcopal 

penal court, but in the 17th century this privilege was 

cancelled). 

      8. Visitors were judges as well. And sometimes at work 

in quisitio the bishop or 

lawyer 

     9. The judges had to persuade the suspect to 

recognition an ju. In 1521, and the visitor Sylvester P ri- 

E ri o 6 2 wrote down how and in what way it should be done. 

    10. Principally permitted as the most extreme 

measure, torture was actually used regularly 

and could be applied to any witness. Civil- 

Danish authorities also used torture, but inc- 

the visitors expanded and systematized them. P y tk a 

considered to be a way to 

discover heresy. And me n about in this capacity she was 

sanctioned in 1257 by Pope Innocent IV B 

his bull "Ad extirpan da". Subsequently, many popes 

confirmed this document. Torture was banned 

in 1816 by Pope Pius VII. 

    11. The law of torture could not be repeated, however 

it could be "continued" as long as the accused 

the victim does not admit what is required of him. Usual- 

The torture consisted of three stages. More soft right 

the rules relating to the trial of a witch were 

whether introduced in 1623. 

    12. Having confessed under torture, the accused, 

thuya about the torture chamber, had to repeat his 

recognition “freely and voluntarily, without pressure from 

loy or fear." It was believed that in this way and in the way he 

admits his guilt without torture (which is what the records 

appeared in court documents). 

    13. Each defendant had to invent 

or give the names of accomplices or those whom he also 

suspects heresy. 

    14. Appeals were not allowed in principle. 

    15. And the property of the accused was confiscated inc- 

vision. All the popes considered this practice to be the same 

of the strongest of their methods in the fight against heretics. And nnoken 

Tiy IV said that it was something like a sword hanging 

over the heads of princes and heretics. Due to the fact that con- 

362 



Fiskation was a common thing, it is rarely spoken about 

especially, except perhaps in the excommunication formula. (R.G. Robinet. 

"Encyclopedia of Witchcraft and Demonology", 1959). 



             Witch hunt in Germany 

1486         Creation of the Witch Hunters' Code - 

                to the book "Hammer of the Witches" by Yakov Sh prenge- 

                rum, dean of the University of Cologne, 

                and Prior Heinrich Kramer 6 3 . 

1532         Issuance of the Caroline Code, providing 

                torturer and the death penalty for 

                witchcraft. This code was adopted 

                almost all three hundred 

                the tiny states that make up 

                w and mi then the Holy Roman 

                empire. 

1563         Council of Trent decides to return pro- 

                testant Germany into the bosom of the Catholic 

                effects: intensification of religious struggle and 

                persecution. 

1590         William V starts a witch hunt in 

                B accident and . 

1618         Prosecution for witchcraft I ogak 

                on Junius, burgomaster of Bamberg. 

1631         Publication of Friedrich von's book 

                nee "Cautio crim m alis," in which he 

                spoke out against witch-hunting. 

1632         Death of the Bishop of Bamberg 

                end the terrible persecution in this 

                princedom (1609-1632). 

1655         The last execution on charges of count 

                dovostve in Cologne (there persecution would 

                whether not so cruel). 

1775         The last official execution for a call 

                dovostvo in Germany (execution and Anna-Ma- 

                ria Shwegel, resident of Kempten, 

                Bavary i ). 

1787         All "Vedovskiye" laws were repealed in 

                Austria. 



             Witch hunt in France 

1398         The University of Paris announces 

                that the pact with the devil is not just 

                magical rite, but heresy. 



1428           Vedic Trials at Briançon, Dauphy 

                  ne. Between 1428 and 1450. 

                  burned about 167 local residents. 

1431           The trial of Jeanne d'Arc, during which 

                  she was charged with 

                  witchcraft. 

1440           And the famous case of J and la de Ré, accused 

                  leg in witchcraft and debauchery. 

1490           King Charles VIII issues a decree against 

                  fortune-tellers, soothsayers and necromancers. 

1508           Mass trials in Bearn. 

1529           Inquisitorial process in Luxeil. 

1557           Vedovskoy trial in Toulouse - burned 

                  40 people. 

1580           Jean Baudin publishes his Demonoma 

                  niyu”, in which he condemns witches. 

1589           Fourteen witches in Tours convert 

                  Xia with an appeal to Henry III, who 

                  who is subsequently charged with defending 

                  witches. 

1625           Beginning of general decline in hunting 

                  witches in French territory. 

1670zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

      d.           Vedic Trials in Rouen. 

1679-1682 The notorious case of the "Fire Chamber": 

                  The Star Chamber of Louis XIV 

                  followed by conspiracies about poisoning, listened to 

                  w and wow numerous testimonies 

                  on the prevalence of corruption and the 

                  dovstvo. Over 300 people have been arrested. 

                  36 kazn o. It's over Queen 

                  edict, which denied 

                  the existence of witchcraft and sorcerers. 

1745           The last execution on charges of count 

                  dovstve (the case of Father Ludovic Debar in 

                  Lyon). 



    If a person has already been accused and n to the vizi ts and her, then this 

meant that the victim was getting on the path, unknown 

leading her to certain death. N ak an une announced 

of the sentence, the prisoner had to experience 

and the procedure of public un and wives and I: "We command 

to you as an order of azan and I wear two felt crosses 

one hundred yellow, one in front, the other behind each 

house your clothes with the exception of your pants. You do not 

you have the right to go out or go anywhere without these 

364 



\ crosses. The cross should be 20 by 16 inches, 

  the width of each part is 12 inches. If 

  tear or wear out, you will have to replace 

  nit and x”, wrote in his “Guide to ink visito- 

  ra” Franciscan Bernard Gui. 

     As the witch hunt intensifies in Germany, And so 

  Lia and France, the courts of inquisition began to constitute 

  specific lists of questions 

  it was possible to prove the guilt of the victim. Before you 

  an example of this kind of "questionnaire" using 

  for more than three hundred years as judges in Colmar, Alsace. 



   Questions to ask a witch: 



   How long have you been a witch? 

   Why did you become her? 

   How did you become a witch and what happened then? 

   Whom did you choose to be your incubus? 

   What was his name? 

   What was the name of your master and one of the wicked de- 

mono? 

   What was it for to la tva that you were forced to 

bring him? 

   In what way did you bring it and on what terms? 

   How did you swear with your fingers? 

   Where did you complete and la your alliance with the incubus? 

   Like demons, as well as people took part in 

night 

   What kind of food did you eat there? 

   How was the feast organized at the Sabbath? 

   Where did you sit at this feast? 

   What kind of music did they play there and what kind of dances did you dance 

shoes? 

   How did your incubus reward you for sexual intercourse 

you? 

   Like the devilish marks left on your body 

this incubus? 

   What harm have you done to such and such people 

and how did you do it? 

   Why did you do this damage to them? 

   How can it be reduced? 

   With the help of how and x herbs or how and in the way you can 

want to save them from it? 

   To those children whom you bewitched? 

   And why did you do it? 

                                                      365 



   Which animals have you bewitched to death or to 

sent to n their illness? 

   Why did you do such deeds? 

   Why are your partners in sin? 

   Why does the devil make deals at night? 

   What are these ointments with which you rub your 

melo? 

   How do you fly through the air? 

   What magic words do you say then? 

   What storms are you raising? 

   Who helps you with this? 

   Which of the invasions of caterpillars and other insects 

the work of your hands? 

   What did you do to evoke these disgusts? 

tedious creatures? 

   Did the devil leave a certain period for your evil? 

dey n i m ? 6 4 

   Therefore, one should not be surprised that thousands of innocents: 

people getting bombarded with these kinds of questions 

implying the original guilt of the victim 

were put to death to azn and. Very often these 

you were poor and ignorant people who 

it cost nothing to intimidate the judges by questioning 

them in gloomy judicial to azemats. Frightened victims 

might not even understand the question, or might just m 

fall into a verbal trap. Chance to avoid under' 

there was practically no fate. 

   In order to extort from the defendant a confession 

usually, as we said above, apply 

p tk a: the shower is more important than the body. Considering from. 

the clever technique of the shoulder masters, don't stop' 

perhaps to be surprised that p ytk and, as a rule, gave; 

expected results. German scientist Free,1 

Rich von Schee (1591-1635) wrote about knocked-out sg 

recognition of x: “The strongest, which are shot 

gave it all, told me it's hard to imagine with" 

be such a crime that they would not immediately 

repeated, if it promised at least some relief 

nie, for they agreed rather ten times moderate • 

than go through it all again." 

   French demonologist Jean Bodin (1529-159' 

justified the use of torture in the following ways 

“If there is any way to propitiate the Lord, 

beat His blessings, vn take in reverent zyxwvutsrqp 

                                                    т[" 

'L' 



not one way to punish azan and I others, to protect them 

from third-party infection, reduce the number of sinful 

kov, to secure the lives of good people and punish the 

my heinous crimes that can only 

can imagine a person, so it is with extreme strictness 

guest n how to call witches. 

                                                  367 



    "Hammer of the Witches", written by two monks domi 

Nikan order, provided for very clear rights 

preparation for torture for stubborn witnesses 

Lei: “The beginning of the test of torture lies in the following 

washing. Firstly, the jailers are preparing weapons p ygk and, 

and then undress the prisoner. If this is a woman, 

then she undresses other women, reliable 

venerable. Undressing is done in order to 

to find out if any 

witches' tools, as they often do by science 

demons when they use the members of the body not 

baptized child so that they can lose 

opportunity to be saved. 

   When the instruments of torture are prepared for action, the courts 

on my own behalf and on behalf of other respected husbands. 

and zealots in the faith again offers the accused to 

voluntarily confess. If he does not receive prizes 

niya, he asks those present to prepare a 

qualified for a rack test or some other 

torture am. The assistants immediately obey, showing 

and feigned excitement. Then at the request of KOI I 

or from those present, the prisoner is newly released / * 

is given and he is once again persuaded to tell the truth. Etc 



WOM he is promised that he will not be put to death if 

confesses. 

 [But if witches, despite threats and promises, 

continue to persist, then let the jailers 

tsyat sentence of torture in the usual way, exposing 

their themes of torture required by the crime. During the 

when tortured, they are asked questions on the charges 

and this is done constantly, starting with easier 

accusations - for they more readily admit! 

light accusations rather than grave accusations.” 

    The last hope of the executioners was to say 

during which "the hands of the prisoner were tied for 

back, a load was tied to his legs. Then his sub- 

take until he touches the head of the block. 

For some time he is allowed to hang in this way, 

so that all his ligaments and vessels are terribly 

stretched under the influence of weights tied 

to the feet. 

    Then it is jerked out and out, completely weakened 

for me, at the same time, the rope, without allowing at the same time to touch- 

all the earth. And thanks to this terrible push of his hand 

and the legs are out of joint. This gives him an acute 

pain - from the shock and experienced by him at a sudden 

on a different basis! 

din, the most cruel and painful way pulls everything 

his body »6 5 . 

    As Friedrich von Shpee said, torture is subject to 

any accused who refused to confess confessed. 

After that, he, as a rule, almost always said 

the right words. People didn't feel safe 

even in their own homes. "If the witch 

told the truth under the influence of pain, then in this case 

tea her condition is impossible to describe. She not only 

can help herself, but is forced to blame others, 

whom she does not even know whose names are put into her 

mouth by investigators, or reported by patches. or 

she herself had heard of them as suspects and 

not collected. Those, in turn, were forced to 

the thread of others, those - still someone, and so everything is a continuation 

huddles. Someone can help here, seeing how everything props 

walks? 

    The same thing will be felt with those who live 

deliberately slandered. And if they don't need 

compensation for damage, then their winding up gishnnmachkhkh for 

Proof of vi y Her sh ~ l. b 1 "Xt go d and t, p 



slander began to spread all around, intensifying 

there was suspicion, they began to whisper about it, 

all corners. Therefore, those who found themselves under torture and n "ases 

name a. 

    And from everything that usually accompanied such processes 

fools, one thing should be noted, that if the judicial break 

the war continued, no one could feel 

feel safe regardless of gender, obrap 

life, virtue, honor, if any enemy or 

slanderer wanted to bring a person under accusation i 

               66 

to witchcraft." 

    Von Schee was scornful of the allegations 

according to which any person gave p azan and I svs 

coherently, without using torture on him: “There is such a phrase 

often used by judges that the accused, de 

fuck, confessed without torture, and therefore undoubtedly wine 

veins. I got curious and did some research. 

during which he discovered that in fact he subjected them all 

or torture - they clamped their hands and feet in iron ty 

skah with sharp and narrow steel edges, flattened 

shim them, like p and a horn, squeeze out the mawsh and me blood and with 

chi n I vsh and mi unbearable pain. This is what is called "b( 

p ytok ". And I am so deceived by those who do not 

understands similar phrases to visitors. 

    There are several very peculiar descriptions 

of people accused of witchcraft, who, nahs 

while under torture, they did not feel at all 

whether . So, for example, Guazzo told how “a certain 

a woman, about fifty years old, endured torture at a boiling place*. 

fat, which was poured on her body, and others mocker 

over all its members and at the same time nothing 

worked. After all, when she was taken out of torture, then n ( 

her body did not have any injuries, chrome 

except perhaps the big toe, dislocated in the course ( 

tortured and and not yet set. N o and this n and k ak not me 

pranked her and didn’t give her any pain.” 

    Trier rules, used, perhaps, by itself! 

notoriety, testify to the fact that it is used 

torture has taken on an unusually wide scale: “3TI 

the movement was supported by numerous officials 

to the ami who sought wealth in the ashes of their victims 

That's why from yard to yard, through towns and villages^" 

of all dioceses, special accusers flew and scurried about, 

quisitors, notaries, jurors, judges, constables 

470 



\ who dragged people of both sexes to court and tortured 

 ave them in huge numbers. 

    Practically none of the accused escaped 

to azan and i. And in TrirezyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJI 

                        he spared even the best of their people 

of this city. And more than one judge, two buryumistra, not- 

how many members of the council and judges were co- 









      в о nnrb jie bit §ar niMtct) fepn 

                   b 



burnt you there. Canons of all their church colleges, with 

Chodsky priests and rural deans were discarded 

shens aside - That's how far they have gone in their malice 

and madness people and judges, alk and e of someone else's blood 

and property! There was almost no one who would not have been captured 

were suspected of this crime. 

   Meanwhile, notaries, copyists and keepers of 

stin itz got rich. The executioners rode on thoroughbreds 

horses adah, like courtiers, dressed in gold and 

edge. And their wives competed with noble ladies 

in the wealth of their outfits. Children of the accused and 

the occupants were sent into exile. And x good confiscated- 

But. Pahari and vintners have gone bankrupt - it has come 

calm. A terrible epidemic or a pogromist 

vatel - and they would hardly have devastated the lands of Trier 

more than and n to visi ts and I and unusually wide 

                 6 

persecution » ' . 

   Many tried to bribe the inquisitors. "Very 

it often happens that the visitors replace those 

foresters are punished with a monetary fine, delivering to themselves 

and thus a huge income. some unfortunate 

they had to pay something like annual 

contributions. If they stopped paying, then they were again 

they pulled before bright eyes and inquisitorial judges. More 

Moreover, in cases where the property of heretics is con 

was forged in favor of the public t reasury, in kvi 

The sitor always got a very good share of it. 

   And so he is, the only accusation, a simple under 

vision in heresy or witchcraft, or a call to inn to vision 

they led to disgrace and dishonor. From this it was possible 

whether to get rid of handing in to the visitor a significant 

amount of silver. When I was in Italy and (in 1511-153 b 

years), then most of the inquisitors of the Milan Ger 

the kingdom in this way and in the way the fine oval the noble 

good ladies, as well as poor but honest women 

tormented by fear, from which they received og 

                                                         68 

generous sums of money, ”wrote Cornelius Agrippa. 

   The persecution in Trier was really terrible. 

However, of all three hundred states that made up Ger 

Mania, the spiritual principality of Bamberg was installed 

here is a kind of record. Witch hunt there 

Prince-Bishop Johann von Aschhausen (1609— 

1632), under which more than three hundred people paid 

WITH YOUR LIFE for accusations of witchcraft. almost him 

of them died in 1617. In deployed in 20 

372 



\ 

    in the 30s of the XVII century on the territory of Bamberg 

    duvan yah, many respectable citizens were accused 

    and subjected to "fair" punishment azan and yu - killed, 

    so that this land of Germany is famous for its cruelty 

    la throughout Europe. So, for example, local torture 

    included the following: 

        "1. Thumb vices for use 

    together with 

        2. From the mother's legs. 

        3. Flagellation of the tortured (including hanging 

    nominal state). 

        4. "Ladder" - one of the forms of the rack. 

        5. Blocks equipped with iron spikes. This 

    instrument of torture and could be used during weaving 

    hours. 

        6. Dyba. 

        7. Rubbing the neck with a stiff rope until 

    bone will open. 

        8. Cold water baths. 

        9. And the test is burning with their feathers, which follow 

    lo hold under the armpit to the ami or at the groin, previously 

    dipping them in burning sulfur. 

        10. "Prayer bench" with sharp wooden 

    ribs. 

        11. Force-feeding heavily salted agricultural 

    due to the simultaneous refusal of drinking water. 

        12. Bathtubs from boiled fabric, in which iz- 

    news (in 1630 in Tsaile it was put to death and 

    som six people)»6 9 . 

        One of their most sincere, sad and piercing 

    solid evidence in the history of witchcraft processes 

    belongs to Iogan Junius, burgomaster of Bamberg. 

    In 1628 he was accused of witchcraft, subjected to 

    interrogated and sentenced to death. In a feverish atmosphere 

    sphere of that time, he could not do anything to 

    his salvation. All the time while this parsing- 

    he tried to prove his innocence. N ezadol- 

    Before his death, he wrote a letter to his daughter. Ve- 

    ron ike. This letter is almost impossible to read - 

    because his fingers were mutilated by a special vise: 

    “A hundred, a thousand times hello, my dear daughter, 

    beloved Veron ika. N innocent ram I went to jail, 

    innocent I was tortured, innocent I must and 

    die. And for everyone who got into this witch's 

    prison, must become a sorcerer, or he will be mu- 

                                                          37 3 



read until he invents something 

whom about himself and, may the Lord have mercy on him! Not 

will speak to himself. 

   I'll tell you what happened to me. when me 

for the first time they brought me to torture, then my son-in-law was already there 

Dr. Brown, Dr. Ketzendorfer and two other unknown 

whom me doctor. Then Dr. Brown asked me 

“Well, cousin, how did you get here?” I answered 

"And for accidental slander." “Listen, you,” sharply 

he said, “you are a sorcerer. Do you acknowledge this 

voluntarily? If not, then we will bring here a witness 

lei, and even the executioner will be invited at the same time. Then I sk.) 

hall: “I'm not a sorcerer. I understand very well what that 

case. Let at least a thousand witnesses come here, I m 

I'm worried. I'll even listen to them." 

    Then the son of the enclera appeared before me, saying t 

w and y that he saw me ya. I asked him if he was 

equestrian questioned and whether he took an oath, zyxwvutsrq 

                                                      h 

Dr Brown refused me this. Then to the ancler, to * 









574 



tor Georg Haan, entered this chamber and he said the same, 

that his son. After which Else Heppfen was also brought in. 

She saw me dancing in the Hauptsmorwald, but they 

do not allow her or her to pronounce a lyat. I said, "I don't 

when I didn’t renounce God and never will 

“The Lord, by His grace, will keep me from this. 

I'd rather endure what I have to endure." 

    And then he entered - may the Lord of heaven have mercy - 

ny! - the executioner and put on my thumbs ty- 

ski, while tying his hands so that the blood came out from 

me from under the nails and in other places, so four 

weeks after that I couldn't move my fingers, which 

you, however, and now see from my letter. 

    Then they tore off my clothes, tied my hands behind 

back and pulled me up on the "ladder". Here I have 

sparks from my eyes fell, and I thought I had come 

me the end. Eight times they lifted me like this and 

sharply released in and out, so that I endured the torment of an unusual 

tea I then said to Dr. Brown, “God bless 

chastises you for such vicious treatment of an innocent and 

respected person." And he answered: “You are a fraud- 

n and k. 

    And all this happened on Friday, June 30, but, with 

With God's help, I endured these tortures. When, on- 

the end, the executioner took me back to the cell, he said: 

"Sir, for God's sake, I beg you, confess at least 

anything, because you can't bear the torture that 

the eye will expose you. But even if you survive, then 

you won't be saved anyway, even if you are a count, because 

that this torture will be followed by another, and so it will be until then 

Until then, you don't confess to witchcraft. Until then 

since,” he continued, “they will not leave you behind, that 

you, however, see for yourself from the whole process. 

They are all the same." 

    Then came Georg Haan, who declared that, with 

according to the opinion of the members of the commission, the prince-bishop 

I wanted my case to be made such a visual 

an example to astonish everyone. 

    And so I asked them to give me one day 

for reflection and for a conversation with a priest, by 

because I was in a depressed state of mind. IN 

the priest refused me, but they gave me time to think. 

So look, my dear girl, it's dangerous 

I was and still am. I have to say that 

                                                     S75 



I am a sorcerer - although I am not one, I must refuse 

from God, which I have never done before. 

    All this time I was overwhelmed by various anxiety! 

thoughts, but finally an idea came to my mind. I 

I won’t be afraid, and since they didn’t bring me a priest, 

whom I could consult, then I myself must gi. 

think and declare your decision. Probably so b- 

it's better if i just say it even if i don't 

did nothing of the sort in reality, and then 

I could confess this to the priest and let him 

responsible for all this are those who forced me to act i 

so in this way ... So I made a confession, as 

blowing lower, but it was all a lie. 

    Now read, my dear child, what am I in 

knew, wanting to avoid extraordinary torment and cruelty 

torture that I could no longer endure. (Farther 

a confession follows, repeating, in essence, what 

what was said during the investigation.) 

    Then I had to say who I saw on the veda 

skom shabash e. I said that I did not recognize them. "Ah, TS 

you old rogue, you need some shchi and pts zzh 

plunge into your vile mouth. Tell me, was it not 

Chancellor? And I said yes. "Who else?" I am again" 

                                                        etc 

said nothing. Then he said: “Well, let’s 

let's walk the streets. Let's start with the market, then go through * 

one, then another." I had to name there n* 

how many people. Here we went out for one long y - 

zu, where I didn’t know anyone. But still, I had to. 

here to name eight more people. N a Z inkenvert 

one more. Then we went to the Upper Bridge, then t 

Georgtor. Again, I didn't recognize anyone here. Do I know 

someone in the palace, who could it be - about everything< 

I had to say this without fear. And so they 

they constantly asked me on every street, although I 

could and did not intend to tell them any more about 4i 

So they again handed me over to the shoulder cases,> 

teru, telling him to shave off all my hair on m<1 

and subjected me to new tortures. "This rascal knows 

someone from the market place adi, that guy was talking to sh 

to every day, but he still doesn't want ims; 

name". By these words they meant 

Master Dietmeyer, so I had to call! 

his. 

    After which I had to declare the committed 

my crimes. But I didn’t say anything ... “Take up 

М 



those of him!” So I said that I was going to kill my 

children, but slaughtered a horse instead. It did not help. I 

he also took sacred wafers and buried them. When I 

said so, they left me alone. 

    Here, my dear, before you are all my deeds and 

knowledge for which I must die. But all this is absolutely 

a cruel lie and and zmysh flax and I, so help me the Lord. 

For all this I was forced to say with the help of infernal 

the pain that I endured. After all, they never 

stop the torture before the person confesses to 

something. No matter how pious he is, he must 

wives to become a sorcerer. And there is no salvation for anyone, be it 

even a nobleman. And if the Lord does not condescend to 

as well as x means for protection and will not shed the light of truth, 

then our whole family will be burned. God in heaven 

domo that I don't know about anything. And I will die innocent 

I am similarly tortured. 

    Dear child, keep this letter a secret, lest 

who did not find it; otherwise I will be pi- 

thaw even more cruelly, and my jailers beheaded 

vyat. 'Cause it's all forbidden... My dear, give it 

man thaler.,. I have been writing this letter for several days. 

Both my hands are crippled. I'm very bad... Calm- 

night, - after all, your oten, And ohanne Junius is no more 

when you are not seen t "" 0 . 

    One parish priest from a village in the county 

Bonna characterized the atmosphere of terror in this way, gentlemen 

which took place in many places in Germany at the beginning of the XVII 

century: “The victims of their blazing funeral pyres are 

lyayutsya, mostly male sorcerers. Into this matter 

half the city was involved, for they were arrested and burned 

even professors, law students, pastors, canons 

ki, wick arias and monks. His Serene Highness the Prince had 

seventy seminaries in which priests were trained 

kov, and one of them, who also became famous as 

musician anta, was arrested yesterday; the other two also 

searched, but they managed to escape. The chancellor and his wife, 

as well as wives and his personal secretary were also captured 

cheny and treasury. 

    On the eve of the day of the Virgin Mary, a girl was executed 

nineteen years old, who enjoyed an extraordinary love of 

I wind in the city for my virtue, which from a young age - 

they were brought up by the Prince-Bishop himself. I saw how I was 

executed and then burned the canon of the cathedral 

named R otenzahe. Children three or four years old had their 

                                                    .- (7 7 



mi lovers of devils. Students were burned there 

boys aged 9-14 years. In short, consisting 

things are so terrible that no one knows how they 

he can talk and communicate with people”7 1 . 

    Someone began to speak out against all these vile 

stay. Among such people was the Jesuit Hai. 

nrich Türk from Paderborn: “Some people start 

feel extraordinary sympathy for these unfortunate 

real sacrifices, and immediately began to arise big cons 

opinions as to whether all these 

flame people are so guilty and deserve such horror 

noah death. After all, many people think that such an appeal 

relationship with people whom he redeemed with his precious 

blood of Christ, there is unjustified cruelty, thin 

sh aya of any barbarity»7 2 . 

    However, in the tenth and twenties of the XVII century, violently 

howling flame of persecution begins to slowly fade away 

All these terrible persecutions in Bamberg ceased with 

the death of the Prince Bishop in 1632, ts 

To the last witch to azn or whether in 1655. And all- 

after all, the last official execution took place in Germany 

research institutes only in 1775; in Austria, the anti-Wedding laws 

We were canceled twelve years later. In F ran tssh, 

witchcraft processes begin to subside already from the very beginning 

beginning of the 17th century, although, of course, the unusual case of chambre 

d'arden te 1679-1682 in all the splendor of the show 

lo, what prejudices were rooted in the concept of “hunting for 

witches." (Star Chamber of Louis XIV Investigation 

la widely circulated allegations of poisoning 

I x and witchcraft among the French nobility; royal 

the edict of 1682 rejected the reality of witchcraft and sorcery 

va.) In France, the last execution on charges of counting 

Dove took place in Lyon in 1745. 





                     Chapter six 

  Trials of Wizards and Witches 

         IN ENGLAND AND SCOTLAND 



   The persecution of witches in England was felt much 

weaker than on the continent. Starting from 1542 

the last to azn and, held in 1684, on that svg 

about a thousand people were sent. The reason is 

There were many different factors, among 

378 



which the main thing, perhaps, was that on the territory 

rii of England there never existed an apparatus of invisibility 

tions. Under Henry VIII (1509-1547), the country withdrew from 

pan-European system of the Catholic Church. Except 

moreover, a natural barrier to penetration 

to the British Isles the most disgusting 

phenomena of medieval life and lay and the English Channel. At that 

while in Germany and France there were massive 

to azn and, during which hundreds of witches and col- 

dunov, in England the largest action of its kind 

became the Chelmsford case of 1645 - then at the same time 

In fact, nineteen witches were executed. However, then 

there was a time of a mighty witch hunter 

Matthew Hopkins - he was at the zenith of his weakness 

You. In general, even the execution of nine witches during Lan to a- 

the Shire process of 1612 became for England a 

extraordinary and sensational. 

    In the same way, the English judges did not show any 

to their defendants of such cruelty, what a pro- 

I influence their colleagues with respect to my victims with con- 

nenta. So, for example, if we talk about torture, then in 

England used only a "diet" (bread and water), on- 

forcible soldering of a person with water and twisting 

joints. Neither the rack, nor the pulp, nor 

Spanish boot, as it happened all the time in 

Europe (unless the suspected witch is considered 

lurked in the same way and changed). Moreover, in England 

witches were almost always hanged rather than burned. 

    The start of the witch hunt was laid by a special 

mullet against witchcraft, issued in 1542 in 

the reign of Henry VI II. It spoke about 

that if someone “uses, resorts, practices 

forges or sometimes engages in ... a spell or cast 

calling spirits, witchcraft, sorcery and sorcery 

vom in order to find money or treasure, or 

devastates, destroys or destroys someone's property 

society, relatives or himself ... or vyk apy- 

vilifies and overthrows the cross or crosses, it will be 

be considered and recognized as a criminal offence, and 

each and every one who erred in the above manner... 

will be considered, recognized and constituted criminal 

criminals and criminals. 

    Meat is a crime, and a cure is a meal 

so ... they will endure and suffer the same heavy pains 

death, loss and confiscation of their lands, holding 

                                                    37 4 



n ii, goods and movable property, as in the case of 

criminal offense, and lose the privilege of do 

                              73 

clergy and priesthood". 

    This statute of 1542 was also forwarded 

against those who unlawfully summoned spirits, and who, "created 

riv and served as the reason for the appearance of various of them 

images and images of men, women, children, angels 

catches or devils, animals and birds, and having also created 

crowns, skulls, swords, rings, bowls and other things, 

assured everyone of the truth of these fantastic things 

and uprooted and overturned countless 

crosses and assumed the right to announce to everyone where 

lost or stolen items are found. Similar 

deeds can only be used for the sake of 

anyone who has recourse to the harsh law, in order to inflict 

niya of damage and evil to the subjects of the king and the loss of souls 

these criminals, to the great dishonor of God, 

disgrace and disorder in the kingdom." 

    A similar statute was issued at the very beginning of the government. 

of Queen Elizabeth I in 1563 (Statute of Henry 

VIII was canceled after his death in 1547 in the reign 

Edward VI). This new decree said: “Nastoya 

u and m it is announced that today there are no ordinary or special 

on azan 

calling and conjuring an and I m and evil spirits ... this is a crime 

by virtue of a statute passed in the thirty-third year 

the reign of the late King Henry the Eighth, considered 

was a criminal act, and such was the state of affairs 

until the aforementioned statute has been repealed by Ak- 

Volume and Decree of Repeal issued in the first year 

reign of the late King Edward VI. 

   It is possible that Elizabeth's activities in the case 

the publication in 1563 of laws against witches influenced the 

Bishop John of Salisbury's homily adapted to it 

Jewell, uttered by him three years earlier: “These 

people (I mean witches and sorcerers) during 

over the past few years have surprisingly intensified in the 

Your Lordship's orders. These eyes have seen the most 

obvious and obvious manifestations of their malice. Data 

Your Grace shrink to death, their flowers wither- 

yut, their flesh rots, their senses become dull, they 

minds are shaking. That's why the humblest request 

Your poor subjects Your Highness consists 

that the laws concerning these villains be 

are given in execution”7 4 . 



380 



    Since the statute of Henry VIII was repealed, 

"many diabolical personalities invented and performed 

invocation and conjuration of sinful and criminal spirits 

hov, and resorted to the use of witchcraft, sorcerer- 

spells, spells and spells and witchcraft to harm people and do- 

bru their neighbors and other subjects of this kingdom, 

as well as other obscene acts and desires 

contrary to the laws of Almighty God, with danger to 

their own souls, and to the dishonor and disorder of this 

kingdoms." 

    This statute of Elizabeth stated that if anyone 

or “uses, engages in or resorts to incantations 

n and m and call sinful and evil spirits for the sake of 

goals and needs; or if any person or 

some people will be after the first day mentioned 

June to use and resort to witchcraft, charms, 

to n an and i m or witchcraft, then this person can 

be killed and destroyed ... (then he) will suffer torment 

death as a criminal (or criminals) and will lose 

the privilege and benefits of the priesthood and spiritual status 

n and I. However, the wife and children of the person who fell under this 

the article itself was not subject to its action. 

    Death on the gallows was the most severe measure of 

Kazan and I, which could be imposed for witchcraft - 

after all, the latter was considered in England rather a secular pre- 

step than religious heresy. Along with the, 

other punishments were possible, for example, shame 

nth pillar. If someone "will use, occupy 

swear or resort to any kind of incantation n an and i m, cha- 

frames, witchcraft or sorcery, why some 

the love will dry up, wither away, or in some way 

zom is damaged by the body, or his property or movables 

will be damaged and destroyed, then each such 

the offender will be imprisoned for up to a year without 

guarantee or pledge, and once at the end of each 

the third month of this year ... on a fair day at a fish- 

night square adi... will be exhibited at the pillory 

at six o'clock, where he will openly confess his 

misdeeds and delusions". 



           Witchcraft in England and Scotland 

1542     Statute of Henry VIII against witches 

1547     Repeal of the statute of 1542 during the reign 

           Edward VI 

                                                       381 



1563   Statute of Queen Kli^a^e-! s directed 

          against witnessing 

1566   First witch trial at Chelmsford 

1579   Witches of Windsor; second process in 

          in Chelmsford 

1582   The Essex Witches of St. Osis 

          followed at Chelmsford) 

1584   Publication of "The Discoveries of Witchcraft" 

          Regin Alda Scott 

1589   Third Trial at Chelmsford 

1593   Witches of Huntington 

1597   Edition of the "Demonology" by James VI Sh otlan 

          (Jacob I of English) 

1597   Case of the boy from Burton (Thomas Darley 

          ha) in Staffordshire 

1604   Statute of James I against witches 

1604   The Case of the Boy from Norswich (Imposter) 

1605   The Witches of Abingdon and An n a Günther (himself * 

          called k a) 

1612   Lan to ash and rsk and th witch trial 

1616   The case of the boy from Leicester (John Smp 

          ta), impostor 

1620   The case of the boy from Billson (William Per- 

          ri), impostor 

1645   Case of the Faversham Witches in Kent. Gene- 

          real witch hunter Matthew 

          Hopkins and Chelmsford (M anningtree) 

          witch process 

1646   Matthew Hopkins dies of tuberculosis 

1647   Edition of Hopkins' book The Discovery of the Witch 

1649   Case of the St. Albany Witches at Khertf Ordshy, 

1652   "Doctor Lamb's Favorite": Anne's Case 

          B Odenham. Case of the Wapping Witch (Js> 

          Peterson) near London 

1662   Witch trial at St. Edmundsbury 

1674   Trial of Anna Foster in Northampton" 

1682   The Case of the Sin of the Exeter Witches 

1684   Last execution on charges of witchcraft 

          in England (Alice M olland from Exeter) 

1712   Jane Wenham of Walkern, Herefordshire 

          the last person in England to be charged 

          witchcraft. 

1722   The last execution on charges of witchcraft 

          on the territory of Scotland 

1736   Repeal of the statute of James I (1604) 

582 



   According to the law of that time, 

people occupying a high position in society, 

were subjected to a different judgment, even if they were accused 

in similar crimes: “If such a 

the offender is a peer of this kingdom, then let 

he will be judged by the court of his peers, as he usually does- 

in cases of criminal offenses or state 

gift change, but not in any other way. 

   Another, later statute, adopted in 1581 

du, that is, back in the reign of Elizabeth, should have 

protect the monarchy from witches. If anyone will 

• seek to find out, or will actively inquire 

words, deeds, sent and I mi, how long will it be 

to live the queen and how long is she going to live, 

or who will reign as king or queen 

you of this kingdom of England in case of illness of her light- 

or will be in some open form a prophet- 

honor on this score, or strive and wish 

death or loss of our mistress of her royal 

majesty in which she now abides, or something 

something of the same kind, then each such act 

nie will be considered a criminal offense, and then 

mu and will be punished by execution and confiscation of property 

happiness". 

   The first major witch trial took place in An- 

glia in 1566. It was in Chelmsford, in Essex; 

since the time and building and I of the anti-Vedic statute has passed 

three years. This matter was undoubtedly considered important. IN 

the first day it was led by the local rector, Reverend 

Thomas Call and Sir John Fortescue; on the second - sir 

Gilbert Jellal (Attorney General) and John Sa- 

Uscot, Judge of the King's Bench. There were 

three - Elizabeth Francis, Agnes Waterhouse and her daughter 

Joan Waterhouse. All of them were from a small 

the village of Hatf Hill Peverill, near Chelmsford. 

This process is very interesting, since it is very good 

sho is common to artin y position suspected 

taken in witchcraft. 

   After countless questions, Elizabeth Francis 

knew that she comprehended the art of witchcraft under 

The guidance of her grandmother, mother to and and to, when she was 

only 12 years old. Matushka aI v advised her to give up 

God" and give your blood to Satan (so she said), oh 

To whom she said that he appeared in the form of a white heel 



a naughty cat, and taught to call her by pronouncing n; 

this is the name of Satan, and keep it in a basket.” 

    Soon Elizabeth began to ask for osh k y, her "sign, 

my spirit,” to do some things for her. She Hall 

body "become as rich as possible and live in contentment, 

and he promised her this, asking and waking that she wished 

no, and she said: “Sheep” (because this bag is osh pcs 

spoke to her, by her own admission...). *" 

immediately this cat delivered sheep to her pastures in k 

number of 18 pieces, black and white, which are left 

spent all this time with her, but in the end they were all 

carried away, and she does not even know how. 

    Then Elisabeth asked this kosh to do that> 

for Andrew Byles to be her husband. It was local 

rich man and he, of course, refused Elizabeth, who 

“wished that Satan would empty his warehouses, h 

he immediately did; and not being satisfied with these- - 

she wished he touched Byles' body that zyxwvutsr 

                                                       shopping mall 

and did, whereupon the man died." 

    After the death of Andrew Byles, Elizabeth began to 

to throw off another candidate for the role of husband. This che- * 

the century was Francis, who remained her husband and on v. 

cop of investigation. “After marriage, they lived like this, k. 

she wished, being excited, as she said-' 

to anxiety and are moved to curses and boron 

blasphemy. And so she wished that Satan - 

cat - killed a child who was about six months old 

and he did it. 

    But since she never found peace, to about. 

whom she desired so passionately, she commanded him and 

send lameness on her husband Francis. And he did.• 

as follows: he came early in the morning and arranged 

in the head of this Francis, taking on the appearance of a vile zhaot 

And when he, putting on his shoe, touched Satan with his foot, 

he was very surprised and asked his wife about it. AND ( 

told him not to kill that toad, and how 

Francis listened to her, he was immediately overcome by a limp, 

which he never recovered. 

    Establishing to his delight that this cat was a sakl 

Devil, the court began to scrutinize the form "\u003e 

Elizabeth's relationship with the cat Satan: on trial p. 

admitted that “every time he did something 

administer at her request, he demanded a drop from her. 

vi, which she gave him, piercing her g 

now in one place, now in another. In those places where 



pointed at herself, there were red spots that 

can be seen now." Elizabeth admitted that she 

she maintains such "friendly" relations here 

for 15 or 16 years now. But in the end she began to get tired of 

of all this, and decide and la break such a "friendship". She 

“came to her neighbor matushka e Waterhouse, poor 

woman, when she was busy at the stove, and asked to give 

her one pie. In return, she promised 

bring her something so extraordinarily good that 

will inevitably come in handy throughout her life. And this 

Matush K A Waterhouse gave her a pie, after which she 

brought this cat to her in an apron and taught her how to 

to lay like that in due time she learned from her grandmother 

to and and to, while saying that she should call him Sa- 

tan and give him a little bit of your blood, bread and 

milk." 

    It is characteristic that Elizabeth Francis does not mention any 

about agreements with the Devil, nor about shabbas or witches 

meetings. In general, the mention of these things was met 

are found in the materials of the English witch trials 

very rarely; they are more characteristic of Europe with its rest 

reish them religious problems. However, this 

"servant" and the deeds of "maleficium" (personal villain 

i n i ia) are much more common. In this case, the court 

completely relied on the show azan and I Elizabeth and delivered 

the following sentence: she was sentenced to a one-year 

belt lock. A few years later her again 

accused of witchcraft and after that, now for the second time 

she was hanged for a certain charge (1579): moreover 

it should be noted that this ara overtook her not by wrapping 

not in heresies, but for reasons of harm to the particular 

man. 

    The second defendant in the Chelmsford trial was 

mother to a Agnes Waterhouse. During the interrogations Agnes 

Waterhouse admitted that she acted with this cat, 

Satan, just like Elizabeth. For example, she is not 

usual tenacity "forced him to kill one of 

his own pigs, which he did. And for the work 

she gave him a chicken, which he asked her before 

this, as well as to the oranges of his blood. And every time 

when he did something at her request, she rewarded 

gave it in this way and in that way, pointing at herself in the face or in 

Hand and pumping blood into his mouth. He sucked and then 

again lay down in the basket in which she kept him. 



13- 3400                                             38 5 



Spots from all these punctures are still visible today zyxwvutsrq 

                                                        and. 

her skin." 

    On another occasion, Agnes testified to the court that somehow, 

became very angry with a certain father Kersey, deciding 

go on to order him. She took "her cat, Satan, in n>, 

dol and put it on a tree in front of the door and order;, 

let him kill three pigs of this father Kersey. He is so 

acted, and when he returned, he told her about it, and he .-, 

rewarded him in the same way as before, that is, she gave chicks 

flax to a and to a drop of his blood. This chick to and he sk 

without a trace, so that after him there was not a kgk left 

points, neither sh to urk and nor tendons. 

    Certainly, under pressure, Agnes 

showed the court, asking to take into account other 

how are you maleficium. So, 'he admitted that, "having quarreled 

hanging out with a widow named Gooddey, she ordered 

Satan take her cow away, which he did. She is on 

hailed him, as before. In the same way, when he 

quarreled with her other neighbor, she is exactly the same 

killed three of her geese. 

    And she also admitted that being constantly in trouble. 

deceased state, she asked Satan to destroy., 

then the brewery. And when her neighbor didn't like it. 

oil Agnes, the last two days later spoiled <h 

milk. And also, quarreling with his other neighbor 

her husband, she ordered Satan to kill the last 

cut bleeding, which he did for the previous vozsh; 

birth". 

    In the end, she confessed that "because and 

relations with her husband were not very good, she npt 

to azala Satan to kill him, which he did nine l * 

back, and she has been a widow ever since.” 

    We see that in this case Satan, having endured 

there are peculiar magical metamorphoses - he is trans; 

turns into a toad. Agnes Waterhouse explained that “before . 

for a long time she kept this cat in a basket and 

was forced to make him a bedding of neck;> 

sti, although she had little of it. And then she started 

pour in the name of the Father, and the Son, and the Holy Spirit, so that (>;• 

turned into a toad. And then he turned into a toad, 

so she put it in a basket, and took away the wool;: 

But she also said that going to Brexted wouldn't be long. 

before her arrest, she heard Satan tell her to 

to hurry home, for she must have had some ' • ' 

big trouble, so how soon will she be ( 

386 



either hanged or burned." This is how it ends 

recognition of matushka and Waterhouse. She was recognized 

guilty and became, in this way, the first person 

hanged in England for witchcraft. Really 

whether she was engaged in magical exercises, or 

she became a victim of legal prejudice and 

local survivals are unknown. However, this 

tea undoubtedly influenced the subsequent, confirmed 

giving the conviction that witchcraft was a constant 

growing danger to society. 

    The third accused in 1566 at Chelmsford was 

daughter of mothers k and Waterhouse - Joan Waterhouse, girlfriend 

at the age of eighteen. Joan was accused of bewitching 

12-year-old girl Agnes Brown, who "withered her 

right leg and right hand "(in fact, the latter, probably 

yatn o, smashed parali h). The only evidence 

against Joan was given to the most affected and, of course, 

Indeed, nothing has been confirmed. P amya thuya, how much 

people came under suspicion due to unconfirmed 

testimonies of my children in recent years, Joan was not- 

usually glad when she was released. 

    In the courtroom, Joan told her accuser- 

nice that she sometimes took part in witchcraft, 

which her mother did, but that only once 

she decided to scare this girl Agnes Brown from 

B rexted, who refused to give her bread and cheese. 

Joan asked Satan what she should do. Satan 

demanded her soul and body. Joan, "being strongly 

frightened and having decided to get rid of him, agreeing 

lass. And then he approached this girl in the form of a spiteful 

a dog with horns on its head and scared her so much, 

that this image still haunts the girls”7 5 . This 

the story about the dog was invented by Agnes Brown herself. By- 

apparently, a cat or a toad - in this case, decided 

change your look! 

    The Chelmsford Trial of 1566 attracted un- 

usually wide attention of the English. Es County 

sex became famous precisely for its fight against witches, 

which is why it is not surprising that those who followed 

years are full of numerous messages like 

cities. The second major Chelmsford process was 

stood in 1579 - then Elizabeth was hanged 

Francis. Two others died with her: Ellen Smith, 

Whose mother was hanged for witchcraft for five years 

13*                                                 38 7 



back, and Alice Noakes. Another defendant, Margarr 

Stanton, was acquitted. 

    Three years later, another one took place in the same place. 

famous trial - the case of the witches of St. Osis 

By the time search on the body of the accused "devil 

ski marks ", that is, those places where the devil pi, - 

blood, has become a common procedure. Equally^ 

it has become a practice and custom to accept as 

ve evidence of p azan and i mentally handicapped 

children. One of the modern researchers so nnuiei 

about it: “Similar use of so and x evidence, 

in the processes may lead to the idea that in 1582 

year in England there were no rules at all, I touch 

the positions of the witnesses. Easily accepted 

Oral statements were made by the children of the six- and nine-year-olds 

age. Nor was there a critical approach to 

declared iyam neighbor, who said that he heard 

something that, in his opinion, was a criminal 

speeches ... Experts' assessments were accepted by some 

in a roundabout way - for example, the court was sent for 

a phenomenon that said the doctor suspected 

that a certain deed is inherently witchcraft, etc. 

Absolutely everything was taken into account”76. 

    The third major witch trial took place in Chel 

msford in 1589, when one number of 

Dong and nine other people with him. Four of them were 

hanged. As before, this process is characterized 

using baseless children's accusations of ka 

as "evidence", in the presence of devils, "servants 

nicks” and various acts of maleficia. Posts about 

shabash akh or paktakh with the devil we do not meet, n>> 

what is in France and Germany. Investigations in Es 

sex reached its peak in 1645 in the era of active 

witch hunter general Matthew Hop- 

kinsa. 

    In view of the spread of witchcraft at the end of the XVI century 

to a, in 1604, that is, in the second year of the reign of Jacob 

I, strict laws were passed against him. Himself to 

role was an active researcher of the problem of witchcraft 

va and in 1597 he published his work - "Demo- 

nology". Personally, he believed in witches and was strictly persecuted 

shaft them. 

    In a speech delivered in 1591 in Edinburgh, he 

severely reprimanded the court for rejecting the charge 

niya in witchcraft: “For I know that witchcraft, of necessity 

3 88 



spreading wide among us, there is 

the most grievous sin, and I spent three quarters of it 

years, weeding out those who are guilty here. God's and Che- 

the laws of fishing teach us that this sin is the most 

disgusting. And according to the laws of God, death is punishable 

tew. According to human institutions, this is called - 

sya maleficium or veneficium, bad or poisonous 

deed, and is called, respectively, death. 

    That which moved (the people of Assisi) to do so, to ak 

what they did was that they didn't have any 

some evidence other than witchcraft. I know that, by 

civil laws, these obscene persons are not 

can be accepted as witnesses, except 

cases of heresy or lesae m ajestatis. H o though 

in other cases, this cannot be allowed in any way, however 

however, in such dealings with witches, such 

nimo. First, no honest shower can 

know about both things. Second, because they are not 

blame themselves. And thirdly, none of the 

their deeds cannot be seen. 

    Further. Wizards and witches I call those people 

dey who renounce God and wholly betray- 

to the Devil. But if they refused and repented, how 

was done this time, then I do not consider them witches 

and sorcerers, and therefore they are shown and I am the essence of satisfaction 

         77 

teln s ". 

    Statute of James I of 1604 as mandatory 

to ares for crimes committed by a sorceress, pre- 

thought of the gallows. Such punishment was applied 

even if no murder was committed. If any- 

for men or women "will use or 

act in calling and and spells on and and any sins 

evil and evil spirits, or they will consult and 

fight ... or reward any sinful and evil- 

spirit for any purpose or interest; either will 

pull out from the graves of dead men, wives and n and de- 

tei... in order to use them one way or another 

For his sorcery ... if he is killed, wounded, 

harmful, withered by the body of any person ... then to each 

such a criminal or a criminal, their assistants, 

accomplices and advisers will be legally accused of 

any of the above crimes and sentenced to 

death, and suffer the pangs of death, like a criminal 

Or the criminal and, and lose the privilege and benefits 

the priesthood and the church » 7 8 . 



                                                      L8 4 



    And it is interesting, however, that the statute of Jacob I says 

about the idea of the Sabbath and the treaty that originated in Europe 

Devil. Probably English lawyers, scientists and 

Church leaders wanted to establish themselves in the idea that 

witchcraft was more than just a crime 

against a person: it was a crime against 

God. (The statute of 1604 was not repealed until 1736. 

do during the reign of George II). 

    King Jacob believed that a witch should be turned and 

through the test of water, that is, to make her "float 

wat." The accused was thrown into a river or lake: if he, " 

swam out, so she was guilty of a ram; if drowned - 

n evin n a. “The Lord ordained as a supernatural 

a sign for monstrous disrespect, showing 

my witches, make sure that the water refused when 

to receive into your bosom those who rejected holy water in baptism 

niya and stubbornly refused grace »7 9 . 

    And the water test was a very old method of testing. 

dividing a person's guilt or innocence. Similar 

appeal to the intervention of God was already known ( 

baby lone ya mi. "If one person accuses another 

black magic, but at the same time he did not clearly explain his business " 

then the accused will go to the river and plunge into the waters 

If the river overcomes him, then the accuser will rule 

give him property. If the river proves him innocent 

and he will not drown, his accuser will inevitably 

sentenced to death, and the property of the dead 

                                                      80 

part (of the property) of the one who endured and tried and e. 

    However, in spite of its policy pursued 

van iya witches, Jacob I (1603- 1625) gradually began zyxwvutsrqp 

                                                        me 

get involved in your opinion. He saw that often 

The allegations were based on an unconfirmed witness 

children. This was facilitated by Abingdon npt 

cess of 1605, where the accuser was four 

centennial I am An n a Günther; Affair Boys To A Of Leicesters 

ra (John Smith) in 1618, according to whose statement > 

9 people were hanged, as well as a similar fir 

tea that happened to the "Bilson boy", Witt 

Pit Perry two years later. One contemporary writer^ 

                                                           1 

"The frequency of false possession (of the devil) 

changing the mind of King James in ... what he would i 

at first uncertain, and then he decisively rejected in (p 

judgments about the deeds of n and I x witches and devils as simple as that. 

prejudice and delusion and I »8 1 . 



390 



    Indeed, over the past nine years 

only five people were hanged on charges of 

in witchcraft; and this happened at a time when the mass 

owl k azn and in the German city of Bamberg alone 

hundreds of times their number of victims. 

   However, despite the fact that in England already 

several of our skillful Vedovskie processes took place 

owls, including in Lan k ash and re in 1612 and in Chelms- 

Ford, the bloodiest year was yet to come. 





                   Hopkins Wiic h Finder G encmli 









                                        in- tncCrawnei 

                                4- GrL?zz<?llzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfed 

                                             He was greedy 



    Year 1645. For a few years, England turns into i 

the victim of religious e to strivism and civil 

wars, during which once again blossomed luxuriant colors 

volume and witch hunt. Driving her with the force of new drive- 

lei, on whose conscience there are 19 people, would.! 

Matthew Hopkin s, n unsuccessful lawyer from the town 

Mannigtry in Essex. Having failed on a legal 

in the field, Hopkins decided to press capital, special 

cultivating on the fear and prejudice of the local Puritans, 

which they experienced in relation to witchcraft. Not 

wine, but simply not universally respected 

people became victims of religious fear, 

and the madness of the locals, for that was the time of the 

gnostic persecution, no data, perhaps, in Am 

ley since the time of the Tudors. 

    In search of victims, Hopk-in resorted to the most unparalleled 

bottom and vile means. One writer at the same time 

remarked: “Imagine for a minute duck at the poor, old” 

a creature burdened with all the faults and diseases 

his age, foolishly put in the middle 

di rooms. Every neighborhood crowds around her house 

th rabble. Her legs are tied crosswise so that those 

Now the whole weight of the body falls on the buttocks. R ita 

position after a few hours 

the blood almost stops, and it becomes sit 

it hurts just as much as if she were sitting on a piece of wood!! 

mare. But so it withstands all 24 hours, without giving 

she neither eats nor sleeps, and even if it was their favorite 

w and th method of inquiry and I, so what's surprising b 

that people who wanted to save their lives confirmed 

waited for any inventions and, as and e only those came / 

head, and what they, of course, never guess 

       82 

whether s». 

   Samuel Butler wrote of Matthew Hopkins: 

    Isn't he six dozen 

    Hung here for a whole year? 

   Some for not drowning 

   Others - for the fact that day and night 

   We sat, staring at the moon ... - 

   Now they're hanging, they can't be helped. 

    And n y - for "vile" tricks 

   With a loud-mouthed bird: to ap moons, 

    And n dyke and, geese, even pigs 

    I am afflicted with unnatural sadness. 

   So thought this sir ... 8 3 

3zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

 92 



    The "bewitchment" of people and animals was that common 

denominator, under which in England summed up the practice 

literally all witches. In this most often he was accused of 

1645 of his victims by Matthew Hopkin c. Any, even 

indirect reference by the accused to the animal 

small for evidence of a particular imp or 

"servant" sent by the devil. Another write- 

tel, resident vsh and th, however, a little later, adds: “I think 

May that when the search for witches kept the poor without 

food and sleep until they are well understood 

small what he said, then they themselves, trying to avoid 

reap these torments, told him fables about these 

k osh k ah, k otya takh and dogs ah”8 4 . 

    And sometimes specially selected teams of prisons 

The guards kept the accused from sleeping until 

those, having come to a state of complete exhaustion, do not recognize 

fell into everything that was necessary. For example, 

to a certain John u Lowes they "was kept awake for several 

nights in a row and made him run up and down the 

room until he started to stop 

take a breath. After which they gave him a small 

respite and it all started from the beginning. That's how they did 

several days in a row, while he was still able to 

                                          85 

feel what he says or does. 

   Acting in both ways, the inventive gene- 

real witch hunter and his five or six 

his assistants collected dozens of confessions that 

in fact, they turned out to be fake. They began to accept 

mother of the commission and from other towns and villages around 

Chelmsf horde in order to destroy the "witches" before 

end. In general, under the flywheel of this hysterical 

pania hit hundreds of residents of the eastern counties of Ang- 

lii. 

   However, in 1646 Hopkins was faced with 

the first kri ti kami whom he began to persecute with 

the same energy and the same cruelty. People's sub- 

support, on which his company was initially based 

n ia, slowly dried up. In 1646 he returned to 

home in M an n ingtry, where he died of tuberculosis 

one year later. 

   But if the main hunter died, then with him 

popular prejudices have not disappeared. For the next ten 

The Tiletians brought new victims with them. So, for example- 

measures, in 1652 in the town of Maidstone in Kent there was 

hanged 6 people. Nine years later, the 



a well-known case in St. Odmundsbury, which in <- 

renowned jurist Sir Matthew Hale, who later became 

wii chief judge of the kingdom. Remind this process 

some kind of grotesque - it was based on children's 

fantasy, unverified reports. The basics of the law 

testimonial evidence was the most 

frankly trampled on - the judges believed abso 

fiercely to any rumors. 

    In St Edmundsbury the most incriminating screenings 

niya were given by several young children, for 

I vis vsh and mi that they were bewitched. as a doctor for 

Sir 

Thomas Brown. With some hesitation, he stated 

that somehow it is even doubtful that the children were acting 

visibly bewitched: “His opinion was that Thu., 

the devil in such cases affected the bodies of the husband 

rank and woman on natural grounds ... And for he 

I realized that these fainting spells were natural 

mi, that's all, but nothing envelops them at all 

they are only enhanced to an extraordinary degree 

mi of the devil, united with the evil tricks of those 

whom we call witches, at whose appearance he and de 

                     86 

lal these abominations. 

    Many people who knew nothing about witchcraft 

suffered as a result of the accusations of these hysterics and 

Saint Edmundsbury. These kids weren't bewitched at all 

rather, they were prone to epileptic seizures 

to am. Among them were seven-year-old Deborah and de 

I am Elizabeth Pacey and I live in this town. 

    “Pripadk and they differed. And suddenly suddenly 

Nala twitch one part of the body, sometimes the other. Sometimes 

the whole body became so sensitive that it 

it was simply impossible to reach them. At other times 

they should have been brought to their senses and removed from eating1 

                                                          1 

sh an and i to look at them and not listen, yes 

at least a day or two. They were in the same situation. 

deprived of the opportunity to speak for eight days 

and then everything continued. 

    Another time they fainted, but then, in zyxwvutsr 

                                                          •• 

returning to the speech, they began to cough terribly, 

sputum, to overk at the same time nails or two-foam 

high pins with a wide hat. Such nails number-' 

about forty or more, as well as pins, p o i lt • 

in court, accompanied by a shown witness, attached \ r 

existing at that moment. In general, at the end of the pripal 

K) 4 



they were taken for pins and nails. On a day like this 

seizures were repeated four or five times » 8 7 . 

   The processes at Seyat Edmundsbury were the last 

being mi in a series of large anti-Vedic processes, 

held in England. P after recovery from moisture 

sti in 1660 Charles II to azn and almost ceased. 

The uncertainty of the early years of the Puritan era and the civil 

Danish war was replaced by tolerance and social 

stability. The last victim of the accusation of 

Alice, an Exeter resident, fell into dominion in 1684. 

M olland, although the processes continued and subsequently 

wii. In 1712, Jane Wenham became the last human 

century, who was accused of witchcraft, but she 

was justified. And in 1736 Parliament repealed the act 

1604, according to which the hunt for 

witches. 

   John Wagstaff, graduate of Oxford, extremely 

reacted warmly to the very fact of mass executions 

"witches", which very often met in English 

lian life, and in other countries as well. In the middle 

XVII century, and he wrote the following: “I cannot live without horror 

and tremble to remember the huge number of people brought 

we have been sacrificed in many countries and in many times 

in the name of this chilling judgment. Thousands, yes 

probably tens of thousands were killed, and many 

of them died not a simple death, but a terrifying one, 

sophisticated. And at the same time, how much is left 

and those who have walked the same path, but whom we already 

don't remember?”8 8 

   If Wagstaff was frightened by the list of victims of the 

lyan justice, then he would be even more frightened by 

recitation of those killed in Scotland. Between 1573 and 

1722 north of the English border for witchcraft 

More than 4,000 men, women and children were executed. 

“And in one country, the witch cult did not flourish with such 

with some terrifying power, in no country is this superstition 

did not exist for so long, and in no country 

the investigations were not tougher, and the fires blazed brighter, 

than in Scotland. Lonely hills and running 

plains, echoing hollows and distant 

lots were considered suitable hiding places for secrets 

forces that in the popular mind always personify 

merged with the Devil, being the focus of the forces of death, 

ruins and hellish sins”8 9 . 

                                                     39 5 



    Another writer said this: “By barbarism, pro- 

revealed during the witch hunt, Scotland can 

can only yield to German II. Presbyterian 

the clergy acted like ordinary inquisitors 

frames, and church meetings often participated in the courts 

along with lay assessors and judges. Sh otlan- 

children's laws were much tougher in this matter in 

regarding the accused. It's good that these devil- 

torture and involuntarily limited to the fact that in the region 

hundreds of torture instruments Scotland lagged behind others 

European countries. Any doubts that arise 

with regard to witchcraft, were suppressed immediately 

n o »9 0 . 

    The persecution in Scotland began with Vedov's pro- 

cess in North Berwick in 1590. 

hysteria in Scotland has reached its peak thanks to 

increased support for her by James VI (later Eng- 

Lean king James I). Unlike England here 

the wildest tortures were permitted. Defendants for 

were often condemned for their "general reputation" because 

we are even without recognition from the latter; convict- 

the money was not hung, but burned at the stake (probably 

in order to prevent the rebirth of the body). 

    In their worst cases, the cruelty was simply 

amazing. Dr. Fian, who was considered "famous" 

sorcerer" and head of the Norse-Berwick witches, was 

burnt at Edinburgh in January 1591. Before that he 

endured the most severe torture: “Nails on all of his 

fingers were split and pulled out with a tool, 

called in Scotland "Turk"; in England we 

we call them u and p ts ami; under the nails they drove him two 

needles, to the very hat. Despite these tortures, the documents 

the tor did not confess to anything, and in response to his confession, these tortures 

no effect at all. 

    He was then duly sentenced to torture 

ke in shoes mak ah, in which he remained for a long time, 

for which he withstood many blows, so that his legs 

it was completely smashed and squeezed so 

as much as possible, so that the bones and meat were 

so ground that the blood and bone marrow are poly- 

with extraordinary force, whereby its members became 

completely disabled." 

    Like everywhere else, in Scotland, informants in every possible way 

encouraged to denounce those they 

consider themselves a sorcerer. “A hollow piece of wood or sun- 

396 



duk is placed in the church and there anyone can enter it 

put a piece of paper in which you can write 

the witch's name, place, time, event, and so on. 

And this chest, locked with three locks, every Friday 

The 10th day opens with three incoming visitors or 

officials appointed for this purpose, who have 

There are three different keys among them. Thus, the name of the obvi- 

the client remained unknown, so he was not subject to 

censured and accused of wanting to harm 

                                         92 

or destroy your poor neighbor." 

    Many Scottish towns and villages are preserved 

whether the terrible records of the processes that took place in these 

places. Some of them contain descriptions of 

expenses for the trial and execution of the sentence, 

ie kaz n. Dan's first report comes from Kirk Aldi. 

1636 9 3 : 

For 10 carts of coal (for that) 

to burn them                           5 stamps 

                                        or 3 pounds, 

                                        6 sh and l., 8 pence. 

For 1 barrel of resin                       14 sh and l., 

For a rope (for hanging)               6 sh and l. 

Hemp loops                         3 lbs., 10 sh and l. 

For their preparation                         8 sh and l. 



  Further: 

F in mautu, landowner ik y, 

for fulfillment 

legal obligations                   6 sh and l. 

I will execute for the labors                         8 pounds, 14 sh and l. 

And for expenses                             16 sh and l., 4 pence 



   This attitude towards witchcraft was preserved in the III 

Landia until the 18th century. In 1704, for example, in 

during the Pitten Ween Process on the East Coast 

Scotland, two more witches were convicted and subjected to 

bent painfully to azn and. This act of power included 

lie with complacency. In June 1727 Janet Horne of 

Dorneha was burned for being used as a 

horse for their flights to Sabbath and their own 

new daughter. And in 1773, the Association of Presbyters of the 

little confirmed their views on witchcraft - this 

was a kind of tribute to a relic, rooted 

here two hundred years ago. 



                    Chapter Seven 

         VEDOVSK PROCESS IN SALEM 



   Perhaps not a single “Vedovskoye” case has attracted 

myself so much vn and mans and I, to how the process took place in 

Salem in New England. This was in 1692. One 

to this event, which has already taken place on the American 

earth, it became known not only thanks to the huge 

the number of people found guilty (Salem bp 

small community), but mainly for what 

it all happened quite late, at the very end 

XVII century. In England, for example, from 1684 there would be no 

not a single person was executed for witchcraft. P ove 

In 1656, Anne Hibbins was accused of 

witchcraft just because it turned out to be a little mind 

her neighbors. She, as the judge explained, unfortunately 

Stu guessed that two of her pursuers, whom 

she saw them talking in the street talking about 

her. It cost her her life despite all her attempts. 

judges to reject this decision. In other words 

Anna Hibbins fell victim to the usual village 

gossip. 

   As elsewhere, in New England, prosecutors usually 

suffered from hysteria. Long before Salemscope started 

cases in judicial practice, there were people suffering 

hysterical seizures. As an example 

one can cite the case of Anna Cole, a resident of 

Hartford, Connex tik ut, which occurred in 1662> 

“She often had wrong body movements, 

which even threatened her health, and horrified those 

who saw her at that moment. And very often she made 

great anxiety in public ceremonies by 

worshiping the Lord with two other women 

mi, who also suffered from strange fits. and L 

a day of prayer, according to the descriptions of those present, by this; 1 

restless persons were created so and unbelievable 

hardships and turmoil that God-fearing people 

fainted at the sight of all this. Therefore not 

by chance that everyone around believed that Anna Kou. 

was bewitched or possessed by the devil. In puri 

Tang society, like America was in the 17th century, in 

the existence of the devil was believed as fervently as i' 

into the existence of God. 



    Similar stories that happened so often during the 

witch processes, have long been the subject of many 

numerous disputes. Was it just religious 

madness, or everything that happened is material for me- 

dikov? One modern researcher described the use of 

teriyu as a process that begins "with pain or strange 

sensations in one place or another of the body ... She often 

starts in the lower part of the abdomen and slowly rises 

n imatsya, extending to other organs s. So, 

for example, it often goes to the epigastric region, in 

chest, throat. That is, it acquires quite an interest - 

nye forms, which was accepted for a long time 

time for the characteristic features of hysteria. Patient at 

it feels like something big, something like a ball- 

to a, rises to his throat and strangles him » 9 4 . 

    This medical description of hysteria is very similar to 

modern conclusions of doctors made in similar 

same situation x. And here is another case of hysteria, described- 



n y Boston priest K otton Mazero - . 

(1662-1728) in the case of the children of Goodwin in 1688\ 

“And sometimes they are deaf, sometimes they are mute, blind, and sometimes 

together. For some, the tongue sticks to the larynx, for others 

gih - crawls out to the chin to an extraordinary length 

Their mouths are so open that sometimes their jaws come out 

from their bundles, but they can slam shut with such force 

like a spring lock. 

   The same thing happens with their shoulders, elbows 

joints, to the hands and other members of the body. By 

swarm they lie, numb, and they are carried the way they do 

with connected ones, and their bodies can be extended to 

so much that it becomes scary, because at any moment 

to the skin they can burst. They may pitifully 

talk about the fact that their body is allegedly cut into pieces or 

that they are beaten with such force that there is no way 

to endure all this.” 

   One modern researcher wrote about Sala like this 

me 1692: “Now we have become obvious reasons 

of everything that happened. In Salem Village hysteria early 

was carried out with occult experiments. And further hysterics 

hallucinations, the occurrence of these patients 

dey, are confirmed by numerous and very 

concrete evidence of concrete acts of witchcraft 

property, as well as another kind of recognition by us, in large 

                                  95 

in its own right, it is also steric. 

   But in those days such explanations would not have been.'- . 

known to the inhabitants of New England. And frankly and h e s 

n th man Totton Mather believed that the witches were barely 

blows to hunt with all determination, because he: 

are the offspring of the devil: “These devils, with the help of 

supernatural deeds and a terrible sentence! 

heaven prevailed bodily over many people in C\ 

Leme and nearby places; and houses of the poor 

whether to be filled with terrible weeping and groaning tormented 

evil demons. At the heart of this unusual 

that lies, probably, disgusting sorcery. MH OI 

completely dissimilar people were of 

guilty, they were condemned and punished only on the basis of 

words hurt them." Perhaps K Otton Mather was e<< 

my influential and active witch hunter.' 

in the area of the settlements of the colonists, surrounding them Massach\ 

Setsky hall in. 

   They said about Salem like this: “1692 was, probably, 

one of the most hectic for New England. R ' 

400 



there was a time of political instability, the role of Mather 

in the judiciary grew, and he sought to 

purge the colonial government. F ran- 

the tsuzes were fighting, they went on the warpath 

so do n dei ts. Taxes increased terribly (in 1691. 

the colonial government decided to collect from the settlers 

tsev 1346 pounds), a severe winter passed, trading 

Yes, they were attacked by m pirates, raged 

smallpox. On top of that, the existing tension 

intensified due to the growing discontent 

owners of land and border areas. For husband- 

officials and women brought up in a restrictive gospel 

Gelish spirit, these anxieties and failures of 1692 were 

                                    96 

unquestionably caused by Dya volo m » . 

    One of his contemporaries, John Hale, put it this way 

common fears, kings and e among the inhabitants of Salem. These 

the witches, he wrote, “resolved to destroy Salem Village 

and, starting with the house of the priest and destroying the church of the State 

go, establish the kingdom of Satan. Also pointing out 

moose that Massachusetts was not a republic or a monarch 

chia, but a theocratic society. Witchcraft - for- 

speaking against God - it was, therefore, the state 

vein and change oh. It was believed that it threatened 

foundations of this religious society, which is 

Is it the inhabitants of Salem: they relate to their own religion 

lis very seriously. 

    In such circumstances, the settlers naturally 

were terribly frightened when they found out that witchcraft was 

nestled in the house of their priest, Reverend Se- 

muel parris. One young woman together with 

his daughter Elizabeth, nine years old, and nephews Nitzei 

Abigail Williams, age 11, usually spent 

evenings with his slave Tituba. P last story- 

gave them terrible, superstitious tales and West Indies 

islands, thus igniting their imagination. 

Probably, these girls were suffering at that moment 

radka or even hysteria, due to which their puri- 

tan base and was attacked by an invisible 

enemy. Be that as it may, for the people of Salem then 

there was only one explanation: witchcraft. These 

girls raised in a devout environment turned out to be 

no doubt bewitched. 

    Elizabeth and Abigail terribly frightened this "circa- 

the “enlightenment” of their parents, becoming so delighted with them 

zom to the center of universal vn and man and i. It's not surprising that 

                                                      4 0 1 

14- 3400 



they were joined by other impressionable d * 

vochki, some of which were even older in * 

growth. Among those involved in this, as it was called 

"game" turned out to be Elizabeth Parris (age 12), Abigei 

Williams, Ann P a tn am (age 12), Elizabeth Hubbard (age 1 

years old), Mary Walcott (16 years old), Elizabeth Proctor (2<> 

years old), Mary Lewis (19 years old), Susan Sheldon (18 years old) 

Elizabeth Booth (18 years old) and many others. 

     But if they were bewitched, then who was p 

is it to blame? In response to the first questions, the girls would 

smartly chose their unlucky victims, perhaps 

but, for fear of public repentance, or purely zyxwvutsrq 

                                                              etc 

childish persistence. And the game began and he should have 

be brought to his terrible to he tsa. One by one 

goy girls gave pokazan and I. elizabeth booth, n apri 

Mer, accused her neighbor John a Proctor: “For now 

sworn statement Elizabeth Booth, aged 18, c< 

toraya testified and said that since ei 

suffering was caused by her neighbor John Prs 

who was the eldest, she was frightened even by his appearance at 

ghost a. She also saw how John Proctor Sr. * 

or his ghost painfully pursued and oppressed 

Mary Walcott, Mercy Lewis and Anna Patnam Jr. 

shui, shchi and paya, pulling and even suffocating and x. 

     According to such evidence, John Proctor was 

found guilty of witchcraft and hanged 

     Similarly, Mary Walcott accused of witchcraft 

Abigail Faulkner: "P ok azan and her Mary Wolcott, kotor.1 

testified and said the following: “About 9 ai 

the thick of 1692 influenced me, the reasons for the willows of suffering, 

n and i , some woman who told me that • 

name is Abigail Falkn er. Eleventh of August 

the day of the interrogation Abigail Faulkn er, she is even more terrible 

influenced me in this way during this ( 

procedures. I saw how Abigail Faulkner or 

ghost, brutally haunted and tormented by Sarah Felpg 

Anna P atn eat. And I really believe with all my heart that Ab 

Gail Faulkner is a witch and that she often works > 

at me and indicated these persons with the help of witchcraft. 

     They said that "the girls who committed the crime 

cannot claim for themselves any mitigation and 

terrible guilt. After all, never, even during the ex < 

to uts and and, they did not show the slightest remorse. 

conscience or remorse, except perhaps with 

Churchill and Mary Warren. They knew exactly what oi 

402 



did. And their actions can be called direct trampling 

I'm right, they drove people to death just like that, 

for fun. March 28, 1692 one of the girls 

zaya vila, as in the inn of Yngersoll, Miss Pro- 

The doctor was engaged in bewitching her. In my eyes 

reddish, Miss Yingersall "told that girl that she 

lied because there was nothing there. Then this girl 

zaya vila that she did all this for fun: 

"They must have some fun." 

    In this truly crazy time, people believed 

practically and in everything. If sorcery was the cause 

change in the behavior of young people, then its next 

caused immediate destruction—regardless of who 

was involved in it. The problem was that in 

the time of the processes that took place at the end of 1692, about 

the accusers were so afraid to point to the “guilty” side, 

that at the same time the most elementary conditions were ignored 

conditions accepted for witness testimony. Suma- 

rabble claims and I these girls were taken for granted 

without any additional confirmation and 

verok. 

    But even worse was that if the victim could 

to give her alibi, then her opponents would say, 

that in front of the girls I appeared the ghost of this "sorcerer" 

and bewitched them. It may seem extraordinary 

strange that at that time the judges believed them so "show- 

zan and I m about ghosts ah. However, this motive is constantly 

appears in the Salem case - a man was condemned yes- 

but for what he did not, but his ghost. 

    By Otton Mather believed in ghosts, but even he did not 

small that their evidence can be taken into account during 

judicial investigation: “If there are no other 

evidence against a person, as soon as what is on 

he is affected by a ghost, then this evidence is under- 

enough to convict this person for 

witchcraft. I think no one doubts that the devil 

have the strength with which they are able 

take on any form they wish. And at 

I don't have an absolute promise given by God that 

they didn't move into me. All Protestant Authors 

believe that the Devil can in this way lead into 

wandering and innocent ... ". But if K Otto Mather and 

confronted the evidence of ghosts, then most 

people were still too willing to believe in them, 



                                                        4 < М 

• 4* 



more if, as a result of the investigation, it determined 

guilt and a specific sentence was pronounced. 

   Processes in Salem have much in common with analogies 

witchcraft processes in Europe and in England. 

So, for example, the legend of the flights of witches, which roamed 

from one process to another, appeared in Salem in 

Anna Foster case: “She and Martha K errier traveled zyxwvutsrq 

                                                      pi 

brooms and special poles when they gathered for Shabai; 

in Salem Village 

at the moment when they flew over the tops 

trees and they fell. But she immediately threw her arms around 

around the neck of Carrier, and so they got to the village. Ilpif 

She hurt her leg a little." 

    Another account spoke of "satellites" 

sorcery, acts of maleficium or petty wickedness, 

misdeeds such as killing pigs, possessing the devil 

scrap. One girl even stated that she saw ka*- 

the accused wrote her name in "To the Devil's Neighbor", but 

The bodies of the Salem magistrate could not believe it. 

    Inkriz Mather (1639-1723) as president of the Gar 

varda, issued the following warning: “The beam 

She, if a dozen suspected witches escape, 

rather than one honest man perish ... Better be> 

the guilty one is released, rather than he will be unproven1 

but condemned. I'd rather call the witch an honest woman 

than I condemn an honest woman, having christened her 

witch." However, his advice was hardly heeded. 

anyway, he believed in witchcraft just as 

and his contemporaries. 

    The process continued. P ok azan and ya girls were 

I accept you, believed in ghosts, religious fear 

Puritan communities did not disappear. Dozens of people would 

whether thrown into jail. Prisoners in Salem kept 

sting in rather harsh conditions: “In this process ^ 

particularly impressive is that the defendants had to 

pay for their stay in prison, even if their i* 

justified! The cancellation of the sentence was followed by one 

the one for liberation is another. Relatives executed 

they paid money to the executioner. Many even after liberation 

denia remained in prison because their property 

was already sold in order to deliver funds' 

and food for their families. Sarah Dustin was cussed 

in January 1693, however, without having anyone, ct: 1 

could pay for her, she died in prison 

Margaret Jacobs was also acquitted, but 



404 



her parents' property was confiscated and she 

kept in prison until some noble 

neznakomets (Mr. Gammon) did not hear about her 

lying down and drank it. William Buckley spent his 

last money to pay 10 pounds for then- 

go to free his wife and children.” 

    Some of the Salem "witches" are very much 

acted on those gathered during the e k zek utsi and: “They 

spoke of their innocence as if in the presence of 

almighty God, before whom they will soon appear. 

They wished and declared their will that their blood 

will be the last blood shed for this reason 

us. With extraordinary excitement they implored Mr. 

To Otto Mather to pray with us. They prayed to the Lord 

yea, that he might find the witches among them. They say- 

whether, without casting a shadow on the court and judges, that they are 

they knew they were guilty and were convicted. 

    They earnestly asked to forgive them all their sins for the sake of 

the precious blood of our dear Isk upitel. They 

looked very honest, sincere with them, feeling 

sh and mi all the circumstances of their case, especially Proctor and 

Willard, whose behavior, starting with a prison cell 

and to he tea the gallows, it was very touching and softened 

heart of many who were present ... " 

    The Reverend George B. Arrows was also innocent: 

“Together with all the others, Mr. Burrows was checked 

zen through the streets of Salem. Climbing the stairs, he 

carried a speech clarifying his innocence, with so much 

with a feminine and serious expression that she admires 

tila of all those present. His prayer (which he 

concluded with a repeated appeal to God) was 

so well composed and at the same time filled with such 

ardor of spirit, which influenced many, causing 

them tears. To some, it even seemed that the audience could 

Gut interfere with azn and ". August 19, 1692 B Arrows 

was hanged. 

    Despite such scenes, the anti-Wedding 

the buildings in Salem seemed indestructible. During 

to azn and Samuel Wardwell on September 22, 1692 "at that 

while he told people about his innocence, 

the executioner smoked a pipe, and the smoke rushed into 

face, so that he could not continue his speech. Then 

the accusers said that it was the Devil preventing him from speaking 

rip". 

                                                    405 



    However, the bell ringing over Salem, 

selkom, numbering about a hundred houses, sailed 

constantly. “During this hysteria, 

almost 150 people. Searches in court records 

millets will undoubtedly add a few more people to 

this list. And for lack of time in 1692 

only 31 people were investigated, in addition to 

Sarah Churchill and Mary Warren, who quickly disowned 

foxes. All these people were heard and sentenced to 

of death. Six of them were men. Nineteen 

man hanged. And of the twelve remaining two (Sarah 

Osborne and Anna Foster) died in prison, one (Gilles 

Corey) committed suicide, alone (Tituba) 

remained in prison. For Two (Abigail Faulkner and 

Elizabeth Proctor) the execution was delayed on the pretext 

pregnancy. They were given enough time, so 

they even managed to get a reprieve. One man 

(Mary Brown) escaped from prison after being sentenced 

sentence, five confessed, which they deserved 

forgiveness". 

    Historian George Lincoln Burr wrote that "Mr. 

ka, which covered the village of Salem in New England, became 

the last bright flash of that terrible lightning, which 

which for such a long period of time stained ev • 

European night in the bloodiest shades. Another 

the largest researcher who studied the Salem case. 

said this: "A mistake can very rarely be refuted 

chickpeas with just one mind. She is second only to logic. 

events. But witchcraft motives were not eradicated from 

minds of people, neither by the power of science, nor by the power of intellect 

that. The eyes of the world saw only delusions, mistakes and 

the horrors of life as they are 

whether in it, and in this lay their strength and their impotence 

This is the essence of the Salem case, which has become 

one of the most notable events in world history. 





                      EPILOGUE 



   The Greatest Witch Hunt in Human History 

swept Western Europe and continued zyxwvutsrq 

                                                   with 

1450 to 1750, became one of the strangest 

leniya in the history of the West. It is already remarkable 

only because of the huge number of victims, and there were <- 

about a hundred thousand, but also because the beginning of his arrival 

406 



dates back to the early years of the European Renaissance. In XV 

century in Europe, cities grew and flourished, freeing themselves 

from the old, fettering norms of feudalism. Scientists in- 

crossed the ancient sciences and - physics, chemistry, mathematics 

ku and astronomy, drew their inspiration from the world of an- 

ity and writings of Arab scholars. Printing 

published books and pamphlets, affecting all aspects 

we live life - philosophy, rhetoric, grammar, theo- 

logy, mathematics and other sciences, agronomy, archi- 

texture, etc. And yet, it is precisely the most imaginative 

smart and rational people everywhere 

expressed their support and participation to hunters for 

witches. Among them were the French philosopher 

Jean Baudin, famous bishops and lawyers, kings, 

like James I. However, the modern reader must 

remember that such "purges" were not characteristic of 

only medieval Europe. The twentieth century has become 

persecution of the Jews, six million of whom 

died during the second world war, constant 

oppression of national minorities, political 

of the horror of makartism that gripped the United 

States, which is often referred to as “hunting for 

witches." Human behavior is not a rational thing 

no matter how much people want to believe it. Unfortunately- 

in their lives, and they are not guided by the principle 

pami humanity and tolerance, as it could be. 





                        NOTES 



    All works presented in this book are in Russian 

translated for the first time, except for the "Synagogue of Satan" by St.P Shibyshevsky 

and "Treatise on succubus and incubus" L.-M. Sinistrari. At work 

over the texts, the translators tried to preserve their style as much as possible 

and spirit, sometimes, maybe even to the detriment of literary quality 

translation. Notes to the essay by St. P. Shibyshevsky were compiled 

Yu O Suvorova, to the "States and Empires of the Sun" by S. Cyrano de 

Bergerac and N.V. Simonova, to all other works - 

M A Timofeev. 







                      And oann Trittemius 

         A TRACT ABOUT EVIL PEOPLE AND WIZARDS 



    The author of this treatise, an outstanding German historian, theologian, 

an expert in the occult sciences was born on February 1 (12), 1462, not far 

from Trier in the town of Tretheim, from where he got his nickname. 

His father was a well-known vintner in oKpyie and subsequently received 

noble title. His mother, Elizabeth de Longwy, was descended from 

noblewoman, which, by the way, helped to a large extent 

her husband to join the nobility in about a year 

after the birth of Ioanna, her father died, and after another seven years, the young 

the widow remarried The fate of the boy was traditionally 

onno for such situations - his stepfather did not love him, for his upbringing 

and the education of a teenager is not spedich, but counting, reading and writing in 

Latin And John learned only thanks to the participation and help of a neighbor, 

whose name has not been preserved in the annals of history Like many of his 

peers, he ears out of home, stayed for some time in Trier and 

Heidechberg, but then again returned to his homeland 

    In January 1482, an inquisitive young man set off again in 

path The route was determined by him, apparently, in advance - III Panheim 

monastery, behind the walls of which he wants! hide from the vain and not 

very kind to him of the world and do science February 2, 1482 

he finally parted with social life, and on November 21 the same 

of the year accepted initiation Eight months later, the abbot 

monastery unexpectedly gives up his place and the monks 

take their head And oanna He went the 22nd south 





       R.Ambelain. The magic crystal or the magic of Jehan Tritheme 

P aris, 1962, p 7. 

    The same, p.   8. 



                                                               404 



    Having become an abbot, And oann Trittemius turned all his strength to 

improvement of the position of the monastery, he followed the life of the monks, 

condition of the monastery buildings, observance of the rules of mona 

Styr hostel During the years of his tenure in this post 

The number of manuscripts in the library increased from 48 to 2000 Remaining 

time he devoted to scientific and theological studies - then 

later he created his famous works on the history of Hermas 

nii, “The Book of Church Writers” (a kind of biobibliography 

encyclopedia) and many other historical and theological 

treatises, as well as essays on the occult sciences 

as a result of political intrigues, John was forced to leave my 

hardened and finally settled in the abbey of Jacob in Würzburg, 

which he headed for ten years from 1506 to 

his very death, which occurred on December 27, 1516. His pen 

belong to about 50 works, most of which were published 

forged and received universal recognition only in the second half 

16th century 

    Suggested Three Answers to Emperor Maximilian's Questions 

were printed in 1581 in the book F lagellum haereticorum 

of the fascinators, by FN Icolao Jaquerio F rancofurti ad Moen, 

pp 452 494 as an application and considered as a single piece 

a demonological treatise entitled Ioannis Tritemn, abbatis 

of St. James at Herbipolis, formerly of Spanheim, Tractatus 

concerning the reprobate and evildoers (questions 3, to Maximil I Imp Rom) 

In addition, they were published in "To the Book of Eight Questions", the text of which 

which does not differ from the said edition of Ioannis Trithemn Liber 

eight questions Oppenhem, 1515, M oguntiae, 1601 Н астоящий пе 

translation made according to the edition of 1581 









      In the edition of 1515 and 1601 these three questions take the positions 

       fifth to seventh 

  p 



      <arbitrator» — лат 

  about 

      t is cruelties 

      te bta1 due to the activity of demons 

      A more detailed description of the demons will be presented below, in 

       second question 

      In contrast to the concept of J. Gifford (see below), according to 

       the other witch is only an instrument in the hands of the devil and nothing! 

       can’t do it on his own, the position of And oanna Trittemia 

       this issue is somewhat different, although less well-established 

       yes, he talks about the equality of sorcerers to demons, sometimes about their under 

       decency, etc. 

      Ibid, note I 



7 

    Lk 9 1, see also Mt 10 1, Mark       3 13, 6 7 

    Apparently, the author gives biblical quotations from memory, and 

     to, as a rule, in a distorted or incomplete form In favor of 

     this is also indicated by the fact that he never makes exact references to 

     text In this case, perhaps, Luke 10 19 is meant 

     “I give you power to tread on snakes and scorpions, and on all the strength 

     the enemy, and no one will hurt you" (hereinafter the biblical 

     quotations, except where noted, are in sino 

     distant translation) 

 " And cx 22 17 "Do not leave the fortune tellers alive" 

• The term "necromancy" itself is of Greek origin and means 

     enjoys calling the dead and talking to them about the future 

1 1 

     And oan 15 5 

12 Hereinafter, the author constantly pursues one of the fundamental 

     of the demonology of the sixteenth century that all punishments, 

     that fell as a result of the intrigues of the devil on a person, there are 

     the result of divine decision and permission about the role of god 

     by permission, see Mt 10:29 “a bird shall not fall to the ground 

     without the will of your Father" 

     The subtlety (subtihtas) of the nature of demons probably depends on 

     that in the past many of them were angels 

   * It is characteristic that in this work, written at the beginning of the XVI 

     century, it is already said about the meetings (shabash ah ') of sorcerers, the presence 

     pre-juvenile, devilish signs and marks 

      In 16th-century popular demonology, a witch's wrath would be counted 

     lurk almost the main reason that pushed her to evil 

     deed 

      «animus» - lat 

11 

     "butter" - lat 

1 ft 

      i.e. demons 

      A similar interpretation of the peculiar freedom of sorcerers and insubordinate 

      innocence to their demons is rare. It is characteristic that in 

      end of the treatise And oann even writes about kochduns who defend 

      get rid of demons with the help of the church 

      The author thus recognizes the independence of witches in grandfather 

      their commission of a witchcraft act and their equality in this with de 

      monami 

    ^ "steps" - la^ 

    * Compare the gradation of demons with L M Sinistrari and F M Guazzo (according to 

      essay R Charter) 

      There is some deviation from the views of the authors here. 

      "Hammer of the Witches" by Ya Sh prenger and G I nstitoris, who considered you 

      new to this directly witches 

      We are talking about the first biography of the saint, "The Life of St. Anthony", 

      written by Athanasius of Alexandria (293-35373), faith 

      obviously, in 356 357 years The author is a little inaccurate, these words are not spoken 

      Athanasius, but his hero, ev Anthony "A great multitude of them in 



      the air around us" (24). C it. by: Creations of St. Aphas- 

      nasia of Alexandria. Sergiev Posad, part 3 . 1903, p. 197. 

  ^ 5 Ambrose of Milan (333-397), statesman and church 

      foreman, father of the church. Born in the family of the prefect of Gaul 

      Became Bishop of Milan in 374. vehemently opposed 

      paganism and heresies. The author of the treatises "On the positions of ministers" 

      lei”, “On the sacraments”, “On childishness” and many others. 

26 "telum" — p. 

^ And gnatius the God-bearer, ep. Antioch about 69-110, 

      martyred during the reign of Trajan in 110. IN 

      Russian translation of his Epistle to the inhabitants of Ephesus, published 

      nom in 1862, this phrase sounds like this: "There is nothing better 

      peace, for it destroys all warfare between heavenly and earthly 

      spirit". Do it. by: P isania men of the apostles. M. 1862. p. 382. 

^° Ioann Chrysostom (347-407) does not have a work with such 

      name. Trittemius quotes the last of the "Three words to Sta- 

      Giria to the Ascetic Possessed by a Demon”, called “On 

      despondency” (and not the third book of the treatise). Quote Translation 

      given according to the edition: Creations of John Chrysostom, vol. 1. to n. 1. 

      SPb. 1898, p. 243. 

^ The author uses the term "incubones", which in Latin 

      ke has three meanings: a) lying on treasures, i.e. the keeper 

      treasures (from Petronius); b) a nightmare, an incubus (in Tertulli- 

      ana); c) incubus, the devil in the form of a man (in medieval de- 

      monologues). In this case, we use the first value. 

      In general, in the description of underground demons, a strong influence is noticeable 

      understanding of Germanic mythology and folklore with their dwarfs, trolls 

      lyami, etc. 

"" An inaccurate quote from Tov. 3.2. 

"^ And ov. 34.10: "There can be no unrighteousness with God or with the Almighty 

      injustice” (translated by M.I.Rizhsky). 

 zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDC 

whop 

° ^ "devil, father of lies", And oan. 8.44. 

""* Probably, the author means the plot from Acts, 3-4 about healing 

     Peter the lame and his speech before the Sanhedrin. 

    Acts. 14.22: “We shall be afflicted by many tribulations to enter the Kingdom 

     God", 

    P rem. Sol. 3.12: "For whom the Lord loves, he chastens and 

     favors him as a father does his son." 







         INTERROGATION AND RECOGNITION OF FAMOUS WITCHES 

                     AT CHELMSFORD 



    This pamphlet is the first published record of the mother 

als of the trial at Chelmsford in 1566. He left immediately after 

its completion in three issues - two appeared on August 13 and 

the last on August 23 of the same year. Translation made according to the edition 



412 



Witchcraft. Ed. by B.Rosen. London, 1969 (Stratford- upon- Avon library. 

6), pp. 72—82. 









    1 The original reads "whom Satan infected with the spirit of Belial." 

       Belial is one of the fallen angels, see 2 Cor. 6.15. 

   * Dogs of this breed appeared in England around the middle of the 16th 

       centuries and are still very rare. 

   ° English demonology and witch processes are characterized by 

       a certain set of desires of candidates for sorcerers - they want 

       they want to strengthen their financial situation, which is often expressed 

       complained in a request to the devil to increase the number of livestock. 

   "* Based on the materials of the Chelmsford trial of 1579, it turns out that 

       that these women were sisters. 

   "Dysentery. 

      An obvious contradiction in the materials and / or in the testimony of pro- 

       cessa, since Agnes had to pray to Satan, and not to the State 

       under God. 

    ' The standard request of Satan, who wanted to completely take over the su- 

       community of people associated with it. 

      In the first publication of the pamphlet, there is an illustration depicting 

       this dog with horns, a collar and a chain with a key. Self iso- 

       the fighting is very rough, so her face is more like 

       a rabbit, not a monkey, as the text says. 

   ^ Probably, in this case, everything was limited only to verbal 

       oath. 

 10 years* 

- 1" Most likely, this is a typo of the original. 

 And See below in "Dialogue" by J. Gifford a similar plot. 

  ^ So we found it possible to translate the expression "by public 

       auth ority". B arbara Rosen explains Latin by A. Waterhouse with 

       commitment to tradition. 







       ABOUT THE MOST EVIL ACT OF A WRONG WITCH 



    This pamphlet, written in 1592 and widely 

walking in England is the most implausible of all 

Glian demonological literature. No entries that 

could document at least some facts reported 

nye R.Bertom, has not been preserved. According to Barbara Rosen, its author 

was based on rumors, as a result of which this essay became 

the clearest illustration of the mood that reigned in the English 

provincial and not very educated society of the late XVI 

century. The translation is made according to the edition: Witchcraft. Ed. by B. Rosen. London. 

1969 (Stratford- upon- Avon library. 6), pp. 204—209. 



                                                                   413 



  1 This poem is used by R. Hart as an epigraph; 

     to his essay on witchcraft (see below). 

  ^ Synodal translation. 

  "All these images are scattered in large numbers throughout the Old Music zyxwvuts and 

     New Testament: thus, the image of a lion is used in 1 Pet. 5.8 

     dragon - in Rev. 12 etc. 

  * Most likely, the author means Catholic preachers. 

  *> This essay, like a number of other pamphlets, is divided into 

     two parts - the first, introduction, is purely theological, general 

     innovatory character, although the dogma is served on an affordable May 

      owl reader level, and the second tells directly 

      about the events themselves. 

  ^ Demons - assistant witches usually appeared in the form of a toad 

      hare, weasel, black dog, cat, ferret. See Chelm's materials 

      the Sford process (above) and R. Hart's essay (below). 

  ^ Limbo (from lat. limbus) - in Catholic teaching, the place where 

      there are souls of unbaptized children and adolescents who are not 

      have committed any sin. However, due to the absence of 

      they are deprived of the opportunity to see God. Here is 

      used as an allegory. 

  ^ The country of the Cimmerians - here we mean the area inhabited * 1 

      mythical people, located in the far west in the country 

      not eternal darkness (in Homer). 

  9 Interestingly, the author does not show how Richard;, 

      managed to return home. 

• ^ In our opinion, these "adventures" were simply invented by Rea 

     chard Burt to justify his absence: therefore, neither 

     what real "witchy" element in this work is not 

     is present. 









                       J. Gifford 

             DIALOGUE ABOUT WITCHES AND WITCH 



    The author of this demonological work was probably born 

OK. 1550 In the middle of the 60s. J.Gifford studied at Hart Hall i- 

Oxford, like his famous contemporary and compatriot 

demonologist Reginald Scott. Main writing activity 

this theologian and preacher falls on 1573-1590s; in it 

time he becomes one of the leaders of the English non-conformists 

Since 1584 he has been the head of the parish of All Saints in Maldon. Behind 

active participation in the Essex nonconformist movement in 1584 

removed from his post, although before his death, come * 

Shay in 1620, continued to engage in preaching activities 

stu in Essex. In addition to this treatise, in 1584 Gifford published 



414 



another demonic essay. Dialogue* was published four 

times: in 1593, 1603, 1824 (reprint from the second edition in the series 

Percy Society, v. VIII, No. 24) and 1931 Our translation is based on 

latest reprint edition: AD ialogue Concerning Witches 

and Witchcraftes,     by G eorge G ifford. Oxf., 1931 (Shakespeare 

Association Fascimiles, No. 1), which is a reproduction 

first edition in 1593. 







  * This is the first demonological work by J. Gifford 

     «A D iscourse of the subtill Practises of Devilles by Witches and 

    Sorceres, published in 1584. According to Beatrice White, 

    the creation of such a work was prompted by the famous 

    trials of 1579 at Chelmsford and 1582 at St. Osis (see about 

    them the book of R. Hart), which he may have attended. 

    In addition, in 1584, the monumental art of 

    following R. Scott “The Discovery of Witchcraft”, which determined the practice 

    virtually the entire subsequent development of British demonology, in 

    including those that influenced these works of J. Gifford. 

 p 



   Such statements of the author were apparently led to scanned 

    distant confessions at the Chelmsford trial, as well as 

    like a strong outbreak of folk demonomania in England during 

    second half of the 16th century. 

   In the address, as in the main text, Gifford strictly adheres to 

    lives in the orthodox setting that the devil (Satan) 

    acts as a punishing instrument in the hands of the Lord, and it is thanks to 

    he has a certain power. Wed with the work of John Trittemia. 

 ^ English demonological terminology throughout history 

    skom period of its existence and did not settle down. In our 

    in translation, we will adhere to the following system: witches 

    translated as "witches", sorceres as "sorceresses". In this 

    case "sorcerers" are designated by the word conjurors. 

   There are a lot of contradictions in this essay, including 

    and in the interpretation of the key points of demonological theory. 

    Below J. Gifford contradicts himself several times, saying, 

    that the devil only uses diseases that objectively have 

    in the human body. 

   These two terms are difficult enough to convey accurately in 

    Russian in this context: in the original text is 

    «cunning men and wise women». 

   Rationalistic motive in revealing the causes of witchcraft 

    leniations and simply rationalism as a method are peculiar to the English 

    demonology in general, with the possible exception of "Demonology" 

    James VI(I). It is not by chance that one of the heroes of the "Dialogue", expressing thoughts 



     A D ialogue..., p. VII. 





                                                                 415 



       the author, below says: “Probably your mind is bewitched, about 

       driven by blindness and disbelief...”, combining, of course, walkie-talkies 

       rational and irrational approaches in the analysis of this npc&if 

       matics. 

    8 In the text of the first edition, the author's name is on the title page, 

       at the end of the dedication, it is written through "a" - "Giffard". Now at 

       It is customary to write the surname through * o. 

   "It is no coincidence that the author unfolds the action of his dialogue in the village 

       locality, since it is in the villages and, to a lesser extent, 

       degree, women lived in small towns, occupying 

       by sorcery practice. 

Yu For the entire composition of J. Gifford, the image of the witch Kai is characteristic 

      an old, sometimes ugly woman. On the whole, the English 

      monologue is not characteristic of a young green-eyed witch - soblio 

      threader. 

And Hereinafter we translate (based on the context) cunning mm 

      as a "sorcerer", although it is possible to translate this term with the word 

       "sorcerer". 

12 i.e. witch. 

• I" And coming from the context and semantic load, we considered possible; 1. 

      translate the word devil to ak "demon" (a creature of the second order 

      since the word demon is almost never found in this text 

      and Devil to ak "devil". The meaning of the text is not distorted. 

14 Reference to biblical texts, primarily to the New Testament" 

      characteristic in general for such works written by an 

      Leah Protestants. 

1*^ The teacher's words are indicative: by the end of the 16th century, demonologists st. 

      recognized the obsession of two kinds - natural-medical 

                                                                     1 

      and diabolical. This is one of the concessions to sound 

      meaning. 

1 6 

      M f .12.33; 7.12.20. 

1' Roll call with the words of Christ, Mf .6.4-5,16,18. 

1 0 

     Very often in the text when quoting biblical statements and 

      Gifford indicates only the chapter. In this case, see Isa. 5.2'. 

                                                                   1 

      Here and henceforth, all biblical quotations are given directly * 

      translation from English. In the notes, all the biblical you 

      sayings are given by us in the Synodal translation. 

1 In the Synodal Translation, this passage sounds like this: “that they are not at 

      received the love of truth for their salvation. And for this he will send and '. 

      God is the action of delusion, so that they will believe a lie”, . 

      Fes. 2.11-12. It is possible that Gifford is deliberately reducing 

      quotes, adapting them for your text, or giving them from memory 

^ "Rev. 13.3-4. Compare the Synodal translation: "And the whole earth marveled 

      watching the beast, and bowed to the dragon, who gave power / 

      beast. And bowed down to the beast... We found it possible to transfer * 

      sti the word "followed" as "followed". 

      Rev.12.9: “And the great dragon, the ancient serpent, was cast down> 

      called the devil and Satan." Approximation of the appearance of Satin, 



416 



       Beast, Antichrist with the Roman Catholic Church - character 

       thorny cliche of all Protestant literature of the 16th century. 

 ^ Typical of English demonology and folk beliefs 

        a set of zoomorphic images of improvised demons. You can go to them 

       add another hare (see Samuel's words above). About their image 

       жизни zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

               v nutrition, see also R. Hart's book. 

 2 

   2. Mark 5.9. In modern J. Gifford demonology, their number 

       the wealth was in the millions, see the notes to the book by S.Pshi- 

       byshevsky. 

 2 4 

      1 Peter 5.8. 

 ^° Not exactly. The dragon is identified with the devil, but not with 

       demons, because under them - if you follow the biblical 

       text - should mean his angels who fought together 

       stand with him against the heavenly host led by Michael. 

^° M f .12.26. Wed Synodal translation: “and if Satan from Satan 

       drives, then he is divided with himself. How will the kingdom stand 

       his?" 

2 7 

      I sh. 7.12. 

2 8 

      See note. 21. 

"Chapter 1 of the Epistle of the Apostle Peter does not say that the devil 

       in the form of a lion, begins to growl after someone utters mo- 

       Lithuania. 

" See Ephesians 6.12: "Because our wrestling is not 

       against blood and flesh, but against principalities, against authorities, 

       against the rulers of the darkness of this world, against the spirits of wickedness 

       heavenly." 

"^ Cf. Galatians 5.19-21: "They are known; they 

       essence ... enmity, quarrel, envy, anger, strife., hatred, murder, 

       drunkenness, debauchery, and the like." 

°^ A common rhetorical place in Ashley's journalism of the 1960s-1990s 

       years of the XVI century, directed against the agitation of papal Rome 

       and the practice of persecuting Protestants Perhaps, under these words, 

       by you, the author indirectly implies the actions of the Spanish government 

       activities in Europe. 

      P oel. Eph .6.16: “Most of all, take the SHIELD of faith, with which 

       you can quench all the fiery darts of the evil one.” 

3 4 

      See ibid., 11. 

      11:13: “Put on the whole armor of God, so that you 

       it was possible to stand against the intrigues of the devil”, “for this 

       put on the whole armor of God. lest you m o n and resist the day 

      evil and, having overcome all, to stand. 

      And John 8.44: “Your father is the devil, and you want to fulfill lusts 

       your father ”(Christ’s words to the Jews) of St. Paul in 

      Acts, 13.10. turned to the sorcerer Elim ^ 'Oh, sweaty 

       of all perfidy And of all villainy, the son of the devil, the enemy of all 

       what truth! The use of quotations is somewhat arbitrary, 

      insofar as these words are not addressed to Christians; in our own 

      In this case, we are talking about lost Christians 



                                                           417 



3 7 

    See note. thirty. 

3 8 

    See ate. E f .5.1-8. 

3" According to English folk demonology, in a neck basket[ 

     stew under the bed usually lived spirits in the form of a cat or a toad 

4 

  ^ Hidden in these words is some regret of the hero (and the author. 

     understandable, since very often in practice "witches" were customary 

     village grandmothers, healers, who also treated people, 

     and animals. "Witches" they often became in the eye * 

     surroundings after treatment failure. 

4 1 

    M f .8.31. 

4 2 

    1 Peter 5.9-10. 

4 3 

    It is obvious that in this treatise there is a single chain of devils! 

     demon-witch, all links of which interact in one way or another;, 

     ut. In this Gifford differs significantly from the demonological 

     skoy tradition represented by John Trittemius. 

4 4 

    For the “checking” of Iov, see Iov.1.8-12; 2.4-10. On the death of his children 

     1.18-19. And the initiator of this test was Satan. Oh witch> 

     There are no references in the text. 

4 5 

    See 1 Samuel 16:14 and el. 

4 6 

    See note. 41. 

4 7 

    2 Thess. 2.9-12. 

4 

  ° See and ov. 1.8: “for there is no one like him on earth” (translated by M. Rizh 

     sky). 

4 9 

    See note. 26. 

5 0 

    And ov.1.15,17. 

51 Another example of authorial contradiction: Daniel, denying sleep 

     the absolute independence of witches in the matter of intercourse < 

     devil, here already endows them with a certain freedom in this act 

    The expression "angel of light" is taken from 2 Cor. 11.14. 

with 

0 0 

    Another contradiction, since earlier Gifford wrote that the devil << 

     sees all the hidden diseases that the da- 

     the best doctors. 

0 4 

    Such an interpretation of witches as victims of vile deception from the outside! 

     devil is characteristic of English demonology. In this pr< 

     appeared rationalistic approach and loyalty attitude zyxwvutsr 

                                                                   i 

     witches, which is partly characteristic of British anti-Witchcraft; 

     legislation. 

    It is unlikely that the demons still achieved such admiration >' 

     reverence on the part of the English peasants and philistines - istorg 

     scientific material does not provide sufficient evidence to confirm 

     the correctness of this assertion. At the same time, this package 

     passing well demonstrates the actual presence of one '• • 

     components of this whole "Vedic stream". Millennial • 

     the history of Christianity in the British Isles could not (as i 

     in Europe) to eradicate traditional beliefs and traditionally - 

     medicine, closely related to medicine and mi 

     gytic rites. And it is precisely the presence of this potent! ^^, 



      general cultural phenomenon can be partly explained by the 

      f act of flourishing witchcraft in the 16th century. 

*>6 See 1 Sam. 28:16-18. Saul asked to summon the spirit of Samuel. 

* "' Sibyl is a clairvoyant who received the gift of prediction from a god 

      gestures; as a rule, her prophecies, made in a state of ex- 

      pelvis, threaten people with trouble. The homeland of the Sibyls is considered Near 

      East. The most famous (out of 10) are Kumekaya and Eritrean. 

      And their predictions were recorded in special collections - “Ora- 

      to the street." 

"° Acts .16.16. However, the biblical text does not say (ak writes 

      below Gifford) that she broadcast about the missing and stolen 

      things, but only that she was endowed with a spirit of divination 

      things. 

5 9 

     Act .16.18. 

6 0 

     Tue. 18.11—12. 

6 1 

     Tue.18.15. Translated by D.J. Siphon (I Jerusalem, 1975, p. 248) 

      this phrase sounds like this: “A prophet from your midst, from your brothers- 

      them like me the Lord your God will set up for you, his servants 

      roam." 

6 2 

     For example, Tuesday 18.14—21. 

6 3 

     See 1 Sam. 28.6 ate. 

"* Another contradiction coming from the mouth of Daniel, who 

      consequently will say that these sorcerers are also powerless and 

      it is all just a hoax orchestrated by Satan. 

°° Imagery from 1 Peter 5.8 is used again. and Rev. 13. 

6 6 

     See M f .12.26. 

"' It is characteristic that nowhere in this work is not a word 

      about church exorcism. 

   ° Below Daniel, apparently forgetting about this statement of his, will 

      to say that it is the spirits that give the image to the glass. 

" in Deut.18.12. This expression is used further - see, for example, 

      22.5. 

     According to legend, the smell of the devil was the smell of sulfur. 

     Probably M.B. means Deut. 18:21: "But the prophet... who 

      will speak in the name of other gods, such a pro- 

      rock." See also I skh.22.17. 

 ' ^ This list clearly shows the change in attitudes in general 

      society to witchcraft, which began around the 13th century. If before 

      of this time, witchcraft practice was considered as a criminal 

      crime (see, for example, Salic truth, LXIV) then 

      now it becomes a crime much more 

      religious, and therefore less tolerant. 

     See also sch.22.17: "Do not let fortune-tellers live." 

     This statement is unfounded, since in this place there is no 

      there are no terminological explanations for them. 

7 5 

     See I. 7.11-12. 

7 6 

     Sm. Tue. 18.10—11. 

     See note. 69. 



^ 8 See Deuteronomy 18.10: 

      his son or his daughter through the fire, neither the magician nor the wolf 

      shebnik, .. ”, etc. 

^ 9 M.B. cunning: in Deuteronomy 19.15 it is said about “every sin in general”, 

      so the witches are quite suitable for this article. 

°0 M.B. has probably already forgotten the previous part of the conversation, where 

      it was thought that witches and sorcerers usually become 

      sinful people (below this thesis will be in a veiled form 

      repeated), so witchcraft and sorcery (this is the interpretation of 

      nii) is by no means a professional occupation; that's why, destroy 

      alive witches, it is impossible to stop the possibility of their speedy 

      revival. 

8 

  * I.e. the demon. 

8 

  ^ Probably, the speaker means the spirit of Samuel, but this 

      the interpretation is very tendentious and strained. 

8 3 

     See note. 68. 

8 4 

     See note. 66. 

     Daniel means the devil. 

8 6 

     See Act n.16.]6. 

8 

  ^ The measure of punishment, characteristic of England, in contrast to conti- 

      nental Europe. 

     Free alteration of a phrase from 1 Petr.5.8. 

8 9 

     See 1 P etr. 5.8. 

9 0 

     See Rev. 13. 

   * Perhaps this example was inspired by the author's materials Chelms- 

      the Ford trial of 1566 (see above). 

  ^ Contemporary French demonology to J. Gifford (J. Voden) 

      considered the reasons for the flight to the Sabbath more critically, considering 

      this is a hallucination caused by the use of drugs 

      funds. 

  This is what happened to the participants in the Chelmsford Trials in the 1960s and 1980s. 

      gg. XVI century (see above). 

9< 

   * This question appears in many critical writings, on- 

      ruled against witch-hunts. Indeed, except for 

      in individual cases, when the matter was determined by the political 

      or personal interest, witches and sorcerers turned out to be poor 

      people who often performed simply the role of public thunder 

      branch. S. Cyrano de asks about the same in his letter. 

      Bergerac (see his letter "Against the sorcerers"). 

     See a similar ironic request in the said letter. 

      S. Cyrano de Bergerac a. 

     One of the most common punishments for witches 

      (which the victims of the first trial in Chelmsford got off with). 

      Sorcerers sentenced to death were hanged in England. 

     It is possible that the chickens suffered from foot and mouth disease. 

9 0 

     See M f.8.31-32. A slight inaccuracy of the author: in the gospel 

      the text talks about demons, not just one demon. 



   This image, rather everything! Oh, was inspired by J. Gifford by Chel- 

    the MSford trial of 1566 (see above). 

   See 1 P etr. 5.9. "Resist him with firm faith..." 

   Hint on the criminal or witchcraft past of healers. 





        AN EXTRAORDINARY REPORT ABOUT THE SIX MOST 

               NOTORIOUS WICCORDERS 



    This pamphlet, which appeared in Germany in 1600 and immediately 

translated into English, is very indicative for understanding 

the process of rebirth and degeneration of the very idea of witchcraft, and 

as well as changes in its interpretation and perception in the public consciousness 

research institutes. It is quite obvious that demonic forces are present here. 

howl almost imperceptibly, explaining only the dexterity of these people who, 

judging by their fault, they were ordinary criminal 

n ikami. As for the incrimination against them of the murders of young children, 

which are practically the only (besides pouches of 

manure) a "real" sign of their relationship with the diabolical 

lamy, it could very well be a standard judicial formula, which 

which was often abused by German judges a few years later, 

in particular, at the well-known trials in Bamberg. True translation 

made according to the edition: Witchcrfaft. Ed. by B. Rosen, London, 1969 

(Stratford- upon- Avon library. 6), pp. 316—322. 







 ^ The text contains the word "invisible" - invisible, although, according to the 

     B. Rosen’s position, another option is possible - “invincible”, 

     invincible. And going out of context, we found it possible to add 

     stick with the second option. 

 ^ A set of crimes, in addition to purely criminal ones, is standard for 

     Germany (suffice it to recall the bull of Pope Innocent VIII 

     "Highly desiring affections" from December 5, 1484). 

    Probably, we are talking about the so-called. "witch chair", which is often 

     used in the witch trials in Germany. 

 * * The bodies of sorcerers (as well as heretics, by the way) were burned to the ground in order to 

     there was no possibility for them to be resurrected bodily. 







                        F . von SPEE 

                     WARNING CRIME WINGS 

              AND LEE ABOUT PROCESSES AGAINST WITCHES 



    Friedrich Pee von Langenfeld was born on February 25, 1591 

in the family of an official of the Elector of Cologne in the castle Kaiserswerth about 

Dusseldorf. After graduating from the Jesuit school, at the age of nineteen 



tsati years entered the order. On behalf of the leadership of the order, 

carried out missionary activity for the conversion of German 

Protestants to the "true Catholic faith". 

    With witchcraft and witch-hunting F. von Sh pe especially 

clashed closely in Würzburg, where he was sent as a 

the leader of the convicts in these processes. His book Cautio 

criminalis, or about the proceedings against the sagas» saw the world in 1631 

without indicating the name of the author on the title page. Until 1731, this was 

The work was published a total of 13 times, both in Latin and 

and in other languages (in 1632 in Dutch, in 1647 in 

Bremen in German, in 1660 in French). In 1632 a book 

published in the second edition immediately in Cologne and Frankfurt am Main 

F. von Schee died on August 7, 1635 during the plague epi- 

demi in Trier, where he worked as a doctor, treating French prisoners 

The second book on witchcraft, the materials for which he had already 

brany, in the end it was not written 

    The proposed translation is made according to the edition: R .P . Friderici Spee, e 

Soc. The criminal warning of Jesus or the proceedings against the sagas of the book... 

Augustus Vindelicorum, 1731. pp. 334-356. 







  * Like many demonological treatises of the late XVI-XVII 

     centuries, this book is written on the model of already existing workers 

     dov. In this case, its structure exactly reproduces 

     the structure of the famous demonological research Sylvest 

     Ра П риерио "De strigimagarum daemondis mirandis book three." 

     published in 1521. We have chosen only two chapters 

     (question) from the work of Sh pee, which most of all allow selling 

     to demonstrate his rather specific position on the question 

     dews of demonology proper, since on the whole the book is 

     largely legal in nature. This essay 

     actually written in response to a book published in 1590 

     Peter B insfeld «Tractat von Bekantnuss der Zauberer und 

     witches» (Trier, 1590). 

  ^ in conventibus - here and below we found it possible to use 

     when translating the term "sabbath", although the words "sabath * 

     not used anywhere. 

    The expression "angel of light" is taken from 2 Cor. 11.14. 

     Martin Antonio Delrio (1551-1608), Spanish jurist, 

     lawyer, member of the Jesuit order. Made famous by printed in 1599 

     year with the book "D isquisitiones magicae", based on materials 

     a large number of witch processes and became the second in 

     prestige after the "Hammer of the Witches" among lawyers. 





      Langin G. Religion and witch trial, Leipzig, 1888, pp. 272-273 

      Sh indelarzh B . Fishing for things. Sofia, 1990. S. 102. 



422 



 ** Latin terminology for this concept is multi- 

     significant. In this case, the word "figura" is used. 

    Here F. von Schee uses the term "magi". 

  ' See note. 3. 

 ° And I mean, in particular, the “Hammer of the Witches” by J. Sh prenger and 

     G.I nstitoris, "The Fortress of Faith Against the Jews..." Bartolomeo de 

     Spina, "The Scourge of Heretics" by Nicola Jacquier and others. 





                     By S. Cyrano de B 

               FOR KOLDUNOV. AGAINST THE WIZARDS 



    And the famous French writer and publicist was born in the 

our noble family in 1619, without having received a systematic education 

education and not having a solid social base, was forced to be content 

live the life of literary bohemia. In the 1940s, in one of 

scientific circles Cyrano de Bergerac met P. Gassendi 

and became a persistent propagandist of the ideas of this French philo- 

sofa. He wrote most of his works in 

the last decade of his life, marked by seclusion and 

disease. And it was then that he created the “States and Empires 

of the Moon", "States and Empires of the Sun", "Mazarinades", some 

from public letters. He died in 1655. Published 

below, the translations of two letters make it possible to clarify the position of the 

my Cyrano in this matter, and also clearly show what 

there was an attitude to the problem of witchcraft in some layers of the French 

society of the middle of the 17th century. Translation made according to the edition: 

Cyrano de Bergerac, S. Les oeuvres libertines, t. 2, Paris, 1921, pp. 

208-219. In this edition, the letters are printed in the version in 

which they were published in a volume of the writings of Cyrano de Bergerac 

in 1654. 









  1 As in his other works, the author takes the hero into 

     another world, another planet. In this case, this is done 

     most likely in order to emphasize unreality and you- 

     thoughtfulness of what is happening. 

    Agrigsha (Cornelius Heinrich) Nettesheim - see approx. 5 k 

     "States or Empires of the Moon". 

  "Zarathustra, Lord B of Actria - see note 9 to the first part 

     "Synagogues of Satan" by St.P Shibyshevsky. 

  4 As you know, demons are divided into several types. Cm. 

     above is the work of Ioann Trittemia, as well as ch. 1 book by R. Har- 

     ta (excerpts from the work of F. - M. Guazzo). 

  ° Probably, by "big black man" the author means 

     Satan. 



                                                                 423 



   ^ The Devil lists virtually all those deeds that incre^ 

        mined by witches during trials and figures 

        roved in the demonological literature of the 16th-17th centuries. 

   ^ In principle, this letter is not directed against sorcerers, but rather 

        against the recognition of their existence. 

   ° See note. 5. 

   "Like many people who spoke on the topics of witchcraft and 

        often taking opposite positions, Cyrano de Beer 

        Gerak believed that the real judicial system in <- 

        children to self-incrimination of a person (see options for the same and, 

        positions of F. von Schee and J. Gifford). 

Yu Sr. similar in "Dialogue" by J. Gifford. 

And According to tradition, the money received from evil spirits, I will turn 

        lis either in oak leaves, or in ash or coal. Wed lower" 

        excerpt from The State and Empire of the Sun. 

^2 Cyrano de Bergerac could be familiar with the book by J.B. 

        monomania of witches ”(1580), in the second part of which it is said 

        rant about it. 

1 3 

       Examples taken from the Bible - 1 Samuel 28.16-18; Mt.8.30-32 and so on 

• ^ Perhaps we are talking about testing sorcerers through immersed and- 

        into the water, although most likely the author means sprinkling is holy, 

        water. 

• *• ' "I believe" - lat. Beginning of prayer. 









                STATES AND EMPIRES OF THE SUN 



    Translation of the beginning of this work by Sidano de Bergerac sdechi i 

according to the text of the Paris edition edited by W. Spence: Cyrano iH 

                                                                         1 

Bergerac, S. Voyage to the Moon and Comic History of the States and Empire - 

of the sun. Paris, 1963. 







    This book is a kind of continuation of the "State 

     Empire of the Moon”, which explains the somewhat unexpected 

     did not start it. 

    "handwritten copies were sold under the counter" This place m 

     can serve as evidence that the work "States 

     Empire of the Moon" was distributed in handwritten versions. H < 

     written between 1647 and 1650, it was published after the death of Mr. 

     Cyrano in 1657. 

    Long clothes were worn by members of the judicial chambers and parliament 

  * "to exchange benefices" meant to move to another parish 

    Agrippa (Cornelius Heinrich) Nettesheim - German g> m 

     nist, doctor, philosopher, writer, was also fond of alchemy. Rodi 

     in Cologne in 1486 attracted attention theologically '" 



424 



       lectures in the city of Dole in Franche-Konte. With their caustic satyrs 

       restored the monks and, accused of heresy, was forced to 

       settle in England. Returning to Germany, he published his 

       famous essay "On the unreliability and futility of the sciences" (Keln, 

       1527), mocking the then state of science, for which 

       again accused of heresy and fled to France. Died 

       in 1538 (according to other sources in 1535). Contemporaries 

       Agrippa gained fame as a great sorcerer and magician, 

      "resembling the Muse, which is called Euterpe." E rub. - one of 

       nine muses, patroness of lyric poetry 

    ' "carried something like a sarbican to her mouth." Blow gun: tube 

       1.5 - 3 m long, embedded in another tube, poison arrows 

       poisoned by plant poison, they are blown out to 30-40 m. 

      “I constantly dream of caves and fire. The reason is simple - me and 

       choleric and melancholic. Trying a similar explanation again 

       goes back to the theory of Hippocrates (c. 460 - c. 370 BC - 

       ancient Greek physician, reformer of ancient medicine) about four 

       three temperaments, according to which the temperament of the individual 

       depends on certain liquid media of the body: blood, mucus, 

       black and yellow bile. Sanguine - blood, life force; 

       phlegmatic - mucus; melancholic - black bile, hence the 

       Denia caves; choleric - bile, hence visions of fire. 

      And from the Gospel: "In the beginning God created..." 

1     "singing the Litany with an effort" Litany - a short prayer 

      at the Catholics. It is performed during church processions. IN 

      in its oldest form was a solemn prayer for 

      sending heavenly help to the growth of the fruits of the earth and 

      performed in case of drought, etc. 

• H "he tore off his stole." Epitrachelion - part of the liturgical 

      leg vestments of a priest; 

12 "Physics of Descartes". Rene Descartes, romanized name K artesius 

     (1596, Touraine - 1650, Stockholm) - French philosopher and 

     mathematician. Here is a reference to his work "The Elements of Philosophy" 

     (1644). 

"Beelzebub is Satan or the head of evil spirits, demons. More 

     according to one philological interpretation, this word means "god 

     manure" or any uncleanness and dirt. 

  4 

    According to popular superstition, the toad is one of the creatures 

     polishing the devil's power 

    “All that was missing was a wife and a broken pot to resemble 

     And ova." And ov is the main character of the so-called book 

     And the ova placed in the Bible. Yahweh (the supreme deity in Judaism) 

     ism) argued with the treacherous Satan about selfless righteousness 

     And ova. Yahweh invited Satan to test him with misfortunes, exactly 

     not take life. Satan destroyed the children of Iov, took away wealth, 

     finally struck him from head to toe with leprosy. 

    A naive but cunning man is afraid of becoming a victim of witchcraft. 

     action by which oak leaves turn into golden 



                                                               425 



      lot coins. That's why he wishes that if the coins 

      retut its original form, then let it happen n< 

      barely making their purchase. 





                         L. - M. Sinistrari 

              ABOUT DEMON AND ALI TETA AND BESTIALITY 

                     INCUBI AND SUCCUBI 





    The author of this treatise was born in 1622 and died in 1701. IN 

In 1647 he entered the Franciscan order and soon became one and 

the most famous theologians And the waist. For some time L. - M. Sini 

strari spent in Rome, where he served as an adviser to the highest zyxwvutsrqpo 

                                                                sua<- 

Sacred Inquisition, thus obtaining the opportunity to 

get acquainted with its archive. After that, he spent two years under the 

osprey of Avignon, and then moved to Milan, where he became the main battle 

word to the local bishop. In 1688 he took part in the work 

general congress of the Franciscans, at which he was instructed to collect all 

statutes of the order. The treatise we are publishing was probably written 

in the mid 80s. XVII century. Russian translation of the treatise, made 

from the first scientific edition (Paris, 1872), was first published 

in the journal I Zida, 1915-1916, N ° 1-6. Last name of the translator 

hiding under the initials Z.F.V., could not be identified. For, 

of this edition, the text of the treatise has been edited and supplemented" 

notes. 









  1 Juan Caramuel de Loblokowitz (1608-1682) - one of the 

    major humanists and naturalists in Spain, exhibit1 

    who fell against scholasticism and sought an ideological 

    ru in the philosophy of Epicurus. P dedicated a number of works to problems b " 

    speechless. 

    Thomas de Vio of Gaeta (Caetan, Caetanus) (1469-1534) 

    cardinal, member of the Dominican order, prominent neoscholis 

    and opponent of Martin Luther. The latter's doctrine of predestination" 

    leniya oppose the theological metaphysics of Thomas A1- 

    wine. In the commentaries on the writings of Aquinas, he developed 

    some ideas that Thomas himself had only hinted at! 

    for example, the idea of the analogy of being and the transcendental 

    antagonist of humanism. 

    P apa Achesander VII (Fabio Chigi), pontificate 1655-16t> 

    Years Originally from a well-known banking family, was papal n\> 

    ciem in Cologne, from 1651 cardinal. And elected by the pope in spite of - 

    desire of the French court, resulting in the relations of Rome" 

    with France deteriorated sharply. Patronized development* 

    construction and architecture. 



426 



* This entire paragraph is an almost verbatim reproduction 

  derivation of a fragment from the “Hammer of the Witches”. Wed: “And in k n. 15, ch. 23. 

  "Of the city of God" he resolves the question as follows: "Often 

  has been said and affirmed by many from personal perception and 

  from the testimonies of other eyewitnesses, the reliability of which is not 

  there may be doubts that goblin and fauns, which among the people 

  are called incubi, obsessed with a passion for women, dobi- 

  had carnal intercourse with them and performed it, and that some 

  the tori decons (called by the Gauls duses) diligently tried 

  were willing to do such abominations and often did them. Would howl 

  impudence to deny this in view of the reliability of the people who 

  those who eat victuals." Here are the words of Augustine ”(Y.Sh prenger, G.I nsti- 

  toris. There are witches. M. 1990. S. 100.). Augustine has this fragment 

  stop, in the chapter in which the author talks about angels. For 

  comparison, here is the original text of Augustine:               “Et 

  since it is a very frequent report, and many have experienced themselves, or from them, who 

  they had heard, of whose faith there was no doubt 

  confirms that the Silvanus and P anes, who are commonly called incubus, are impudent 

  that he had often existed among women, and that he had desired them, and had done them 

  intercourse; and certain demons, whom Diusius Galli n un 

  constantly to make this impurity and temptation, and many such 

  they insist, that it may seem impudence to deny this...» and so on. (St 

  Aurelius Augustine I bishop De Civitate Dei Libri XXII, v. 2, 

  Lipsiae, 1908, p. 108). See also On the City of God, XVIII, 18. 

  (about the influence of demons on a person). 

"On the intercourse of the devil with sorcerers and ordinary people also 

   see Hammer of the Witches, p. 95 meals, 120 meals, 282 meals 

  The most famous screenings, which gave a picture of the Sabbath with all 

   details are contained in the demonological writings of P. de 

   Lankra and J. B. Auden, as well as in the materials of the witch trial 

   in Germany in the early 17th century. 

  Eucharist, i.e. Communion is one of the sacraments of the Christian 

   churches. In Greek it means "thanksgiving". 

° For how demons take sperm from men, see again "M olot ...", 

   With. 99 ate. 

Boes (Betius) Hector (1465-1536), Scottish historian and 

   humanist. Studied at Dundee and at the University of Paris; Friend 

   Erasmus of Rotterdam, Professor of Philosophy at the College of Mont- 

   tagyu, founder of the University of Aberdeen and its first director 

   torus (since 1505). Author of the famous "And the history of the Scots", 

   published in 1527 in Latin e, in which unusual 

   tea is widely used Scottish mythology, folklore, 

   epic sayings. In writing this work, he describes 

   dabbled in the manuscript of a certain Veremund on the history of Scotland, 

   then kept in the monastery And to olmk and ll and did not reach 

   our time. 



                                                               427 



The independence of these spirits goes so far that they 

    do not even fit the general demonic "standard" according to the lane 

    due to his action. 

And Pope Pius V (Antonio Ghislieri), pontificate 1566-1572 

    Born into a poor family, at the age of 14 he joined the Dominican 

    order. Was an inquisitor in Northern Italy and Rome; cardinal 

    since 1557. He opposed the Reformation, although he also demanded a pro- 

    implemented a policy of keeping the biblical commandments and 

    principles of asceticism. Under him, among the clergy there was a 

    a serious "purge" was carried out, with the aim of expelling from their 

    of all negligent priests, starting from the level of a bishop 

    and ending with the rural parish. Organizer of the Holy Anti-Turkish 

    league. 

12 Bernardin Feltre (1439, Feltre - 1494, Pavia), banner 

    filthy Italian preacher. Member of the Franciscan order 

    1456, since 1463 he has been teaching in Franciscan schools, 

    carries out missionary activity in various cities 

    And the waist, where in parallel with this he organizes a network of ghost houses 

    niya. Memory - 28 September. He has several sermons 

    in which he also touches on demonological issues, for example, 

    mer, "How a sinner is a devil and worse than a devil" 

    (Sermons by Blessed Bernardino Tomitano da Feltre, t. 1, Milan 

    1964, p. 123—132). 

1 "This story, in its plot, structure, figurative system through 

    extremely close to the characteristic and traditional for the era 

    Revival of the Jean Roux novella (see the works of B ok to acccio, Ca 

    kitty, straparolla, etc.). The devil is playing the role here. 

    which clever and daring fellow, a typical Italian city 

    zhanin, encroaching on the loyalty of a virtuous wife and 

    doing all sorts of jokes with her and her entourage. Myself 

    Sinistrari treats this story with some humor, 

    You can, considering it in your soul an ordinary fable. 

14 About the possibility of the birth of people from incubi, their features and 

    etc. see Hammer of the Witches, p. 96-104. 

1 Bellarmino Robert (1542, Monte Pulciano - 1621, Rome), known 

    eminent theologian-polemist, cardinal since 1598. His mother, Sin 

    Tiia Cervini, was the sister of the future Pope Marcellus II. entered 

    in the Jesuit order in 1560. He studied theology for three years at the Roman 

    collegium, and in 1570-1576. lectured on Thomas' "Summa" 

    in Louvain, where he became famous for his sermons. From 1592 

    rector of the Rome Collegium, from 1602 - Archbishop Capuan 

    sky. In 1581 he published the famous essay "D isputationes de 

    controversies of faith against the heretics of this time" (3 tt., Rome) 

    He became famous as a talented systematizer of the Catholic 

    trines and polemicist with Protestantism (especially Anglicanism) 

    vom). Some of his books were translated at the end of the 18th century 

    in Russian i zy k. 

    Francisco of Suar (1548–1617), Spanish philosopher and sweat 



    literary writer, graduated from the Faculty of Law of Salaman- 

    University, member of the Jesuit order, professor of theology 

    Via in Segovia, Alcala, Salamanca, Rome. Rightly called 

    "the last scholastic"; such "fame kept him, judging by 

    according to Viko's autobiography, up to the beginning of the 18th century ”(A.K. 

    Dzhivelegov). And his treatises “On Laws” (1612) are known, in 

    in which he, in particular, expressed peculiarly expressed 

    tyrannical ideas, and "Defence of the Catholic Faith" (1613), 

    which is probably what Sinistrari refers to. 

16 Here Sinistrari is somewhat arbitrarily approaching the biblical 

    text. First, among the interpreters of the Bible there is no consensus 

    about who the “sons of God” are - the sons of the great 

    maybe angels or pious descendants of Seth (the last point 

    view adhered to bl. And eronym, bl. Augustine, St. And oann 

    Zlatoust, etc.). Secondly, from the marriage of the sons of God with the daughters 

    human began to be born not giants who were 

    representatives of antediluvian mankind (in the Old Testament 

    they are designated by the word "nephilim"), and "strong, from ancient times 

    glorious people ”(Gen. 6.4), which in the Orthodox tradition is interpreted 

    it is exactly how physically strong, outstanding personalities 

    ("gibborim"). Sinistrari departs from almost all churches 

    authorities and, considering this really very vague 

    manna chapter, applies the rational-logical method, on- 

    forcefully "bringing" her under his original scheme of incubi 

    and their role in the appearance of giants. 

   Celsus is an ancient critic of Christianity, close to the circle at the square. 

    tonics. He was critical of the New Testament, considering it 

    scrapping Christianity by betraying traditional beliefs and traditional 

    tions of ancestors. As a positive example for Christians 

    with regard to loyalty to one's traditional religion, one often 

    led the Jews. 

1 IV Lateran Cathedral, the largest Catholic cathedral of the middle 

    centuries, was convened in 1215 a year before the death of Pope Andno- 

    kentia III. It adopted 70 rules that formed the basis 

    new church law. 

1 "VII Ecumenical Council (II Nicaea) was held in September-ok- 

    October 787. It resolved issues related to the icono- 

    wrestling fury. Bishops-iconoclasts were forgiven by the patri- 

    Arch of Constantinople Tarasius, and veneration and production 

    The icons have been restored. 

   The author's reference to Aristotle is inaccurate. In book 12 of Metaphysics 

    Aristotle writes not about spirits, but about ideality and intangibility 

    higher beginning. 

   Wed M f. 11.10: “For he is the one about whom it is written: “Behold, I send 

    my angel before you, who will prepare your way 

    in front of you". 

   Sm. Aug. On the divination of demons, ch. III. "... He also approached 

    to the demons for so long a time that their life is extended, 



                                                                429 



    a far greater experience of things than can be proptcr to men 

    to come from the shortness of life"./ / The complete course of patrolling Series 

    latina. t. 40, P aris, 1865, col. 584. 

2^ And it means the book of Reginald Scott "The Discovery of Witchcraft" 

    (1584). 

2^ Sinistrari is mistaken - neither Plato nor his followers 

    from the so-called. "Platonic" school there is no dialogue with that name 

    although the very theme of the demon Socrates is considered by him in a number of dia 

    logs, in particular, in "Theage" and others. Special reasoning with 

    Apuleius has a demon (daimone) of Socrates and they are called 

    "On the Deity of Socrates". 

   A similar interpretation of incubi and succubi belongs to 

    Sinistrari, since J. Sh prenger and G. I nstitoris do not qualify 

    identify them as intelligent animals. 

   With examples of similar diabolical obsession and seduction on 

    full of all medieval Christian (especially Latin) 

    literature and many theological treatises. As an illustration 

    stration, you can cite a short story belonging to 

    Peru by the 14th-century English mystic philosopher Richard Rolle 



                 "The Tale of the Temptation of Hempole 

                  (Richard's nickname. - Transl.) " 



    And the story told by the hermit Richard. 

    When I set myself a single goal and left ob. 

worldly teas and began to serve the Lord more than people, 

elk so that one night I lay and rested - and it was soon. 

after my conversion - and the most beautiful young woman appeared to me 

the woman I saw before and loved in that life 

And when I noticed this, I wondered why she came so late> 

to this desert. And then suddenly, without saying a word, he lay down 

right here next to me. And when I felt it, I was afraid 

that she would drag me into the abyss, and said that I would get up and be silent > 

for us in and for me of the Holy Trinity. Oh she twisted me so cruel 

that I had no mouth to speak, no hands to hinder! 

to her. And when I saw this, I clearly understood that it was not women " 

but the devil is in the form of a woman. That is why I turned to the Lord 

said to himself, making the sign of the cross on his chest: “Oh, Jesus 

How precious is Your blood," and then very quickly it weakened, ( 

suddenly everything disappeared. And I gave thanks to God who freed me, < 

because since then I forced myself to love And Jesus, and the more. 

enjoyed His love, the more sweet did he find it. I d 

today it is so, but it does not proceed from my understanding. Ta>- 

blessed be the name And of Jesus in this world of worlds! Amyu 

amen, amen! And Jesus, the son of the glorious Virgin, and the mercy of the Lord and ' 

to all yours! Amen, amen, amen. In mercy - amen!" (Sh 



translated from: English prose treatises of Richard Rolle de 

H ampole. London, 1921, p. 5—6). 

 ^ Quote from kn. Tobit is given inaccurately: “He answered: if anyone 

     tormented by a demon or an evil spirit, then the heart and liver should smoke 

     before such a man or woman, and there will be no more 

     suffer" (Synod, trans.). 

^ On the expulsion of the demon from Sarah, see Tov.8.2-3. 

 * Valesius Heinrich (Henri de Valois) (1603-1676). french is- 

     toric, scholarly classicist, publisher of ancient and medieval works 

     kov authors 

"^ Interpretations of the Catholic theologians mentioned by Sinistrari 

     are indeed somewhat artificial, since 

     in the book of Tobit, 8.3. the following is said: “The demon, sensing this 

     smell, fled to the upper countries of Egypt, and an angel bound him." 

     Meanwhile, Orthodox exegetes also believe that this 

     mon (Asmodeus) fled into the desert (according to biblical demonology, 

     habitual residence of evil spirits) not because he 

     felt the smell of burning fish entrails - after all, on 

     th, as an incorporeal being, could not act material 

     remedy - but because it was just a miracle in the chain 

     other biblical miracles and cannot be explained. Some 

     of such researchers consider this act endowed with such 

     great power because he, in their opinion, symbolized 

     followed by the prayer of Tobias and Sarah. 

"" See John 1 14: "And the Word became flesh." 

° ^ The confusion in this case of the concepts of incubus and succubus is shown 

     important, since for Sinistrari it is no longer important to distinguish clearly 

     the definition of their functions, made in the spirit of J.Sh prenger and G.Insti- 

     toris. 

3" The last of the described situations is explained, in our opinion, 

     quite simply: cursing and behaving so obscenely 

     the incubus was, most likely, the fruit of the sick fantasy of the deacon, 

     which he developed on the basis of alcohol consumption. 

"Cornelius Lapid (Cornelius van der Steen) (1567-1637), 

     theologian, lecturer at the University of Louvain, member of the order 

     Jesuits from 1592, professor at the Roman Collegium from 1616. 

     Author of the famous "Commentaries on Bibchia" 

    The quote is inaccurate. The Bible literally says the following: 

     "And he put gall on his father's eyes and said to 

     draw, my father! His eyes were stuck and he wiped them. And pulled off the edges 

     his eye is a thorn. When he saw his son, he fell on his neck." 

     (Vol. 11.10-12). 

axis 

 ° The interpretation of this episode by Sinistrari literally follows the biblical 

    text. However, with regard to the assertion that Ra- 

    Fail chained Asmodeus somewhere in the desert, it can be said 

    that it is neither the only nor the indisputable right 

    glorious exegetes believe that the word "tied" (and not "chained") 

    means in this case not a specific act, but that the angel with 

                                                                'A \   1 



     with the help of his miraculous power, he took away from Asmodeus the ability to m 

     the ability to move in space and create your own treatments 

"' Bl. Ieronim (340-419), church writer, exegete, auto; 

     Latin translation of the Bible (Vulgate), as well as the famous 

     writings "About famous men". Left many letters 

"^ St. Athanasius of Alexandria (c. 295-373), a prominent reli 

     giosno-politician, ideologist of the fight against Arianism 

     universal church in 30-60 years. IV century. Author of numerous 

     writings of a dogmatic and polemical nature and nepaoi about 

     Lives of St. Anthony. 

    "At the final goal", "on the way" - lat. 

LG) 

    "in the state of the path and reward" - lat. 

41 "On underground beings" - lat. Georg Agricola (Bauer) (24 3 

     1490 - 11/21/1555), an outstanding German mineralogist and scientist 

     mining investigator. 

42 Michael Ettmüller (1644-1683), German physician. His labor 

     • I n stitution es medicae ”was widely known in con 

     це XVII века, см.: Michaelis Ettm ulleri...Opera omnia theoretica 

     and practical, Lyons, 1685. 

4*^ Lactantius, Lucius Caelius Firmian (c. 250 - after 325). 

     church writer, teacher of eloquence in N and comedy 

     In his main work, Divine Ordinances, 

     tried to establish and systematize the foundations of Christian 

     teachings. Author of polemical works "On the Creation of God". 

     “On the Wrath of God” (precisely about these two writings and a niche. 

     Sinistrari). In addition, Lactantius wrote the received neo- 

     extremely famous small work "On the death of drive 

     telei”, in which he highlighted the struggle of the Roman emperors with the Christian 

     stance until the beginning of the 4th century. For beauty and expression 

     the quality of the syllable earned the honorary title of "Christian Tzipe 

     rona"- 

     Barony, Cesare (1538-1607), the largest official 

     Catholic historian of the Renaissance. In his Church 

     annals", published at the beginning of the 18th century in an abbreviated form - 

     in Russian, assembled a huge, sometimes unique, Mai" 

     rial on the history of the Christian church of the first and beginning of the second " 

     millennium. This work was the basis of many studies. 

     history of the church, written in the XVII-XIX centuries. In 1913-1915 b 

     published in Russian for the second time. 

44 In the translation of the Torah, made by D.Yosifon (Jerusalim, 197 5). 

     this phrase is translated as follows: “The scepter will not depart from And oud and j<i 

     a legislator from among his descendants until he comes to Shito. 

     and to him is the obedience of the nations.” 

4 5 

    See M f .1. 

    This description from the book by F. - M. Gouache, see below in the essay by R. Härt1 

    In the description of L.-M. Sinistrari the nature of the seed of the incubus nablk 1 

     there are big differences from the traditional point of view 

     diabolical FUCK. If P. de Lancre, J. B. Auden, etc. have a relationship^' 



432 



            with the devil make a woman feel cold from the seed and 

            pain from the act itself, then Sinistrari's incubi are opposed to it in everything 

            opposite, including in their essence and origin. 

            In this, independence and well-known originality are manifested. 

            ness of Italian demonology of the 17th century. 





                                St.P Shibyshevsky 

                               SYNAGOGUE OF SATAN 



«           The talent of the Polish writer, theorist of art and literature, 

|       criticism of Stanislav P Shibyshevsky (1868-1927) appeared in 

I       many areas, including in the genre of historical and psychological 

t       essays, which include the "Synagogue of Satan". Before 







1 

t 

* 

        deal with issues of magic and witchcraft, the interest in which was 

        very great in the decadent circles of the end of the last century, he studied 

        music, architecture, studied the works of famous psychologists and 

        dikov. All this, as well as the enormous influence of the works of F.N. Eetzsche, approved 

        S.P. Shibyshevsky in his concept of the analysis of historical events. 

I'       And that is why in the "Synagogue of Satan" the author assigns so much 

'"       what is the place for the problem of sex, the role of the subconscious, which, according to 

J       writer, there is a complex biological and sexual. First 

\       The Synagogue of Satan was published in 1897 in German 

        language, and in 1902 it was translated into Polish. In this edition 

;.       reproduced a newly edited Russian translation of this 

        works, published in the 10th volume of the collected works of S.P. Shiba- 

'       shevsky in 1911. 







                                  Part one 



           Lightbearer (Lucifer) - from the Latin "lucere", to shine. P rya- 

            my translation from the Latin name of the leader of the rebels 

            against the God of angels until his downfall into hell. 

         ^ Paraclete - translated from Greek "intercessor" - the Holy Spirit, 

            sent by Jesus after death to the earth to people. 

           Youth of Nazareth - i.e. And Jesus, who, according to Christian tradition, 

            control, will win the last battle of the devil. Nazaret - town 

            in Galilee, where Christ spent his childhood. 

           Magi is a term used in two meanings: a) as 

            as a designation of priests in Zoroastrianism, as well as prophets and 

            predictors; b) to an ax a synonym for the words "wizard, sorcerer." 

           Chaldea is another name for the Babylonian state. 

           Mazdaism - it is from the names of the religion of the ancient Iranians (Zoroast- 

           rism), which comes from the name of the good god Agura-Mazda; re- 

           religious and philosophical doctrine, reflecting the ideology of a wide 

            popular movement in Iran in the 5th-6th centuries. Founder - prop- 



           3400                                                       433 

    1 



    the herald Mazdak (470-521) - According to his teachings, in the foundations " 

    world process lies the struggle between the bright beginning, dei 

    acting purposefully and reasonably, and a dark beginning, 

    acting blind. Initially, people were in a state 

    complete equality, which was violated by the victory of evil, then. 

    who suffered the inherent ills of society. Mazdaism rejected the Manichaeans 

    sky asceticism and was permeated with the spirit of struggle. 

  'Holy fire - Zoroastrians revered fire as a sacred 

    the element with which life was associated. 

    Agura-Mazda is the god of goodness in Zoroastrianism, the lord of Asha is 

    row, justice, righteousness. He is opposed to Ak! 

    ra Mainyu, the god of evil. In one of the parts of the "Avesta" (Yasna, 30.3 -Гzyxwvut 

                                                                    • 

    says: “Indeed, there are two primary spirits, twins, sleeping 

    nye by their opposite. These first gods voluntarily 

    took good and evil, after which a struggle began between them, 

    which has become the core of human history. in itgle 

    Agura Mazda will win the great battle and be able to destroy the evil 

    The God of goodness is the creator of all things. First, he created 

    free from the bodily shell, but then gave his creations 

    niyam material form, seeing in it the greater good. Angry f* 

    God has invaded this world. He emerged from the water, having done more 

    part of it is salty, withered the plants, killed the first person i" 

    spoiled the fire with smoke. In the end the demons are devas and si' 

    darkness will still be destroyed in the said battle. Rivers 

    molten metal will flow down to hell and kill Aigra-mang' 

    and burn the last remnants of evil in the world 

 ' Zarathushtra (Zoroaster), prophet. Most likely, this is the real 

    the logical person who owns the compilation of the Ghat, dre' 

     the most important part of the Avesta, the sacred book of Zoroastrianism. UK^ 

    approximately between the 10th and 6th centuries BC Originally Zorois" 

    delivered sermons in his homeland, but was not B} •• 

    known by his community. According to Pahlavi sources, * 

    was persecuted by the local sorcerer Dur 

    Rav and was forced to leave his homeland. bend down 

    age at the hands of a pagan priest. 

   Soma (from the verb "squeeze") - in ancient Indian mythology. 

    divine drink and the deity of this drink, made 

    plant of the same name, which could not be identified 

    still. This cult is of Indo-Iranian origin. P*- 

    Initially, its name sounded like "haoma". N drink e. 

    hallucinogenic. There are a number of hypotheses about the plant, from to o! 

    this drink (hemp, rhubarb, " 

    homor, etc.), but no specific ones that allowed 

    accurately identify it, there are no descriptions. And it was thought that 

    haoma is a plant, the first created by God, and which in c > 1 

    This is the progenitor of all other plants. In e k!' 

    astrisme haoma is praised for being, intoxicating, cnocorV' 

    bestow health, healing power, development, growth, power, JH>. 



434 



      nie. Haoma is a feature of earlier cults, which, by virtue of its 

      popularity, introduced Zoroaster into his teaching, 

Ch Thoth - in Egyptian mythology, the god of wisdom, counting and writing. 

      Thoth's wife was the goddess of truth and order, Maat. sacred 

      Thoth's animal was an ibis, so Thoth was usually depicted in 

      the form of a man with the head of an ibis. How is the astral deity Thoth 

      identified with the moon. He was considered the heart of the god Ra and usually 

      depicted behind the god Pa - the sun. It was created by Ryo himself. 

      "Lord of time", he divided it into years, months, days and 

      kept an account for them. He recorded the birthdays and deaths of people and led 

      letolisi. He created writing and taught mankind to count 

      and a letter. Having acquired the ability to heal, He, with the help of ma- 

      magical spells healed the infant Horus, who had been bitten 

      snake. In the "Book of the Dead" Thoth was depicted near the scales, 

      giving the result of weighing the heart. In religious mysti- 

      in ancient Greek literature, he was identified with Herme- 

      catfish, who performed under the name of Trismegistus, “Thrice 

      best of her", 

'• ^ In the Hellenistic period, Thoth was credited with creating a sacred 

      other books, including "To the Book of Breathing", which, together with 

      "To the Book of the Dead" was placed in the tomb, believing that they possess 

      magical power. 

1 "Heka1a - in Greek mythology, the goddess of darkness, night visions 

      and membership. From Zeus, she received power over fate as an inheritance 

      Lands and seas Night, terrible goddess, with a flaming torch 

      and pji;ax and with snakes in her hair, Hekate was the goddess of sorcery, 

      to which they turned for help, resorting to special mysteries 

      wedding ceremonies. At night she wanders among the graves and brings out 

      ghosts of the dead. And images of Hekate were often set 

      at the crossroads, where she was usually sacrificed. 

1 ^ Satyrs - in Greek mythology, the demons of fertility, included 

      in the retinue of Dionysus, the god of winemaking. They are covered with wool, 

      hairy, bearded, with hooves, horse tails. N a go- 

      catch them small horns or horse ears, but the torso and 

      their very heads are human They are cocky, lustful, in love 

      cheeky, cheeky. 

1a Pan - in Greek mythology, the deity of gardens, jes and fields. 

      He is the son of the nymph Dryope and Hermes, introduces Pan 

      goat-legged, on his head he has goat horns, covered with a tuft on top 

      with wool. And known for his taste for wine and fun 

      full of passionate love and constantly chasing nymphs 

      H aodit on people causeless, panicky fear 

1 "In this case, it acts as a symbol (or its image) 

      fertilizing principle in nature, 

*' Tiberius (14-37 years), stepson of Octavian Augustus, oficia.ncho 

      adopted in the year 4 n l year by the name of Tiberius Yuchin Caesar 

      and in that capacity declared heir to the property of the princeps. 

      From 6 to 9 years. Tiberius was the commander of a huge Roman 



15* 



      army that suppressed the uprising in Pannonia. Immediately after the death of zyxwvuts 

                                                                     „ 

      Augustus, the Senate confirmed him in all the rights that he possessed 

      his predecessor. 

1;     t- in. K Iprian came from a noble family, received excellent, 

      education, was a lawyer, became famous as a scientist-rhetor 

      He accepted Christianity in the fortieth year of his life in 246 BtKopi 

      was appointed presbyter, and in 248 - bishop of Carthage 

      skim. Converted to Christianity, sold all his property, 

      and gave money to the poor. 

       At the beginning of the persecution under the emperor Valerian (253-260) 

       imprisoned, where, according to legend, he had a vision of 

      standing torment. Soon he was returned to Carthage, where he and 

      was executed. His body was buried by members of the Christian 

        yuschiny, and the collected blood was stored for a long time as a priceless pp 

        1ikvia. Cyprian died in 258. 

     Tertullian, Kvint Septimius Florence, famous theologian, and- 

      education lawyer, b. OK . 160 AD Exact date of acceptance 

       lm Christianity is unknown, however, in the opinion of the majority 

       researchers, until his death, he adhered to mon 

       .anist beliefs. He became famous for his writings of apologetics 

      and, to a lesser extent, dogmatic. Before 

      , 'of his passion for Montanism, Tertullian wrote treatises "On 

        crossing”, “About repentance”, “About patience”, “About idolatry” 

       it etc., in which he acted as a defender of orthodox chri 

         tyanism from heretics and attacks from pagans. Subsequently, 

      He paid much attention to the struggle and controversy with the Gnostics. Question < 

      • _ah personal behavior was very strict, prescribed a woman "- 1 

      lead a chaste life up to refusing a second marriage 

      Tertullian also formulated the seven most important deaths. 

       purulent sins - murder, idolatry, deceit, faith^ and 

         blasphemy, adultery and lewdness. 

^and   this. I eronym (c. 340-420), one of the most famous omoii 

        churches in the west. Before the adoption of Christianity, he received good 

      secular education. Subsequently - a monk and an ascetic. Wrote.- 

       f poison of church-historical writings (“About Famous Men” 

       "Chronicle"), teachings, sermons and treatises. Especially known 

         Gen for his translation of the Bible into Latin (the so-called Vulgate! 

     „"> actantius, Lucius Caelius Firmian (c. 250-c. 325), b, 

      emerging Christian writer. Born in Africa (according to others 

      data - in Italy), received a classical education and very good, 

      quickly became famous as a rhetorician and erkhotvorets. Before taking chri 

      from tianism was close to stoicism. Was personally invited by him 

        1 by Diocletian as a teacher of krasnors 

      chiya to the main school of the city of N and comedy, however, upon acceptance of cre 

        singing Lactantsy left this position. From 308 to 317 bp 

      teacher of the eldest son of Emperor Konstantin (ruled ZOO - 

      • '37). In his main work "Divine Ordinances * 1 

      t iya ”(304-311) Lactantius sought not only to disprove! 



      denounce the accusations made against Christianity by 

      educated Romans, but also to establish the systematic foundations 

      Christian teaching. According to the theologian, paganism is not 

      able to be neither true wisdom nor true religion 

      because in it these concepts are separated, while wisdom> 

      inseparable from religion and vice versa. And true worship of God 

      stands in virtue, understood in the Christian sense. In con 

      throughout the book, he expounds the chiliastic doctrine, foreshadowing the coming 

      end of the world in two hundred years and the beginning of a new millennium 

      but the kingdom of Christ. 

      The works of Lactantia, including “On the death of the persecutors of Christ- 

      ancestry", were highly valued by church criticism. For your red 

      in speech, he is even nicknamed the "Christian Ciceron." 

sang 



   And savrius and conoclast - meaning the Byzantine emperor 

    Leo and Savr (716-741), under which the iconoclastic 

   movement in Byzantium. 

"" Gregory the Great (in the Orthodox tradition - Dialog). Ro 

    went ok. 540, died 604 Pope 590-604 

    He came from a noble family Anitsiev. At one time he occupied 

   zhnost prefecta P has. With 577 - a monk. At his own expense 

   founded several monasteries in Sicily and Rome. S.Pshi- 

   Byshevsky alludes to those that were in circulation in the Renaissance 

    and especially at the beginning of modern times, legendary messages • 

    that he burned the Palatine Library, destroyed the arm 

   writings of the writings of Cicero and Titus Livius, destroyed monuments 

   antique sculpture. The groundlessness of such claims 

   was proven at the end of the 18th century, however, in the domestic 

   literature, such assessments of his activities were found 

    up until recently. 

   Theodosius II (the Younger) (c. 401-450), Byzantine emperor 

   ator from 408. Until 428 he ruled under the tutelage of his sister P ul 

   cherii; then until 441 he was under the influence of his wives) 

   Eudoxia. In the last years of the reign, power was 

   tically in the hands of the eunuch Chrysanths. In 442, forced to conclude 

    made peace with the leader of the vandals Geiseric, according to which 

   North Africa went to the vandals. During his reign Constant 

   tinopol was surrounded by powerful walls (413), a uni- 

   versity (425), published by the so-called. Code of Theodosius (438) - the first 

   code of early Byzantine law. 

   Aphrodite is the goddess of love and beauty in Greek mythology. 

   There are two versions of the origin of this goddess. Agreement, 

   first, she is the daughter of Zeus and Dione; according to the second, she gives birth 

   was born from the blood of Uranus, which fell into the sea, forming yen; 

   Aphrodite was represented as the goddess of fertility, eternal springs, 

   love power is subject to both gods and people     and life and, whose 

   only Athena, Artemis and Hestia are beyond their control. In Rome Afrs- 

   dita was revered under the name of Venus, thus considered 

   progenitor of the Romans through her son Aeneas. 



                                                              437 



26 Exorcism - a rite of exorcism, performed specifically 

    trained by a priest and conducted on a special 

    nym to nigami. However, it was officially believed that completely besi 

    can never be expelled from the human body. This is what caused 

    this remark by S.P. Shibyshevsky. 

27 "Lucifer" is sometimes translated as "morning star", i.e. Venus 

    There is an obvious play on words. The author is mistaken in the following; 

    Lucifer cannot conclude the day with the light of Venus, because. Venus. 

    having the movement opposite to the course of the Earth, in contrast to 

    other stars rise in the morning. 

^ Demon - in Greek mythology, a generalized idea of 

    some indefinite and unformed divine power, often 

    most of all evil. In many cases, it determines the fate of a person 

    century. It is an instantaneous appearing and instantaneously disappearing 

    terrible fatal force that cannot be called by any name 

    him and with whom it is impossible to enter into communication. And sometimes demons 

    they also called the Olympic gods, but only in a generalized way 

    or if the god did not manifest himself individually and concealed his 

    Name . Demons directly affect a person, preparing 

    he is in trouble, they seduce him, send troubles, ominous dreams. Every- 

    at home, a person is given his own demon in life, which determines 

    and character of a person. 

       In addition, demons were thought of as a category of deities of the lowest 

       a row, which were intermediaries between the highest gods and 

      people. Hesiod has the generation of the "golden age" after his 

       state of mind turns into “blissful demons” who oh- 

       injure people and observe right and wrong deeds 

       In Roman mythology, the demon corresponds to genius. early christs 

       The Ancestral idea of a demon is associated with the image of an evil, demonic 

       strength. Demons are the spirits of evil, wars, servants and accomplices of the devil, 

       "invisible enemies" of the human race. They are the embodiment of 

       solitary evil and all kinds of contacts with them, aimed at 

       doing something good is basically impossible. 

^     Theodore, bishop. Mopsuestian (or Mopsuestian), mind. in 429 

      a native of Antioch, comes from a rich and famous family. From 

       for his inclination towards the monastic life, coupled with a thirst 

       Doy knowledge, went to a monastery for a while. However, under 

      influence of his comrade, And John Chrysostom left from there and 

       embarked on serious theological work. zealous follower 

      Antioch Theological School. Bishop since 393. 

"     Konstantin I the Great (274-337), Roman emperor, son 

       To the station of Chlorus and Helena. Change is associated with his name 

       religious policy of the emperors towards the recognition of the Christian 

      stance. In 313, he issued the Edict of Milan, according to 

       to which all persecution of Christians was forbidden and but 

       any religion was placed in the category of permitted. P ri Konstantin? 

      the church acquired some property privileges, and in 

       during the struggle against Arianism, the Orthodox clergy received 



438 



    sometimes quite effective support from the imperial 

    Torah. However, Konstantin himself was baptized only before 

    death. Despite all the twists and turns of the imperial religious 

    politics, he is canonized as "equal to the apostles". Wednesday- 

    century-old Western Church was considered a model of Christian 

    ruler. Under Constantine, a law was actually passed 

    threatening sorcerers with punishments - they were deprived of their property and exiled 

    Lali. 

"* Valens (328-378), Roman emperor since 364. After 

    death in the specified year And ovian, the Roman army proclaimed 

    his emperor, Valentinian, who chose his companion 

    the rulers of brother Valens, giving him the eastern part of the empire. Wa- 

    tapes was distinguished by active persecution of Orthodox Christians 

    an, including Cyril I of Jerusalem, Meletios of Antioch- 

    sky. He allowed the settlement of the Gothic tribes on the Danube lands 

    la x, however, during the battle with the rebel Germans in the summer 

    378 was killed. 

32 Iamblichus (c. 280-c. 330), ancient philosopher, founder of 

    Syrian School of Neoplatonism, student of Porthirius, continued 

    who lived a mystical tradition in Neoplatonism. He belongs to 

    is the Code of Pythagorean Teachings. "Single" Plotina Yamv- 

    dashingly divided into two principles: "one", which is higher than any 

    understanding and being and above any name, and "one", 

    which is the beginning of everything and deserves to be named in 

    as "one" and "good". Iamblichus sought to restore 

    ancient religion with its rites, miracles and prophecies, 

    to the restoration of her entire cult. S.P. Shibyshevsky's indication of 

    that Iamblichus was forced to end his life under 

    Valente, somewhat contradicts the truth, since it is unlikely 

    It is clear that the future emperor began the persecution of the philosopher in two 

    summer age. 

Mass is the liturgy of the Catholic Church. Into the content of the mass 

    includes the reading of prayers, chants, accompanied by an organ. Behind- 

    The mass ends with the rite of communion. 

Bacchanalia - festivities in honor of the god Bacchus, the Roman counterpart 

    Dionysus, who in Greek mythology was the god of fruit-bearing 

    forces of the earth, vegetation, viticulture and winemaking. Exactly 

    he taught the people how to grow the vine. In the holiday 

    in a procession, people dressed up in the clothes of his companions - 

    shooting ranges, bacchantes, etc. According to legend, the companions of Bacchus fell 

    into sacred madness, drinking the blood of torn beasts. Di- 

    onis freed people from their worries, plunging them into a state of unrestrained 

    great fun and enjoyment. 

35 And the Virgin Mary is meant. 

"° Noah - the tenth and last of the antediluvian patriarchs in the direct 

    line from Adam, son of Lamech, born in 1056 from creation 

    peace. 



                                                              439 



3fzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

    Hades, Hades - in Greek mythology, the god is the lord of the kingdom 

    the dead, as well as the kingdom itself. 

38 Eusebius, ep. Caesarean (c. 260-340), one of the highest 

    given church leaders of the first half of the fourth century 

    ka, "father of church history." After 324, he became close to them 

    operator Konstantin, participated in the work of the First Universe 

    Cathedral of Nicaea in 325. Author of "Church History" 

     "Biography of Emperor Constantine" and other works 

    apologetic, polemical and historical character. 

"Raban Maurus (c. 780-856), figure in the Carolingian revival 

    niya, student of Alcuin, since 832 abbot of the Fulda monastery, 

    from 847 Archbishop of Mainz. Advisor to Louis Blago- 

    the righteous and his son. Author of numerous essays, 

    in a way, textbooks for church schools to ol. 

40 F legeton, Kotsit, Styx - the rivers of Hades. 

* * Charon - in Greek mythology, the carrier of the dead in Hades 

    And he is depicted as a gloomy old man dressed in rags. Charon re- 

    carries the dead along the waters of underground rivers, receiving payment for this 

    in 1 obl. It transports only those dead whose bones have found 

    peace in the grave. 

"The author probably means the Messalian sect, an ascetic movement 

    zhenie, which originated in the IV century in the east in some monas- 

    the six communities of Syria and Asia Minor. The only remedy 

    salvation, they considered prayer, and therefore put it above 

    Total. According to the teachings of the Messalians, each person, by virtue of 

    coming from Adam, brings with him an evil demon into the world, during 

    whose authority he resides. To the decision is not able to deliver 

    man from this companion, and only prayer has salvation 

    body force. The Messalians denied the trinity of persons in God, 

    considering faces as forms of the same God. In the 11th century this 

    the sect reappears in France, but already under its second 

    name - "Evhity". According to their teaching, God the Father had two Sons 

    newer - the elder, Satanail and the younger, Christ. senior state 

    ruled over everything earthly, and the younger - over everything heavenly 

    The Elder quarreled with the Father and founded an independent 

    kingdom; the younger remained faithful to the Father. Satanail's kingdom 

    in the end will be destroyed, and for salvation, it is necessary to 

    lithuania and striving for moral perfection. Big me- 

    one hundred Euchytes averted religious exaltation, during which 

    they received revelations and were granted visions of spirits. Among 

    they met many people who practiced magic. Maybe, 

    the author writes about the second sect. 

* "Sixtus V (1585-1590), pope. Real name Felice 

    P eretti. Born December 13, 1521 in Grottamar in a poor 

    family. He entered the Franciscan Order, where he very soon 

    poured to ak one of the best preachers and conductor of ideas 

    Cathedral of Trent. Paul IV entrusted him with the functions of the inquisi- 

    tor in Venice, and Pius V appointed him a cardinal and general 



440 



    orders. During the pontificate of Gregory XIII, Peretti was 

    out of work, because dad just couldn’t stand him. Ascending the papal 

    throne, he vowed to put an end to robbery and banditry, 

    who lived in Rome and on the roads leading to it. Caught times- 

    the fighters were executed, and their heads were put on the bridge in front of the deputy 

    com St. Angel. In addition, he reformed the Roman Curia; 

    improved the city. 

4 

  ^ Meaning Anselm of Canterbury (1033-1109), you- 

    a prominent medieval scholastic theologian and ecclesiastical figure. 

    Born in Piedmont, from 1060 a monk, from 1093 Archbishop Ken 

    terbury. 

    Antichrist - the word has two meanings: the enemy of Christ and 

    False Christ. The second meaning is the most important because it is 

    this person will come to earth and it will be with him that he will fight 

    Jesus Christ. 

AL 

   The answer of the Jews to the words of Pilate, Matt. 27.25. 

4 7 

   Probably, the following words from the "Song of Levia- 

    fane": "On earth there is no likeness to him, he was created fearless. 

    He looks at everything high (with contempt). He is king over all 

    proud beasts ”(Job. 41.25-26. Quoted from: M.I. Rizh- 

    sky. Book of Job. M. 1991. S. 82.). 

^° Mani (216-273), founder of Manichaeism. Origin 

    Iranian from a wealthy Parthian family. His father was a member of the sect 

   Elhaizites (according to the views of the related sect of the Essenes among the Jews 

    Stian). Mani believed in God and the devil, in heaven and hell, in three epochs, 

    to the posthumous judgment, the final victory over evil, eternal life 

    the righteous. According to the teachings of Mani, this world is a complete 

   effacement of evil, that is why he himself completely renounces the application 

   understanding of everything worldly. Zoroastrianism, Christianity, Buddhism 

   all this is one and the same true faith, distorted by human non- 

   understanding. According to legend, he preached his doctrine 

   not only in Persia, but also in Central Asia, India, China. To him 

    seven religious and ethical writings were attributed (“The Book 

   giants”, etc.). The followers of Mani were divided into elected 

    nyh and ministers. The former had to renounce all 

   bodily pleasures, from everything that could darken the heavenly 

   light; the requirements for the latter were not so 

   ditches. Both of these categories could achieve immortality through 

   vom cleansing in the lake located on the moon (baptism of heaven 

   water), and consecration by solar baptism (baptism is not 

   demonic fire). 

49 Gnosis (gnosticism) is a philosophical doctrine that has absorbed 

   features of Christianity and pagan philosophy. Comes from Greek 

   Greek "gnosis" - knowledge. Christian ideas about Tro- 

   the faces of the Gnostics were transformed into the Great Triad, oli- 

   the personified Mother, Demiurge and Redeemer. Parts of God 

   natural Being, the higher outflows are called zones. They 

   form a plerona, i.e. the fullness of the mind. Gnostics divided people 



                                                               L L1 



       into three categories: 1) connected and limited by matter, earthly 

      People; 2) spiritual people reaching the Divine light 

      (pneumatics); 3) able to rise to the Demiurge (psyche). 

       From the very beginning, this current was divided into three groups and many 

       the existence of sects that mixed the ideas of pantheism in their teaching, 

       monotheism, the theoretical provisions of Plato, Heraclitus with 

       Christian mysticism. 

5 0 

      Manichaeism is the teaching of Maya. In Europe, it has received wide distribution 

       spread in Southern Gaul, Spain already in the first centuries AD. 

       A peculiar "revival" of the ideas of Manichaeism occurs during 

       the emergence of related movements - Bogomilism, Catharism and 

       etc. This doctrine arose in the Middle East in the III century and 

      is a synthesis of the Chaldean-Babylonian, Persian and Christian 

      Stian myths. A certain influence on him was exerted by the gnostic 

       cism. Mani first fully accepted Christianity and even 

      was a presbyter in Agvatz, but for following the idea of dualism was 

      excommunicated from the church. According to the Manichaean doctrine, in the world 

       Initially, there are two kingdoms: the kingdom of good and light and the kingdom 

      matter, evil and darkness. The first consists of five pure elements 

       - fire, water, light, air and earth; second of the five impure 

      - storms, fog, mud, etc. The god of the first kingdom is surrounded 

      pure spirits - zones, the second - the spirits of darkness. goes between the gods 

      constant struggle. One day the demons saw an attractive 

      the brilliance of the kingdom of light and out of envy attacked him. But the father of light 

      to protect the borders of his kingdom, he made out of himself the Aeon-Mother 

      life, which is already for a direct fight with the spirits 

      darkness produced another new zone - the First Man, whom 

      the Manichaeans called Christ, and so on. First person with five chi- 

      shy elements entered the fight against the demons, but weakened in the course of 

      her to the point that the demons managed to take over part of his light 

      creatures. In such circumstances, the Father of Light produced on 

      the power to him of one more zone - the Life-Giving Spirit. This Spirit is 

      frees from danger the unsinned part of the First Man and 

      puts her in the sun. This part of the zone is the passionless Jesus, 

      or the Son of Man, but the part swallowed up by the kingdom of darkness, 

      - Suffering Jesus. To put a limit on liberation 

      suffering Jesus, Satan invited his spirits to collect all 

      parts of the world that are in the kingdom of darkness into one place and concluded 

      them into matter. Having done all this, Satan thus creates 

      man in the image of the First Man, whose beauty he was 

      amazed. So that the rational soul does not know about its spiritual 

      origin. Satan planned to split the mind of the soul. From ma- 

      teria and the rest of the world, he creates a wife in whom 

      takes precedence matter, sensuality. Rational soul, divided 

      naya on individual personalities, is crushed into small particles, which 

      which are conveniently kept in material bodies as in dungeons. 

      In an effort to free his suffering half, Impassionate 

      Jesus descends to earth, taking the form of a man - Christ. 



442 



* "1 In this case, Avignon is used as an allegory. In XIV 

     century, from 1309 to 1377, there was the residence of the Roman 

     dads. The population of Rome, political forces, dissatisfied 

     journey of the curia to France, during the controversy they sometimes used 

     in relation to the Avignon popes, the term "antichrist". 

°2 In the thousandth year, the church and the whole of European society expected 

     the end of the world; such sentiments were cultivated in addition to 

     general theological constructions by objective historical circumstances 

     events - natural disasters, epidemics, raids 

     Hungarians, etc., which entailed an increase in such expectations 

     of 

5 3 

    Otto I the Great (912–7.5.973), king since 936, emperor since 

     962, representative of the Saxon dynasty. In the fight against the separatist 

     tymism of the dukes (especially Swabia, B accident, Lorraine) describe 

     rallied against the episcopate and abbots, endowing them with extensive property 

     military privileges. He handed over to the bishops 

     separate parts of the ducal territories. Otto continued to 

     evasion of the lands of the Polabian Slavs, creating on the occupied lands 

     two large marks and. With him began conquests 

     in and waist. In 951, under the guise of helping the exiled 

     the Roman population to Pope John XII, undertook a campaign against 

     R im. And using the decline in which the papacy was, 

     In spite of his power, Otto actually made him an instrument of his 

     politicians. 

"   Sylvester II (999-1003), pope. According to Benedic- 

    tinsk historian William Malmesbury, he was born in France 

    tions. He was originally a monk at the Abbey of Aurignac in Auvergne. 

    Then he fled to Spain, where for several years he studied with the Arabs. 

    scientists natural sciences. According to legend, there he began to 

    take in astrology and magic. Chronicler Sigebert (d. 1113) 

    assured that since Sylvester did not repent, he was carried away by the black 

    volume. 

"° Perhaps we are talking about the approval of the Archbishop of Rei- 

    Moscow five-year-old son of Count Hugh of Vermandois. This appointment 

    was approved by Pope John X (914-928). 

°° We are talking about Marozia, the daughter of the Roman Theophylact, the former 

    mistress of Pope Sergius III (904-911), whose son became 

    later pope under the name of John XI, and also about Theodore 

    The eldest, the wife of Theophylact, who put him on the papal pre- 

    table of Landon (913-914) and John X (914-928). By 

    according to the chronicler Liutprand, And John X was the lover of Te- 

    odors. In addition, Marozia were subsequently erected on 

    the papacy of Leo VI (928) and Stephen VII (928-931). 

°' Gregory VI (1045-1046), pope, also known as 

    named John Gratian. Descended from the Jewish family of Pier- 

    leoni. K drank the papal title from Benedict IX for 2000 denarii 

    silver. 



• ^ Gregory VII (1073-1085), Pope. All my activities 

     nost sent to strengthen the Roman church. In 1075 

     issued a decree forbidding simony and introducing celibacy. Author 

     essay "The Dictate of the Pope", which proclaimed the right 

     pope to be supreme lord and determine the fate of all the world- 

     feudal lords. To the ultimate goal of his activity, he considered 

     the building of the theocratic state throughout Europe. 

5 9 

    Calling Gregory a "fanatic monk-pope" is not entirely correct. 

     vomer, because . his monasticism is not an indisputable fact. 

60 Pyotr Damiani (1007-1072), a representative of the early scholastic 

     to and , headed the monastery school in Ravenna, bishop, then 

     cardinal of the Catholic Church. He was a supporter of theocracy 

     chess program, strongly opposed simony. One of 

     the greatest theologians and scientific authorities of their time. 

6 

  * Peter of Lombard (d. 1164), philosopher and theologian. Was born 

     in Italy, studied in Bologna, Paris, where he listened to the lectures of Peter 

     Abelard. He taught theology at the school at the Cathedral of Paris 

     Mother of God. In 1159-1160. Archbishop of Paris. In his 

     the main work of the "Sentence" based on the Bible and writings 

     Church Fathers gives a systematic exposition of the Catholic 

     goslovia. This book has been used to combat various 

     heretical sects until the beginning of the 16th century. 

    Aristotle (384-322 BC), ancient Greek philosopher and 

     scientist, born in Stagira. His father Nikomah was a courtier 

     physician to the Macedonian king Amyntas II. Becoming already known fi- 

     philosopher, Aristotle took the post of educator of Alexander, 

     current king of Macedon. His writings have been translated into la 

     the Tin language in the Middle Ages, forming the basis of numerous 

     scholastic comments. 

°° Haroun al Rashid (r. 786-809), fifth caliph 

     from the Abbasid dynasty. 

"" * Abu Ali ibn Sina (lat. Avicenna) (980-1037) - philosopher, 

     physician, naturalist and poet. Put forward a position on the 

     the proper existence of religion and philosophy, the independence 

     philosophy as a science and based on the achievements of human 

     mind. The derogatory characterization given to him by P shi- 

     Byshevsky, to put it mildly, is not accurate. 

°5 Thomas Aquinas (1225-1274), an outstanding medieval 

     scientist and theologian, systematizer of orthodox scholasticism. 

     Born near Aquino in the Kingdom of Naples. Studied at 

     monastery in Monte Cassino, then in Naples. In 1244 he joined 

     drank in the Dominican order. Education completed under the supervision of 

     leadership of Albert von Bolstedt in Paris and Cologne 

     universities. In 1269-1272. led the 

     Riga University struggle against Averroism. Referred to 

     whether to the saints in 1323 

     Thomas Aquinas ultimate goal and root cause of his su- 

     whom he considered God. The essence of God and his being are identical 



444 



    n s. Matter perceives forms changing each other and 

    that does not exist outside the form. Made a great contribution to the study 

    Christian angelology and demonology, speaking at the same time 

    against witches, sorcerers and all kinds of magic. 

66 John Dune Scotus (1265-1308), scholastic philosopher, theologian. W from- 

    native of Lland, studied at Oxford, where he was accepted 

    order of the Dominicans. One of the main points of his teaching is 

    the question of the relationship of theology to philosophy, of faith to knowledge. 

    The subject of theology is God, the subject of philosophy is being. From- 

    here philosophy can comprehend God not as God, but 

    whether sh as being. Scott's followers opposed 

    supporters of Thomas Aquinas. Here and below P Shibyshevsky 

    unjustifiably exaggerates and distorts the essence of scholastic discussions 

    between realists and nominalists who tried to solve the complex 

    the most important problem of the particular and the general, form and content, 

    cause and effect. 

R7 

°'   Here the author means, most likely, Zoroastrianism. 

     Plato (428-348 BC), ancient Greek philosopher whose 

      views were not rejected by Christians and had a great influence 

      (along with Aristotelianism) to scholasticism and the whole philosophy of the middle 

      age and the Renaissance in general. 

     Pierre Abelard (1079-1142), French theologian and philosopher. 

      Studied in Paris at the cathedral school with Guillaume of Champagne 

      The ancient religion, recognized by him as natural, was considered 

      the christian of Christianity. Abelard claimed superiority 

      free thought, for he declared thinking as the norm of truth, which 

      which not only makes the content of faith intelligible to reason, 

      but “in doubtful cases leads to an independent decision 

      shenia". To the criterion of truth, he considered her agreement with the 

      which, in turn, is the natural moral 

      a law that applies to all people. The deed that is being done 

      according to conscience, cannot be recognized as sinful. Teaching 

      nie Abelard was condemned at Soissons in 1121 and Sansky 

      1140 cathedrals. P anegirical characteristic given by this 

      mu philosopher P Shibyshevsky, is characteristic of many works in 

      last century. In our country, Abelard's "positivity" 

      has long been defined by the fact that he fought against Bernard 

      K Lervossky, the most prominent religious thinker and political 

      figure of the first half of the XII century, ideas and activities 

      which were considered reactionary. 

7P 

     The personal qualities of Abelard as a man were not so majestic 

      venny, as his theoretical knowledge. This man was very 

      proud, arrogant, selfish and quite cruel 

      and cynical towards women, in whom, even in 

      Eloisa, he wanted to see something that would constantly admire 

      them (see his letters to Eloisa). 

71 

' 1 And I mean Anselm of Canterbury. 



^2 Arnold of Brescia (c. 1100-1155), Italian religio 

    giozny and politician, a student of Abelard. ledge a' 

    against the wealth and luxury of the Catholic clergy. Returning 

    living after his exile in Italy (c. 1145), he again began 

    preaching, demanding freedom and independence 

    from popes and emperors. Hiding in Campania, dad was caught 

    court, hanged and then burned. His ashes were thrown into 

    Tiber. 

^3 Люций zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFED 

            II (1144-1145), pope. P bend during demon 

    orders in Rome - without waiting for help from the emperor 

    Torah, gathered a detachment And attacked the Apitol hill, where 

    the Senate spoke. Killed during the battle. 

  * Eugene III (1145-1153), pope. Bernard's student 

    To Lervossky. Almost all the time of his pontiff ikat was 

    outside of Rome, captured by supporters of Arnold Bre 

    Xian. The Pope was able to return to Rome only in 1153, 

    by signing an aid treaty with Friedrich Barbarossa. 

"Averroes (Ibn Rushd, 1126-1198), Arab philosopher from Kor 

    dovy, interpreter of Aristotle. According to Averroes, matter 

    on, and God only contributes to the actualization in the world of eternal 

    forms. Religion is below philosophy and must accommodate 

    to her his teaching. And the individual soul is mortal, but immortal 

    the world mind is an infinite substance acting from outside 

    on individual souls and common to all. 

'" Kabbalah (Heb. "tradition") - a mystical movement in Judaism 

    Abbalism finally took shape by the 13th century among the Jews 

    And Spain and France. The main work of the book is the Zohar. To heaven 

    The cornerstone of Kabbalah is the doctrine of the Ensof (infinite 

    nom); this concept has no definition, since any 

    the definition is limiting. Ensof is sub 

    station, immanent cause, active and passive beginning 

    peace. 

'' Frederick II Shtaufen (1194-1250), German king from 1212 

     g., emperor since 1220. Was unusually widely educated for 

     of his time, spoke several languages, showed interest 

     to the sciences, especially to the natural ones, the author of the treatise “On the Art 

     hunting with birds”. Founded a number of schools and Neapolitan 

     university (1224), showed religious tolerance, allowing 

     giving to Arabs and Jews. 

7 8 

    Richard I the Lionheart (1157-1199), King of England 

     1189, representative of the Angevin dynasty of Plantagenets, son 

     Henry II and Eleanor of Aquitaine, brother John Landless 

     go. One of the leaders of the III Crusade. 

    And it means Salah ad-Din (Saladin) (1138-1193), Sultan 

     Egypt since 1171, founder of the Ayyubid dynasty, by origin 

     Denia Kurd. P patron of enlightenment. 



446 



8 0 

    Henry II Planthagenet (1133-1189), English king from 

     1154, son of Queen Matilda of England and French 

     Count Jean of Froy Plantagenet. 

°1 John B without land (1167-1216), King of England from 1199 

     d., younger son of Heinrich P. 

8 2 

    Saint Louis IX (1214-1270), French king from 

     Dynasty K apetingov since 1226 

     trip to North Africa. 

33 Chernobog is an evil god in Balto-Slavic mythology who brings 

     misfortune. In the "Slavic Chronicle" by Helmold, the author of the XII century, 

     a ritual of a feast is described, at which they let a round bowl 

     and cast a spell on behalf of two gods - good and 

     evil. On the basis of this opposition, the pa- 

     ra Belobog - Chernobog, the embodiment of the oppositions of "black- 

     something is white, happiness is misfortune, etc. In Old Norse 

     Nitlingasaga mentions the god of Blackheads, depicted in the form 

     an idol with a silver mustache. 

°^ Bogomilstvo is a dualistic doctrine that appeared in the 10th century 

     and quickly spread in the Balkan countries. originated 

     it is in Bulgaria, its formal ancestor was pop Bo- 

     Gomil, about whose life very little is known. According to the teachings 

     Bogomilov, the Supreme God had a firstborn son, Satanai- 

     la, who wanted to become independent of the Father and with a part 

     spirits subordinate to him rebelled against him, for which he was lowered 

     cast down from heaven by the Father. Then Satanail decided to found his own 

     independent kingdom. He created the visible world and the body of Adam, 

     but could not give him a living soul. That's why he turned to 

     a request to the Father to send divine breath for 

     reviving a person. At the same time, he said that he would be in power 

     howl over the bodily nature of man, and the Father over the spiritual and 

     that man with his spiritual nature will replace the Father of fallen an- 

     gels. However, then Satanael decided to completely subdue his race 

     human. To do this, he entered the 3rd Mey, seduced Eve and 

     fathered Cain and his sister Calomena from her. And it was Satanail 

     created the seas and oceans, created plants and animals. 

0 0 

    In the south of France there have always existed not just "all sorts of" heresies, 

     but precisely dualistic. Shortly after its historic 

     appearance here, Manichaeism is found, in the 4th century it was widely 

     Priscillianism spread. In the 6th century, Proven- 

     Sal Paulicianism, in the views of which one can trace 

     strong Neoplatonist influence. This heresy denied all 

     the outside of the cult, hierarchy and church organization. 

     Finally, at the beginning of the 11th century, bogomilism also appeared here. 

8 6 

    Smael (Samael) - in Jewish demonology, an evil spirit, often 

     identified with Satan. His other name is M alhiriya, king 

     evil. In Coptic Gnostic texts, Small acts as 

     evil demiurge. He is a great demon, lord of the lower part 

     hell and chaos. And sometimes he was identified with a hostile vet- 



     covenant God-creator; in such cases he was called Sava 

     ofom. 

^ Nitzsche, Friedrich Wilhelm (1844-1900), eminent 

     German idealist philosopher, author of the well-known works “So Go 

     Zarathustra stole", "The Will to Power", etc. 

^ 8 "perfect" - originally the Cathars were divided into "perfect 

     n s”, “believers” and “sympathizers”. "Perfect" are 

     were spreaders of the faith and organizers. They led 

     very strict life, observed ascetic rules and 

     kept a vow of celibacy, ate nothing three times a week, 

     besides bread and water, and observed a forty-day fast for four 

     times a year. They were not engaged in any kind of work, so to ak ig. 

     activities in general consisted of preaching. 

&9 Cathars is the name of a medieval dualistic sect that arose 

     шей в XI векеzyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPO 

                      in the south of France. This term is most likely 

     comes from the Greek word for "pure". IIpovHB- 

     niki Qatar deduced the origin of this term from the German 

     whom the word denoting k osh k y, due to the habit of katar sobi 

     fight at night. 

9" There is no reason to talk about hatred of Christianity, 

     for the Cathars called themselves true Christians and set 

     its goal is the restoration of true Christianity, which would 

     lo is perverted by the fathers of the Catholic Church, against which they, 

     in fact, they performed. 

    According to the teachings of the atars, the world was created by an evil God, Satan, about whom 

     and it is said in the Old Testament, unlike the good God, nevi 

     dim Father, whose son was Christ. 

    Let's try to understand the Qatari cult using the example of baptism. 

     First of all, it must be borne in mind that the Cathars did not deny 

     baptism to such that they were forced to admit even 

     inquisitors. However, they denied the benefits of water cream. 

     communion, conducting instead of it another, spiritual, which was called 

     laying on of hands. They denied the baptism of children; admission to a sect 

     preceded by a probationary period of several years, 

     during which the subject traveled around the country, accompanied by 

     leader of the perfect, thus becoming acquainted with his future 

     life. In traditional Christian baptism, this is about 

     the series is preceded by an introduction to faith; people who 

     rushed to be baptized, called catechumens, and their term 

     trials lasted from several months to several years. 

     The birth of children appeared in the 2nd century, but until the 4th century there was no 

     accepted universally because it was considered illegal. At 

     careful reading of the Acts of the Apostles and their Epistles shows that 

     that water baptism was followed by the laying on of hands. This auto- 

     swarm rite was called baptism in the spirit and without it, water baptism 

     the prayer was considered insufficient: “Pavel ... arrived at Ephesus and, 

     finding some disciples there, he said to me: Have you accepted 

     Holy Spirit, believe? They said to him: We don't even 



448 



     heard that there is a Holy Spirit. He said to them: What are you 

     baptized? They answered: in John's baptism! P avel said 

     them: And John baptized with baptism until ayan iya, telling people to 

     believed in him who would come after him, that is, in Christ and Jesus. Conditions 

     having done this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord and Jesus, and when 

     Paul laid hands on them, and the Holy Spirit descended on them, and 

     they began to speak with other tongues and prophesy (Acts. 

     19.1-6). Comparing the above, it becomes clear that 

     Cathars tried to follow the true (apostolic) Christ 

     anstvu. If, however, P Shibyshevsky really considers the rites 

     Qatar is a parody of the Catholic, then this only testifies to 

     how far Catholics have gone from apostolic Christianity. 

 U "P Shibyshevsky again uncritically repeats the main provisions 

     of anti-Qatari writings. Actually Qatari 

     communion looked like this: at the beginning of each 

     months, the Cathars gathered together with their believers or 

     separately and blessed the bread. Holding it in my hands and hanging on 

     neck towel and something white, they said a prayer 

     God and then divided the bread into small pieces. P 

     remonia was described by St. Justin and related to the time 

     original Christianity. All this was done in deep 

     secret, so that neither here nor in other sacraments is there anything in common 

     with the Sabbath, as P Shibyshevsky writes, no. 

"" * The Cathars did not accept the cross, because they considered it a tool 

     torture and murder of Christ. 

"° In Toulouse, the Cathars had a bishop, one of five in South France 

     tion, and no pope, although, according to sources, they recognize 

     Validate the supremacy of the Bogomil Pope N and K and you. No special 

     The Cathars did not have a Ra in Lyon. The only one we know 

     the Cathar Council took place in 1167 near Toulouse, 

     It was chaired by Nikita himself, who specializes in this 

     arrived from Constantinople. At this cathedral he was condemned 

     modified dualism To oncorezzo and elected bishops on 

     vacant cafes. 

^ ° Languedoc - a region in the south of France, occupying land from Pe- 

     Rigara, Dauphine, etc. to Catalonia and Savoy. 

"' St. Dominic (Domenico de Guzman) - founder of the Order of the Dominic 

     nikans. Born in 1170 in Castile, died in 1221. 

     At the age of fourteen he entered the University of Valencia. In 1204 

     the city ends up in the south of France, where for the first time it encounters 

     Albigensians. During the crusades he followed with his 

     followers of the army, acting as an investigative team 

     missions. Permission to establish the order was given by the pope already 

     after the defeat of the Albigenses. From 1233 into the hands of the Dominicans 

     in fact, control of the Inquisition was transferred. 

9 

  ^ Simon IV, Comte de Montfort (1160-1218), crusader. IN 

     1190-1200 fought in the Middle East; in 1208 became 

     at the head of a campaign against the Albigensians. In 1213, near Muret, he defeated 



                                                                449 



     troops of Pedro II of Aragon and Raymond VI of Toulouse. Killed 

     at the siege of Toulouse. 

 9 9 According to the Russian historian N.A. Osokin, when taking Beziers 

     20,000 people died. 

     Abbot Sito - the head and ideologist of the 1211 campaign against the Cathars. 

      Full name Arnold of Sieve, later Archbishop of Narbonne. 

      In a report to the pope, sent by him after the capture of Beziers, he says 

      says: “While the barons were discussing how to release those who were 

      in the city of Christians, some rash heads, people of vile rank 

      and almost unarmed, went on the attack and after two or three 

      hours already took possession of the moat and walls, and the city of Béziers was taken, 

      moreover, 20,000 people fell by the sword. Great was the beating 

      enemies, the whole city was plundered - a wonderful testimony 

      terrible judgment of God. Here it is not visible that Arnold regrets 

      lel about what he had done, rather he justified himself before the pope for you 

      needy cruelty and bloodshed. 

      Innocent III (1160-1216), pope from 1198 

      its origin from the family of the Dukes of Spoleto. Real name 

      Lothario Conti, Count of Segni. Left a huge correspondence, co- 

      works of a moral and ascetic nature. Achieved uninterrupted 

      the influence of secular authorities in church affairs. 

100 

     N.A. Osokin's capture of Carcassonne is described differently. After taking 

     Beziers crusaders moved to Carcassonne, set it on fire before 

     revenge and took it by storm. Then a few days both sides 

     waited. The Aragonese king doi Pedro came to the city with 

     a hundred knights, so that the forces were unequal, since 

     Viscount Beziers had only 400 knights, and the total number of 

     Inov-crusaders exceeded 50,000 people. Abbot Sito 

      demanded the unconditional surrender of the city, promising free passage 

     only the viscount and 11 barons. The Viscount refused and Don Pedro, not 

     having obtained the consent of the besieged, he returned to Aragon. In this mo- 

      a papal legate arrived in the army of the crusaders, for a negotiation 

      with which Viscount Beziers was captured and taken into custody. 

      Then the Carcassonians lost heart and, using the underground passage, 

      sting - some to Toulouse, others to the Spanish border. crusader- 

      The tsy entered the already deserted city, without meeting any resistance. 

      tivleniya due to the lack of townspeople. 

101 

    Another name for the Southern French heresy, which included not 

    only dualistic catharism. 

102 With the fact that the south was destroyed and fell into decay, it is difficult to argue, 

    however, with regard to the death penalty of local feudal lords, it is impossible 

    speak with such confidence. Of the most famous figures 

    only two of the Albigensian movement died in prison - Baron 

    Beziers and Baron Thermae. 

103 It would be more accurate to say *anti-Catholic Toulouse. 

104 It is difficult to assume the existence of this slogan among the Cathars, known 

    with his forbearance. By the way, Pshibyshevsky himself refutes 



450 



       himself, speaking below about the presence of this sin precisely in the environment of catho- 

       personal priesthood. 

       Rigaud, Ed (d. 1275), Archbishop of Rouen from 1248 Possible 

        translator's error, because most likely the name should be here 

       Rigor, who lived a hundred years earlier and really was 

       chronistome), 

       St. Bertin - it is not entirely clear who the author means. Holy c 

       lived by this name much earlier, 612-709. 

1 07 

       Philip IV the Handsome, French king from 1285-1314 Leading 

       struggle with England, taxed the French clergy 

       to cover military costs. In 1296, the Pope published 

       bull in which, without naming Philip, he threatened to be excommunicated 

       from the church to all the laity who impose taxes on the clergy. 

       The king responded to this by forbidding the export of dragons from France. 

       precious metals. Then the pope made concessions - to the clergy 

       making voluntary donations to the needs of 

       states. However, the hostility soon resumed, because in 

       the field of foreign policy, the pope supported England. In 1301 

       a papal legate was arrested in France, and the following year 

       Philip summoned the deputies of all estates, who spoke 

       against the pope and solemnly declared that the king had received 

       ronu from God, not from the pope. In response to this, Boniface VIII 

       convened a council in Rome, condemning the actions of the French. Dad on- 

       stood on the responsibility of the secular authorities to the spiritual and 

       absolute spiritual incompetence. At the return meeting, 

       leaders of French society, associate of the king, lawyer 

       Guillaume Nogaret accused the pope of various crimes and 

       let the king arrest him and hold a trial. 

1 OS 

       Edward I (1239-1307), English king from 1272 from 

       nastia of the Plantagenets. He imposed a ban on the right of the church to 

       acquire land. He died on a trip to Scotland. 

109 

       Those. Pope Boniface VIII, previously a lawyer, apostle 

       a notary public and a lawyer at the Consistory. 

       Inspection of the remains, carried out during the renovation of the tomb, shows 

       hall that dad at the time of his death was a little over fifty 

       years. Guillaume Nogaret, sent to arrest the pope, entered 

       relics of the Column in the papal palace in Anagni, where at that time on- 

       Boniface walked. The Pope managed to return to Rome and soon he 

       died (11 October 1303). 

       Celestine V, Pope 1292-1294 

112 

       Benedict XI, Pope 1303-1304 From a shepherd's family. 

       He died as if he had eaten too many figs given to him, but this version 

       did not receive confirmation, as, however, was not refuted 

       bent. 

       As for the "mad bull", it was issued by Boniface VIII 

       18.XI.1302 and it dealt with the relationship between the secular and spiritual 

       goddamn power. 

                                                                 451 



1 1 3 

        Raymond Bertrand de Gault, Pope Clement V (1305-1314). Was 

         canon in Bordeaux, vicar general of Lyons, then pope 

         chaplain and archbishop of Bordeaux. Active member 

         process of the Templars. 

        Templars, Templars - a military monastic order founded 

         in 1119 in Jerusalem shortly after the 1st Crusade and received 

         named after the location of the original residence 

         tsii - the place where, according to legend, the temple of Solomon the boy was located. 

         Order of the Knights Templar, founded ostensibly to protect pilgrims 

         and the lands conquered by the crusaders from the Muslims, soon 

         reverted to the largest landowner and banker in Western 

         Europe, mainly in France. Under high interest 

         he provided loans to the French king and other high- 

         appointed persons. Abbot John Trittenheim at the beginning of the XVI 

         V. declared that the order of the templars was the richest of the or- 

        money in Europe. According to later estimates, the annual income 

         templars was 20 million. gold thalers. To the conflict Fi 

        Lippa IV with Pope B Oneface VIII, when the Templars accepted 

         side of the pontiff, showed that the knights-monks, using 

        supported by the Roman Curia, it is difficult, despite the 

         king, accuse of heresy on the sole ground that 

        they were neutral in the Albigensian wars. Phillip first 

         asked to be accepted as a knight of the order, then through Pope Kliment 

        V proposed to merge the Templar Order with its permanent 

        rivals - the Order of St. John. Having received a refusal, Philipp 

        put a list of accusations, incriminating them, in particular, 

        blasphemy, renunciation of Christ and other blasphemous deeds 

        niya. In the spring of 1307 Climent V summoned the Master of the Order from Cyprus 

        Jacques de Molay, who was preparing an expedition to Syria there. At the end 

        September by chancellor, who was supposed to lead the process, in view of 

        refusal of the Archbishop of N Arbonne, Guillaume N Ogaret was appointed. 

        In October 1307, many members of the order were arrested, and 

        order houses and castles were placed under the supervision of the queen 

        sky authorities. And it is known that shortly before his arrest, Jacques de 

        Mole burned many documents and manuscripts belonging to the 

        Denu. In 1310, in Paris, near the monastery of St. Anthony were 

        54 knights of the order were burned. On April 3, 1312, the pope announced the bul 

        lu, according to which the order was dissolved. March 13, 1314 

        stood before the court and were condemned by the master of the order and the prior 

        Normandy Geoff Froy de Charnay. March 18 they were burned 

        on Jewish Island opposite the royal palace. 

        And I mean Jean Vaudin (1529-1596), French right- 

        Vedas, demonologist, political thinker. P shibyshevsky talk- 

        rit about his book "The Demonomania of the Witches", published in 1580, in 

        which he writes about the deeds of the devil, sets out in detail all the su- 

        the ideas that existed then about witches, witchcraft, about sha- 

        bashakh, etc. Boden firmly believed in the reality of the demonic world. 





452 



         and witch deeds, called to punish not only witches 

         all those who do not believe in their existence. 

         According to other sources, he was accused of poisoning 

         Queen Blanc to N of Avarr. He managed to pay off the obvi- 

         neniya, having paid a large sum to Blanc's daughter, Zhanna Soup 

         Philip K handsome. However, three years after the death of Jean- 

         us, Guichard was again accused of poisoning. They claimed that epi- 

         the osprey was in love with her and sought her reciprocity, and since 

         she did not respond to his courtship, then he resorted to witchcraft 

         charms. The devil taught him how to make a wax figure, however 

         Guichard, not seeing the direct result of fi- 

         gurka, threw it into the fire, and in the same world the queen died. 

         Louis X the Quarrelsome (1289-1316), King of France from 1314 

         of the year. 

118 

         Angeran Marigny was rich, close to Philip K the handsome. 

         After the death of the latter, the Count of Valois accused Marigny before 

         Louis X that he squandered the state treasury. 

         Marigny was convicted and hanged (1315). Among those built 

         he was also accused of forcing his wife and her 

         sister to communicate with the sorcerer, who, by their order, made 

         wax figurines depicting the king, his relatives and 

         etc. With the help of these figurines, Marigny allegedly wanted to destroy 

         a lot 

119 

         I Zabella (d. 1358), Queen of England, daughter of Philip IV 

         and wife of Edward II of England. Together with your lover 

         M ortimer, she recruited troops in Flanders and France and 

         with the help of her brother, Charles K, the handsome, she overthrew and killed 

         Edward II. 

1   90 

         Edward II of England (1284-1327), King of England from 1307 

         of the year. 

121 

         If you put a comma after the word "occidere", then the phrase can be 

         will translate something like this: “Eduard - to kill, not to be afraid 

         follows", and if after "nolite", then this: "Do not kill Edward, 

         should be afraid." 

         And I mean Ferdinand II of Aragon (1452-1516), who 

         the role of Aragon since 1479, Sicily since 1468, Castile in 1479— 

         1504, husband of I Zabella K of Astil. During his reign there was 

         the Reconquista was completed, the expeditions of H.Kolumba were carried out, the 

         Evana Navarra, Neapolitan kingdom annexed. 

1 2 3 

         Raymond Lull, Spanish scientist, religious thinker. 

         Born in 1229 on the island of Mallorca. Was a member of a spiritual order, 

         however, he was more attracted to the preaching work of the middle 

         di non-Christian peoples, especially Muslims, so he 

         started learning Arabic. On my own, without having 

         papal sanction, made many missionary journeys 

         actions to North Africa. It was believed that Lull was engaged in 

         alchemy and with its help makes gold for the English 

         king, which is why many called him a heretic and acted 

                                                                   453 



        against his canonization. Author of many works on alchemy, me 

        discipline, philosophy. 

        Flamel, Nicola - French scientist. Born in the middle 

        XIV century, in a poor family in Pontoise. At first, he was involved in composing 

        horoscopes, astrology, prediction of the future. Then 

        carried away by the search for a philosophical amn, however, confusedzyxwvutsrqp 

                                                                        uh 

        this issue, decided to seek help from Jewish scholars, 

        living in Spain. In 1382, he allegedly managed to get 

        artificial gold. He died in 1414, bequeathing all his 

        property to hospitals and monasteries. 

        Helmont, Jan Baptist van (1557-1624), German naturalist 

        losophist, follower of Paracelsus. Born into a noble family in Bua 

        ledkzh in B rabante. 

1 2 6 

        See note. 82. 

127 

        Flagellants are members of a religious movement that arose in 

        1210 in Italy. Exposed themselves during public trials 

        this scourging as a sign of repentance of ayaniya and "baptism of blood", giving, 

        in their opinion, the expiation of all sins. In 1349 condemned 

        church to heretics. 

128 

        Carl VI (1380-1422), French king from the Wa-dynasty 

        lua, mentally ill. 

129 

        Probably, P shibyshevsky means Wenceslas IV, King of the Czech Republic 

         in 1378-1419, which was also in 1378-1400. emperor 

         Holy Roman Empire. 

ion 



        Most likely, the author is talking about Peter I the Just, Portuguese 

        king in 1357-1367. Distinguished by extreme fairness 

        stu. 

131 

        After the death of Gregory XI, who moved his residence from 

        Avignon in R&M, the Roman people began to demand the Pope of Italy 

         of origin. And m was chosen by Archbishop Bartolomeo 

         Prignano, who became Pope Urban VI. A little while later 

         French to ardin als, annulling the decision of the previous 

         conclave elected another pope. And m became Cardinal Robert Zhe- 

         Nevsky (1378), who took the name of Kliment VII and tried to 

         with the help of weapons to conquer R and m. N about the Romans supported Ur- 

         Bana and Kliment were forced to leave for Avignon, where he restored 

         former papal administration. From that moment in the Catholic 

         church begins the so-called. Great split. After Urban's death 

         B oniface IX (1389-1404) became Pope VI (1389-1404), and in 1394 in 

         Avignon succeeded to the throne of Clement VII - Benedict 

         XIII. On the side of the Avignon popes were the royal courts 

         France, Naples, Scotland, Germany. Pope under- 

         held by England, Portugal, Hungary. Other countries 

         assumed neutrality. 

        And it means the Marquis Jeanne de Brevieux, who in the end 

         was executed. 



- 1 OO 

         The characteristic of fashion, no doubt, was borrowed by P. Shibyshevsky 

         from the book of J. M. and Schle "The Witch", the influence of which on the author of "Si- 

         the nakedness of Satan" is undeniable. 



                                Part two 



       Here Pshibyshevsky repeats the tendentious interpretation 

       letters of Gregory I the Great to Desiderius, Bishop of Vienne, in which 

       In the torus, he speaks of the impossibility for the clergy with equal 

       zeal to indulge in the study of ancient heritage and Scripture, 

       works of the Church Fathers. 

    Francis of Assisi (1181-1226), Italian religious 

       actively. Born in the family of a cloth merchant an ya mi. In 1206 he left 

       from home and devoted himself to preaching poverty to the ak perfect 

       forms of love for God. In 1207-1209. along with their after- 

       The founders of the Order of the Minorite Brothers were his trustees. 

        "The experience of reassessing all values" - the subtitle of the book 

       F. Nitzsche "The Will to Power". 

    * * Agrippa Nettesheimsky (Heinrich Cornelius), German writer, 

       philosopher, doctor. Born in 1486 in Cologne, died in 1535 

       known for his research in the field of alchemy. 

    5 Paracelsus (Philipp Aureol Theophrastus Bombast von Hohenheim), 

       German physician and alchemist, Swiss by birth. Ro- 

       died in 1493 died in 1541 

 "Kliment VI (1342-1352), pope. By origin 

       Frenchman. In 1347 he bought Avignon for 80,000 gold flo- 

       rinov from John I, Count of Provence and Naples. P patroness- 

       led the study of classical languages, the development of astronomy. 

       Apparently, we are talking about Louis V of Bavaria, impe- 

       ator of the Holy Roman Empire, with whom Kli- 

       ment VI. 

  ' Melitta - in ancient Greek mythology, the name of several persons 

       press. Here, probably, the priestess of Demeter from Eastma is meant, 

       torn to pieces by its neighbors. 

 ° Astarte - in West Semitic mythology, the personification of the planet 

       Venus, goddess of love and fertility, warrior goddess. In email 

       linistic period Astarte was identified with the Greek Af- 

       with rhodium. 

 ** Kibela - the Great Mother of the gods. This goddess demanded from her 

       servants of complete submission, forgetting oneself in a crazy resurrection 

       bargaining and ecstasy, when the priestesses of K and Bela inflicted blood on each other 

       your wounds, and the neophytes castrated themselves in the name of the goddess. Cybele 

       appeared on a golden chariot with a crown in the form of a jagged 

       towers; she was surrounded by a crowd of attendants, lions and panthers. Late- 

       her, in imperial Rome, K ibela became the patroness of the blessed 

       the state of cities and the whole state. 

      Semiramis - in ancient Greek mythology, the daughter of the Syrian god 

       Gini Derketo. Left in the mountains, she was fed by pigeons, 



                                                                   455 



     fed by the shepherds. First, she married a wavy councilor. 

     king of lon, but soon became the wife of the ruler himself, Ni- 

     on the. After her death, she turned into a dove. All this is mythological 

     graphic frame of the legend about the Babylonian queen Shammura- 

     mat (late 9th century BC). 

11 Maya (Skt. "cunning, deceit") - an illusion personified 

     Hindu mythology in the person of the goddess, whose goal was 

     cheating people. In Bhagavad Gita the whole world was the creation of Maya 

     - a spectacle in which everything is an illusion. And sometimes identified 

     with Durga, the wife of SH and you, as the source of witchcraft. 

1^ Devas - in Iranian mythology, evil spirits opposing the good 

     gim — ahuram. 

1 "Gaia is mother earth in ancient Greek mythology. She herself is from 

     Uranus, the sky, gave birth to herself and took him as her husband. With him 

     she gave birth to the titans, among whom were Kronos and Rhea, ro- 

     children of Zeus. 

• ^ Lamy: 1. In ancient Greek mythology, a monster, the daughter of Posei- 

     don. H was once the beloved of Zeus, but after 

     Hera's wife killed her children, Lamia was forced to take refuge in 

     cave and turn into a bloody monster, kidnapping and 

     devouring other people's children. In addition, Hera deprived her of sleep, 

     so she wanders at night. In addition, lamias were called 

     night ghosts sucking the blood out of young men. 2. In mi- 

     phology of the peoples of Europe an evil spirit, a snake with a head and chest 

     a beautiful wife. It is believed that lamia can kill children, 

     seduce men, drink their blood. Lives in forests, ravines, 

     abandoned lands. 

1 ^ Strigs - in Roman mythology, witches, winged creatures, 

     descended from harpies. They took the form of birds so that at night 

     attack babies. About one tradition, haircuts are a must 

     bloodsuckers, according to another - they kidnapped children, leaving in return 

     straw man. White thorns served as amulets against them. 

     In medieval Europe, the term "strigi" was transferred to evil 

     spirits to such. In Germany, in the scientific literature, they sometimes 

     meant witches. 

•• Lilith is an evil spirit, usually female, in Jewish mythology. 

     logic. She takes possession of men against their will in order to 

     have children from them. Therefore, the Talmud does not recommend men 

     sleep at home alone. It was believed that Lilith not only brings 

     spoiling babies and harassing them, or kidnapping and sweeping 

     takes children; she was also attributed to damage to women in labor and women's 

     infertility. According to one legend, Lilith was the wife of Hell 

     ma: God, having created Adam, made his wife Lilith out of clay. But 

     they quarreled and Lilith flew away. The angels caught up with her and took her 

     her oath that she would not enter a house in which she saw them 

     or their names. According to other legends, she was the wife of Samael 

     and mother of demons. 



456 



    7 

*   "Hammer of the Witches" by Jacob Schprenger and Heinrich Institoris     of the book 

     ha, written by two Cologne theologians, published in 1486 

     g. and acquired great fame and authority among secular 

     and spiritual judges. The provisions contained therein soon became 

     be considered equal to the law. Until 1669, withstood 29 

     denmark. There is an incomplete translation of this book into Russian 

     language (M ., 1990). 

1° Sirach - meaning the book of Jesus the son of Sirach, part of Vet- 

     hogo testament. 

1 9 

    And John Chrysostom (347-407), father of the Eastern Church, issues 

     current theologian and preacher, Archbishop of Constantinople 

     sky in 398-404. Among his many works are 

     those that are devoted to the problems of Christian demonology 

     gii (To Stagirius the ascetic, three words). Huge attention 

     devoted to the problems of Christian and human morality, 

     share against idle entertainment and distortion of Christian 

     ethics. 

2° Lucius Annaeus Seneca (4-65), Roman philosopher, representative 

     Stoic Platonism. He was the tutor of Emperor Nero. 

     Accused of high treason, committed suicide 

     murder. He also became famous as the author of tragedies. 

21 These places, called "the seal of the devil," used to evoke 

     great interest among the judges, because it was here that they pricked long 

     with a needle, checking the fact of a person's possession. More about 

     see the essay by R. Hart. 

• ^ Pierre de Lankr (1550-1631), famous French lawyer, 

     engaged in witchcraft processes in the lands of the Basques. P rigo- 

     stole to death ca. 600 people. His father was a wealthy winemaker 

     scrap of Basque origin. Pierre studied law in Turin and 

     Czech Republic, then became a judge. In 1609, two people from the town 

     Labour sent a petition to the French Parliament asking 

     appoint them a judge who would put an end to the witches in this 

     region. De Lankra was sent there, according to whom this 

     edge was ok. 3000 people, incl. and clergymen, 

     marked with the seal of the devil. In 1595 he published a large 

     work entitled “To the picture of the inconstancy of bad angels and 

     demons", in which he described in detail the demonic hierarchy, 

     dividing the entire army of darkness into 9 ranks. 

^ With regard to the "fire resistance" of witches and the use of fire of a single 

     there is no opinion among demonologists. Finally sentenced 

     sorcerers were burned to death so that their bodies could not be restored 

     curl. 

24 Delrio, Martin Antonio (1551-1608), famous Spanish 

     sky demonologist. Born in Antwerp in an aristocratic 

     family of Spanish origin. And studied philosophy and law in 

     Paris, Douai and Louvain. He entered the Jesuit order. Later pre- 

     gave the right. His book "And investigations of magic" (1599) to 

     middle of the 18th century published 20 times. 



                                                              457 



2 5 

    Wallace (Wallas), Alfred Russell (1823-1903), famous an- 

     Glian natural philosopher who developed the theory of evolution 

     Darwin. This book was published in 1881. 

26 The following description of Satan is taken from de Lancre. Here and 

     further in the description of the coven, etc. P Shibyshevsky follows already 

     the mentioned book by J. M and sh le. About the time of the Shaba- 

     shi usually coincided with Christian holidays - Easter, 

     Trinity, And Vanom's day, etc. In a small size, the covens are right 

     lyalis and weekdays, once a week. 

Shibyshevsky is mistaken - the material god of the Cathars was 

     evil, but basic. Good god to just invisible, non-material 

     al. 

28 Another mistake - the Cathars never honored an evil god. 

29 Wier (more correctly Weyer), I ohanne (1515-1588) - German 

     physician, demonologist, opposed witch-hunts. I thought that 

     most witches are just medically ill 

     women. However, he believed in the devil and his legions, 

     whose leaders he described in the treatise “On pseudo-monarchy 

     demons", although he denied that the devil endows witches with power 

     harm people. He believed that people's faith in witchcraft is 

     the fruit of the devil's work and the church, supporting it, plays to him 

     on hand. He said that all evil is caused by Satan, not by witches. 

"^ The Black Mass is a rite of worship to Satan, parodying the Catholic 

      mass, a kind of requiem for a living person with 

      intent on harming him. 

"• * Bartolomeo de Spina - famous demonologist of the 15th century. 

32 This story is borrowed by the author from the book by J.B. 

      nomania of witches" (1580). It is not clear how they use the publication 

      P. Shibyshevsky fell, since in the Paris edition of 1598 

      of the year is the 5th chapter of the II part (p. 245). 

Somnambulism - the degree of unconscious human activity 

      up to clairvoyance. 

"''* Remigius - Nicholas Remy (1530-1612), French judge, 

      demonologist. He is believed to have been sentenced to death for ten years 

      its activities in Lorraine County 900 witches. In 1595 he published 

      in Lyon "Three Books on Devil Worship". This example is taken 

      from 14 ch. III to n. 

   Nider, Iogann - the author of the classic demonological work 

    • Muravynik", which was usually published as an appendix 

   provisions for the Hammer of the Witches. 

"° Gilles de Ré - Marshal of France Gilles de Laval, Baron de Ré. 

    After spending several years at the court of Charles VII, he retired to his 

    estate, where he took up alchemy, wanting to discover the secret of 

    management of gold. In order to appease the devil and win him 

    help in this matter, he sacrificed up to 200 boys; 

    after his arrest, a lot of children's skulls were found in the dungeon and 

    bones. 



158 



  'zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJIHGFEDCBA 

l 

    We are talking about the mania of obsession that seized the nuns of the monastery. 

     rya St. Elizabeth in Louviers. A more detailed description of all this 

     case is contained in a book written down under the dictation of one of his 

     participants, Madeleine Vovan, and published in Rouen in 1652. She 

     first made a pact with the devil at the insistence of the confessor 

      monastery of father Pikar and very soon felt possessed 

     press, imagined that the devils were beating her, that she was being pursued by his 

     love cat with glowing eyes. During the investigation it was 

      found that out of 52 nuns, 6 were “really possessed” 

      mymi”, and the rest suffered from hysteria. Madeleine was imprisoned 

      forever in prison, Pikar's corpse dug out of the ground, held 

      the trial of his successor Boulier, who was 

      a sign to the guilty and, together with the bones of Pikar, was burned on August 21 

      1647 at the Fish Market in Rouen. 

3° Des Eiliers (or Deseyers) - Catherine Monvoisin. According to legend, in 

      her garden was buried 2500 children's corpses and unborn 

      embryos, and the rat poison seized during the search is quite 

      it would be enough to send several hundred people to the next world. 

      Her services were used by the Duchess of Orleans, the Duchess 

      Bouillon, Marquise de Montespan. 

"" Huysman, Georges (1848-1907) - Belgian writer, author 

      numerous popular decadent novels "On the contrary", 

      "There, below" (another name for "Abyss"), in which a large 

      place is occupied by occult and demonic motifs. All these 

      the novels have been translated into Russian. The influence of J. Gu- 

      Isman on S.P. Shibyshevsky was very strong, and we think 

      that the frequent use of the word a 

      rebours is associated precisely with the first novel by J. Guksman, which 

      ry in the original bears exactly this name. 

* "Leo Taxil (nast, name Gabriel Antoine Jogan-Pazhes, 1854— 

      1907), French journalist, writer, popular historian 

      congestion and mystifier. Together with Carl Hux, he produced il- 

      Illustrated Bulletin "The Devil in the 19th Century". 

4* Adonai - "master", this term is often applied to 

      people in the sense of "master, master." Replace the word And ehovah. 

"And Yehovah - in the Jewish religion and philosophy, one of the names of God, 

      denoting eternity, originality and immutability of His being 

      stva. And Yehovah can also be translated as "Existing". 

     Rosicrucians - a secret religious and mystical (later and half- 

      itic) current, adjacent to Freemasonry. Legendary Os- 

      innovator — Christian Rosenkreutzer (1378- —1484), symbol — 

      rose and cross. 

44 Stanislas de Gueta (or de Guaita), b. I 860, d. 1898 Poet, 

      writer, one of the organizers of the new Kabbalistic order 

      on the Rosicrucians, in the development of the statute of which an active 

      J.Enkos also took part, better known under the pseudonym 

      P apus. P ended his life by suicide. 



                                                            459 



                             R . Hart 

                       HISTORY OF WITCHCRAFT 



    An outline of the history of medieval witchcraft in Western Europe was 

written by Roger Hart for Oxford students as a sub- 

preparatory reading for a more in-depth study of this phenomenon 

of Western European culture. Translation made according to the publication: H art R. 

Witchcraft, London, 1971. 







    * R. Burton "Anatomy of Melancholy" (1652). 

 2 

       L.Wilson «Account of his life». 

    3 

       JH .Z opft "Essertation on the Servant Vampires". 

    4 

       R.Scot «The Discovery of Witchcraft» (1584). 

    " S.H arsnett «D eclaration of Popish Impostures» (1599). 

    ^ For full text, see: J.S. Prenger, G.Institoris. Molot 

        witches. M., 1990, pp. 59-61. 

       B ulla 1501 "When we received it." 

    ° See his Compendium Maleficarum and cf. with treatise 

        And ohanna Trittemia. 

    9 

       W.West "Symboleography" (1594). 

 1" Compare the corresponding fragments from the "Dialogue" by J. Gifford. 

 • Ч G ratian «D ecretum». 

 1^ An example is taken by R. Hart from the book of F.-M. Guazzo “Compendium 

       of witches" (1608). 

1 3 

      T.Ady «A Candle in the D ark» (1656). 

1 4 

      T. Hobbes "Leviathan" (1651). 

1 5 

      E.Spenser «The F aerie Queene» (1590). 

1 6 

      R. Bovet "Pandemonium" (1684). 

1 7 

      T.P otts «The Wonderfull Discoverie of Witches» (1613). 

1(5 

      See note 5. 

1 9 

      See note 4. 

2 0 

      W.Rowley, T.D ekker, J.F ord. «The Witch of Edmonton», V акт. 

       (1658). 

2 1 

      See Treatise L. - M. Sinistrari, ch.I ll in this edition. 

2 2 

      JF on tain e. "Marks of Sorieres" (1611). 

2 3 

      R.H .Robbins «Encyclopaedia of Witchcraft and Demonology» (1959). 

2 4 

      G .Mackenzie «Laws and customs of Scotland» (1678). 

2 5 

      See note 12. 

2 6 

      JN ider "F ormicarius" (approx. 1435). 

2 7 

      «Trial account of Isobel G owdie, Scotland» (1662). 

2 8 

      See note 12. 

2 9 

      «The Apprehension and Confession of Three N otorious Witches... 

       in the county of Essex» (1589). 

3 0 

      «Doctor Lambis D arling» (1653). 

3 1 

      See note 27. 

3 2 

      «News from Scotland» (1591). 



460 



3 3 

    C it. Quoted from: RH .Robbins "Encyclopaedia", p.317. 

3 4 

    See note 12. 

3 5 

    There. 

3 

  ^ Cit. Quoted from: RH .Robbins "Encyclopaedia", p.421. 

3 7 

    Ц ит. по: R. Seth. «In th e name of the Devil» (1969). 

3 8 

    H .M ore. «An Antidote against Atheism» (1653). 

3 9 

    Case I zabel Gaudí, Scotland, 1662 

4 0 

    See note 37. 

4 1 

    There. 

4 2 

    C. Penser. "Commentary..." (1560). 

4 3 

    See note 12. 

4 4 

    See note 39. 

4 5 

    There. 

4 6 

    Candidus Brognolus of Bergamo. "Manual of Exorcists" (1651) 

4 7 

     «Wonderful discovery of Witches in the County of Lancashire» 

     (1613). 

4 8 

    See note 39. 

4 9 

    There. 

    Proceedings of the Chelmsford witch trial of 1616 

°1 This spell was cast by James Davies in Lancashire 

     witch trial of 1612 

5 2 

    C it. by: R.Seth. "In th e name..." 

    Ibid. (taken from the materials of I. Gaudí's trial). 

5 4 

    There. 

5 5 

    There. 

5 6 

    W.P erkins. «A D iscourse of the D amned Art of Witchcraft» (1608). 

5 7 

    R.Eden. «H istory of the Travel in the West and East Indies» (1577). 

5 8 

    See note 37. 

5 9 

    R.H errick. «A Mocking View of Exorcism». 

D u 

    The exact date of the founding of the Inquisition still does not exist. 

     More common and justified is another - 1231/1233. 

*> 1 Council of Trent of the Catholic Church (13.XII.1545 - 

     4.XII.1563), convened to address issues of combating pro- 

     testantism and opposition to the power of emperors. Were 

     anathematized the main provisions of Protestant dogma 

     to and, it is confirmed that the authority of the pope is higher than the authority of the councils, 

     and the dogmas of the Catholic Church remain in the form in which 

     they were developed in the Middle Ages. The cathedral was fortified 

     the positions of the bishops, who were also credited with the foundation 

     to develop special educational facilities for the training of new personnel; 

     conducting - seminary. In 1564, the so-called 

     "Professio fidei Tridentina", for whose loyalty they were supposed to 

     swear all the clerics and professors of Universities. By- 

     formation of the cathedral were not accepted unconditionally in many 

     European countries, incl. in Spain. 

°2 Sylvester Prierio (1456-1523) Italian theologian, demo- 

     nolog. In this case, we mean its well-known product 



                                                                   461 



      denie "The three books of the sorcerers, and of the wonders of the demons... and 

      on the basis of forming a process against them. 

"° In the Russian translation of The Hammer of the Witches, G.K. Ramer speaks under 

      with his Latin surname - G.I nstitoris. 

6 4 

     C it. by: RH .Robbins. Op. cit. 

6 5 

     P.Limborch. «H istory of the Inquisition» (1692). 

6 6 

     F. von Spee. "Cautio criminalis" (1631). 

6 7 

     J.Lin don . «H istory of Treves». 

D o 

     Cornelius Agrippa On the Uncertainty and Vanity of Science (1531). 

6 9 

     C it. by: RH .Robbins. Op. cit. 

 '" The letter is dated July 24, 1628. 

7 1 

     C it. by: RH .Robbins. Op. cit. 

7 2 

     There. 

7 3 

     "Statutes of the Realm", v.3, p.837. All of the following official 

      cial documents are cited from the same collection. 

7 4 

     This sermon was delivered in 1560. 

 '" All materials of the Chelmsford Trial are cited in: "The 

      Examenation and Confession of Certain Witches at Chelmsford» 

      (1566). 

7 6 

     W.N otestein. «H istory of Witchcraft in Englang» (1911). 

7 7 

     Speech of James VI at Talbot, 1591 

7 8 

     «Statutes of the Realm», v.4, part 2, p.1028 

7 9 

     Jam es I . «Demonology» (1597). 

8 

   "The Laws of Hammurabi. 

8 1 

     T.F uller. «Church H istory of Britain» (1655). 

8 2 

     F .H utchinson. «H istorical essay concerning Witchcraft» (1718). 

8 3 

     Butler S. «H adibras» (1664). 

8 4 

     F .H utchinson. Op. cit. 

8 5 

     There. 

8 6 

     «A trial of Witches...» (1682). 

8 7 

     There. 

8 8 

     J.Wagstaffe. «The Question of Witchcraft Debated» (1669). 

8 9 

     M .Summers. «The G eography of Witchcraft» (1927). 

9 0 

     C it. by: RH .Robbins. Op. cit. 

9 1 

     «News from Scotland...» (1591). 

9 2 

     See note 4. 

9 3 

     C it. by: RH .Robbins. Op. cit. 

9 4 

     P .Jan et. «The major symptoms of H ysteria» (1907). 

9 5 

     C.H ansen. «Witchcraft at Salem» (1970). 

9 6 

     RH .Robbins. op. cit. 









462 



                    LIST AND ILLUSTRATION 









p.   23   Martial arts of an old woman and a devil (engraving, Germany, 

            XVII century) 

p.   46   The witch receives the spirit from the Black Man (Satan) 

p.   74   The devil in the form of a winged goat appears before 

            people standing in a magic circle (engraving from the beginning of 

            XVII century) 

p. 123     F. Goya "Witches" 

p. 155     Witches who cause a storm (from the book by W. Molitor 

            "O Lamia x", 1489) 

            Penitential clothes for those who have renounced and who have not confessed 

            sorcerers 

            Shabash (engraving, France, 1640) 

            Witches preparing an ointment for flying to the Sabbat 

            (engraving by G. Baldung) 

p. 289     The devil on a black horse carries a woman away from home 

            (engraving, 1555) 

p. 291     A. Kneling "Witches" 

page 292     Feast after the Sabbath (engraving, 1608) 

p. 301     Interrogation of witches from North Berwick before James VI 

            (engraving from the book "News from Scotland", 1591) 

p. 324     Title page of N. Crouch "Kingdom of Darkness" 

            (1688, England) 

p. 334     And a needle for piercing the “seals” of the devil 

p. 338     Third Trial at Chelmsford (1589) Joan Prentice 

            hanged for witchcraft (England, 16th century) 

p. 344     Devil in the form of a goat with a candle and a broom. Around 

            his assistants are dancing (engraving, England, 16th century) 

p. 367     Instruments of torture at trials in Bamberg (Germany, 

            XVII century) 

p. 368     And the trials of the witch with water (engraving, England, 16th century) 

p. 371     Koldun on his way to the place of execution (Bamberg, Germany, 

            XVII century) 

p. 374     Bamberg trials: torture chamber with strappados 

p. 391     M. Hopkins presides at Chelmsford 

            process of 1645; animals - spirits of witches 

p. 399     K. Mather 



    And the illustrations are taken from the collections of the library of the British Museum, 

Weyland Library, Munsell Collection and Lambeth Library 

palace. 



                                                             463 



                                         CONTENT 







ML Timofeev.           D e m o n o l o g y in the epoch of rena s ta cy                         3 



      Part one . "ALL EARTH P R E I F O N A D E M O S" 



И о а н н zyxwvutsrqponmlkjihgfedcbaZYXWVUTSRQPONMLKJI 

           Trittemius. T r a c t a t o bad people and sorcerers. 

TLep.EA.IIIepeyd   and MA.Timofeev                                           13 

P o r i n s e r i n g t h e famous witches in C h a m s f o r d . 

Tlep.MA- Timofeev                                                                               3V> 

About the evil deed of the new witch. 

P e r . ML.Timofeev                                                                               51 

George Gnfford. Dialogue about witches and witchcraft. 

P e r . ML.Timofeev                                                                               59 

Unusual message about the six most manifested sorcerers. 

P e r . MA.Timofeev                                                                             149 

Friedrich von Sh p e e . C aut io cr im in a lis, i l i O p ro cess pr o ti v e 

witches. Lane VA- Gafner                                                                           157 

S .S i ran o de Berg e cancer. Z a k o l dun o v . P r o t i v k o l dun o v . 

States and empires of the Sun (fragments). 

P e r . N. V. Simonova                                                                           173 

Ludovico Maria Sinistrari. About demon n and a li tete and besti ali tete 

and n to ubo in and with uk to ub about in. P e r . Z . F. W                                                   2 0] 



       Part two . N O NO SAVING IN THE FORCES OF THE DARK 



S tan and sla in P shibysh vs ky. S and n ago ha s a ta ny. 

Hier.SL.Koiransky                                                                               24i 

Roger Hart. And the history of witchcraft. 

P er. ML.Timofeev                                                                               317 

Notes                                                                                     40ft 

List of illustrations                                                                               463 









                           Demonology of the Renaissance 

                                 (16th - 17th centuries) 



      LR No. 030457 dated 12/14/92. Signed for publication on May 25, 1992. 

     Format 60 x 90 1/16. Offset paper. Offset printing. 

  Uslovn.pech.l. 29, 0. Uch.- izd.l. 26.52. Circulation 5000 BC Order )00 



      And the publishing house "Russian Political Encyclopedia" 

 129256, Moscow, st. Wilhelm P and k a, 4. Tel. 181-00-13, 181-01-1 l 

 Printed from the finished original layout at the Moscow Printing House No. 2 RAS 

                     121099, Moscow, Shubinsky per., 6 



476
